‫أدوﺑﻲ ﺳﻴﺴﺘﻴﻤﺰ إﻧﻜﻮرﺑﻮرﻳﺘـﺪ‬ ‫رﻓﺾ اﻟﻀﻤﺎن واﺗﻔﺎﻗﻴﺔ ﺗﺮﺧﻴﺺ ﺑﺮاﻣﺞ آﻤﺒﻴﻮﺗﺮ.‬ ‫هﺬا اﻟﻤﺴﺘﻨﺪ ﻳﺸﻤﻞ ﻣﻌﻠﻮﻣﺎت اﻟﻀﻤﺎن )اﻟﺠﺰء اﻷول( واﺗﻔﺎﻗﻴﺔ ﺗﺮﺧﻴﺺ ﺗﺸﻤﻞ اﺳﺘﺨﺪام ﺑﺮاﻣﺞ أدوﺑﻲ )اﻟﺠﺰء اﻟﺜﺎﻧﻲ(.‬ ‫اﻟﺠﺰء اﻷول. رﻓﺾ اﻟﻀﻤﺎن.‬ ‫ﻳﺘﻢ ﺗﺴﻠﻴﻢ ﺑﺮﻧﺎﻣﺞ اﻟﻜﻤﺒﻴﻮﺗﺮ إﻟﻴﻜﻢ ﻓﻲ ﺣﺎﻟﺘﻪ "آﻤﺎ هﻮ" وﺑﺠﻤﻴﻊ أﺧﻄﺎﺋﻪ .وﻻ ﺗﻘﺪم أدوﺑﻲ وﻻ ﻣﻮردوهﺎ وﻻ ﺟﻬﺎت إﺻﺪار اﻟﺸﻬﺎدات وﻻ ﻳﻤﻜﻨﻬﺎ ﺿﻤﺎن اﻷداء‬ ‫أو اﻟﻨﺘﺎﺋﺞ اﻟﺘﻲ ﻳﻤﻜﻨﻚ اﻟﺤﺼﻮل ﻋﻠﻴﻬﺎ ﺑﺎﺳﺘﺨﺪام ﺑﺮﻧﺎﻣﺞ اﻟﻜﻤﺒﻴﻮﺗﺮ أو ﺧﺪﻣﺎت ﺟﻬﺔ إﺻﺪار اﻟﺸﻬﺎدات أو ﻋﺮوض اﻟﻐﻴﺮ اﻷﺧﺮى. وﺑﺎﺳﺘﺜﻨﺎء ﻣﺎ ﻳﻜﻮن ﺧﺎﺻﺎ‬ ‫ً‬ ‫ﺑﺄي ﺿﻤﺎن أو ﺷﺮط أو ﺗﻌﻬﺪ أو ﺷﺮط ﻻ ﻳﻤﻜﻦ اﺳﺘﺜﻨﺎؤﻩ أو ﺗﺤﺪﻳﺪﻩ ﺑﻤﻮﺟﺐ اﻟﻘﺎﻧﻮن اﻟﻤﻌﻤﻮل ﺑﻪ ﻓﻲ ﺟﻬﺔ اﻻﺧﺘﺼﺎص اﻟﻘﻀﺎﺋﻲ اﻟﺘﻲ ﺗﺘﺒﻌﻬﺎ، ﻓﺈن أدوﺑﻲ‬ ‫وﻣﻮر ّﻳﻬﺎ وﺷﺮآﺎﺗﻬﺎ اﻟﺰﻣﻴﻠﺔ ﻟﻦ ﻳﻘﺪﻣﻮا أﻳﺔ ﺿﻤﺎﻧﺎت أو ﺷﺮوط أو ﺑﻴﺎﻧﺎت ﺗﻤﺜﻴﻞ أو أﺣﻜﺎم، )ﺻﺮﻳﺤﺔ أم ﺿﻤﻨﻴﺔ، ﺳﻮاء ﺑﻤﻮﺟﺐ اﻟﺘﺸﺮﻳﻊ أو اﻟﻘﺎﻧﻮن اﻟﻌﺎم أو‬ ‫د‬ ‫اﻟﻌﺮف أو اﻻﺳﺘﺨﺪام أو ﻏﻴﺮ ذﻟﻚ( ﻣﻤﺎ ﻳﺘﻌﻠﻖ ﺑﺄﻳﺔ ﻣﺴﺎﺋﻞ أﺧﺮى، وﻳﺸﻤﻞ ذﻟﻚ وﻟﻜﻨﻪ ﻻ ﻳﻘﺘﺼﺮ ﻋﻠﻰ، ﻋﺪم اﻻﻧﺘﻬﺎك ﻟﺤﻘﻮق اﻟﻐﻴﺮ أو اﻟﻤﻠﻜﻴﺔ أو ﻗﺎﺑﻠﻴﺔ‬ ‫اﻟﻌﺮض ﻟﻠﺴﻮق أو اﻟﺘﻜﺎﻣﻞ أو اﻟﺠﻮدة اﻟﻤﺮﺿﻴﺔ أو اﻟﻤﻼءﻣﺔ ﻷي ﻏﺮض ﻣﺤﺪد وﺧﺎص.‬ ‫اﻟﺠﺰء اﻟﺜﺎﻧﻲ. اﺗﻔﺎﻗﻴﺔ ﺗﺮﺧﻴﺺ ﺑﺮاﻣﺞ آﻤﺒﻴﻮﺗﺮ.‬ ‫ﻋﻨﺪ ﻗﻴﺎﻣﻚ ﺑﺎﺳﺘﺨﺪام أو ﻧﺴﺦ أو ﺗﻮزﻳﻊ آﻞ أو أي ﺟﺰء ﻣﻦ ﺑﺮﻧﺎﻣﺞ أدوﺑﻲ، ﻓﺄﻧﺖ ﺑﺬﻟﻚ ﺗﻮاﻓﻖ ﻋﻠﻰ وﺗﻘﺒﻞ ﺟﻤﻴﻊ أﺣﻜﺎم وﺷﺮوط هﺬﻩ اﻻﺗﻔﺎﻗﻴﺔ، ﺑﻤﺎ ﻓﻲ ذﻟﻚ،‬ ‫وﻋﻠﻰ وﺟﻪ اﻟﺘﺤﺪﻳﺪ، اﻟﻨﺼﻮص اﻟﺘﺎﻟﻴﺔ: اﻻﺳﺘﺨﺪام اﻟﻮارد ﻓﻲ اﻟﻤﺎدة 2؛ اﻟﻘﺎﺑﻠﻴﺔ ﻟﻠﻨﻘﻞ ﻓﻲ اﻟﻤﺎدة 4؛ اﻟﺘﻮﺻﻴﻞ واﻟﺨﺼﻮﺻﻴﺔ ﻓﻲ اﻟﻤﺎدة 6؛ اﻟﻀﻤﺎن ﻓﻲ اﻟﻤﺎدة 9‬ ‫واﻟﻤﺴﺆوﻟﻴﺔ ﻓﻲ اﻟﻤﺎدة 01 واﻟﻤﺎدة 61. ﻋﻨﺪ ﻗﺒﻮﻟﻬﺎ ﺗﻜﻮن هﺬﻩ اﻻﺗﻔﺎﻗﻴﺔ ﻗﺎﺑﻠﺔ ﻟﻠﺘﻄﺒﻴﻖ ﺿﺪك وﺿﺪ أي آﻴﺎن ﺣﺼﻞ ﻋﻠﻰ ﺑﺮﻧﺎﻣﺞ اﻟﺤﺎﺳﻮب وﺗﻢ اﺳﺘﺨﺪاﻣﻪ‬ ‫ﺑﺎﻟﻨﻴﺎﺑﺔ ﻋﻨﻪ. إذا ﻟﻢ ﺗﻮاﻓﻖ ﻋﻠﻰ أﺣﻜﺎم هﺬﻩ اﻻﺗﻔﺎﻗﻴﺔ، ﻻ ﺗﺴﺘﺨﺪم ﺑﺮﻧﺎﻣﺞ اﻟﻜﻤﺒﻴﻮﺗﺮ.‬ ‫ﻻ ﺗﺴﻤﺢ ﻟﻚ أدوﺑﻲ ﺑﺎﺳﺘﺨﺪام ﺑﺮﻧﺎﻣﺞ اﻟﻜﻤﺒﻴﻮﺗﺮ إﻻ وﻓﻘﺎ ﻟﺸﺮوط هﺬﻩ اﻻﺗﻔﺎﻗﻴﺔ. اﺳﺘﺨﺪام ﺑﻌﺾ ﻣﻮاد اﻟﻐﻴﺮ اﻟﻤﺘﻀﻤﻨﺔ ﻓﻲ اﻟﺒﺮﻧﺎﻣﺞ ﻗﺪ ﻳﺨﻀﻊ ﻷﺣﻜﺎم وﺷﺮوط‬ ‫ً‬ ‫ً‬ ‫أﺧﺮى ﺗﻮﺟﺪ ﺗﺤﺪﻳﺪا ﻓﻲ اﺗﻔﺎﻗﻴﺔ ﺗﺮﺧﻴﺺ ﻣﻨﻔﺼﻠﺔ أو ﻓﻲ ﻣﻠﻒ "إﻗﺮأﻧﻲ/‪ "READ ME‬اﻟﻤﻮﺟﻮد ﺑﺎﻟﻘﺮب ﻣﻦ ﺗﻠﻚ اﻟﻤﻮاد أو ﻓﻲ "إﺷﻌﺎرات ﺑﺮاﻣﺞ آﻤﺒﻴﻮﺗﺮ‬ ‫اﻟﻐﻴﺮ و/أو اﻟﺸﺮوط واﻷﺣﻜﺎم اﻹﺿﺎﻓﻴﺔ" اﻟﻤﻮﺟﻮدة ﻋﻠﻰ ‪.http://www.adobe.com/go/thirdparty_ae‬‬ ‫1. ﺗﻌﺮﻳﻔـــﺎت.‬ ‫"أدوﺑﻲ" ﺗﻌﻨﻲ أدوﺑﻲ ﺳﻴﺴﺘﻴﻤﺰ إﻧﻜﻮرﺑﻮرﻳﺘﺪ، وهﻲ ﺷﺮآﺔ ﺗﺄﺳﺴﺖ وﻗﺎﺋﻤﺔ ﻓﻲ دﻳﻼوﻳﺮ، وﻋﻨﻮاﻧﻬﺎ 543 ﺑﺎرك أﻓﻴﻨﻴﻮ، ﺳﺎن ﺧﻮﺳﻴﻪ، آﺎﻟﻴﻔﻮرﻧﻴﺎ 01159، إذا‬ ‫ﻣﺎ آﺎﻧﺖ اﻟﻤﺎدة اﻟﻔﺮﻋﻴﺔ 21)أ( ﻣﻦ هﺬﻩ اﻻﺗﻔﺎﻗﻴﺔ ﻣﻨﻄﺒﻘﺔ؛ وﺑﺨﻼف ذﻟﻚ ﻓﺈﻧﻬﺎ ﺗﻌﻨﻲ أدوﺑﻲ ﺳﻴﺴﺘﻴﻤﺰ ﺳﻮﻓﺘﻮﻳﺮ ﺁﻳﺮﻻﻧﺪ ﻟﻴﻤﺘﺪ، وﻋﻨﻮاﻧﻬﺎ ﻳﻮﻧﻴﺖ 0013، ﻟﻴﻚ‬ ‫دراﻳﻒ، ﺳﻴﺘﻲ وﻳﺴﺖ آﺎﻣﺒﻮس، ﺳﺎﺟﺎرت دي42، ﺟﻤﻬﻮرﻳﺔ أﻳﺮﻟﻨﺪا، وهﻲ ﺷﺮآﺔ ﻗﺎﺋﻤﺔ ﺑﻤﻮﺟﺐ ﻗﻮاﻧﻴﻦ أﻳﺮﻟﻨﺪا وهﻲ ﺷﺮآﺔ ﻣﻨﺘﺴﺒﺔ إﻟﻰ وﻣﺮﺧﺺ ﻟﻬﺎ ﻣﻦ‬ ‫أدوﺑﻲ ﺳﻴﺴﺘﻴﻤﺰ إﻧﻜﻮرﺑﻮرﻳﺘﺪ. "اﻟﺤﺎﺳﺐ اﻵﻟﻲ" ﻳﻌﻨﻲ ﺟﻬﺎزا إﻟﻜﺘﺮوﻧﻴﺎ ﺷﺨﺼﻴﺎ اﻓﺘﺮاﺿﻴﺎ أو ﻓﻌﻠﻴﺎ ﻳﺘﻘﺒﻞ اﻟﻤﻌﻠﻮﻣﺎت رﻗﻤﻴﺎ أو ﻓﻲ ﺷﻜﻞ ﻣﻤﺎﺛﻞ وﻳﻘﻮم ﺑﻤﻌﺎﻟﺠﺔ‬ ‫ً‬ ‫ً‬ ‫ً‬ ‫ً‬ ‫ً‬ ‫ً‬ ‫ً‬ ‫ً‬ ‫وﺗﺼﺮﻳﻒ ﺗﻠﻚ اﻟﻤﻌﻠﻮﻣﺎت وﺻﻮﻻ إﻟﻰ ﻧﺘﻴﺠﺔ ﻣﻌﻴﻨﺔ وﻣﺤﺪدة اﺳﺘﻨﺎدا إﻟﻰ ﺳﻠﺴﻠﺔ ﻣﻦ اﻟﺘﻌﻠﻴﻤﺎت. "ﺑﺮﻧﺎﻣﺞ اﻟﻜﻤﺒﻴﻮﺗﺮ" ﺗﻌﻨﻲ )أ( آﺎﻓﺔ ﻣﺤﺘﻮﻳﺎت اﻟﻤﻠﻔﺎت )اﻟﺘﻲ‬ ‫ﺗﺘﻮﻓﺮ ﺑﻮاﺳﻄﺔ اﻟﺘﺤﻤﻴﻞ اﻹﻟﻜﺘﺮوﻧﻲ، أو ﺿﻤﻦ وﺳﻂ ﻣﺎدي( أو اﻷﻗﺮاص أو اﻟﻮﺳﺎﺋﻂ اﻷﺧﺮى اﻟﻤﺮﻓﻘﺔ ﻣﻌﻬﺎ هﺬﻩ اﻻﺗﻔﺎﻗﻴﺔ واﻟﺘﻲ ﻗﺪ ﺗﺸﺘﻤﻞ ﻋﻠﻰ: )1(‬ ‫ﻣﻌﻠﻮﻣﺎت آﻤﺒﻴﻮﺗﺮ ﻣﻦ أدوﺑﻲ أو ﻣﻦ اﻟﻐﻴﺮ، ﺑﻤﺎ ﻓﻲ ذﻟﻚ أدوﺑﻲ رﻳﺪر )®‪ ،(Adobe Reader‬أدوﺑﻲ إﻳﺮ )™‪ (Adobe® AIR‬أدوﺑﻲ ﻓﻼش ﺑﻼﻳﺮ‬ ‫)‪ ،(Adobe Flash® Player‬ﺷﻮآﻮاﻳﻒ ﺑﻼﻳﺮ )‪ (Shockwave® Player‬وأوﺛﺮوﻳﺮ ﺑﻼﻳﺮ )‪) (Authorware® Player‬ﻳﺸﺎر إﻟﻴﻬﺎ ﺟﻤﻴﻌﺎ ﺑﺄدوﺑﻲ‬ ‫إﻳﺮ وﻓﻼش ﺑﻼﻳﺮ وﺷﻮآﻮاﻳﻒ ﺑﻼﻳﺮ وأوﺛﺮوﻳﺮ ﺑﻼﻳﺮ ﺑـ "أدوﺑﻲ رﻧﺘﺎﻳﻤﺰ" )‪(Adobe Runtimes‬؛ )2( اﻟﻤﻮاد أو اﻟﻤﻠﻔﺎت اﻟﻤﻜﺘﻮﺑﺔ اﻟﺘﻮﺿﻴﺤﻴﺔ ذات اﻟﺼﻠﺔ‬ ‫)"اﻟﻮﺛﺎﺋﻖ"(؛ و)3( اﻷﺣﺮف/‪fonts‬؛ و)ب( ﻋﻤﻠﻴﺎت اﻟﺘﺤﺪﻳﺚ واﻟﻨﺴﺦ اﻟﻤﻨﻘﺤﺔ اﻟﻤﻌﺪﻟﺔ وﻋﻤﻠﻴﺎت اﻟﺘﻄﻮﻳﺮ واﻹﺿﺎﻓﺎت واﻟﻨﺴﺦ اﻟﻤﺼﻮرة ﻣﻦ ﺑﺮاﻣﺞ‬ ‫اﻟﻜﻤﺒﻴﻮﺗﺮ، إن وﺟﺪت، اﻟﻤﺮﺧﺼﺔ إﻟﻴﻚ ﻣﻦ ﻗﺒﻞ أدوﺑﻲ )ﺗﺴﻤﻰ ﻣﻌﺎ "ﻋﻤﻠﻴﺎت اﻟﺘﺤﺪﻳﺚ"(. "اﺳﺘﺨﺪام" ﺗﻌﻨﻲ اﻟﺪﺧﻮل إﻟﻰ أو اﻟﺘﺮآﻴﺐ أو اﻟﺘﻨﺰﻳﻞ أو اﻟﻨﺴﺦ، أو‬ ‫ً‬ ‫ﻏﻴﺮ ذﻟﻚ ﻣﻦ اﻻﺳﺘﻔﺎدة ﻣﻦ اﺳﺘﺨﺪام اﻷداء اﻟﻮﻇﻴﻔﻲ ﻟﺒﺮاﻣﺞ اﻟﻜﻤﺒﻴﻮﺗﺮ.‬ ‫2. ﺗﺮﺧﻴﺺ ﺑﺮاﻣﺞ اﻟﻜﻤﺒﻴﻮﺗﺮ.‬ ‫إذا ﺣﺼﻠﺖ ﻋﻠﻰ ﺑﺮﻧﺎﻣﺞ اﻟﻜﻤﺒﻴﻮﺗﺮ ﻣﻦ أدوﺑﻲ أو أﺣﺪ اﻟﻤﺮﺧﺼﻴﻦ ﻣﻦ ﻗﺒﻠﻬﺎ، وﺑﺸﺮط اﻟﺘﺰاﻣﻚ ﺑﺄﺣﻜﺎم هﺬﻩ اﻻﺗﻔﺎﻗﻴﺔ )هﺬﻩ "اﻻﺗﻔﺎﻗﻴﺔ"( ﺑﻤﺎ ﻓﻲ ذﻟﻚ اﻟﻘﻴﻮد‬ ‫اﻟﻮاردة ﻓﻲ اﻟﻤﺎدة 3، ﻓﺈن أدوﺑﻲ ﺗﻤﻨﺤﻚ ﺗﺮﺧﻴﺼﺎ ﻏﻴﺮ ﺣﺼﺮي ﻻﺳﺘﺨﺪام ﺑﺮﻧﺎﻣﺞ اﻟﻜﻤﺒﻴﻮﺗﺮ ﺑﺎﻟﻄﺮﻳﻘﺔ وﻟﻸﻏﺮاض اﻟﻤﺤﺪدة ﻓﻲ اﻟﻮﺛﺎﺋﻖ آﻤﺎ ﻳﻠﻲ:‬ ‫2-1 اﻻﺳﺘﺨﺪام اﻟﻌﺎم. ﻗﺪ ﺗﻘﻮم ﺑﺘﺮآﻴﺐ واﺳﺘﺨﺪام ﻧﺴﺨﺔ ﻣﺼﻮرة ﻣﻦ ﺑﺮﻧﺎﻣﺞ آﻤﺒﻴﻮﺗﺮ ﻋﻠﻰ ﺟﻬﺎز اﻟﻜﻤﺒﻴﻮﺗﺮ اﻟﻤﺘﻮاﻓﻖ اﻟﺨﺎص ﺑﻚ. راﺟﻊ اﻟﻤﺎدة 3 ﻟﻼﻃﻼع‬ ‫ﻋﻠﻰ اﻟﻘﻴﻮد اﻟﻬﺎﻣﺔ ﺑﺸﺄن اﺳﺘﺨﺪام اﻟﺒﺮﻧﺎﻣﺞ.‬ ‫2-2 اﺳﺘﺨﺪام اﻟﻤﻠ ﱢﻢ. هﺬﻩ اﻻﺗﻔﺎﻗﻴﺔ ﻻ ﺗﺴﻤﺢ ﻟﻚ ﺑﺘﺮآﻴﺐ أو اﺳﺘﺨﺪام اﻟﺒﺮﻧﺎﻣﺞ ﻋﻠﻰ ﻣﻠﻘﻢ ﻣﻠﻔﺎت آﻤﺒﻴﻮﺗﺮ. ﻟﻤﺰﻳﺪ ﻣﻦ اﻟﻤﻌﻠﻮﻣﺎت ﻋﻦ اﺳﺘﺨﺪام اﻟﺒﺮﻧﺎﻣﺞ ﻋﻠﻰ‬ ‫ﻘ‬ ‫ﻣﻠﻘﻢ ﻣﻠﻔﺎت آﻤﺒﻴﻮﺗﺮ ﻳﺮﺟﻰ اﻻﻃﻼع ﻋﻠﻰ ‪ http://www.adobe.com/go/acrobat_distribute_ae‬ﻟﻤﺰﻳﺪ ﻣﻦ اﻟﻤﻌﻠﻮﻣﺎت ﻋﻦ أدوﺑﻲ رﻳﺪر‬ ‫)‪(Adobe Reader‬؛ أو ‪ http://www.adobe.com/go/licensing_ae‬ﻟﻤﺰﻳﺪ ﻣﻦ اﻟﻤﻌﻠﻮﻣﺎت ﻋﻦ ﺑﺮاﻣﺞ أدوﺑﻲ رﻧﺘﺎﻳﻤﺰ )‪.(Adobe Runtimes‬‬ ‫2-3 اﻟﺘﻮزﻳﻊ. هﺬا اﻟﺘﺮﺧﻴﺺ ﻻ ﻳﻤﻨﺤﻚ اﻟﺤﻖ ﻓﻲ ﺗﺮﺧﻴﺺ اﻟﺒﺮﻧﺎﻣﺞ ﻣﻦ اﻟﺒﺎﻃﻦ وﺗﻮزﻳﻌﻪ. ﻟﻤﺰﻳﺪ ﻣﻦ اﻟﻤﻌﻠﻮﻣﺎت ﻋﻦ اﻟﺤﺼﻮل ﻋﻠﻰ ﺣﻖ ﺗﻮزﻳﻊ اﻟﺒﺮﻧﺎﻣﺞ‬ ‫ﻋﻠﻰ وﺳﺎﺋﻂ ﺣﻘﻴﻘﻴﺔ أو ﻣﻦ ﺧﻼل ﺷﺒﻜﺔ داﺧﻠﻴﺔ أو ﻣﻊ ﻣﻨﺘﺠﻚ أو ﺧﺪﻣﺘﻚ ﻳﺮﺟﻰ اﻻﻃﻼع ﻋﻠﻰ‬

‫‪ http://www.adobe.com/go/acrobat_distribute_ae‬ﻟﻤﺰﻳﺪ ﻣﻦ اﻟﻤﻌﻠﻮﻣﺎت ﻋﻦ أدوﺑﻲ رﻳﺪر )‪(Adobe Reader‬؛ أو‬ ‫‪ http://www.adobe.com/go/licensing_ae‬ﻟﻤﺰﻳﺪ ﻣﻦ اﻟﻤﻌﻠﻮﻣﺎت ﻋﻦ ﺑﺮاﻣﺞ أدوﺑﻲ رﻧﺘﺎﻳﻤﺰ )‪.(Adobe Runtimes‬‬ ‫2-4 ﻧﺴﺨﺔ اﻟﺪﻋﻢ واﻹﺳﻨﺎد. ﻳﻤﻜﻨﻚ ﻋﻤﻞ ﻧﺴﺨﺔ واﺣﺪة ﻣﻦ اﻹﺳﻨﺎد واﻟﺪﻋﻢ ﻣﻦ ﺑﺮاﻣﺞ اﻟﻜﻤﺒﻴﻮﺗﺮ، ﻋﻠﻰ أن ﻻ ﺗﻜﻮن ﻧﺴﺨﺔ اﻹﺳﻨﺎد واﻟﺪﻋﻢ اﻟﺨﺎﺻﺔ ﺑﻚ ﻣﺜﺒﺘﺔ أو‬ ‫ﻣﺴﺘﺨﺪﻣﺔ. وﻻ ﻳﻤﻜﻨﻚ ﻧﻘﻞ وﺗﺤﻮﻳﻞ اﻟﺤﻘﻮق إﻟﻰ ﻧﺴﺨﺔ دﻋﻢ وإﺳﻨﺎد ﻣﺎ ﻟﻢ ﺗﻘﻮم ﺑﺘﺤﻮﻳﻞ وﻧﻘﻞ آﺎﻓﺔ ﺣﻘﻮﻗﻚ ﻓﻲ اﻟﺒﺮﻧﺎﻣﺞ آﻤﺎ هﻮ ﻣﻨﺼﻮص ﻋﻠﻴﻪ ﻓﻲ اﻟﻤﺎدة 4.‬ ‫3. اﻻﻟﺘﺰاﻣﺎت واﻟﻘﻴﻮد.‬ ‫3-1 اﻟﻘﻴﻮد ﻋﻠﻰ أدوﺑﻲ رﻧﺘﺎﻳﻢ. ﻻ ﻳﻤﻜﻨﻚ اﺳﺘﺨﺪام أي ﺑﺮﻧﺎﻣﺞ ﻣﻦ ﺑﺮاﻣﺞ أدوﺑﻲ رﻧﺘﺎﻳﻢ ﻋﻠﻰ أي ﺟﻬﺎز ﻻ ﻳﻌﻤﻞ ﺑﻮاﺳﻄﺔ ﺣﺎﺳﻮب أو ﻣﻊ أﻳﺔ ﻧﺴﺨﺔ ﻣﺮآﺒﺔ‬ ‫داﺧﻠﻴﺎ أو ﻧﺴﺨﺔ ﺟﻬﺎز ﻷي ﻧﻈﺎم ﺗﺸﻐﻴﻞ. وﺗﺠﻨﺒﺎ ﻟﻠﺸﻚ، وﻋﻠﻰ ﺳﺒﻴﻞ اﻟﻤﺜﺎل ﻓﻘﻂ، ﻻ ﻳﺠﻮز ﻟﻚ اﺳﺘﻌﻤﺎل أدوﺑﻲ رﻧﺘﺎﻳﻢ ﻋﻠﻰ أي )أ( ﺟﻬﺎز ﻣﺤﻤﻮل أو ﺳﺎت‬ ‫ﺗﻮب ﺑﻮآﺲ )‪ (STB‬أو ﺟﻬﺎز هﺎﺗﻒ أو وﻳﺐ ﺑﺎد )‪ (web pad‬أو ﺗﺎﺑﻠﺖ )‪ (tablet‬أو ﺗﺎﺑﻠﺖ ﺑﻲ ﺳﻲ )‪) (Tablet PC‬ﻣﺎﻋﺪا ﻧﺴﺨﺔ وﻳﻨﺪوز إآﺲ ﺑﻲ ﺗﺎﺑﻠﺖ‬ ‫ﺑﻲ ﺳﻲ )‪ (Windows XP Tablet PC Edition‬وﻣﺎ ﺗﻠﺘﻬﺎ( أو آﻮﻧﺴﻮل أﻟﻌﺎب أو ﺗﻠﻴﻔﺰﻳﻮن أو ﻣﺸﻐﻞ أﻗﺮاص دي ﻓﻲ دي أو ﻣﺮآﺰ وﺳﺎﺋﻂ )ﺑﺎﺳﺘﺜﻨﺎء‬ ‫ﻧﺴﺨﺔ وﻳﻨﺪوز إآﺲ ﺑﻲ ﻣﻴﺪﻳﺎ ﺳﻨﺘﺮ )‪ (Windows XP Media Center Edition‬وﻣﺎ ﺗﻠﺘﻬﺎ( أو ﻟﻮﺣﺔ دﻋﺎﻳﺔ إﻟﻜﺘﺮوﻧﻴﺔ أو أﻳﺔ ﻻﻓﺘﺔ إﻋﻼﻧﻴﺔ رﻗﻤﻴﺔ أو‬ ‫ﺟﻬﺎز إﻧﺘﺮﻧﺖ أو ﺟﻬﺎز ﺁﺧﺮ ﻣﺘﺼﻞ ﺑﺎﻹﻧﺘﺮﻧﺖ أو ﻣﺴﺎﻋﺪ ﺷﺨﺼﻲ رﻗﻤﻲ )‪ (PDA‬أو ﺟﻬﺎز ﻃﺒﻲ أو ﺻﺮاف ﺁﻟﻲ)‪ (ATM‬أو ﺟﻬﺎز ﺗﻴﻠﻴﻤﺎﺗﻚ أو ﺁﻟﺔ أﻟﻌﺎب‬ ‫أو ﻧﻈﺎم ﻣﻨﺰﻟﻲ ﻳﻌﻤﻞ ﺁﻟﻴﺎ أو آﺸﻚ أو ﺟﻬﺎز ﺗﺤﻜﻢ ﻋﻨﺪ ﺑﻌﺪ أو أي ﺟﻬﺎز إﻟﻜﺘﺮوﻧﻲ ﺁﺧﺮ ﻟﻠﻤﺴﺘﻬﻠﻚ، )ب( هﺎﺗﻒ ﺟﻮال ﻳﻌﺘﻤﺪ ﻋﻠﻰ ﻣﺸﻐﻞ أو آﺒﻞ أو ﻗﻤﺮ‬ ‫ً‬ ‫ﺻﻨﺎﻋﻲ أو ﻧﻈﺎم ﺗﻠﻴﻔﺰﻳﻮن، أو )ج( ﺟﻬﺎز ﺁﺧﺮ ﺑﻨﻈﺎم ﻣﻐﻠﻖ . ﻟﻤﺰﻳﺪ ﻣﻦ اﻟﻤﻌﻠﻮﻣﺎت ﻋﻦ ﺗﺮﺧﻴﺺ ﺑﺮاﻣﺞ أدوﺑﻲ رﻧﺘﺎﻳﻤﺰ )‪ (Adobe Runtimes‬ﻟﻼﺳﺘﺨﺪام‬ ‫ﻋﻠﻰ اﻷﺟﻬﺰة اﻟﻤﺬآﻮرة ﻳﺮﺟﻰ زﻳﺎرة ‪.http://www.adobe.com/go/licensing_ae‬‬ ‫3-2 ﻗﻴﻮد ﻋﻠﻰ أدوﺑﻲ رﻳﺪر. ﺑﺮﻧﺎﻣﺞ أدوﺑﻲ رﻳﺪر ﻣﺮﺧﺺ أو ﻣﻮزع ﻣﻦ ﻗﺒﻞ أدوﺑﻲ ﻟﻤﺮاﺟﻌﺔ وإﻃﻼع وﺗﻮزﻳﻊ وﻣﺸﺎرآﺔ ﻣﻠﻔﺎت "ﺑﻲ دي إف/‪."PDF‬‬ ‫3-2-1 ﻗﻴﻮد اﻟﺘﺤﻮﻳﻞ. ﻻ ﻳﺠﻮز ﻟﻚ دﻣﺞ أو اﺳﺘﺨﺪام ﺑﺮﻧﺎﻣﺞ أدوﺑﻲ رﻳﺪر ﻣﻊ أي ﺑﺮﻧﺎﻣﺞ آﻤﺒﻴﻮﺗﺮ ﺁﺧﺮ، أو ﺑﺮاﻣﺞ ﻣﺴﺎﻋﺪة أو ﻋﻤﻠﻴﺔ ﺗﻌﺰﻳﺰ ودﻋﻢ ﺗﺴﺘﺨﺪم أو‬ ‫ﺗﺴﺘﻨﺪ إﻟﻰ ﺑﺮﻧﺎﻣﺞ أدوﺑﻲ رﻳﺪر ﻋﻨﺪ ﺗﺤﻮﻳﻞ أو ﻧﻘﻞ ﻣﻠﻔﺎت ‪ PDF‬إﻟﻰ ﺗﻨﺴﻴﻖ ﻣﺨﺘﻠﻒ )ﻣﺜﻞ ﻣﻠﻒ ‪ PDF‬إﻟﻰ ﻣﻠﻒ ‪ TIFF‬أو ‪ JPEG‬أو ‪.(SVG‬‬ ‫3-2-2 ﻗﻴﻮد اﻟﺒﺮاﻣﺞ اﻹﺿﺎﻓﻴﺔ. ﻻ ﻳﺠﻮز ﻟﻚ دﻣﺞ أو اﺳﺘﺨﺪام ﺑﺮﻧﺎﻣﺞ أدوﺑﻲ رﻳﺪر ﻣﻊ أي ﺑﺮﻧﺎﻣﺞ إﺿﺎﻓﻲ ﻟﻢ ﻳﺘﻢ ﺗﻄﻮﻳﺮﻩ وﻓﻘﺎ ﻻﺗﻔﺎﻗﻴﺔ ﺗﺮﺧﻴﺺ رﺋﻴﺴﻲ‬ ‫ً‬ ‫ﻟﺘﻮﺣﻴﺪ أدوﺑﻲ.‬ ‫3-2-3 اﻟﺨﺼﺎﺋﺺ اﻟﻤﻌﻄﻠﺔ. ﻗﺪ ﻳﺤﺘﻮي ﺑﺮﻧﺎﻣﺞ اﻟﻜﻤﺒﻴﻮﺗﺮ ﻋﻠﻰ ﺧﺼﺎﺋﺺ أو وﻇﺎﺋﻒ ﻣﺨﻔﻴﺔ أو ﺗﻈﻬﺮ ﻣﻌﻄﻠﺔ أو "ﻏﻴﺮ ﻧﺸﻄﺔ" )اﻟﺨﺼﺎﺋﺺ اﻟﻤﻌﻄﻠﺔ"(.‬ ‫اﻟﺨﺼﺎﺋﺺ اﻟﻤﻌﻄﻠﺔ ﺗﻨﺸﻂ ﻓﻘﻂ ﻋﻨﺪ ﻓﺘﺢ ﻣﻠﻒ ‪ PDF‬ﺗﻢ إﻧﺸﺎؤﻩ ﺑﺎﺳﺘﺨﺪام ﺗﻤﻜﻴﻦ اﻟﺘﻜﻨﻮﻟﻮﺟﻴﺎ اﻟﻤﺘﺎﺣﺔ ﻣﻦ أدوﺑﻲ. ﻟﻦ ﺗﺼﻞ إﻟﻰ أو ﺗﺤﺎول اﻟﻮﺻﻮل إﻟﻰ أﻳﺔ‬ ‫ﺧﺼﺎﺋﺺ ﻣﻌﻄﻠﺔ ﺑﺎﺳﺘﺜﻨﺎء ﻣﺎ ﻳﺘﻢ ﻣﻦ ﺧﻼل اﺳﺘﺨﺪام ﺗﻠﻚ اﻟﺘﻘﻨﻴﺎت، وﻟﻦ ﺗﻌﺘﻤﺪ ﻋﻠﻰ أدوﺑﻲ رﻳﺪر )‪ (Adobe Reader‬ﻹﻧﺸﺎء ﺧﺎﺻﻴﺔ ﻣﺸﺎﺑﻬﺔ ﺗﻤﺎﻣﺎ ﻷي‬ ‫ً‬ ‫ﺧﺎﺻﻴﺔ ﻣﻌﻄﻠﺔ أو ﺗﻘﻮم ﺑﺨﻼف ذﻟﻚ ﺑﺎﻟﺪوران ﺣﻮل اﻟﺘﻘﻨﻴﺔ اﻟﺘﻲ ﺗﺘﺤﻜﻢ ﻓﻲ ﺗﻨﺸﻴﻂ أي ﺧﺎﺻﻴﺔ ﻣﻦ ﺗﻠﻚ اﻟﺨﻮاص. ﻟﻤﺰﻳﺪ ﻣﻦ اﻟﻤﻌﻠﻮﻣﺎت ﻋﻦ اﻟﺨﺼﺎﺋﺺ‬ ‫اﻟﻤﻌﻄﻠﺔ ﻳﺮﺟﻰ اﻟﺮﺟﻮع إﻟﻰ ‪.http://www.adobe.com/go/readerextensions_ae‬‬ ‫3-3 اﻹﺷﻌﺎرات. أﻳﺔ ﻧﺴﺨﺔ ﻣﻦ اﻟﺒﺮﻧﺎﻣﺞ ﺗﻘﻮم ﺑﻌﻤﻠﻬﺎ ﻳﺠﺐ أن ﺗﺤﺘﻮي ﻋﻠﻰ ﻧﻔﺲ إﺷﻌﺎرات ﺣﻘﻮق اﻟﺘﺄﻟﻴﻒ وﺣﻘﻮق اﻟﻤﻠﻜﻴﺔ اﻷﺧﺮى اﻟﺘﻲ ﺗﻈﻬﺮ ﻋﻠﻰ اﻟﺒﺮﻧﺎﻣﺞ‬ ‫أو ﻓﻴﻪ.‬ ‫3-4 ﻋﺪم ﺗﻌﺪﻳﻞ أو ﻋﻜﺲ هﻨﺪﺳﺔ اﻟﺒﺮﻧﺎﻣﺞ. ﻻ ﻳﺠﻮز ﻟﻚ ﺗﻌﺪﻳﻞ أو ﺗﻜﻴﻴﻒ أو ﺗﺮﺟﻤﺔ أو إﻧﺸﺎء أﻋﻤﺎل ﻣﺸﺘﻘﺔ ﻣﺒﻨﻴﺔ ﻋﻠﻰ اﻟﺒﺮﻧﺎﻣﺞ. ﻟﻦ ﺗﻘﻮم ﺑﻘﻠﺐ وﻋﻜﺲ‬ ‫هﻨﺪﺳﺔ، أو ﻣﻨﻊ ﺗﺤﻠﻴﻞ أو ﺗﺼﻨﻴﻒ، أو ﻓﻚ وﺣﻞ أو ﺑﺨﻼف ذﻟﻚ ﻣﺤﺎوﻟﺔ اﺳﺘﻜﺸﺎف ﺷﻴﻔﺮة اﻟﻤﺼﺪر اﻟﺨﺎﺻﺔ ﺑﺒﺮﻧﺎﻣﺞ اﻟﻜﻤﺒﻴﻮﺗﺮ ﺑﺎﺳﺘﺜﻨﺎء ﻣﺎ ﻳﻜﻮن ﻟﻠﻨﻄﺎق اﻟﺬي‬ ‫ّ‬ ‫ﻳﻜﻮن ﻣﺴﻤﻮﺣﺎ ﺑﻪ ﻟﻌﻜﺲ هﻨﺪﺳﺔ أو ﻣﻨﻊ ﺗﺤﻠﻴﻞ اﻟﺒﺮﻧﺎﻣﺞ ﺑﻤﻮﺟﺐ اﻟﻘﺎﻧﻮن اﻟﻤﻌﻤﻮل ﺑﻪ.‬ ‫ً‬ ‫4. اﻟﻨﻘﻞ واﻟﺘﺤﻮﻳﻞ.‬ ‫ﻻ ﻳﻤﻜﻨﻚ ﺗﺄﺟﻴﺮ أو إﻳﺠﺎر أو اﻟﺘﺮﺧﻴﺺ ﻣﻦ اﻟﺒﺎﻃﻦ أو اﻟﺘﻨﺎزل ﻋﻦ أو ﻧﻘﻞ وﺗﺤﻮﻳﻞ ﺣﻘﻮﻗﻚ اﻟﺨﺎﺻﺔ ﺑﺒﺮﻧﺎﻣﺞ اﻟﻜﻤﺒﻴﻮﺗﺮ أو اﻟﺘﻔﻮﻳﺾ ﻟﻜﺎﻓﺔ أو أي ﺟﺰء ﻣﻦ‬ ‫ﺑﺮﻧﺎﻣﺞ اﻟﻜﻤﺒﻴﻮﺗﺮ ﻟﻴﺘﻢ ﻧﺴﺨﻪ ﻋﻠﻰ ﺟﻬﺎز ﺣﺎﺳﻮب ﺁﺧﺮ ﻓﺮدي، ﺑﺎﺳﺘﺜﻨﺎء ﻣﺎ ﻗﺪ ﻳﻜﻮن ﻣﺴﻤﻮﺣﺎ ﺑﻪ ﻓﻲ هﺬﻩ اﻻﺗﻔﺎﻗﻴﺔ. ﻣﻦ ﺟﻬﺔ أﺧﺮى، ﻓﻴﻤﻜﻨﻚ ﺗﺤﻮﻳﻞ وﻧﻘﻞ آﺎﻓﺔ‬ ‫ً‬ ‫ﺣﻘﻮﻗﻚ ﻻﺳﺘﺨﺪام اﻟﺒﺮاﻣﺞ إﻟﻰ ﺷﺨﺺ ﺁﺧﺮ أو أي آﻴﺎن ﻗﺎﻧﻮﻧﻲ ﺁﺧﺮ، ﻋﻠﻰ أن: )أ( ﺗﻘﻮم آﺬﻟﻚ ﺑﻨﻘﻞ وﺗﺤﻮﻳﻞ )1( هﺬﻩ اﻻﺗﻔﺎﻗﻴﺔ، )2( اﻟﺒﺮﻧﺎﻣﺞ وآﺎﻓﺔ اﻟﺒﺮاﻣﺞ‬ ‫اﻷﺧﺮى واﻷﺟﻬﺰة اﻟﺘﻲ ﺗﻢ ﺟﻤﻌﻬﺎ ﻣﻦ ﻗﺒﻞ أو ﺗﺮآﻴﺒﻬﺎ ﻣﻊ ﺑﺮاﻣﺞ اﻟﻜﻤﺒﻴﻮﺗﺮ، وﺗﺸﻤﻞ آﺎﻓﺔ اﻟﻨﺴﺦ اﻟﻤﺼﻮرة وﻋﻤﻠﻴﺎت اﻟﺘﺤﺪﻳﺚ واﻟﺘﻄﻮﻳﺮ واﻟﻨﺴﺦ اﻟﻤﻨﻘﺤﺔ‬ ‫اﻟﻤﺴﺒﻘﺔ إﻟﻰ ذﻟﻚ اﻟﺸﺨﺺ ؛ )ب( آﻤﺎ أﻧﻚ ﻻ ﺗﺒﻘﻰ ﻣﺤﺘﻔﻈﺎ ﺑﺄﻳﺔ ﻧﺴﺦ ﻣﺼﻮرة، وﺗﺸﻤﻞ آﺎﻓﺔ ﺑﺮاﻣﺞ اﻟﺪﻋﻢ واﻹﺳﻨﺎد واﻟﻨﺴﺦ اﻟﻤﺨﺰﻧﺔ ﻋﻠﻰ ﺟﻬﺎز ﺣﺎﺳﻮب؛‬ ‫ً‬ ‫و)ج( ﻳﻘﺒﻞ اﻟﻄﺮف اﻟﻤﺘﻠﻘﻲ ﻟﺬﻟﻚ أﺣﻜﺎم وﺷﺮوط هﺬﻩ اﻻﺗﻔﺎﻗﻴﺔ وأﻳﺔ أﺣﻜﺎم وﺷﺮوط ﺑﻤﻮﺟﺒﻬﺎ ﻗﻤﺖ ﺑﻄﺮﻳﻘﺔ ﻗﺎﻧﻮﻧﻴﺔ ﺑﺎﻟﺤﺼﻮل ﻋﻠﻰ ﺗﺮﺧﻴﺺ ﺳﺎري اﻟﻤﻔﻌﻮل‬ ‫ﻟﺒﺮﻧﺎﻣﺞ اﻟﻜﻤﺒﻴﻮﺗﺮ. وﺑﺎﻟﺮﻏﻢ ﻣﻤﺎ ﺳﺒﻖ ذآﺮﻩ، ﻓﻼ ﻳﻤﻜﻨﻚ ﻧﻘﻞ وﺗﺤﻮﻳﻞ اﻟﺒﺮاﻣﺞ اﻟﻤﺘﻌﻠﻘﺔ ﺑﺎﻟﺘﻌﻠﻴﻢ واﻟﺘﺪرﻳﺐ وﺑﺮاﻣﺞ ﻣﺎ ﻗﺒﻞ اﻟﻨﺸﺮ واﻟﺘﻮزﻳﻊ، أو ﻗﺪ ﻻ ﺗﻘﻮم‬ ‫ﺑﺈﻋﺎدة ﺑﻴﻊ ﻧﺴﺦ ﺑﺮﻧﺎﻣﺞ اﻟﻜﻤﺒﻴﻮﺗﺮ.‬ ‫5. اﻣﺘﻼك اﻟﻤﻠﻜﻴﺔ اﻟﻔﻜﺮﻳﺔ وﺣﻤﺎﻳﺔ اﻟﺤﻘﻮق.‬ ‫ﺗﻌﺘﺒﺮ ﺑﺮاﻣﺞ اﻟﻜﻤﺒﻴﻮﺗﺮ واﻟﻨﺴﺦ اﻟﻤﺼﻮرة اﻟﻤﺼﺮح ﺑﻬﺎ اﻟﺘﻲ ﺗﻘﻮم ﺑﻬﺎ ﻣﻠﻜﻴﺔ ﻓﻜﺮﻳﺔ وﻣﻤﻠﻮآﺔ ﻣﻦ ﻗﺒﻞ أدوﺑﻲ ﺳﻴﺴﺘﻴﻤﺰ إﻧﻜﻮرﺑﻮرﻳﺘﺪ وﻣﻮ ﱢدﻳﻬﺎ. أﻣﺎ اﻟﺒﻨﻴﺔ‬ ‫ر‬ ‫ﱢ‬ ‫اﻟﺘﺮآﻴﺒﻴﺔ واﻟﺘﻨﻈﻴﻢ وﺷﻴﻔﺮة ﺑﺮاﻣﺞ اﻟﻜﻤﺒﻴﻮﺗﺮ ﻓﺘﻌﺘﺒﺮ أﺳﺮارا ﺗﺠﺎرﻳﺔ ﻗﻴﻤﺔ وﻣﻌﻠﻮﻣﺎت ﺳﺮﻳﺔ ﻟـ أدوﺑﻲ ﺳﻴﺴﺘﻴﻤﺰ إﻧﻜﻮرﺑﻮرﻳﺘﺪ وﻣﻮردﻳﻬﺎ. آﻤﺎ أن اﻟﺒﺮﻧﺎﻣﺞ‬ ‫ً‬ ‫ﻣﺤﻤﻲ ﺑﻤﻮﺟﺐ اﻟﻘﺎﻧﻮن، وﻳﺸﻤﻞ ذﻟﻚ دون ﺗﺤﺪﻳﺪ، ﺣﻘﻮق اﻟﺘﺄﻟﻴﻒ ﻟﻠﻮﻻﻳﺎت اﻟﻤﺘﺤﺪة اﻷﻣﺮﻳﻜﻴﺔ ودول أﺧﺮى، وﺑﻤﻮﺟﺐ أﺣﻜﺎم اﻟﻤﻌﺎهﺪة اﻟﺪوﻟﻴﺔ. وﺑﺎﺳﺘﺜﻨﺎء ﻣﺎ‬ ‫ﺗﻢ ﺗﺒﻴﺎﻧﻪ ﺻﺮاﺣﺔ ﻓﻲ هﺬﻩ اﻻﺗﻔﺎﻗﻴﺔ، ﻓﺈن هﺬﻩ اﻻﺗﻔﺎﻗﻴﺔ ﻟﻦ ﺗﻤﻨﺤﻚ أﻳﺔ ﺣﻘﻮق ﻣﻠﻜﻴﺔ ﻓﻜﺮﻳﺔ ﻓﻲ ﺑﺮاﻣﺞ اﻟﻜﻤﺒﻴﻮﺗﺮ وإن آﺎﻓﺔ اﻟﺤﻘﻮق اﻟﺘﻲ ﻟﻢ ﻳﺘﻢ ﻣﻨﺤﻬﺎ ﺑﺸﻜﻞ‬ ‫ﺻﺮﻳﺢ ﺳﻴﺘﻢ اﻟﺘﺤﻔﻆ ﻋﻠﻴﻬﺎ ﻣﻦ ﻗﺒﻞ أدوﺑﻲ وﻣﻮ ﱢدﻳﻬﺎ.‬ ‫ر‬

‫6. اﻟﺘﻮﺻﻴﻞ واﻟﺨﺼﻮﺻﻴﺔ‬ ‫6-1 اﺳﺘﺨﺪام ﻣﻠﻔﺎت ‪ .PDF‬ﻋﻨﺪﻣﺎ ﺗﺴﺘﺨﺪم اﻟﺒﺮﻧﺎﻣﺞ ﻟﻔﺘﺢ ﻣﻠﻒ ﺑﺘﻨﺴﻴﻖ ‪ PDF‬ﺗﻢ ﺗﻤﻜﻴﻨﻪ ﻟﻌﺮض إﻋﻼﻧﺎت ﻣﻦ ﺧﻼل اﻟﺘﺴﺠﻴﻞ ﻣﻊ إﻋﻼﻧﺎت ﺧﺪﻣﺔ أدوﺑﻲ‬ ‫‪ ،PDF‬ﻓﺈن ﺣﺎﺳﻮﺑﻚ ﻗﺪ ﻳﺘﺼﻞ ﺑﺄﺣﺪ ﻣﻮاﻗﻊ اﻹﻧﺘﺮﻧﺖ اﻟﺘﻲ ﻳﺘﻢ ﺗﺸﻐﻴﻠﻬﺎ ﻣﻦ ﻗﺒﻞ أدوﺑﻲ أو أﺣﺪ اﻟﻤﻌﻠﻨﻴﻦ أو ﻃﺮف ﺛﺎﻟﺚ ﺁﺧﺮ. ﻳﺘﻢ إرﺳﺎل ﻋﻨﻮان ﺑﺮوﺗﻮآﻮل‬ ‫اﻹﻧﺘﺮﻧﺖ )‪ (IP‬اﻟﺨﺎص ﺑﻚ ﻋﻨﺪﻣﺎ ﻳﺤﺪث ذﻟﻚ. وﻗﺪ ﻳﻘﻮم اﻟﻄﺮف اﻟﻤﻀﻴﻒ ﻟﻠﻤﻮﻗﻊ ﺑﺎﺳﺘﺨﺪام اﻟﺘﻜﻨﻮﻟﻮﺟﻴﺎ ﻹرﺳﺎل )أو "ﺧﺪﻣﺔ"( اﻹﻋﻼن أو اﻟﻤﺤﺘﻮى‬ ‫اﻹﻟﻜﺘﺮوﻧﻲ اﻵﺧﺮ اﻟﺬي ﻳﻈﻬﺮ ﻓﻲ أو ﺑﺎﻟﻘﺮب ﻣﻦ اﻟﻤﻠﻒ اﻟﻤﻔﺘﻮح. وﻗﺪ ﻳﻘﻮم أﻳﻀﺎ ﻣﺸﻐﻞ ﻣﻮﻗﻊ اﻹﻧﺘﺮﻧﺖ ﺑﺎﺳﺘﺨﺪام ‪ JavaScript‬وإﺷﺎرات اﻟﻮﻳﺐ )ﺗﻌﺮف‬ ‫ً‬ ‫أﻳﻀﺎ ﺑﻌﻼﻣﺎت اﻹﺟﺮاءات أو اﻟﺼﻮر أﺣﺎدﻳﺔ اﻟﺒﻜﺴﻞ( وﺗﻘﻨﻴﺎت أﺧﺮى ﻟﺰﻳﺎدة وﻗﻴﺎس ﻓﻌﺎﻟﻴﺔ اﻹﻋﻼﻧﺎت وﺗﺸﺨﻴﺺ اﻟﻤﺤﺘﻮى اﻹﻋﻼﻧﻲ. اﺗﺼﺎﻟﻚ ﺑﻤﻮاﻗﻊ أدوﺑﻲ‬ ‫ً‬ ‫ﻳﺨﻀﻊ ﻟﺴﻴﺎﺳﺔ أدوﺑﻲ ﻟﻠﺨﺼﻮﺻﻴﺔ ﻋﺒﺮ اﻹﻧﺘﺮﻧﺖ اﻟﻤﻮﺟﻮدة ﻋﻠﻰ اﻟﻤﻮﻗﻊ ‪ .http://www.adobe.com/go/privacy_ae‬وﻻ ﻳﺠﻮز ﻷدوﺑﻲ اﻟﻮﺻﻮل‬ ‫إﻟﻰ أو اﻟﺘﺤﻜﻢ ﻓﻲ اﻟﺨﺼﺎﺋﺺ اﻟﺘﻲ ﻗﺪ ﻳﺴﺘﺨﺪﻣﻬﺎ أي ﻃﺮف ﻣﻦ اﻟﻐﻴﺮ، آﻤﺎ أن أﻧﻈﻤﺔ اﻟﻤﻌﻠﻮﻣﺎت ﻟﻤﻮاﻗﻊ اﻟﻐﻴﺮ ﻋﻠﻰ اﻹﻧﺘﺮﻧﺖ ﻻ ﺗﺸﻤﻠﻬﺎ ﺳﻴﺎﺳﺔ أدوﺑﻲ‬ ‫ﻟﻠﺨﺼﻮﺻﻴﺔ ﻋﺒﺮ اﻹﻧﺘﺮﻧﺖ.‬ ‫6-2 اﻟﺘﺤﺪﻳﺚ واﻟﺘﻄﻮﻳﺮ. أﻧﺖ ﺗﻘﺮ وﺗﻮاﻓﻖ ﻋﻠﻰ أن اﻟﺒﺮﻧﺎﻣﺞ ﻗﺪ ﻳﺘﺴﺒﺐ ﻓﻲ ﺟﻌﻞ ﺣﺎﺳﻮﺑﻚ ﻳﺘﺼﻞ ﺗﻠﻘﺎﺋﻴﺎ ﺑﺎﻹﻧﺘﺮﻧﺖ ﻟﻠﺒﺤﺚ ﻋﻦ اﻟﺘﺤﺪﻳﺜﺎت اﻟﻤﺘﺎﺣﺔ ﻟﺘﻨﺰﻳﻠﻬﺎ‬ ‫ً‬ ‫ﺗﻠﻘﺎﺋﻴﺎ إﻟﻰ ﺣﺎﺳﻮﺑﻚ وإﺑﻼغ أدوﺑﻲ أن اﻟﺒﺮﻧﺎﻣﺞ ﺗﻢ ﺗﺜﺒﻴﺘﻪ ﺑﻨﺠﺎح. وﻋﻨﺪﻣﺎ ﻳﺤﺪث ذﻟﻚ، ﻻ ﺗﻨﻘﻞ إﻟﻰ أدوﺑﻲ ﺳﻮى اﻟﻤﻌﻠﻮﻣﺎت اﻟﺘﻲ ﻻ ﺗﺤﺪد اﻷﺷﺨﺎص. اﺗﺼﺎﻟﻚ‬ ‫ً‬ ‫ﺑﻤﻮاﻗﻊ أدوﺑﻲ ﻳﺨﻀﻊ ﻟﺴﻴﺎﺳﺔ أدوﺑﻲ ﻟﻠﺨﺼﻮﺻﻴﺔ ﻋﺒﺮ اﻹﻧﺘﺮﻧﺖ اﻟﻤﻮﺟﻮدة ﻋﻠﻰ اﻟﻤﻮﻗﻊ ‪ .http://www.adobe.com/go/privacy_ae‬ﻳﺮﺟﻰ ﻣﺮاﺟﻌﺔ‬ ‫اﻟﻮﺛﺎﺋﻖ ﻟﻤﻌﺮﻓﺔ اﻟﻤﻌﻠﻮﻣﺎت اﻟﺨﺎﺻﺔ ﺑﺘﻐﻴﻴﺮ إﻋﺪادات اﻟﺘﺤﺪﻳﺚ اﻻﻓﺘﺮاﺿﻴﺔ.‬ ‫6-3 ﻣﺪﻳﺮ اﻹﻋﺪادات. ﻗﺪ ﻳﺘﺴﺒﺐ ﻓﻼش ﺑﻼﻳﺮ )‪ (Flash Player‬ﻓﻲ ﺗﺨﺰﻳﻦ ﺑﻌﺾ إﻋﺪادات اﻟﻤﺴﺘﺨﺪم ﻋﻠﻰ ﺟﻬﺎز اﻟﻜﻤﺒﻴﻮﺗﺮ اﻟﺨﺎص ﺑﻚ ﻋﻠﻰ هﻴﺌﺔ آﺎﺋﻦ‬ ‫ﻣﺸﺘﺮك ﻣﺤﻠﻲ. وهﺬﻩ اﻹﻋﺪادات ﻻ ﺗﺮﺗﺒﻂ ﺑﻚ، ﻟﻜﻨﻬﺎ ﺗﺴﻤﺢ ﻟﻚ ﺑﺘﺸﻜﻴﻞ ﺑﻌﺾ اﻹﻋﺪادات ﺿﻤﻦ ﻓﻼش ﺑﻼﻳﺮ. وﻳﻤﻜﻨﻚ اﻟﺤﺼﻮل ﻋﻠﻰ ﻣﺰﻳﺪ ﻣﻦ اﻟﻤﻌﻠﻮﻣﺎت‬ ‫ﺣﻮل اﻟﻜﺎﺋﻦ اﻟﺪاﺧﻠﻲ اﻟﻤﺸﺘﺮك ﻋﻠﻰ اﻟﻤﻮﻗﻊ اﻟﺘﺎﻟﻲ: ‪ http://www.adobe.com/go/flashplayer_security_ae‬وﻣﺰﻳﺪ ﻣﻦ اﻟﻤﻌﻠﻮﻣﺎت ﺣﻮل ﻣﺪﻳﺮ‬ ‫اﻟﻤﻌﻠﻮﻣﺎت ﻋﻠﻰ ‪.http://www.adobe.com/go/settingsmanager_ae‬‬ ‫7. ﻋﺮوض اﻟﻐﻴﺮ.‬ ‫ﻗﺪ ﻳﺴﻤﺢ ﻟﻚ ﺑﺮﻧﺎﻣﺞ اﻟﻜﻤﺒﻴﻮﺗﺮ ﺑﺎﻟﺪﺧﻮل وﺗﺸﻐﻴﻞ ﻣﻮاﻗﻊ اﻟﻐﻴﺮ اﻹﻟﻜﺘﺮوﻧﻴﺔ وﺗﻄﺒﻴﻘﺎت اﻟﺒﺮاﻣﺞ وﺧﺪﻣﺎت اﻟﺒﻴﺎﻧﺎت، ﺑﻤﺎ ﻓﻲ ذﻟﻚ ﺗﻄﺒﻴﻘﺎت اﻹﻧﺘﺮﻧﺖ اﻟﻐﻨﻴﺔ‬ ‫)"ﻋﺮوض اﻟﻐﻴﺮ"(. دﺧﻮﻟﻚ إﻟﻰ أي ﻣﻦ ﻣﻮاﻗﻊ اﻟﻐﻴﺮ واﺳﺘﺨﺪاﻣﻚ ﻟﻬﺎ، وﻳﺸﻤﻞ ذﻟﻚ أﻳﺔ ﺑﻀﺎﺋﻊ أو ﺧﺪﻣﺎت أو ﻣﻌﻠﻮﻣﺎت ﺗﻢ ﺗﻮﻓﻴﺮهﺎ ﻣﻦ ﺗﻠﻚ اﻟﻤﻮاﻗﻊ ﻳﺨﻀﻊ‬ ‫ﻟﻸﺣﻜﺎم واﻟﺸﺮوط اﻟﻤﺘﻌﻠﻘﺔ ﺑﺘﻠﻚ اﻟﻌﺮوض. ﻋﺮوض اﻟﻐﻴﺮ ﻟﻴﺴﺖ ﻣﻤﻠﻮآﺔ أو ﻣﺰودة ﻣﻦ ﻗﺒﻞ أدوﺑﻲ.‬ ‫8. اﻟﺸﻬﺎدات اﻟﺮﻗﻤﻴﺔ.‬ ‫8-1 اﻻﺳﺘﺨﺪام. ﻳﺴﺘﺨﺪم أدوب إﻳﺮ )‪ (Adobe AIR‬اﻟﺸﻬﺎدات اﻟﺮﻗﻤﻴﺔ ﻟﻤﺴﺎﻋﺪﺗﻚ ﻓﻲ اﻟﺘﻌﺮف ﻋﻠﻰ ﻧﺎﺷﺮ ﺗﻄﺒﻴﻘﺎت أدوب إﻳﺮ اﻟﺘﻲ ﻳﺘﻢ إﻧﺸﺎؤهﺎ ﻣﻦ ﻗﺒﻞ‬ ‫اﻟﻐﻴﺮ. ﻳﺴﺘﺨﺪم أدوﺑﻲ رﻳﺪر )‪ (Adobe Reader‬اﻟﺸﻬﺎدات اﻟﺮﻗﻤﻴﺔ ﻟﻠﺘﻮﻗﻴﻊ واﻟﺘﺤﻘﻖ ﻣﻦ اﻟﺘﻮﻗﻴﻌﺎت داﺧﻞ ﻣﺴﺘﻨﺪات ‪ PDF‬واﻟﺘﺤﻘﻖ ﻣﻦ ﻣﺴﺘﻨﺪات ‪PDF‬‬ ‫اﻟﻤﻌﺘﻤﺪة. ﻗﺪ ﻳﺘﻢ ﺗﻮﺻﻴﻞ ﺣﺎﺳﻮﺑﻚ ﺑﺎﻹﻧﺘﺮﻧﺖ ﻋﻨﺪ اﻟﺘﺤﻘﻖ ﻣﻦ اﻟﺸﻬﺎدة اﻟﺮﻗﻤﻴﺔ. اﻟﺸﻬﺎدات اﻟﺮﻗﻤﻴﺔ ﻳﺘﻢ إﺻﺪارهﺎ ﻣﻦ ﻗﺒﻞ ﺟﻬﺎت إﺻﺪار اﻟﺸﻬﺎدات ﻣﻦ اﻟﻐﻴﺮ،‬ ‫وهﻲ ﺗﺸﻤﻞ ﺑﺎﺋﻌﻲ ﺧﺪﻣﺎت أدوﺑﻲ ﻟﻠﻤﺴﺘﻨﺪات اﻟﻤﻌﺘﻤﺪة )‪ (CDS‬اﻟﻤﺴﺠﻠﻴﻦ ﻋﻠﻰ اﻟﻤﻮﻗﻊ ‪") http://www.adobe.com/go/partners_cds_ae‬ﺟﻬﺎت‬ ‫إﺻﺪار اﻟﺸﻬﺎدات"( أو ﻳﻤﻜﻦ ﺗﻮﻗﻴﻌﻬﺎ ذاﺗﻴﺎ.‬ ‫ً‬ ‫8-2 اﻟﺸﺮوط واﻷﺣﻜﺎم. ﻳﻌﺪ ﺷﺮاء اﻟﺸﻬﺎدات اﻟﺮﻗﻤﻴﺔ واﺳﺘﺨﺪاﻣﻬﺎ واﻻﻋﺘﻤﺎد ﻋﻠﻴﻬﺎ ﻣﺴﺌﻮﻟﻴﺘﻚ وﻣﺴﺌﻮﻟﻴﺔ ﺟﻬﺔ إﺻﺪار اﻟﺸﻬﺎدة. ﻗﺒﻞ أن ﺗﻌﺘﻤﺪ ﻋﻠﻰ أي ﻣﺴﺘﻨﺪ‬ ‫ﻣﻌﺘﻤﺪ أو ﺗﻮﻗﻴﻊ رﻗﻤﻲ أو ﺧﺪﻣﺎت ﻟﺠﻬﺎت إﺻﺪار اﻟﺸﻬﺎدات ﻳﺠﺐ أن ﺗﺮاﺟﻊ اﻟﺸﺮوط واﻷﺣﻜﺎم اﻟﻤﻌﻤﻮل ﺑﻬﺎ واﻟﺘﻲ ﺗﻘﻮم ﺟﻬﺔ إﺻﺪار اﻟﺸﻬﺎدات اﻟﻤﻌﻨﻴﺔ‬ ‫ﺑﻤﻮﺟﺒﻬﺎ ﺑﺘﻘﺪﻳﻢ اﻟﺨﺪﻣﺎت، ﺑﻤﺎ ﻓﻲ ذﻟﻚ ﻋﻠﻰ ﺳﺒﻴﻞ اﻟﻤﺜﺎل، أي اﺗﻔﺎﻗﻴﺎت ﻣﺸﺘﺮآﻴﻦ، واﺗﻔﺎﻗﻴﺎت اﻷﻃﺮاف اﻟﻤﻌﺘﻤﺪة ﻋﻠﻴﻬﺎ، وﺳﻴﺎﺳﺎت اﻟﺸﻬﺎدات وإﻗﺮارات‬ ‫اﻟﻤﻤﺎرﺳﺔ. اﻧﻈﺮ اﻟﺮواﺑﻂ اﻟﻤﻮﺟﻮدة ﻋﻠﻰ اﻟﻤﻮﻗﻊ ‪ http://www.adobe.com/go/partners_cds_ae‬ﻟﻤﺰﻳﺪ ﻣﻦ اﻟﻤﻌﻠﻮﻣﺎت ﻋﻦ ﺧﺪﻣﺎت أدوﺑﻲ‬ ‫ﻟﻠﻤﺴﺘﻨﺪات اﻟﻤﻌﺘﻤﺪة )‪.(CDS‬‬ ‫8-3 اﻹﻗﺮار. أﻧﺖ ﺗﻮاﻓﻖ ﻋﻠﻰ أن )أ( اﻟﺸﻬﺎدة اﻟﺮﻗﻤﻴﺔ ﻗﺪ ﻳﻜﻮن ﻗﺪ ﺗﻢ إﻟﻐﺎؤهﺎ ﻗﺒﻞ وﻗﺖ اﻟﺘﺤﻘﻖ، ﻣﻤﺎ ﻳﺠﻌﻞ اﻟﺘﻮﻗﻴﻊ اﻟﺮﻗﻤﻲ ﺻﺤﻴﺤﺎ ﺑﻴﻨﻤﺎ ﻓﻲ هﻮ ﻓﻲ اﻟﺤﻘﻴﻘﺔ‬ ‫ً‬ ‫ﺎ‬ ‫ﻟﻴﺲ ﺻﺤﻴﺤً، )ب( ﻗﺪ ﻳﻜﻮن أﻣﺎن وﺳﻼﻣﺔ اﻟﺸﻬﺎدة اﻟﺮﻗﻤﻴﺔ ﻗﺪ ﺗﻌﺮﺿﺎ ﻟﻠﺘﻠﻒ ﺑﺴﺒﺐ ﺗﺼﺮف أو ﺣﺬف ﻣﻦ ﻗﺒﻞ اﻟﻤﻮﻗﻊ ﻋﻠﻰ اﻟﻤﺴﺘﻨﺪ، أو ﺟﻬﺔ إﺻﺪار اﻟﺸﻬﺎدة‬ ‫اﻟﻤﻌﻨﻴﺔ، أو أي ﻃﺮف ﻣﻦ اﻟﻐﻴﺮ، و)ج( ﻗﺪ ﺗﻜﻮن اﻟﺸﻬﺎدة هﻲ ﺷﻬﺎدة ﻣﻮﻗﻌﺔ ذاﺗﻴﺎ ﻟﻢ ﺗﻘﺪﻣﻬﺎ ﺟﻬﺔ ﻣﻦ ﺟﻬﺎت إﺻﺪار اﻟﺸﻬﺎدات. أﻧﺖ وﺣﺪك ﻣﺴﺌﻮل ﻋﻦ اﺗﺨﺎذ‬ ‫ً‬ ‫ﻗﺮار ﺑﺸﺄن ﻣﺎ إذا آﻨﺖ ﺗﻌﺘﻤﺪ أو ﻻ ﺗﻌﺘﻤﺪ ﻋﻠﻰ أي ﺷﻬﺎدة. وﻣﺎ ﻟﻢ ﻳﺘﻢ ﺗﻘﺪﻳﻢ ﺿﻤﺎن ﺧﻄﻲ ﻣﻨﻔﺼﻞ ﺑﺎﻟﺸﺮاء ﻣﻦ ﻗﺒﻞ ﺟﻬﺔ إﺻﺪار اﻟﺸﻬﺎدة ﻓﺄﻧﺖ ﺗﺴﺘﺨﺪم‬ ‫اﻟﺸﻬﺎدات اﻟﺮﻗﻤﻴﺔ ﻋﻠﻰ ﻣﺴﺌﻮﻟﻴﺘﻚ وﺣﺪك.‬ ‫8-4 اﻟﻤﺴﺘﻔﻴﺪون آﻄﺮف ﺛﺎﻟﺚ. أﻧﺖ ﺗﻮاﻓﻖ ﻋﻠﻰ أن أي ﺟﻬﺔ ﻣﻦ ﺟﻬﺎت إﺻﺪار اﻟﺸﻬﺎدات ﺗﻌﺘﻤﺪ ﻋﻠﻴﻬﺎ هﻮ ﻣﺴﺘﻔﻴﺪ ﻣﻦ اﻟﻐﻴﺮ ﻟﻬﺬﻩ اﻻﺗﻔﺎﻗﻴﺔ، وﻳﺤﻖ ﻟﻪ ﺗﻨﻔﻴﺬ‬ ‫هﺬﻩ اﻻﺗﻔﺎﻗﻴﺔ ﺑﺎﺳﻤﻪ آﻤﺎ ﻟﻮ أﻧﻪ ﺷﺮآﺔ أدوﺑﻲ.‬ ‫8-5 اﻟﺘﻌﻮﻳﺾ. أﻧﺖ ﺗﻮاﻓﻖ ﻋﻠﻰ إﺑﻘﺎء أدوﺑﻲ وأي ﺟﻬﺔ ﻹﺻﺪار اﻟﺸﻬﺎدات )ﺑﺎﺳﺘﺜﻨﺎء ﻣﺎ هﻮ ﻣﻨﺼﻮص ﻋﻠﻴﻪ ﺻﺮاﺣﺔ ﻓﻲ اﻟﺸﺮوط واﻷﺣﻜﺎم اﻟﺨﺎﺻﺔ ﺑﻪ(‬ ‫ﺑﻤﻨﺄى ﻋﻦ وﻣﻦ أي وآﺎﻓﺔ اﻟﻤﺴﺌﻮﻟﻴﺎت واﻟﺨﺴﺎﺋﺮ واﻹﺟﺮاءات واﻷﺿﺮار أو اﻟﻤﻄﺎﻟﺒﺎت )وﺗﺸﻤﻞ آﺎﻓﺔ اﻟﻨﻔﻘﺎت اﻟﻤﻌﻘﻮﻟﺔ واﻟﺘﻜﺎﻟﻴﻒ وأﺗﻌﺎب اﻟﻤﺤﺎﻣﻴﻦ( واﻟﺘﻲ‬ ‫ﺗﻨﺸﺄ ﻋﻦ أو ﻓﻴﻤﺎ ﻳﺘﻌﻠﻖ ﺑﺄي اﺳﺘﺨﺪام، أو اﻋﺘﻤﺎد ﻋﻠﻰ، أي ﺧﺪﻣﺔ ﻟﺠﻬﺔ إﺻﺪار اﻟﺸﻬﺎدات، وﺗﺘﻀﻤﻦ، وﺑﺪون ﺗﺤﺪﻳﺪ، )أ( اﻻﻋﺘﻤﺎد ﻋﻠﻰ ﺷﻬﺎدة ﻣﻨﺘﻬﻴﺔ أو‬ ‫ﻣﻠﻐﻴﺔ؛ )ب( اﻟﺘﺤﻘﻖ اﻟﻐﻴﺮ ﻣﻨﺎﺳﺐ واﻟﻐﻴﺮ ﺻﺤﻴﺢ ﻟﺸﻬﺎدة ﻣﺎ؛ )ج( اﺳﺘﺨﺪام ﺷﻬﺎدة ﻏﻴﺮ ﺗﻠﻚ اﻟﻤﺴﻤﻮح ﺑﻬﺎ ﻣﻦ ﻗﺒﻞ أي ﺷﺮوط وأﺣﻜﺎم ﻣﻌﻤﻮل ﺑﻬﺎ، هﺬﻩ‬ ‫اﻻﺗﻔﺎﻗﻴﺔ أو اﻟﻘﺎﻧﻮن اﻟﻤﻌﻤﻮل ﺑﻪ؛ )د( اﻹﺧﻔﺎق ﻓﻲ ﻣﻤﺎرﺳﺔ ﺣﻜﻢ ﻣﻌﻘﻮل ﺗﺤﺖ ﻇﺮوف ﻣﻌﻴﻨﺔ ﺑﺎﻻﻋﺘﻤﺎد ﻋﻠﻰ ﻣﺼﺪر اﻟﺨﺪﻣﺎت أو اﻟﺸﻬﺎدات أو )هـ( اﻹﺧﻔﺎق‬ ‫ﻓﻲ أداء أي ﻣﻦ اﻻﻟﺘﺰاﻣﺎت ﺣﺴﺒﻤﺎ ﻣﻄﻠﻮﺑﺎ ﻓﻲ اﻟﺸﺮوط واﻷﺣﻜﺎم اﻟﻤﺘﻌﻠﻘﺔ ﺑﺎﻟﺨﺪﻣﺎت.‬ ‫ً‬

‫9.ﻻ ﺿﻤﺎن.‬ ‫ﻳﺘﻢ ﺗﺴﻠﻴﻢ ﺑﺮﻧﺎﻣﺞ اﻟﻜﻤﺒﻴﻮﺗﺮ إﻟﻴﻜﻢ ﻓﻲ ﺣﺎﻟﺘﻪ "آﻤﺎ هﻮ" وﺑﺠﻤﻴﻊ أﺧﻄﺎﺋﻪ .وﻻ ﺗﻘﺪم أدوﺑﻲ وﻻ ﻣﻮردوهﺎ وﻻ ﺟﻬﺎت إﺻﺪار اﻟﺸﻬﺎدات وﻻ ﻳﻤﻜﻨﻬﺎ ﺿﻤﺎن اﻷداء‬ ‫أو اﻟﻨﺘﺎﺋﺞ اﻟﺘﻲ ﻳﻤﻜﻨﻚ اﻟﺤﺼﻮل ﻋﻠﻴﻬﺎ ﺑﺎﺳﺘﺨﺪام ﺑﺮﻧﺎﻣﺞ اﻟﻜﻤﺒﻴﻮﺗﺮ أو ﺧﺪﻣﺎت ﺟﻬﺔ إﺻﺪار اﻟﺸﻬﺎدات أو ﻋﺮوض اﻟﻐﻴﺮ اﻷﺧﺮى. وﺑﺎﺳﺘﺜﻨﺎء ﻣﺎ ﻳﻜﻮن ﺧﺎﺻﺎ‬ ‫ً‬ ‫ﺑﺄي ﺿﻤﺎن أو ﺷﺮط أو ﺗﻌﻬﺪ أو ﺷﺮط ﻻ ﻳﻤﻜﻦ اﺳﺘﺜﻨﺎؤﻩ أو ﺗﺤﺪﻳﺪﻩ ﺑﻤﻮﺟﺐ اﻟﻘﺎﻧﻮن اﻟﻤﻌﻤﻮل ﺑﻪ ﻓﻲ ﺟﻬﺔ اﻻﺧﺘﺼﺎص اﻟﻘﻀﺎﺋﻲ اﻟﺘﻲ ﺗﺘﺒﻌﻬﺎ، ﻓﺈن أدوﺑﻲ‬ ‫وﻣﻮر ّﻳﻬﺎ وﺷﺮآﺎﺗﻬﺎ اﻟﺰﻣﻴﻠﺔ ﻟﻦ ﻳﻘﺪﻣﻮا أﻳﺔ ﺿﻤﺎﻧﺎت أو ﺷﺮوط أو ﺗﻌﻬﺪات أو أﺣﻜﺎم، )ﺻﺮﻳﺤﺔ أم ﺿﻤﻨﻴﺔ، ﺳﻮاء ﺑﻤﻮﺟﺐ اﻟﺘﺸﺮﻳﻊ أو اﻟﻘﺎﻧﻮن اﻟﻌﺎم أو‬ ‫د‬ ‫اﻟﻌﺮف أو اﻻﺳﺘﺨﺪام أو ﻏﻴﺮ ذﻟﻚ( ﻣﻤﺎ ﻳﺘﻌﻠﻖ ﺑﺄﻳﺔ ﻣﺴﺎﺋﻞ أﺧﺮى، وﻳﺸﻤﻞ ذﻟﻚ وﻟﻜﻨﻪ ﻻ ﻳﻘﺘﺼﺮ ﻋﻠﻰ، ﻋﺪم اﻻﻧﺘﻬﺎك ﻟﺤﻘﻮق اﻟﻐﻴﺮ أو اﻟﻤﻠﻜﻴﺔ أو ﻗﺎﺑﻠﻴﺔ‬ ‫اﻟﻌﺮض ﻟﻠﺴﻮق أو اﻟﺘﻜﺎﻣﻞ أو اﻟﺠﻮدة اﻟﻤﺮﺿﻴﺔ أو اﻟﻤﻼءﻣﺔ ﻷي ﻏﺮض ﻣﺤﺪد وﺧﺎص .ﻳﺠﺐ أن ﺗﻈﻞ أﺣﻜﺎم اﻟﻤﺎدة )9( واﻟﻤﺎدة )01( ﺳﺎرﻳﺔ ﺑﻌﺪ إﻧﻬﺎء هﺬﻩ‬ ‫اﻻﺗﻔﺎﻗﻴﺔ، آﻴﻔﻤﺎ ﻧﺸﺄ ﺳﺒﺐ ذﻟﻚ، وﻟﻜﻦ هﺬا ﻟﻦ ﻳﺘﻀﻤﻦ أو ﻳﺨﻠﻖ أي ﺣﻖ ﻣﺴﺘﻤﺮ ﻓﻲ اﺳﺘﺨﺪام اﻟﺒﺮﻧﺎﻣﺞ ﺑﻌﺪ إﻧﻬﺎء هﺬﻩ اﻻﺗﻔﺎﻗﻴﺔ.‬ ‫01. ﺗﺤﺪﻳﺪ اﻟﻤﺴﺌﻮﻟﻴﺔ.‬ ‫ﻟﻦ ﺗﻜﻮن أدوﺑﻲ أو ﻣﻮردوهﺎ أو ﺟﻬﺎت إﺻﺪار اﻟﺸﻬﺎدات ﺑﺄي ﺣﺎل ﻣﺴﺌﻮﻟﺔ ﺗﺠﺎهﻜﻢ ﻋﻦ أﻳﺔ أﺿﺮار أو ﻣﻄﺎﻟﺒﺎت أو ﺗﻜﺎﻟﻴﻒ ﻣﻬﻤﺎ آﺎﻧﺖ أو أﻳﺔ أﺿﺮار ﻧﺎﺷﺌﺔ،‬ ‫ﻏﻴﺮ ﻣﺒﺎﺷﺮة أو ﻃﺎرﺋﺔ، أو أﻳﺔ ﺧﺴﺎرة ﻟﻸرﺑﺎح أو ﺧﺴﺎرة اﻟﻤﺪﺧﺮات، ﺣﺘﻰ إذا ﻣﺎ ﺗﻢ إﺑﻼغ ﻣﻨﺪوب أدوﺑﻲ ﻋﻦ اﺣﺘﻤﺎﻟﻴﺔ وﻗﻮع ﻣﺜﻞ ﺗﻠﻚ اﻟﺨﺴﺎرة أو اﻷﺿﺮار‬ ‫أو اﻟﻤﻄﺎﻟﺒﺎت أو اﻟﺘﻜﺎﻟﻴﻒ أو اﻟﻤﻄﺎﻟﺒﺎت. ﺗﻨﻄﺒﻖ اﻟﻘﻴﻮد واﻟﻀﻮاﺑﻂ واﻻﺳﺘﺜﻨﺎءات اﻟﺴﺎﺑﻘﺔ اﻟﺬآﺮ ﻋﻠﻰ اﻟﻨﻄﺎق اﻟﻤﺴﻤﻮح ﺑﻪ ﻣﻦ ﻗﺒﻞ اﻟﻘﺎﻧﻮن اﻟﻤﻨﻄﺒﻖ ﻓﻲ ﻧﻄﺎق‬ ‫ﺳﻠﻄﺘﻜﻢ اﻟﻘﻀﺎﺋﻴﺔ. وﺗﻜﻮن ﻣﺴﺌﻮﻟﻴﺔ أدوﺑﻲ اﻟﻜﺎﻣﻠﺔ وﺗﻠﻚ اﻟﻤﺘﻌﻠﻘﺔ ﺑﻤﻮردﻳﻬﺎ وﺟﻬﺎت إﺻﺪار اﻟﺸﻬﺎدات ﺑﻤﻮﺟﺐ أو ﻓﻴﻤﺎ ﻳﺘﻌﻠﻖ ﺑﻬﺬﻩ اﻻﺗﻔﺎﻗﻴﺔ ﻣﺤﺪودة ﺑﺎﻟﻤﺒﻠﻎ‬ ‫اﻟﻤﺪﻓﻮع ﻟﺒﺮﻧﺎﻣﺞ اﻟﻜﻤﺒﻴﻮﺗﺮ، إن وﺟﺪ .وﻻ ﻳﻮﺟﺪ أي ﺷﻲء ﻓﻲ هﺬﻩ اﻻﺗﻔﺎﻗﻴﺔ ﻣﻤﺎ ﻗﺪ ﻳﻘ ّﺪ أو ﻳﺤﺪ ﻣﻦ ﻣﺴﺌﻮﻟﻴﺔ أدوﺑﻲ ﺗﺠﺎهﻜﻢ ﻓﻲ ﺣﺎﻟﺔ اﻟﻮﻓﺎة أو اﻹﺻﺎﺑﺔ‬ ‫ﻴ‬ ‫اﻟﺸﺨﺼﻴﺔ اﻟﻨﺎﺗﺠﺔ ﻋﻦ إهﻤﺎل أدوﺑﻲ أو ﻋﻦ اﻷذى اﻟﻨﺎﺷﺊ ﻣﻦ اﻟﺨﺪاع )اﻻﺣﺘﻴﺎل(. هﺬا وﺗﺘﺼﺮف ﺑﺎﻟﻨﻴﺎﺑﺔ ﻋﻦ ﻣﻮردﻳﻬﺎ وﺟﻬﺎت إﺻﺪار اﻟﺸﻬﺎدات ﺑﻐﺮض‬ ‫اﻻﻟﺘﺰاﻣﺎت اﻟﻤﺘﻌﻠﻘﺔ ﺑﺎﻟﺘﻨﺎزل واﻟﺘﺨﻠﻲ واﻻﺳﺘﺜﻨﺎء و/أو اﻟﻘﻴﻮد واﻟﻀﻤﺎﻧﺎت واﻟﻤﺴﺌﻮﻟﻴﺔ، آﻤﺎ هﻮ ﻣﻨﺼﻮص ﻋﻠﻴﻪ ﻓﻲ هﺬﻩ اﻻﺗﻔﺎﻗﻴﺔ، وﻟﻜﻦ ﻟﻴﺲ ﻓﻲ أي ﻣﺠﺎل‬ ‫ﺁﺧﺮ وﻻ ﻷي ﻏﺮض. ﻟﻤﺰﻳﺪ ﻣﻦ اﻟﻤﻌﻠﻮﻣﺎت، ﺑﺮﺟﺎء اﻻﻃﻼع ﻋﻠﻰ اﻟﻤﻌﻠﻮﻣﺎت اﻟﻤﺤﺪدة اﻟﺨﺎﺻﺔ ﺑﺎﻟﺴﻠﻄﺔ اﻟﻘﻀﺎﺋﻴﺔ ﻓﻲ ﻧﻬﺎﻳﺔ هﺬﻩ اﻻﺗﻔﺎﻗﻴﺔ، إن وﺟﺪت، أو‬ ‫اﻻﺗﺼﺎل ﺑﻘﺴﻢ دﻋﻢ وإﺳﻨﺎد ﻋﻤﻼء أدوﺑﻲ.‬ ‫11. ﻗﻮاﻧﻴﻦ اﻟﺘﺼﺪﻳﺮ.‬ ‫أﻧﺖ ﺗﻮاﻓﻖ ﻋﻠﻰ أﻧﻪ ﻟﻦ ﻳﺘﻢ ﺷﺤﻦ ﺑﺮاﻣﺞ اﻟﻜﻤﺒﻴﻮﺗﺮ أو ﻧﻘﻠﻬﺎ أو ﺗﺤﻮﻳﻠﻬﺎ، أو ﺗﺼﺪﻳﺮهﺎ إﻟﻰ اﻟﺪوﻟﺔ أو اﺳﺘﺨﺪاﻣﻬﺎ ﺑﺄﻳﺔ ﻃﺮﻳﻘﺔ ﻣﺤﻈﻮرة ﻣﻦ ﻗﺒﻞ ﻗﺎﻧﻮن إدارة‬ ‫اﻟﺘﺼﺪﻳﺮ ﺑﺎﻟﻮﻻﻳﺎت اﻟﻤﺘﺤﺪة اﻷﻣﺮﻳﻜﻴﺔ أو أﻳﺔ ﻗﻮاﻧﻴﻦ ﺗﺼﺪﻳﺮ أﺧﺮى أو ﻗﻴﻮد أو ﺿﻮاﺑﻂ أو ﻟﻮاﺋﺢ )ﻣﻌﺎ ﺗﺴﻤﻰ "ﻗﻮاﻧﻴﻦ اﻟﺘﺼﺪﻳﺮ"(. ﺑﺎﻹﺿﺎﻓﺔ إﻟﻰ ذﻟﻚ، إذا ﻣﺎ‬ ‫ً‬ ‫آﺎن ﺑﺮﻧﺎﻣﺞ اﻟﻜﻤﺒﻴﻮﺗﺮ ﻣﻌﺮﻓﺎ وﻣﺤﺪدا آﻤﺎدة ﺧﺎﺿﻌﺔ ﻟﻠﺘﺼﺪﻳﺮ ﺑﻤﻮﺟﺐ ﻗﻮاﻧﻴﻦ اﻟﺘﺼﺪﻳﺮ، ﻓﻴﺠﺐ ﻋﻠﻴﻚ أن ﺗﻘﺪم وﺗﺒﻴﻦ وﺗﻀﻤﻦ أﻧﻚ ﻟﺴﺖ ﻣﻮاﻃﻨﺎ ﻓﻲ، أو‬ ‫ً‬ ‫ً‬ ‫ً‬ ‫ﻣﻮﺟﻮدا ﻓﻲ دوﻟﺔ ﺗﻘﻊ ﺗﺤﺖ اﻟﺤﻈﺮ أو اﻟﺘﻘﻴﻴﺪ ﻣﻦ ﺟﺎﻧﺐ ﺁﺧﺮ، )وﻳﺸﻤﻞ ذﻟﻚ، دون ﺗﺤﺪﻳﺪ، إﻳﺮان، ﺳﻮرﻳﺎ، اﻟﺴﻮدان، ﻟﻴﺒﻴﺎ، آﻮﺑـﺎ، وآﻮرﻳﺎ اﻟﺸﻤﺎﻟﻴﺔ( وأﻧﻚ‬ ‫ً‬ ‫ﺑﺨﻼف ذﻟﻚ ﻏﻴﺮ ﻣﻮﺿﻮع ﻗﻴﺪ اﻟﺤﻈﺮ ﺑﻤﻮﺟﺐ ﻗﻮاﻧﻴﻦ اﻟﺘﺼﺪﻳﺮ ﻣﻦ اﻟﺤﺼﻮل ﻋﻠﻰ ﺑﺮاﻣﺞ اﻟﻜﻤﺒﻴﻮﺗﺮ. ﻳﺘﻢ ﻣﻨﺢ آﺎﻓﺔ اﻟﺤﻘﻮق اﻟﻤﺘﻌﻠﻘﺔ ﺑﺎﺳﺘﺨﺪام ﺑﺮاﻣﺞ‬ ‫اﻟﻜﻤﺒﻴﻮﺗﺮ ﺑﺸﺮط أن ﺗﺘﻢ ﻣﺼﺎدرة ﺗﻠﻚ اﻟﺤﻘﻮق ﻓﻲ ﺣﺎل إﺧﻔﺎﻗﻚ ﻓﻲ اﻻﻟﺘﺰام ﺑﺄﺣﻜﺎم هﺬﻩ اﻻﺗﻔﺎﻗﻴﺔ.‬ ‫21. اﻟﻘﺎﻧﻮن اﻟﺤﺎآﻢ.‬ ‫ُﺤﻜﻢ هﺬﻩ اﻻﺗﻔﺎﻗﻴﺔ ﻣﻦ ﻗﺒﻞ و ُﻔﺴﺮ وﻓﻘﺎ ﻟﻠﻘﻮاﻧﻴﻦ اﻷﺳﺎﺳﻴﺔ اﻟﻨﺎﻓﺬة اﻟﻤﻔﻌﻮل ﻓﻲ: )أ( وﻻﻳﺔ آﺎﻟﻴﻔﻮرﻧﻴﺎ، إذا ﻣﺎ ﺗﻢ اﻟﺤﺼﻮل ﻋﻠﻰ ﺗﺮﺧﻴﺺ ﺑﺮاﻣﺞ آﻤﺒﻴﻮﺗﺮ ﻋﻨﺪﻣﺎ‬ ‫ً‬ ‫ﺗ‬ ‫ﺗ‬ ‫ﺗﻜﻮن ﺑﺎﻟﻮﻻﻳﺎت اﻟﻤﺘﺤﺪة اﻷﻣﺮﻳﻜﻴﺔ، آﻨﺪا، أو اﻟﻤﻜﺴﻴﻚ؛ أو )ب( اﻟﻴﺎﺑﺎن، إذا ﻣﺎ ﺗﻢ اﻟﺤﺼﻮل ﻋﻠﻰ ﺗﺮﺧﻴﺺ ﺑﺮاﻣﺞ آﻤﺒﻴﻮﺗﺮ ﻋﻨﺪﻣﺎ ﺗﻜﻮن ﻓﻲ اﻟﻴﺎﺑﺎن، اﻟﺼﻴﻦ،‬ ‫آﻮرﻳﺎ، أو أﻳﺔ دوﻟﺔ ﺟﻨﻮب ﺷﺮق ﺁﺳﻴﻮﻳﺔ ﺣﻴﺚ ﺗﻜﺘﺐ آﺎﻓﺔ اﻟﻠﻐﺎت اﻟﺮﺳﻤﻴﺔ إﻣﺎ ﺑﻨﺺ ﻓﺮدي )ﻣﺜﻞ: هﺎﻧﺰي، آﺎﻧﺠﻲ، أو هﺎﻧﺠﺎ(، و/أو اﻟﻨﺺ اﻵﺧﺮ اﻟﺬي ﻳﺴﺘﻨﺪ‬ ‫إﻟﻰ أو ﻳﻜﻮن ﻣﺸﺎﺑﻪ ﻟﻬﻴﻜﻠﻴﺔ ﻧﺺ ﻓﺮدي ﺁﺧﺮ، ﻣﺜﻞ "اﻟﻬﺎﻧﺠﻮل" أو "اﻟﻜﺎﻧﺎ"؛ أو )ج( إﻧﺠﻠﺘﺮا، إذا ﻣﺎ ﺗﻢ اﻟﺤﺼﻮل ﺗﺮﺧﻴﺺ ﺑﺮاﻣﺞ آﻤﺒﻴﻮﺗﺮ ﻋﻨﺪﻣﺎ ﺗﻜﻮن ﻓﻲ‬ ‫أﻳﺔ ﺳﻠﻄﺔ ﻗﻀﺎﺋﻴﺔ ﻟﻢ ﻳﺘﻢ ﺗﺤﺪﻳﺪهﺎ أﻋﻼﻩ. أﻣﺎ اﻟﻤﺤﺎآﻢ اﻟﻤﺨﺘﺼﺔ ﻟﻜﻞ ﻣﻦ ﻣﻘﺎﻃﻌﺔ ﺳﺎﻧﺘﺎ آﻼرا، آﺎﻟﻴﻔﻮرﻧﻴﺎ ﺣﻴﺚ ﺗﻨﻄﺒﻖ ﻗﻮاﻧﻴﻦ آﺎﻟﻴﻔﻮرﻧﻴﺎ، وﻣﺤﻜﻤﺔ ﻣﻘﺎﻃﻌﺔ‬ ‫ﻃﻮآﻴﻮ ﻓﻲ اﻟﻴﺎﺑﺎن، ﺣﻴﺚ ﺗﻨﻄﺒﻖ اﻟﻘﻮاﻧﻴﻦ اﻟﻴﺎﺑﺎﻧﻴﺔ، واﻟﻤﺤﺎآﻢ اﻟﻤﺨﺘﺼﺔ ﻓﻲ ﻟﻨﺪن، اﻧﺠﻠﺘﺮا، ﺣﻴﺚ ﺗﻨﻄﺒﻖ ﻗﻮاﻧﻴﻦ اﻧﺠﻠﺘﺮا، ﻳﺠﺐ أن ﻳﻜﻮن ﻟﻜﻞ ﻣﻨﻬﺎ اﻻﺧﺘﺼﺎص‬ ‫اﻟﻘﻀﺎﺋﻲ اﻟﻐﻴﺮ ﺣﺼﺮي ﻋﻠﻰ آﺎﻓﺔ اﻟﻨﺰاﻋﺎت اﻟﻤﺘﻌﻠﻘﺔ ﺑﻬﺬﻩ اﻻﺗﻔﺎﻗﻴﺔ. وﻟﻦ ُﺤﻜﻢ هﺬﻩ اﻻﺗﻔﺎﻗﻴﺔ ﻣﻦ ﻗﺒﻞ ﻗﻮاﻧﻴﻦ وﻗﻮاﻋﺪ ﻧﺰاع اﻟﻘﺎﻧﻮن ﻷﻳﺔ ﺳﻠﻄﺔ ﻗﻀﺎﺋﻴﺔ أو‬ ‫ﺗ‬ ‫ﻣﻴﺜﺎق اﻷﻣﻢ اﻟﻤﺘﺤﺪة ﻋﻠﻰ اﻟﻌﻘﻮد اﻟﻤﺘﻌﻠﻘﺔ ﺑﻌﻤﻠﻴﺔ اﻟﺒﻴﻊ اﻟﺪوﻟﻴﺔ ﻟﻠﺒﻀﺎﺋﻊ واﻟﺴﻠﻊ، واﻟﺘﻲ ﻳﺘﻢ اﺳﺘﺜﻨﺎء ﺗﻄﺒﻴﻘﻬﺎ ﺑﺸﻜﻞ ﺻﺮﻳﺢ وواﺿﺢ.‬ ‫31. أﺣﻜﺎم ﻋﺎﻣﺔ.‬ ‫إذا ﻣﺎ وﺟﺪ أي ﺟﺰء ﻣﻦ هﺬﻩ اﻻﺗﻔﺎﻗﻴﺔ ﺑﺎﻃﻼ وﻏﻴﺮ ﻧﺎﻓﺬ، ﻓﺈن ذﻟﻚ ﻟﻦ ﻳﺆﺛﺮ ﻋﻠﻰ ﺳﺮﻳﺎن ﻣﻔﻌﻮل اﻻﺗﻔﺎﻗﻴﺔ، واﻟﺘﻲ ﻳﺠﺐ أن ﺗﺒﻘﻰ ﺳﺎرﻳﺔ اﻟﻤﻔﻌﻮل وﻧﺎﻓﺬة وﻓﻘﺎ‬ ‫ً‬ ‫ً‬ ‫ﻷﺣﻜﺎﻣﻬﺎ. وﻟﻦ ﺗﻜﻮن هﺬﻩ اﻻﺗﻔﺎﻗﻴﺔ ﻓﻲ وﺿﻊ إﺧﻼل ﺑﺎﻟﺤﻘﻮق اﻟﺘﺸﺮﻳﻌﻴﺔ ﻷي ﻃﺮف ﻳﺘﻌﺎﻣﻞ آﻤﺴﺘﻬﻠﻚ. ورﺑﻤﺎ ﻳﺘﻢ ﺗﻌﺪﻳﻞ هﺬﻩ اﻻﺗﻔﺎﻗﻴﺔ ﻓﻘﻂ ﺧﻄﻴﺎ وﻳﺘﻢ اﻟﺘﻮﻗﻴﻊ‬ ‫ً‬ ‫ﻋﻠﻰ ذﻟﻚ ﻣﻦ ﻗﺒﻞ ﻣﻮﻇﻒ ﻣﺼﺮح ﻟﻪ ﻣﻦ ﻗﺒﻞ أدوﺑﻲ. وﻳﺠﻮز ﺗﺮﺧﻴﺺ أﻋﻤﺎل اﻟﺘﺤﺪﻳﺚ ﻟﻚ ﻣﻦ ﻗﺒﻞ أدوﺑﻲ ﺑﺸﺮوط إﺿﺎﻓﻴﺔ أو ﻣﺨﺘﻠﻔﺔ. وﺗﻌﺘﺒﺮ هﺬﻩ اﻻﺗﻔﺎﻗﻴﺔ‬ ‫اﻻﺗﻔﺎق اﻟﻜﺎﻣﻞ ﻣﺎ ﺑﻴﻦ أدوﺑﻲ وﺑﻴﻨﻜﻢ ﻓﻴﻤﺎ ﻳﺘﻌﻠﻖ ﺑﺒﺮاﻣﺞ اﻟﻜﻤﺒﻴﻮﺗﺮ، وهﻲ ﺑﺬﻟﻚ ﺗﻠﻐﻲ وﺗﺒﻄﻞ أﻳﺔ ﺑﻴﺎﻧﺎت ﺗﻤﺜﻴﻞ ﺳﺎﺑﻘﺔ أو ﻣﺒﺎﺣﺜﺎت أو ﺗﻌﻬﺪات أو اﺗﺼﺎﻻت أو‬ ‫ﻣﻮاد دﻋﺎﻳﺔ وإﻋﻼن ﺗﺘﻌﻠﻖ ﺑﺒﺮاﻣﺞ اﻟﻜﻤﺒﻴﻮﺗﺮ.‬ ‫41. اﻹﺷﻌﺎر اﻟﻤﻮﺟﻪ إﻟﻰ اﻟﻤﺴﺘﺨﺪﻣﻴﻦ اﻟﻨﻬﺎﺋﻴﻴﻦ ﺑﺤﻜﻮﻣﺔ اﻟﻮﻻﻳﺎت اﻟﻤﺘﺤﺪة.‬ ‫أﻣﺎ ﺑﺎﻟﻨﺴﺒﺔ ﻟﻠﻤﺴﺘﺨ ِﻣﻴﻦ اﻟﻨﻬﺎﺋﻴﻴﻦ ﻓﻲ ﺣﻜﻮﻣﺔ اﻟﻮﻻﻳﺎت اﻟﻤﺘﺤﺪة اﻷﻣﺮﻳﻜﻴﺔ، ﻓﺈن أدوﺑﻲ ﺗﻮاﻓﻖ ﻋﻠﻰ اﻻﻟﺘﺰام ﺑﻜﺎﻓﺔ اﻟﻘﻮاﻧﻴﻦ اﻟﻤﻄﺒﻘﺔ ذات اﻟﻔﺮﺻﺔ اﻟﻤﺘﺴﺎوﻳﺔ‬ ‫ﺪ‬ ‫ﺎ‬ ‫واﻟﺘﻲ ﺗﺸﻤﻞ، إن آﺎن ذﻟﻚ ﻣﻨﺎﺳﺒً، ﻧﺼﻮص أﺣﻜﺎم اﻷﻣﺮ اﻟﺘﻨﻔﻴﺬي 64211، وﺗﻌﺪﻳﻼﺗﻪ، اﻟﻤﺎدة )204( ﻣﻦ ﻗﺎﻧﻮن اﻟﻤﺴﺎﻋﺪة ﻓﻲ إﻋﺎدة ﺗﻌﺪﻳﻞ إﻳﺮا ﻓﻴﺘﻴﺮاﻧﺲ‬

‫ﻓﻲ ﻓﻴﺘﻨﺎم، ﻟﻌﺎم 4791 )83 ﻳﻮ إس ﺳﻲ 2124( واﻟﻤﺎدة )305( ﻣﻦ ﻗﺎﻧﻮن إﻋﺎدة اﻟﺘﺄهﻴﻞ ﻟﻌﺎم 3791، وﺗﻌﺪﻳﻼﺗﻪ، واﻟﻠﻮاﺋﺢ ﻓﻲ 14 "ﺳﻲ.إف.ﺁر." اﻷﺟﺰاء‬ ‫06-1 وﻟﻐﺎﻳﺔ 06-06، 06-147. أﻣﺎ ﻣﺎدة اﻹﺟﺮاء اﻟﺘﻮآﻴﺪي واﻟﻠﻮاﺋﺢ اﻟﻤﺘﻀﻤﻨﺔ ﻓﻲ اﻟﺠﻤﻠﺔ اﻟﺴﺎﺑﻘﺔ ﻓﺴﻴﺘﻢ ﺗﻮﺣﻴﺪهﺎ ودﻣﺠﻬﺎ ﻋﻦ ﻃﺮﻳﻖ اﻹﺷﺎرة إﻟﻴﻬﺎ ﻓﻲ‬ ‫هﺬﻩ اﻻﺗﻔﺎﻗﻴﺔ.‬ ‫51. اﻻﻟﺘﺰام واﻟﺘﻮاﻓﻖ ﻣﻊ اﻟﺘﺮاﺧﻴﺺ.‬ ‫إن آﻨﺖ ﻣﺸﺮوﻋﺎ ﺗﺠﺎرﻳﺎ أو ﻣﻨﻈﻤﺔ، ﻓﺈﻧﻚ ﺗﻮاﻓﻖ وﺗﻘﺒﻞ أﻧﻪ وﻋﻨﺪ اﻟﻄﻠﺐ ﻣﻦ أدوﺑﻲ أو ﻣﻦ ﻣﻤﺜﻠﻬﺎ اﻟﻤﺼﺮح ﻟﻪ ﻓﺈﻧﻚ ﺳﻮف ﺗﻮﺛﻖ وﺧﻼل ﺛﻼﺛﻴﻦ )03( ﻳﻮﻣﺎ‬ ‫ً‬ ‫ً‬ ‫ً‬ ‫ً‬ ‫وﺑﺸﻜﻞ آﺎﻣﻞ وﺗﺸﻬﺪ ﺑﺄن اﺳﺘﺨﺪام أﻳﺎ ﻣﻦ وآﺎﻓﺔ ﺑﺮاﻣﺞ اﻟﻜﻤﺒﻴﻮﺗﺮ ﻓﻲ اﻟﻮﻗﺖ اﻟﺬي ﻳﺘﻢ ﻓﻴﻪ اﻟﻄﻠﺐ ﻳﻜﻮن ﻣﺘﻮاﻓﻘﺎ ﻣﻊ ﺗﺮاﺧﻴﺼﻚ اﻟﺴﺎرﻳﺔ اﻟﻤﻔﻌﻮل ﻣﻦ أدوﺑﻲ.‬ ‫61. أﺣﻜﺎم ﺧﺎﺻﺔ واﺳﺘﺜﻨﺎءات.‬ ‫61-1 ﺗﺤﺪﻳﺪ اﻟﻤﺴﺌﻮﻟﻴﺔ ﻟﻠﻤﺴﺘﺨﺪﻣﻴﻦ اﻟﻤﻘﻴﻤﻴﻦ ﻓﻲ أﻟﻤﺎﻧﻴﺎ واﻟﻨﻤﺴﺎ.‬ ‫61-1-1 إذا ﻗﻤﺖ ﺑﺎﻟﺤﺼﻮل ﻋﻠﻰ ﺑﺮﻧﺎﻣﺞ اﻟﻜﻤﺒﻴﻮﺗﺮ ﻓﻲ أﻟﻤﺎﻧﻴﺎ أو ﻓﻲ اﻟﻨﻤﺴﺎ، وأﻧﺖ ﺗﻘﻴﻢ ﻋﺎدة ﻓﻲ ﺗﻠﻚ اﻟﺪوﻟﺔ، ﻓﻠﻦ ﺗﻨﻄﺒﻖ اﻟﻤﺎدة )01( ﺣﻴﻨﺌﺬ. وﺑﺪﻻ ﻣﻦ ذﻟﻚ،‬ ‫ً‬ ‫ٍ‬ ‫ً‬ ‫ووﻓﻘﺎ ﻷﺣﻜﺎم اﻟﻤﺎدة 61-1-2، ﻓﺈن اﻟﻤﺴﺌﻮﻟﻴﺔ اﻟﻘﺎﻧﻮﻧﻴﺔ ﻷدوﺑﻲ ﻋﻦ اﻷﺿﺮار ﺳﺘﻜﻮن ﻣﺤﺪودة وﻣﻘﺘﺼﺮة ﻋﻠﻰ اﻟﻨﺤﻮ اﻟﺘﺎﻟﻲ: )1( أن ﺗﻜﻮن أدوﺑﻲ ﻣﺴﺌﻮﻟﺔ ﻓﻘﻂ‬ ‫ً‬ ‫وﻟﻐﺎﻳﺔ ﻣﺒﻠﻎ اﻷﺿﺮار اﻟﺬي آﺎن ﻣﻦ اﻟﻤﻤﻜﻦ ﺗﻮﻗﻌﻪ ﻣﻦ اﻟﻨﺎﺣﻴﺔ اﻟﻨﻤﻮذﺟﻴﺔ اﻟﻤﻌﻴﺎرﻳﺔ ﻓﻲ اﻟﻮﻗﺖ اﻟﺬي ﺗﻢ ﻓﻴﻪ اﻟﺪﺧﻮل ﻓﻲ وإﺑﺮام اﺗﻔﺎﻗﻴﺔ اﻟﺘﺮﺧﻴﺺ ﺑﺨﺼﻮص‬ ‫اﻷﺿﺮار اﻟﻨﺎﺷﺌﺔ ﻋﻦ ﺧﺮق ﻣﺘﻬﺎون وإن آﺎن ﺑﺪرﺟﺔ ﺧﻔﻴﻔﺔ ﻟﻼﻟﺘﺰام اﻟﺘﻌﺎﻗﺪي اﻟﻤﺎدي، و)2( ﻟﻦ ﺗﻜﻮن أدوﺑﻲ ﻣﺴﺌﻮﻟﺔ ﻋﻦ اﻷﺿﺮار اﻟﻨﺎﺷﺌﺔ ﻋﻦ أو ﺧﺮق‬ ‫ﻣﺘﻬﺎون وإن آﺎن ﺑﺪرﺟﺔ ﺧﻔﻴﻔﺔ ﻟﻼﻟﺘﺰام اﻟﺘﻌﺎﻗﺪي ﻏﻴﺮ اﻟﻤﺎدي.‬ ‫ا‬ ‫61-1-2 إن ﺗﺤﺪﻳﺪ اﻟﻤﺴﺆوﻟﻴﺔ اﻵﻧﻒ اﻟﺬآﺮ ﻟﻦ ﻳﻨﻄﺒﻖ ﻋﻠﻰ أﻳﺔ ﻣﺴﺌﻮﻟﻴﺔ ﺗﺸﺮﻳﻌﻴﺔ إﻟﺰاﻣﻴﺔ، وﺗﺤﺪﻳﺪً، ﻋﻠﻰ اﻟﻤﺴﺌﻮﻟﻴﺔ اﻟﺘﻲ ﺗﻘﻊ ﺑﻤﻮﺟﺐ اﻟﻘﺎﻧﻮن اﻷﻟﻤﺎﻧﻲ‬ ‫ﻟﻠﻤﺴﺌﻮﻟﻴﺔ ﻋﻦ اﻟﻤﻨﺘﺠﺎت، وهﻲ اﻟﻤﺴﺌﻮﻟﻴﺔ اﻟﻤﺘﻌﻠﻘﺔ ﺑﺎﻓﺘﺮاض وﺟﻮد آﻔﺎﻟﺔ ﻣﺤﺪدة أو ﻣﺴﺌﻮﻟﻴﺔ ﻋﻦ اﺳﺘﺤﻘﺎق اﻟﻠﻮم اﻟﺘﻲ ﺗﺴﺒﺐ اﻹﺻﺎﺑﺎت اﻟﺸﺨﺼﻴﺔ.‬ ‫61-1-3 ﻳﻄﻠﺐ ﻣﻨﻚ إذن اﺗﺨﺎذ آﺎﻓﺔ اﻟﺘﺪاﺑﻴﺮ اﻟﻤﻨﺎﺳﺒﺔ ﻟﺘﺠﻨﺐ وﻗﻮع اﻷﺿﺮار وﻟﺘﻘﻠﻴﻠﻬﺎ، وﺗﺤﺪﻳﺪا اﻟﻘﻴﺎم ﺑﺈﻋﺪاد ﻧﺴﺦ دﻋﻢ وإﺳﻨﺎد ﻣﻦ ﺑﺮاﻣﺞ اﻟﻜﻤﺒﻴﻮﺗﺮ‬ ‫ً‬ ‫واﻟﺒﻴﺎﻧﺎت اﻟﺨﺎﺻﺔ ﺑﺠﻬﺎز ﺣﺎﺳﻮﺑﻚ وذﻟﻚ وﻓﻘﺎ ﻷﺣﻜﺎم هﺬﻩ اﻻﺗﻔﺎﻗﻴﺔ.‬ ‫ً‬

‫إذا آﺎﻧﺖ ﻟﺪﻳﻚ أﻳﺔ أﺳﺌﻠﺔ ﺣﻮل هﺬﻩ اﻻﺗﻔﺎﻗﻴﺔ أو ﺗﺮﻏﺐ ﻓﻲ ﻃﻠﺐ أﻳﺔ ﻣﻌﻠﻮﻣﺎت ﻣﻦ أدوﺑﻲ، ﺑﺮﺟﺎء اﺳﺘﺨﺪام ﻣﻌﻠﻮﻣﺎت اﻟﻌﻨﻮان واﻻﺗﺼﺎل اﻟﻤﺘﻀﻤﻨﺔ ﺑﻬﺬا اﻟﻤﻨﺘﺞ‬ ‫أو ﻋﺒﺮ اﻹﻧﺘﺮﻧﺖ ﻋﻠﻰ اﻟﻌﻨﻮان اﻟﺘﺎﻟﻲ: ‪ http://www.adobe.com/ae‬ﻟﻼﺗﺼﺎل ﺑﻤﻜﺘﺐ أدوﺑﻲ اﻟﺬي ﻳﺨﺪم اﻟﻤﻨﻄﻘﺔ اﻟﺘﻲ ﺗﻘﻴﻢ ﻓﻴﻬﺎ.‬ ‫ﺗﻌﺘﺒﺮ آﻞ ﻣﻦ أدوﺑﻲ وإﻳﺮ وأوﺛﺮوﻳﺮ وﻓﻼش ورﻳﺪر وﺷﻮآﻮﻳﻒ إﻣﺎ ﻋﻼﻣﺎت ﺗﺠﺎرﻳﺔ ﻣﺴﺠﻠﺔ أو ﻋﻼﻣﺎت ﺗﺠﺎرﻳﺔ ﻟـ أدوﺑﻲ ﺳﻴﺴﺘﻴﻤﺰ إﻧﻜﻮرﺑﻮرﻳﺘﺪ ﻓﻲ‬ ‫اﻟﻮﻻﻳﺎت اﻟﻤﺘﺤﺪة اﻷﻣﺮﻳﻜﻴﺔ و/أو اﻟﺪول اﻷﺧﺮى.‬

‫3131_40208002-‪Reader_Player_AIR_WWEULA-ar_AE‬‬

‫ ‬

ADOBE SYSTEMS INCORPORATED Isenção de garantia e contrato de licença de Software. ESTE DOCUMENTO INCLUI INFORMAÇÕES SOBRE A GARANTIA (PARTE I) E UM ACORDO DE LICENÇA QUE REGULAMENTA O USO DO SOFTWARE DA ADOBE (PARTE II). PARTE I. ISENÇÃO DE GARANTIA. O SOFTWARE E OUTRAS INFORMAÇÕES SÃO ENTREGUES “NO ESTADO EM QUE SE ENCONTRAM”, COM TODAS AS FALHAS. A ADOBE, SEUS FORNECEDORES E AUTORIDADES CERTIFICADAS NÃO GARANTEM E NÃO PODEM GARANTIR O DESEMPENHO OU RESULTADOS QUE VOCÊ PODERÁ OBTER USANDO O SOFTWARE, SERVIÇOS DA AUTORIDADE CERTIFICADA OU OUTRAS OFERTAS DE TERCEIROS. SALVO NA MEDIDA EM QUE QUALQUER GARANTIA, CONDIÇÃO, DECLARAÇÃO OU TERMO NÃO POSSAM OU NÃO DEVAM SER EXCLUÍDOS OU LIMITADOS PELA LEGISLAÇÃO APLICÁVEL A VOCÊ, EM SUA JURISDIÇÃO, A ADOBE, SEUS FORNECEDORES E AUTORIDADES CERTIFICADAS NÃO CONCEDEM QUAISQUER GARANTIAS, CONDIÇÕES, DECLARAÇÕES OU TERMOS (EXPRESSOS OU IMPLÍCITOS, POR LEI, LEI CONSUETUDINÁRIA, COSTUME, USO OU QUALQUER OUTRA IMPOSIÇÃO) EM RELAÇÃO A QUALQUER ASSUNTO; INCLUINDO, SEM LIMITAÇÃO, A NÃO VIOLAÇÃO DE DIREITOS DE TERCEIROS, COMERCIABILIDADE, INTEGRAÇÃO, QUALIDADE SATISFATÓRIA OU ADEQUAÇÃO A QUALQUER FINALIDADE ESPECÍFICA. PARTE II. CONTRATO DE LICENÇA DE SOFTWARE. AO USAR, COPIAR OU DISTRIBUIR TODO OU QUALQUER PARTE DO SOFTWARE DA ADOBE, VOCÊ ACEITA TODOS OS TERMOS E CONDIÇÕES DESTE CONTRATO, INCLUINDO, ESPECIFICAMENTE, AS DISPOSIÇÕES SOBRE: USO CONTIDO NA CLÁUSULA 2; TRANSFERÊNCIA NA CLÁUSULA 4; CONECTIVIDADE E PRIVACIDADE NA CLÁUSULA 6; GARANTIA NA CLÁUSULA 9 E RESPONSABILIDADE NAS CLÁUSULAS 10 E 16. MEDIANTE ACEITAÇÃO, ESTE CONTRATO É EXEQÜÍVEL CONTRA VOCÊ E QUALQUER ENTIDADE QUE TENHA OBTIDO O SOFTWARE E EM NOME DA QUAL TENHA SIDO USADO. CASO VOCÊ NÃO CONCORDE COM OS TERMOS DESTE CONTRATO, NÃO USE O SOFTWARE. A ADOBE PERMITE QUE VOCÊ USE O SOFTWARE SOMENTE DE ACORDO COM OS TERMOS DESTE CONTRATO. O USO DE MATERIAIS DE TERCEIROS INCLUÍDOS NO SOFTWARE PODE ESTAR SUJEITO A OUTROS TERMOS E CONDIÇÕES GERALMENTE ENCONTRADOS EM UM CONTRATO DE LICENÇA SEPARADO, UM ARQUIVO “READ ME” (LEIA-ME) FORNECIDO JUNTAMENTE COM TAIS MATERIAIS OU EM “AVISOS DE SOFTWARE DE TERCEIROS E/OU TERMOS E CONDIÇÕES ADICIONAIS” ENCONTRADOS EM http://www.adobe.com/go/thirdparty_br. 1. Definições. “Adobe” significa Adobe Systems Incorporated, uma empresa de Delaware, localizada em 345 Park Avenue, San Jose, Califórnia 95110, se a subcláusula 12 (a) deste contrato for aplicável; do contrário, significa Adobe Systems Software Ireland Limited, localizada em Unit 3100, Lake Drive, City West Campus, Saggart D24, República da Irlanda, uma empresa constituída sob as leis da Irlanda e uma afiliada e licenciada da Adobe Systems Incorporated. “Computador” significa um dispositivo eletrônico pessoal virtual ou físico que aceita informações em formato digital ou similar e as manipula para obter um resultado específico baseado em uma seqüência de instruções. “Software” significa (a) todo o conteúdo dos arquivos (distribuídos eletronicamente ou em mídia física), ou disco(s) ou outra mídia com a qual este contrato é fornecido, que pode incluir (i) informações ou software de computador da Adobe ou de terceiros, incluindo o Adobe Reader® (“Adobe Reader”), Adobe® AIR™ (“Adobe AIR”), Adobe Flash® Player, Shockwave® Player e Authorware® Player (coletivamente, Adobe AIR e os players do Flash, Shockwave e Authorware são os “Adobe Runtimes”); (ii) materiais escritos ou arquivos (“Documentação”) explicativos relacionados e (iii) fontes; e (b) upgrades, versões modificadas, atualizações, adições e cópias do acima

disposto, fornecidos a você pela Adobe e a qualquer momento (coletivamente, “Atualizações”). “Uso” significa acessar, instalar, fazer o download, copiar ou de outra forma beneficiar-se da funcionalidade do Software. 2. Licença do Software. Caso tenha adquirido o Software da Adobe ou de um dos seus licenciados autorizados e sujeito ao cumprimento dos termos deste contrato, incluindo as limitações contidas na Cláusula 3, a Adobe concede uma licença não exclusiva de uso do Software do modo e para os fins descritos na Documentação, conforme segue: 2.1 Uso geral. Você pode instalar e usar uma cópia do Software em um Computador compatível. Consulte a Cláusula 3 para obter informações sobre importantes limitações de uso do Software. 2.2 Uso em servidor. Este acordo não permite que você instale ou use o software em um servidor de arquivos de computador. Para obter informações sobre o uso do software em um servidor de arquivos de computador, consulte http://www.adobe.com/go/acrobat_distribute_br para obter informações sobre o Adobe Reader; ou http://www.adobe.com/go/licensing_br para obter informações sobre o Adobe Runtimes. 2.3 Distribuição. Esta licença não concede o direito de sublicenciar ou distribuir o Software. Para obter informações sobre a obtenção do direito de distribuir o Software em mídia tangível ou por meio de uma rede interna ou com seu produto ou serviço, consulte http://www.adobe.com/go/acrobat_distribute_br para obter informações sobre o Adobe Reader; ou http://www.adobe.com/go/licensing_br para obter informações sobre o Adobe Runtimes. 2.4 Cópia de backup. Você poderá fazer uma cópia de backup do Software, desde que essa cópia não seja instalada nem utilizada. Você não poderá transferir os direitos relativos a uma cópia de backup, a menos que transfira todos os direitos sobre o Software, conforme estabelecido na Cláusula 4. 3. Obrigações e limitações. 3.1 Limitações do Adobe Runtime. Você não usará qualquer Adobe Runtime em qualquer dispositivo que não seja PC ou em conjunto com qualquer versão embutida ou dispositiva de qualquer sistema operacional. Para evitar dúvidas e somente como exemplo, você não poderá usar um Adobe Runtime em nenhum (a) dispositivo móvel, caixa de conversão (set top box - STB), computador de mão, telefone, “web pad”, mesa digitalizadora e Tablet PC (que não tenha o Windows XP Tablet PC Edition e sucessores), console de jogos, TV, DVD player, centro de mídia (que não seja o Windows XP Media Center Edition e seus sucessores), painel eletrônico ou outra sinalização digital, dispositivo para Internet ou outro dispositivo conectado à Internet, PDA, dispositivo médico, caixa eletrônico, dispositivo telemático, máquina de jogos, sistema de automação doméstica, quiosque, dispositivo de controle remoto, ou qualquer outro dispositivo eletrônico para consumidores, (b) sistema móvel com base no operador, a cabo, via satélite ou de televisão, ou (c) outro dispositivo de sistema fechado. Para obter informações sobre licenciamento de Adobe Runtimes para uso em tais sistemas, visite http://www.adobe.com/go/licensing_br. 3.2 Restrições do Adobe Reader. O Adobe Reader será licenciado e distribuído pela Adobe para exibição, distribuição e compartilhamento de arquivos PDF. 3.2.1 Limitações de conversão. Você não integrará ou usará o Adobe Reader em conjunto com qualquer outro software, plug-in ou aperfeiçoamento que use ou dependa do Adobe Reader ao converter ou transformar arquivos PDF em um formato diferente (por exemplo, arquivo PDF em um arquivo TIFF, JPEG ou SVG). 3.2.2 Limitações de plug-in. Você não integrará ou usará o Adobe Reader em conjunto com qualquer outro software de plug-in não desenvolvido de acordo com o Contrato de Licença-chave de Integração da Adobe. 3.2.3 Recursos Desabilitados. O Adobe Reader poderá conter recursos ou funcionalidades ocultas ou exibidas como desabilitadas ou “esmaecidas” (os “Recursos Desabilitados”). Os Recursos Desabilitados somente serão ativados na abertura de um documento PDF que tenha sido criado usando a tecnologia de ativação disponibilizada somente pela Adobe. Você não acessará, nem tentará acessar, quaisquer Recursos Desabilitados que não por meio do uso de tais tecnologias de ativação, nem usará o Adobe Reader para criar um recurso substancialmente similar a qualquer Recurso desabilitado ou de outra forma burlar a tecnologia que controla a ativação de qualquer um destes recursos.

Para obter mais informações sobre os Recursos Desabilitados, consulte http://www.adobe.com/go/readerextensions_br. 3.3 Avisos. Qualquer cópia do Software feita por você deve conter os mesmos avisos de propriedade e direitos autorais exibidos no Software. 3.4 Proibição de modificação ou engenharia reversa. Você não poderá modificar, adaptar, traduzir ou criar trabalhos derivados baseados no Software. Você não usará engenharia reversa, nem descompilará, desmontará ou tentará de qualquer outra forma descobrir o código-fonte do Software, salvo se for expressamente autorizado a aplicar engenharia reversa ou descompilar sob a legislação aplicável. 4. Transferência. Você não poderá alugar, licenciar, sublicenciar, ceder ou transferir seus direitos sobre o Software, ou autorizar a cópia de todo ou parte do Software em Computadores de outros usuários, salvo se for expressamente permitido por este contrato. Você poderá, entretanto, transferir todos os seus direitos de uso do Software para outra pessoa física ou jurídica, desde que: (a) você também transfira (i) este contrato e (ii) o Software e todos os demais hardware e software reunidos ou pré-instalados com o Software, incluindo todas as cópias, atualizações e versões anteriores para pessoa; (b) você não retenha quaisquer cópias, incluindo backups e cópias armazenadas em um Computador e (c) a parte receptora aceite os termos e condições deste contrato e quaisquer outros termos e condições sob os quais você tenha obtido uma licença válida para o Software. Não obstante o acima disposto, você não poderá transferir cópias didáticas do Software, de pré-lançamento ou que não estejam disponíveis para revenda. 5. Titularidade da propriedade intelectual, reserva de direitos. O Software e quaisquer cópias autorizadas por você desenvolvidas são propriedade intelectual da Adobe Systems Incorporated e de seus fornecedores. A estrutura, a organização e o código do Software são considerados segredos comerciais valiosos e são informações confidenciais da Adobe Systems Incorporated e de seus fornecedores. O Software é protegido por leis, incluindo, sem limitação, leis de direitos autorais dos Estados Unidos e de outros países e por disposições de tratados internacionais. Exceto se expressamente mencionado neste documento, este contrato não concede quaisquer direitos de propriedade intelectual sobre o Software e todos os direitos não concedidos expressamente pertencem à Adobe e seus fornecedores. 6. Conectividade e privacidade. 6.1 Uso de arquivos PDF. Quando você usa o Software para abrir um arquivo PDF que foi ativado para exibir anúncios por meio do registro no serviço Ads for Adobe PDF, seu computador pode se conectar a um website operado pela Adobe, um anunciante ou terceiros. Seu endereço de IP (Protocolo de Internet) é enviado quando isso ocorre. A parte que hospeda o site pode usar tecnologia para enviar publicidade ou outro conteúdo eletrônico que seja exibido no arquivo aberto ou próximo a ele. O operador do website também pode usar o JavaScript, web beacons (também conhecidos como marcações de ação ou gifs de pixel único) e outras tecnologias para aumentar e medir a eficácia dos anúncios e personalizar o conteúdo publicitário. Sua comunicação com os websites da Adobe é regida pela Política de Privacidade On-line da Adobe, encontrada em http://www.adobe.com/go/privacy_br. A Adobe pode não ter controle sobre ou acesso a recursos que um terceiro venha a utilizar, e as práticas de informações de websites de terceiros não estão cobertas pela Política de Privacidade On-line da Adobe. 6.2 Atualização. Você reconhece e concorda que o Software pode fazer com que seu Computador se conecte automaticamente à Internet para verificar a existência de atualizações disponíveis para download automático em seu Computador e permitir que a Adobe saiba que o Software foi instalado com êxito. Somente informações de identificação não-pessoal são transmitidas para a Adobe quando isso ocorre. Sua comunicação com os websites da Adobe é regida pela Política de Privacidade On-line da Adobe, encontrada em http://www.adobe.com/go/privacy_br. Consulte a Documentação para obter informações sobre a alteração das configurações padrão de atualização. 6.3 Gerenciador de Opções. O Flash Player poderá fazer com que certas configurações do usuário sejam armazenadas no Computador como um objeto local compartilhado. Estas opções não estão associadas a você, mas

permitem que você configure determinadas opções dentro do Flash Player. Você pode encontrar mais informações sobre objetos locais compartilhados no endereço http://www.adobe.com/go/flashplayer_security_br e mais informações sobre o Gerenciador de Opções no endereço http://www.adobe.com/go/settingsmanager_br. 7. Ofertas de terceiros. O Software poderá permitir que você acesse e interaja com websites, aplicativos de software e serviços de dados de terceiros, incluindo aplicativos ricos de Internet (“Ofertas de terceiros”). Seu acesso e uso de qualquer Oferta de terceiros, incluindo quaisquer bens, serviços ou informações, é regido pelos termos e condições relativos a tais ofertas. As Ofertas de terceiros não são de propriedade ou fornecidas pela Adobe. 8. Certificados digitais. 8.1 Uso. O Adobe AIR usa certificados digitais para ajudá-lo a identificar o publicador de aplicativos Adobe AIR criados por terceiros. O Adobe Reader usa certificados digitais para assinar e validar assinaturas em documentos PDF e validar documentos PDF certificados. Seu Computador pode se conectar à Internet no momento da validação de um certificado digital. Os certificados digitais são emitidos por autoridades certificadas de terceiros, incluindo os fornecedores de CDS (Adobe Certified Document Services, Serviços de Documentos Certificados da Adobe) listados em http://www.adobe.com/go/partners_cds_br (“Autoridades Certificadas”) ou podem ser auto-assinados. 8.2 Termos e condições. A compra, uso e confiança mediante certificados digitais é responsabilidade sua e da Autoridade Certificada. Antes de confiar em qualquer documento certificado, assinatura digital ou serviços de Autoridade Certificada, você deve revisar os termos e condições aplicáveis sob os quais a Autoridade Certificada em questão fornece serviços, incluindo, por exemplo, quaisquer acordos com o assinante, acordos de confiança mútua, políticas de certificados e declarações de práticas. Veja os links em http://www.adobe.com/go/partners_cds_br para obter informações sobre os fornecedores de CDS da Adobe. 8.3 Reconhecimento. Você concorda que (a) um certificado digital pode ter sido revogado antes do momento da verificação, fazendo com que a assinatura ou certificado digital pareçam válidos quando na realidade não o são, (b) a segurança ou integridade de um certificado digital podem ser comprometidas em função de um ato ou omissão do signatário do documento, da Autoridade Certificada aplicável ou de qualquer outro terceiro e (c) um certificado pode ser auto-assinado e não fornecido por uma Autoridade Certificada. VOCÊ É O ÚNICO RESPONSÁVEL POR DECIDIR SE CONFIA OU NÃO EM UM CERTIFICADO. A MENOS QUE UMA GARANTIA POR ESCRITO EM SEPARADO SEJA FORNECIDA POR UMA AUTORIDADE CERTIFICADA, USE OS CERTIFICADOS DIGITAIS SOB SUA RESPONSABILIDADE. 8.4 Terceiros beneficiários. Você concorda que qualquer Autoridade Certificada na qual você deposita confiança é um terceiro beneficiário deste acordo e deverá ter o direito de fazer cumprir este acordo em seu próprio nome como se fosse a Adobe. 8.5 Indenização. Você concorda em isentar a Adobe e qualquer Autoridade Certificada aplicável (à exceção do expressamente estabelecido em seus termos e condições) de quaisquer responsabilidades, perdas, ações, danos ou reclamações (incluindo as despesas, custos e honorários advocatícios) decorrentes ou referentes a qualquer uso, ou confiança, de qualquer serviço dessa autoridade, incluindo, sem limitações (a) confiança em um certificado já vencido ou revogado; (b) verificação imprópria de um certificado; (c) uso de um certificado diferente do permitido em quaisquer termos e condições aplicáveis, neste contrato ou lei aplicável; (d) falha no exercício de julgamento razoável, conforme a circunstância, da confiança nos serviços ou certificados do emissor ou (e) falha em desempenhar qualquer das obrigações requeridas nos termos e condições pertinentes aos serviços. 9. Isenção de garantia. O Software está sendo fornecido “NO ESTADO EM QUE SE ENCONTRA” e com TODAS AS FALHAS. A ADOBE, SEUS FORNECEDORES E AUTORIDADES CERTIFICADAS NÃO GARANTEM E NÃO PODEM GARANTIR O DESEMPENHO OU RESULTADOS QUE VOCÊ PODERÁ OBTER USANDO O SOFTWARE, SERVIÇOS DA AUTORIDADE CERTIFICADA OU OUTRAS OFERTAS DE TERCEIROS. SALVO NA MEDIDA EM QUE QUALQUER GARANTIA, CONDIÇÃO, DECLARAÇÃO OU TERMO NÃO POSSAM OU

NÃO DEVAM SER EXCLUÍDOS OU LIMITADOS PELA LEGISLAÇÃO APLICÁVEL A VOCÊ, EM SUA JURISDIÇÃO, A ADOBE, SEUS FORNECEDORES E AUTORIDADES CERTIFICADAS NÃO CONCEDEM QUAISQUER GARANTIAS, CONDIÇÕES, DECLARAÇÕES OU TERMOS (EXPRESSOS OU IMPLÍCITOS, POR LEI, LEI CONSUETUDINÁRIA, COSTUME, USO OU QUALQUER OUTRA IMPOSIÇÃO) EM RELAÇÃO A QUALQUER ASSUNTO; INCLUINDO, SEM LIMITAÇÃO, A NÃO VIOLAÇÃO DE DIREITOS DE TERCEIROS, COMERCIABILIDADE, INTEGRAÇÃO, QUALIDADE SATISFATÓRIA OU ADEQUAÇÃO A QUALQUER FINALIDADE ESPECÍFICA. As disposições da Cláusula 9 e Cláusula 10 sobreviverão à rescisão deste contrato, por qualquer motivo. Fica ressalvado, todavia, que tal sobrevivência não implicará ou criará qualquer direito posterior de uso do Software após a rescisão deste contrato. 10. Limitação de responsabilidade. EM HIPÓTESE ALGUMA A ADOBE, SEUS FORNECEDORES OU AUTORIDADES CERTIFICADAS SERÃO RESPONSÁVEIS POR QUAISQUER DANOS, RECLAMAÇÕES OU CUSTOS DE QUALQUER ESPÉCIE, INCLUINDO QUAISQUER DANOS CONSEQÜENCIAIS, INDIRETOS OU INCIDENTAIS OU QUALQUER LUCRO CESSANTE OU PERDA DE RECEITA, MESMO QUE UM REPRESENTANTE DA ADOBE TENHA SIDO AVISADO DA POSSIBILIDADE DE TAIS PERDAS, DANOS OU RECLAMAÇÕES. TAIS LIMITAÇÕES E EXCLUSÕES SE APLICAM DE ACORDO COM A LEGISLAÇÃO APLICÁVEL NA SUA JURISDIÇÃO. A RESPONSABILIDADE AGREGADA DA ADOBE, SEUS FORNECEDORES E AUTORIDADES CERTIFICADAS POR OU RELACIONADA A ESTE CONTRATO, ESTÁ LIMITADA À QUANTIA PAGA PELO SOFTWARE, SE APLICÁVEL. Nenhuma disposição contida neste contrato limitará a responsabilidade da Adobe em relação a você em caso de morte ou lesões corporais resultantes da negligência da Adobe ou por ato ilícito ou fraude. A Adobe está agindo em nome de seus fornecedores e Autoridades Certificadas para fins de isenção, exclusão e/ou limitação de obrigações, garantias e responsabilidades conforme estabelecido neste contrato, porém em nenhum outro aspecto e para nenhuma outra finalidade. Para maiores informações, consulte as informações específicas sobre jurisdição no final deste contrato, se aplicável, ou entre em contato com o Departamento de Suporte ao Cliente da Adobe. 11. Regras de exportação. Você concorda que o Software não será enviado, transferido ou exportado para qualquer país ou usado de qualquer maneira proibida pela Lei de Administração de Exportações dos EUA ou outras leis, restrições ou regulamentos de exportação (coletivamente as “Leis de Exportação”). Além disso, se o Software for identificado como item controlado de exportação sob as Leis de Exportação, você declara e garante que não é um cidadão ou de outra forma está localizado em qualquer país que esteja embargado (incluindo sem limitações Irã, Síria, Sudão, Cuba e Coréia do Norte) e que você não está de outra forma proibido sob as Leis de Exportação de receber o Software. Todos os direitos de uso do Software são concedidos com a condição de que tais direitos sejam confiscados caso você não cumpra os termos deste contrato. 12. Legislação aplicável. Este contrato será regido pelas leis e interpretado de acordo com as leis substantivas em vigor no: (a) estado da Califórnia, se uma licença do Software tiver sido adquirida nos Estados Unidos, Canadá ou México; ou (b) Japão, se uma licença do Software tiver sido adquirida no Japão, China, Coréia ou outro país do sudeste asiático onde todos os idiomas oficiais sejam escritos em texto ideográfico (por ex., hanzi, kanji ou hanja) e/ou outro texto baseado em uma estrutura semelhante a um texto ideográfico, como hangul ou kana; ou (c) na Inglaterra, se uma licença do Software tiver sido obtida em qualquer outra jurisdição não descrita acima. Os respectivos tribunais de Santa Clara County na Califórnia quando a legislação da Califórnia for aplicável, tribunal distrital de Tóquio no Japão, quando a legislação japonesa for aplicável e os tribunais competentes de Londres, Inglaterra, quando a legislação inglesa for aplicável, terão jurisdição não exclusiva em relação às disputas relacionadas a este contrato. Este contrato não será regido pelo conflito de legislações de qualquer jurisdição ou pela Convenção das Nações Unidas sobre Contratos Internacionais para Venda de Mercadorias, cuja aplicação está expressamente excluída. 13. Disposições gerais.

Caso qualquer parte deste contrato seja considerada nula ou inexeqüível, ela não afetará a validade do equilíbrio deste contrato, que deverá permanecer válido e exeqüível, de acordo com seus termos. Este contrato não prejudicará os direitos de qualquer parte na qualidade de consumidor. Este contrato só poderá ser modificado por um documento assinado por um representante autorizado da Adobe. As atualizações poderão ser licenciadas a você pela Adobe mediante termos adicionais ou diferentes. Este é o acordo integral entre você e a Adobe em relação ao Software, e prevalece em relação a qualquer declaração, discussão, entendimento, comunicações ou publicidade anteriores em relação ao Software. 14. Aviso aos usuários finais do governo dos EUA. Para os usuários finais do governo dos EUA, a Adobe concorda em cumprir todas as leis de igualdade de oportunidade aplicáveis, incluindo, caso seja adequado, as disposições da Executive Order (Ordem executiva) 11246, e alterações posteriores, Seção 402 da Vietnam Era Veterans Readjustment Assistance Act (Lei de assistência e reajuste a veteranos do Vietnã) de 1974 (artigo 38 do USC 4212) e a Seção 503 da Rehabilitation Act (Lei de reabilitação) de 1973, e alterações posteriores, e os regulamentos no artigo 41 do CFR Partes 60-1 a 60-60, 60-250 e 60-741. A cláusula de ação afirmativa e os regulamentos contidos na sentença anterior deverão ser incorporados por referência a este contrato. 15. Cumprimento das licenças. Caso seja uma empresa ou organização, você concorda que mediante pedidos da Adobe ou de representantes autorizados da Adobe, irá documentar e certificar integralmente, no período de trinta (30) dias, que o uso de todo e qualquer Software na época da solicitação está de acordo com suas licenças válidas da Adobe. 16. Disposições e exceções específicas. 16.1 Limitação de responsabilidade para usuários residentes na Alemanha e Áustria. 16.1.1 Caso você tenha adquirido o Software na Alemanha ou Áustria, e resida em um desses países, a Cláusula 10 não se aplica a você. Alternativamente, sujeito aos termos na Cláusula 16.1.2., a responsabilidade legal da Adobe por danos será limitada conforme segue: (i) a Adobe será responsabilizada somente até o valor dos danos conforme tipicamente previstos no momento em que o contrato de licença passar a ser válido em relação aos danos causados por violação leve de obrigações contratuais substanciais e (ii) a Adobe não será responsável por danos causados por uma violação leve de obrigações contratuais não-substancial. 16.1.2 A limitação de responsabilidade acima descrita não se aplicará a quaisquer responsabilidades legais obrigatórias, em particular, a responsabilidades previstas no Ato de Responsabilidade por Produto da Alemanha, responsabilidade de assumir uma garantia específica ou responsabilidade por danos físicos pessoais culposos. 16.1.3 Você deverá adotar todas as medidas razoáveis para evitar e reduzir danos; particularmente, fazer cópias de segurança (backup) do Software e dos dados de seu computador, sujeitos aos termos deste contrato.

Caso você tenha quaisquer questionamentos a respeito deste contrato ou se deseja solicitar informações à Adobe, use as informações de endereço e de contato incluídas neste produto ou pela web no endereço www.adobe.com/br para entrar em contato com a subsidiária da Adobe que preste serviços na sua jurisdição. Adobe, AIR, Authorware, Flash, Reader e Shockwave são marcas registradas nos Estados Unidos e/ou outros países ou marcas comerciais da Adobe System Incorporated.

Reader_Player_AIR_WWEULA-pt_BR-20080204_1313

 

ADOBE SYSTEMS INCORPORATED Отказ от отговорност по време на гаранция и Лицензионен договор за използване на софтуер. НАСТОЯЩИЯТ ДОКУМЕНТ ВКЛЮЧВА ИНФОРМАЦИЯ ОТНОСНО ГАРАНЦИЯТА (ЧАСТ I) И ЛИЦЕНЗИОННИЯ ДОГОВОР, РЕГЛАМЕНТИРАЩ ИЗПОЛЗВАНЕТО НА СОФТУЕРА НА ADOBE (ЧАСТ II). ЧАСТ I. ОТКАЗ ОТ ОТГОВОРНОСТ ПО ВРЕМЕ НА ГАРАНЦИЯ СОФТУЕРЪТ И ИНФОМАЦИЯТА СЕ ДОСТАВЯТ “В СЪСТЯНИЕТО, В КОЕТО СА” С ВСИЧКИТЕ ИМ НЕДОСТАТЪЦИ. ADOBE И НЕГОВИТЕ ДОСТАВЧИЦИ И ОРГАНИ ЗА СЕРТИФИЦИРАНЕ НЕ ГАРАНТИРАТ И НЕ МОГАТ ДА ГАРАНТИРАТ РАБОТАТА ИЛИ РЕЗУЛТАТИТЕ, КОИТО БИХТЕ МОГЛИ ДА ПОЛУЧИТЕ ПРИ ИЗПОЛЗВАНЕ НА СОФТУЕРА, УСЛУГИТЕ НА ОРГАНИТЕ ЗА СЕРТИФИЦИРАНЕ ИЛИ ПРЕДЛОЖЕНИЯТА НА ДРУГИ ФИРМИ. С ИЗКЛЮЧЕНИЕ НА ГАРАНЦИИ, УСЛОВИЯ, ПРЕДСТАВИТЕЛСТВО ИЛИ СРОКОВЕ, ДОКОЛКОТО СЪЩИТЕ НЕ МОГАТ ИЛИ НЕ СЕ ДОПУСКА ДА БЪДАТ ИЗКЛЮЧЕНИ ИЛИ ОГРАНИЧЕНИ, СЪГЛАСНО ЗАКОНИТЕ, ПРИЛОЖИМИ КЪМ ВЪВ ВАШАТА ЮРИСДИКЦИЯ, ADOBE И НЕГОВИТЕ ДОСТАВЧИЦИ И ОРГАНИ ЗА СЕРТИФИЦИРАНЕ НЕ ПРЕДОСТАВЯТ НИКАКВИ УСЛОВИЯ ЗА ГАРАНЦИИ, ПРЕДСТАВИТЕЛСТВО ИЛИ УСЛОВИЯ (ИЗРИЧНИ ИЛИ ПОДРАЗБИРАЩИ СЕ, НЕЗАВИСИМО ДАЛИ ПРОИЗТИЧАЩИ ОТ ЗАКОНА, ОБЩОТО ПРАВО, ОБИЧАЯ ИЛИ ПО ДРУГ НАЧИН) ПО ОТНОШЕНИЕ НА КАКЪВТО И ДА БИЛО ВЪПРОС, ВКЛЮЧИТЕЛНО, НО НЕ САМО, НЕНАРУШАВАНЕ НА ПРАВАТА НА ТРЕТИ ЛИЦА, ПРОДАВАЕМОСТТА, ИНТЕГРАЦИЯТА, ЗАДОВОЛИТЕЛНОТО КАЧЕСТВО ИЛИ ГОДНОСТТА ЗА ОПРЕДЕЛЕНА ЦЕЛ. ЧАСТ II. ЛИЦЕНЗИОННО СПОРАЗУМЕНИЕ ЗА ИЗПОЛЗВАНЕ НА СОФТУЕР ИЗПОЛЗВАНЕТО, КОПИРАНЕТО ИЛИ РАЗПРОСТРАНЕНИЕТО НА СОФТУЕРА НА ADOBE ИЛИ НА ЧАСТИ ОТ НЕГО, ОЗНАЧАВА ЧЕ ПРИЕМАТЕ ВСИЧКИ УСЛОВИЯ И СРОКОВЕ НА НАСТОЯЩИЯ ДОГОВОР, КАТО СЕ АКЦЕНТИРА ВЪРХУ СЛЕДНИТЕ РАЗПОРЕДБИ: ИЗПОЛЗВАНЕ СПОРЕД РАЗДЕЛ 2; ВЪЗМОЖНОСТ ЗА ПРЕХВЪРЛЯНЕ В РАЗДЕЛ 4; ВЪЗМОЖНОСТ ЗА ВРЪЗКА И ПОВЕРИТЕЛНОСТ В РАЗДЕЛ 6; ГАРАНЦИИ В РАЗДЕЛ 9 И ОТГОВОРНОСТ В РАЗДЕЛ 10 И 16. ПРИ ПРИЕМАНЕ, НАСТОЯЩИЯ ДОГОВОР ВЛИЗА В СИЛА СПРЯМО ВАС И ВСИЧКИ ОБЩНОСТИ, КОИТО СА ПОЛУЧИЛИ СОФТУЕРА ИЛИ ОТ ЧИЕТО ИМЕ ТОЙ СЕ ИЗПОЛЗВА. АКО НЕ СТЕ СЪГЛАСНИ, НЕ ИЗПОЛЗВАЙТЕ СОФТУЕРА. ADOBE РАЗРЕШАВА ДА ИЗПОЛЗВАТЕ СОФТУЕРА САМО ВЪВ ВРЪЗКА С УСЛОВИЯТА НА НАСТОЯЩИЯ ДОГОВОР. ИЗПОЛЗВАНЕТО НА НЯКОИ МАТЕРИАЛИ НА ТРЕТИ ЛИЦА, ВКЛЮЧЕНИ В СОФТУЕРА, МОЖЕ ДА БЪДЕ ПРЕДМЕТ НА ДРУГИ УСЛОВИЯ, ОБИЧАЙНО СЪДЪРЖАЩИ СЕ В ОТДЕЛЕН ЛИЦЕНЗИОНЕН ДОГОВОР, ПРИДРУЖАВАЩ МАТЕРИАЛИТЕ “READ ME” ФАЙЛ ИЛИ В “БЕЛЕЖКИТЕ ОТНОСНО СОФТУЕРА НА ТРЕТИ ЛИЦА И/ИЛИ ДОПЪЛНИТЕЛНИ УСЛОВИЯ”, КОИТО МОЖЕТЕ ДА НАМЕРИТЕ НА АДРЕС http://www.adobe.com/go/thirdparty_bg. 1. Дефиниции. “Adobe” означава Adobe Systems Incorporated, корпорация от Делауер, с адрес 345 Park Avenue, San Jose, California 95110, в случай, че се прилага подраздел 12 (a) на този договор; в противен случай, понятието означава Adobe Systems Software Ireland Limited, Unit 3100, Lake Drive, City West Campus, Saggart D24, Republic of Ireland, дружество, учредено съгласно законите на Ирландия и свързано с и притежател на лиценз от Adobe Systems Incorporated. “Компютър” означава компютърно устройство, което приема информация в цифрова или подобна форма и я обработва за конкретен резултат, въз основа на поредица от инструкции. “Софтуер” означава (a) цялото съдържание на файловете (предоставени или посредством електронно изтегляне, на физически носители, или чрез друг метод на разпространение), диска(овете), CDROM или други носители, с които се предоставя този Договор, включително, но не само (i) компютърна

информация или софтуер на Adobe или трети лица, включително Adobe Reader® (“Adobe Reader”), Adobe® AIR™ (“Adobe AIR”), Adobe Flash® Player, Shockwave® Player и Authorware® Player (заедно, Flash, Shockwave и Authorware плейъри са наричани “Изпълними файлове на Adobe”); (ii) свързаните с тях разяснителни писмени материали или файлове (“Документация”); и (iii) шрифтове; както и (b) всички надграждания, модифицирани версии, актуализации, допълнения към и копия на Софтуера, ако съществуват такива, за които Ви е предоставен лиценз от Adobe (заедно, “Актуализации”). “Употреба” означава достъп, инсталиране, изтегляне, копиране или получаване на облаги по друг начин при използване на функциите на Софтуера. 2. Лиценз за Софтуер. Ако сте получили Софтуера от Adobe или някой от упълномощените му лицензопритежатели и при условие, че спазвате условията на този договор, включително ограниченията в Раздел 3, Adobe Ви предоставя неизключителен лиценз за използване на Софтуера за целите, описани в Документацията, както следва: 2.1 Обща употреба. Можете да инсталирате и използвате едно копие на Софтуера на съвместим Компютър. Вижте Раздел 3 за важни ограничения по отношение употребата на Софтуера. 2.2 Използване на сървър. Това споразумение не разрешава да инсталирате или използвате софтуера на компютърен файлов сървър. За информация относно използването на софтуера на компютърен файлов сървър вижте http://www.adobe.com/go/acrobat_distribute_bg за информация относно Adobe Reader; или http://www.adobe.com/go/licensing_bg относно информация за “Adobe Runtimes”. 2.3 Описание. Настоящият лиценз не гарантира права за подлицензиране или разпространение на Софтуера. За информация относно получаването на права за разпространение на Софтуера върху материален носител или през вътрешна мрежа или с Вашите продукти или услуги, вижте http://www.adobe.com/go/acrobat_distribute_bg за информация относно Adobe Reader; или http://www.adobe.com/go/licensing_bg за информация относно “Adobe Runtimes”. 2.4 Резервно копие. Вие имате право да направите едно резервно копие на Софтуера, при условие, че Вашето резервно копие няма да бъде инсталирано или използвано на никакъв Компютър. Вие не можете да прехвърляте правото си на изработване на резервно копие, освен ако не прехвърлите всички права по отношение на Софтуера, както е предвидено в Раздел 4. 3. Задължения и ограничения. 3.1 Свързани с изпълнимите файлове на Adobe ограничения Вие нямате право да използвате Adobe Runtime на никакво устройство, което не е персонален компютър или с каквато и да било вградена или специфична за конкретното устройство версия, на която и да е операционна система. За избягване на съмнение и само като пример, Вие нямате право да използвате Adobe Runtime на никакви (a) мобилни устройства, телевизионни приставки (“set top boxes” (STB)), “handhelds”, телефони, “web pad” устройства, таблети и таблетни персонални компютри (които не работят с Windows XP Tablet PC Edition и следващите го подобни програми), конзоли за игри, телевизори, DVD плейъри, медийни центрове (с изключение на Windows XP Media Center Edition и последващите го), електронни рекламни табла, интернет приспособления и други, свързани с Интернет устройства, PDA устройства, медицински устройства, банкомати, телематични устройства, игрални машини, системи за автоматизиране на дома, колонки, дистанционни устройства, или каквото и да било друго устройство на потребителската електроника, (b) базирани на оператора мобилни, кабелни, сателитни или телевизионни системи, или (c) други затворени системни устройства [closed system devices]. За информация относно лицензирането на Adobe Runtimes за използване от такива системи вижте http://www.adobe.com/go/licensing_bg. 3.2 Ограничения, свързани с Adobe Reader. Adobe Reader се лицензира и разпространява от Adobe за разглеждане, разпространяване и съвместно използване на PDF файлове. 3.2.1 Ограничения за конвертиране. Вие нямате право да интегрирате или използвате Adobe Reader с друг софтуер, plug-in или подобрение, които използват или зависят от Adobe Reader при конвертиране или преобразуване на PDF файлове в други файлови формати (напр., PDF-файл в TIFF, JPEG, или SVG файл).

3.2.2 Ограничения за Plug-in. Вие нямате право да интегрирате или използвате Adobe Reader с никакъв plugin софтуер, неразработен в съответствие с Лицензния договор за интеграционния ключ на Adobe [Adobe Integration Key License Agreement]. 3.2.3 Деактивирани функции. Adobe Reader може да съдържа характеристики или функции, които са скрити или изглеждат деактивирани или “оцветени в сиво” (“Деактивирани функции”). Деактивираните функции се активират само при отваряне на PDF документ, създаден при използване на технологията за активиране, предоставяна единствено от Adobe. Не се разрешава достъпът или опита за достъп до какви да е деактивирани функции, освен при използване на споменатите технологии за активиране, нито можете да разчитате Adobe Reader да създаде функция, достатъчно подобна на деактивираните, или да избегнете по друг начин технологията, управляваща активирането на подобни функции. За повече информация относно деактивираните функции вижте http://www.adobe.com/go/readerextensions_bg. 3.3 Предупреждения. Всяко направено от Вас копие на Софтуера трябва да съдържа авторските права и забележки за собственост, които са обозначени върху или в Софтуера. 3.4 Забрана за изменения и обратен инженеринг. Вие нямате право да модифицирате, адаптирате, превеждате или създавате производни продукти въз основа на Софтуера. Нямате право на обратен инженеринг, декомпилиране, деасемблиране или други опити за разпознаване на изходния код на Софтуера, освен до степента, до която Ви е дадено изрично разрешение за обратен инженеринг или декомпилиране според приложимото законодателство. 4. Прехвърляне. Вие нямате право да отдавате под наем, на лизинг, да сублицензирате или прехвърляте правата си по отношение на Софтуера, или да разрешавате целия Софтуер или част от него да бъдат копирани на Компютъра на друг потребител, освен ако това е изрично допуснато в настоящия Договор. Вие, обаче, имате право да прехвърлите всичките си права за използване на Софтуера на друго физическо или юридическо лице, при условие, че: (a) също така прехвърлите (i) този Договор, и (ii) Софтуера и целия останал софтуер или хардуер, предоставен в пакет или предварително инсталиран заедно със Софтуера, включително всички копия, актуализации и по-ранни версии, на такова физическо или юридическо лице, (b) не запазите никакви копия, включително резервни и копия, съхранявани на Компютър, и (c) приобретателят приеме условията на този Договор и всички останали условия, при които законно сте закупили лиценз за Софтуера. Независимо от предходното, Вие нямате право да прехвърляте копия с образователна цел, “pre-release” копия, или копия на Софтуера, предоставени не за препродажба. 5. Права върху интелектуалната собственост, защита на авторското право. Софтуерът и всички разрешени копия, които правите, представляват интелектуална собственост и притежание на Adobe Systems Incorporated и неговите доставчици. Структурата, организацията и кодът на Софтуера представляват ценни търговски тайни и поверителна информация на Adobe Systems Incorporated и неговите доставчици. Софтуерът е защитен от закона, включително, но не само законите за авторското право на Съединените щати и други държави, както и от разпоредбите на международните споразумения. Освен доколкото изрично е посочено тук, този договор не Ви предоставя никакви права на интелектуална собственост по отношение на Софтуера, като всички права, които не са изрично предоставени, са запазени от Adobe и неговите доставчици. 6. Възможности за свързване и поверителност. 6.1 Използване на PDF файлове. При използване наСофтуера за отваряне на PDF файл, активиран за показване на реклами посредством регистрация за реклами в сървър на Adobe PDF, компютърът може да се свърже с управляван от Adobe уебсайт, рекламодател или друга фирма. При това се изпраща Вашият адрес за интернет протокол (IP). Хостващата сайта фирма може да използва технология за изпращане (или “обслужване”) на рекламно или друго съдържание, което се показва в близост до отворения файл. Операторът на уебсайта може също да използва JavaScript, уеб маяци (известни още като действени тагове

или еднопикселови gif), както и други технологии за увеличаване и измерване на ефективността на рекламата и персонализиране на рекламното съдържание. Комуникацията с уебсайтовете на Adobe се управлява от Правила за онлайн поверителност които се намират на http://www.adobe.com/go/privacy_bg. Възможно е Adobe да няма достъп или контрол над вероятно използваните от друга фирма функции, а информационните практики на уебсайтовете на другата фирма не се покриват от Правилата за онлайн поверителност на Adobe. 6.2 Актуализиране. С настоящото потвърждавате съгласието си, че Софтуерът може да предизвика автоматично свързване на Компютъра към Интернет за проверка за налични за автоматично изтегляне на Компютъра актуализации и разрешаване на Adobe да провери дали Софтуерът е инсталиран успешно. В такива случаи Adobe получава само несвързана с идентифициране на личността информация. Комуникацията с уебсайтовете на Adobe се управлява от Правила за онлайн поверителност на Adobe, които можете да видите на http://www.adobe.com/go/privacy_bg. Моля, разгледайте Документацията за информация относно смяна на подразбиращите се настройки за актуализиране. 6.3 Мениджър на настройките [Settings Manager]. Flash Player може да съхрани някои потребителски настройки на Компютъра като локално споделян обект. Тези настройки не са свързани с Вас, но Ви позволяват да конфигурирате определени настройки в рамките на Flash Player. Можете да намерите повече информация относно local shared objects посредством хипервръзката http://www.adobe.com/go/flashplayer_security_bg и повече информация за Мениджъра на настройките [Settings Manager] на адрес http://www.adobe.com/go/settingsmanager_bg. 7. Предложения на други фирми. Софтуерът може да разреши достъп и взаимодействие с уебсайтове на други фирми, софтуерни приложения и услуги за данни, включително обогатени интернет приложения (“Предложения на други фирми”). Достъпът и използването на Приложения на други фирми, включително произволни стоки, услуги или информация, се управлява от условията на съответните предложения. Предложенията на други фирми не са собственост на и не са осигуряват от Adobe. 8. Цифрово сертифициране. 8.1 Употреба. Adobe AIR използва цифрово сертифициране, за да ви помогне да установите издателя на създадените от други фирми приложения на Adobe Air. Adobe Reader използва цифрови сертификати за подписване и потвърждаване на подписите в PDF документи за потвърждаване на сертифицирани PDF документи. Компютърът може да се свърже с Интернет по време на потвърждението на цифровия сертификат. Цифровите сертификати се издават от органи за сертифициране на други фирми, включително доставчиците на Adobe Certified Document Services (CDS), изброени на http://www.adobe.com/go/partners_cds_bg (“Органи за сертифициране”) или могат да бъдат самоподписани. 8.2 Срокове и условия. Закупуването, използването и позоваването на цифрови сертификати е Ваша и на Органа за сертифициране отговорност. Преди да се позовете на произволен сертифициран документ, цифров подпис или услуги на Орган за сертифициране, е необходимо да прегледате приложимите срокове и условия, при които съответния Орган за сертифициране предлага услуги, включително, например договори за абонамент, договори за позоваване, правила на сертифициране и декларации от практиката. Вижте връзките на http://www.adobe.com/go/partners_cds_bg за информация относно доставчиците на CDS на Adobe. 8.3 Официална декларация. С настоящото потвърждавате съгласието си, че (а) цифровият сертификат може да бъде анулиран преди времето на потвърждаването, да изглежда валиден, но всъщност да не е, (б) защитата или целостта на цифровия сертификат може да бъде компрометирана поради пропуск на подписващия документа, съответния Орган за сертифициране или друга фирма и (в) сертификатът може да бъде самоподписан, а не издаден от Орган за сертифициране. ЦЯЛАТА ОТГОВОРНОСТ ДАЛИ ДА СЕ ПОЗОВЕТЕ НА СЕРТИФИКАТА ИЛИ НЕ Е ВАША. ОСВЕН АКО НЕ БЪДЕ ИЗДАДЕНА ОТДЕЛНА ПИСМЕНА ГАРАНЦИЯ ОТ ОРГАНА ЗА СЕРТИФИЦИРАНЕ, МОЖЕТЕ ДА ИЗПОЛЗВАТЕ ЦИФРОВИЯ СЕРТИФИКАТ НА СВОЙ РИСК.

8.4 Трети ползващи се лица. С настоящото потвърждавате съгласието си, че Органът за сертифициране, на който се позовавате, представлява трето ползващо се лице от този договор и има права да предизвика действия по договора в своя полза, все едно че е Adobe. 8.5 Обезщетяване. Вие се съгласявате да обезщетите Adobe и съответния Орган за сертифициране (освен ако изрично е предвидено друго в неговите срокове и условия) за всякакви отговорности, загуби, искове, вреди или претенции (включително всички разумни разходи, разноски и адвокатски хонорари), възникващи от или отнасящи се до всяка употреба на или позоваване на всички услуги на подобен орган, включително, но не само (a) позоваване на изтекъл или оттеглен сертификат; (b) неправилно потвърждение на сертификат; (c) използване на сертификат по начин различен от допустимия съгласно приложими срокове и условия, този договор или приложимото законодателство; (d) неупражняване на разумна преценка при съответните обстоятелства при позоваване на услугите или сертификатите на издателя; или (e) неизпълнение на някое от задълженията, изисквани съгласно свързаните с услугите срокове и условия. 9. Без гаранция. Софтуерът се предоставя “В състоянието, в което се намира” и с ВСИЧКИ НЕИЗПРАВНОСТИ. ADOBE И НЕГОВИТЕ ДОСТАВЧИЦИ И ОРГАНИ ЗА СЕРТИФИЦИРАНЕ НЕ ГАРАНТИРАТ И НЕ МОГАТ ДА ГАРАНТИРАТ РАБОТАТА ИЛИ РЕЗУЛТАТИТЕ, КОИТО БИХТЕ МОГЛИ ДА ПОЛУЧИТЕ ПРИ ИЗПОЛЗВАНЕ НА СОФТУЕРА, УСЛУГИТЕ НА ОРГАНИТЕ ЗА СЕРТИФИЦИРАНЕ ИЛИ ПРЕДЛОЖЕНИЯТА НА ДРУГИ ФИРМИ. С ИЗКЛЮЧЕНИЕ НА ГАРАНЦИИ, УСЛОВИЯ, ПРЕДСТАВИТЕЛСТВО ИЛИ СРОКОВЕ, ДОКОЛКОТО СЪЩИТЕ НЕ МОГАТ ИЛИ НЕ СЕ ДОПУСКА ДА БЪДАТ ИЗКЛЮЧЕНИ ИЛИ ОГРАНИЧЕНИ СЪГЛАСНО ЗАКОНИТЕ, ПРИЛОЖИМИ КЪМ ВЪВ ВАШАТА ЮРИСДИКЦИЯ, ADOBE И НЕГОВИТЕ ДОСТАВЧИЦИ И ОРГАНИ ЗА СЕРТИФИЦИРАНЕ НЕ ПРЕДОСТАВЯТ НИКАКВИ УСЛОВИЯ ЗА ГАРАНЦИИ, ПРЕДСТАВИТЕЛСТВО ИЛИ УСЛОВИЯ (ИЗРИЧНИ ИЛИ ПОДРАЗБИРАЩИ СЕ, НЕЗАВИСИМО ДАЛИ ПРОИЗТИЧАЩИ ОТ ЗАКОНА, ОБЩОТО ПРАВО, ОБИЧАЯ ИЛИ ПО ДРУГ НАЧИН) ПО ОТНОШЕНИЕ НА КАКЪВТО И ДА БИЛО ВЪПРОС, ВКЛЮЧИТЕЛНО, НО НЕ САМО НЕНАРУШАВАНЕ НА ПРАВАТА НА ТРЕТИ ЛИЦА, ПРОДАВАЕМОСТТА, ИНТЕГРАЦИЯТА, ЗАДОВОЛИТЕЛНОТО КАЧЕСТВО ИЛИ ГОДНОСТТА ЗА ОПРЕДЕЛЕНА ЦЕЛ. Разпоредбите на Раздели 9 и 10 остават в сила и след прекратяване на този Договор, независимо от начина, по който е било предизвикано, но от това няма да се създава или подразбира съществуването на продължаващо право на използване на Софтуера след прекратяването на този Договор. 10. Ограничаване на отговорността. ПРИ НИКАКВИ ОБСТОЯТЕЛСТВА, ADOBE ИЛИ НЕГОВИТЕ ДОСТАВЧИЦИ, ИЛИ ОРГАНИ ЗА СЕРТИФИЦИРАНЕ, НЕ НОСЯТ ОТГОВОРНОСТ КЪМ ВАС ЗА КАКВИТО И ДА БИЛО ВРЕДИ, ПРЕТЕНЦИИ ИЛИ РАЗХОДИ, НЕПРЕКИ, СЛУЧАЙНИ ВРЕДИ, ИЛИ КАКВИТО И ДА БИЛО ПРОПУСНАТИ ПОЛЗИ ИЛИ ПРОПУСНАТИ СПЕСТЯВАНИЯ, ДОРИ АКО ПРЕДСТАВИТЕЛ НА ADOBE Е БИЛ УВЕДОМЕН ЗА ВЪЗМОЖНОСТТА ЗА НАСТЪПВАНЕ НА ТАКИВА ЗАГУБИ, ВРЕДИ ИЛИ ПРЕТЕНИИ. ПРЕДХОДНИТЕ ОГРАНИЧЕНИЯ И ИЗКЛЮЧЕНИЯ СЕ ПРИЛАГАТ, ДОКОЛКОТО ТОВА СЕ ДОПУСКА ОТ ПРИЛОЖИМОТО ЗАКОНОДАТЕЛСТВО ВЪВ ВАШАТА ЮРИСДИКЦИЯ. СЪВКУПНАТА ОТГОВОРНОСТ НА ADOBE И ТАЗИ НА НЕГОВИТЕ ДОСТАВЧИЦИ ПО ИЛИ ВЪВ ВРЪЗКА С ТОЗИ ДОГОВОР СЕ ОГРАНИЧАВАТ ДО СУМАТА, ПЛАТЕНА ЗА СОФТУЕРА, АКО ИМА ТАКАВА. Нищо, съдържащо се в този договор, не ограничава отговорността на Adobe към Вас в случай на смърт или телесна повреда, произтичащи от небрежност от страна на Adobe, или за непозволено увреждане произтичащо от измама. Adobe действа от името на своите доставчици и Органи за сертифициране с цел изключване и/или ограничаване на задължения, гаранции и отговорност, както е предвидено в този Договор, но не и в които и да е други отношения и за каквито и да е други цели. За допълнителна информация, моля вж. специфичната за юрисдикциите информация в края на този Договор, ако има такава, или се свържете с Отдела за работа с клиенти на Adobe. 11. Правила за износ.

Вие се съгласявате, че Софтуерът няма да се транспортира, пренася или изнася в никоя държава, нито ще се използва по начин, забранен от Закона на Съединените щати за администриране на износа или други закони, ограничения или нормативни разпоредби относно износа (заедно, “Експортното законодателство”). В допълнение, ако Софтуерът е идентифициран като обект на контролиран износ съгласно Експортното законодателство, Вие декларирате и гарантирате, че не сте гражданин на или не се намирате в страна, която е под ембарго (включително, но не само Иран, Сирия, Судан, Либия, Куба и Северна Корея) и че не Ви е забранено по друг начин съгласно Експортното законодателство да получите Софтуера. Всички права за използване на Софтуера се предоставят при условие, че тези права се прекратяват, ако не спазвате условията на този договор. 12. Приложимо право. Към този Договор се прилага и той ще се тълкува в съответствие с материалното право, което е в сила: (a) в щата Калифорния, ако бъде закупен лиценз за Софтуера, докато се намирате в Съединените щати, Канада или Мексико; или (b) в Япония, ако бъде закупен лиценз за Софтуера, докато се намирате в Япония, Китай, Корея или друга държава в Югоизточна Азия, където всички официални езици се изписват или с идеографично писмо (напр., ханзи, канджи или ханджа), и/или друго писмо, базирано върху или подобно по структура на идеографично писмо, като например хангул или кана; или (c) Англия, ако бъде закупен лиценз за Софтуера, докато се намирате в юрисдикция, неописана по-горе. Съответните съдилища в Santa Clara County, California, когато се прилага калифорнийското право, Токийски окръжен съд в Япония, когато се прилага японското право, и компетентните съдилища в Англия, когато се прилага законодателството на Англия, имат неизключителна юрисдикция върху всички спорове, отнасящи се до този Договор. Към този договор не се прилагат стълкновителните разпоредби на която и да е юрисдикция или Конвенцията на Обединените нации относно договорите за международна продажба на стоки, чието приложение изрично се изключва. 13. Общи разпоредби. Ако някоя част от този Договор бъде счетена за недействителна и неподлежаща на изпълнение, това няма да се отрази на валидността на останалата част от Договора, която остава валидна и подлежаща на изпълнение съгласно условията му. Този Договор не преклудира законните права на никоя страна, сключваща го като потребител. Настоящият Договор може да бъде изменян само писмено, като е необходимо да бъде подписан от упълномощен от Adobe служител. Можете да получите лиценз за актуализациите от Adobe при допълнителни или различаващи се условия. Това е цялостният договор между Adobe и Вас по отношение на Софтуера и той замества всякакви предходни декларации, обсъждания, задължения, съобщения или реклами, отнасящи се до Софтуера. 14. Съобщение за Крайни потребители от Правителството на САЩ. За крайни потребители от Правителството на САЩ, Adobe се съгласява да спазва всички приложими закони за осигуряване на равни възможности, включително, ако е уместно, разпоредбите на Указ на Президента на САЩ 11246, с измененията му, Раздел 402 на Закона за помощ за приспособяване на ветераните от виетнамската ера от 1974 г. (38 USC 4212), и Раздел 503 на Закона за реабилитацията от 1973 г., с измененията му, и разпоредбите на 41 CFR Части 60-1 до 60-60 вкл., 60-250, и 60-741. Клаузата за “насърчителни действия” и разпоредбите, съдържащи се в предходното изречение, се включват чрез препращане в настоящия Договор. 15. Съответствие с лицензи. Ако представлявате фирма или организация, потвърждавате съгласието си, че при поискване от Adobe или техен упълномощен представител в рамките на тридесет (30) дни ще документирате изцяло и ще удостоверите, че използването на всеки Софтуер по времето на получаване на искането се извършва в съответствие с валидните Ви лицензи от Adobe.

16. Специфични разпоредби и изключения. 16.1 Ограничаване на отговорността за потребители, пребиваващи в Германия и Австрия. 16.1.1 Ако сте придобили Софтуера в Германия или Австрия и обичайно пребивавате в тази държава, то Раздел 10 не се прилага. Вместо това, при условията на разпоредбите на Раздел 16.1.2 законната отговорност на Adobe за вреди се ограничава, както следва: (i) Adobe отговаря само до размера на вредите, обичайно предвидими по времето на сключване на договора за лиценз, по отношение на вреди от неизпълнение на съществено договорно задължение поради обикновена небрежност и (ii) Adobe не отговаря за вреди от неизпълнение на несъществено договорно задължение поради обикновена небрежност. 16.1.2 Гореспоменатото ограничаване на отговорността не се прилага към задължителната законна отговорност, по-конкретно, към отговорността съгласно германския Закон за отговорност за вреди, причинени от продукти, отговорност за поемане на конкретна гаранция или отговорност за виновно причинени телесни повреди. 16.1.3 Вие сте длъжни да вземете всички разумни мерки за да избегнете настъпването и да намалите вредите, по-конкретно като направите резервни копия на Софтуера и данните на Вашия компютър, в съответствие с разпоредбите на този договор.

В случай, че имате въпроси относно този Договор или ако желаете да поискате информация от Adobe, моля използвайте информацията за адрес и контакт, включена с този продукт или отидете чрез Интернет на адрес http://www.adobe.com/bg, за да се свържете с офиса на Adobe, който обслужва Вашата юрисдикция. Adobe, AIR, Authorware, Flash, Reader и Shockwave са или регистрирани търговски марки или търговски марки на Adobe Systems Incorporated в САЩ и/или други страни.

Reader_Player_WWEULA-bg_BG-20080204_1313

 

ADOBE SYSTEMS INCORPORATED 担保免责声明和软件许可协议。 本文包括担保信息（第I部分）和限制ADOBE软件使用的许可协议（第II部分）。 第I部分：担保免责声明。 本软件和其它信息按“原样”提供，并且不保证没有错误。ADOBE及其供应商以及认证中心不保证也不能保 证使用本软件、认证中心服务或其他第三方产品所可能获得的性能或结果。除非依据您所在区域的适用法 律不能或不得排除或限制前述任何保证、条件、陈述或条款，否则，ADOBE及其供应商以及认证中心不做 出保证条件、陈述或条款（明示的或暗示的无论是依据条例、普通法、惯例、常例，还是其他任何原因） 包括但不限于不侵犯第三方权益、适销性、完整性、满意的质量或适用于任何特殊用途。 第II部分：软件许可协议。 使用、复制或分发ADOBE软件的所有或任何部分，即视为接受本协议中规定的所有条款和条件，特别是对 下列内容之规定：使用（第2部分）、可转让性（第4部分）、连通性和隐私（第6部分）、担保（第9部分 ）以及责任（第10和第16部分）。在接受本协议后，本协议可对您及获得本软件并由他人代表其使用本软 件的任何实体强制执行。如不同意，请不要使用本软件。 ADOBE只允许您按照本协议各项条款的规定使用本软件。使用本软件中包括的某些第三方材料可能会受其 他条款或条件的约束，这些条款或条件通常可以在一个单独的许可协议、这些材料附带的“自述文件”或http: //www.adobe.com/go/thirdparty_cn上的“第三方软件通知和⁄或附加条款和条件”中找到。 1. 定义。 “Adobe”在本协议的子部分12(a)适用时指Adobe Systems Incorporated，地址为345 Park Avenue, San Jose, California 95110的特拉华州公司；否则，“Adobe”指Adobe Systems Software Ireland Limited，其地址为Unit 3100, Lake Drive, City West Campus, Saggart D24, Republic of Ireland，它是依爱尔兰法律建立的公司，且为Adobe Systems Incorporated的关联公司和许可证持有者。“计算机”指以数字或类似形式接受信息并基于指令序列处理信息 以获得特定结果的一个虚拟或物理的个人计算机设备。“本软件”指(a)随附了本协议的文件（以电子或物理 介质提供）、磁盘或其他介质的所有内容，其中可能包括(i)Adobe或第三方计算机信息或软件，包括Adobe Reader®(“Adobe Reader”)、Adobe® AIR™ (“Adobe AIR”)、Adobe Flash®播放器、Shockwave®播放器和Authorware®播放器（Adobe AIR和Flash、Shockwave和Authorware播放器合称“Adobe Runtime”）；(ii)相关的说明性书面材料或文件（“文档”）和(iii)字体；以及(b)Adobe于任何时间提供给您的 升级版、修改版、更新、添加内容及前述内容的副本，这些统称“更新版”。“使用”指访问、安装、下载、复 制或以其他方式通过使用本软件的功能而获益。 2. 软件许可证。 如果您从Adobe或其授权被许可人之一取得软件，并且以您遵守本协议的条款（包括第3部分中的限制）为 前提，Adobe即会授予您非独占性的许可证，允许您依据文档中描述的下述用途使用本软件。 2.1 常规使用。您可以在兼容机上安装并使用本软件的副本。请参见第3部分中有关使用本软件的重要限制。

2.2 服务器使用。本协议不允许您在计算机文件服务器上安装或使用本软件。有关在计算机文件服务器上使用 本软件的信息，请参见http://www.adobe.com/go/acrobat_distribute_cn（Adobe Reader），或http://www.adobe.com/go/licensing_cn（Adobe Runtime）。 2.3 分发。本许可证不授予您发放子许可证或分发本软件的权利。有关通过有形介质或内部网络或随产品或服 务取得分发本软件权利的信息，请参见http://www.adobe.com/go/acrobat_distribute_cn（Adobe Reader），或http://www.adobe.com/go/licensing_cn（Adobe Runtime）。 2.4 备份副本。您可以制作一个软件副本，但不可以安装或使用该副本。除非按第4部分所述将本软件的所有权 限转让，否则不得将权限转让给该备份副本。 3. 义务和限制。 3.1 Adobe Runtime限制。您不得在任何非PC设备上使用任何Adobe Runtime，亦不得将任何Adobe Runtime与任何操作系统的任何嵌入或设备版本一起使用。为避免存疑，举例而言，您不得在下述任何设备 上使用Adobe Runtime：(a)移动设备、机顶盒、手持设备、电话、无线上网机、平板电脑（不包括Windows XP Tablet PC版本及其后续版本）、游戏机、电视机、DVD机、媒体中心（不包括Windows XP Media Center版本及其后续版本）、电子公告牌或其他数字标牌、互联网设备或其他与互联网连接的设备、掌上电 脑、医疗设备、自动取款机、信息通讯设备、游艺机、家庭自动化系统、自助服务机、遥控设备或任何其 他消费电子设备，(b)由操作员操作的移动、有线、卫星或电视系统，或(c)其他闭路系统设备。有关在这些 系统上使用授权Adobe Runtime的信息，请参见http://www.adobe.com/go/licensing_cn。 3.2 Adobe Reader限制。Adobe Reader是由Adobe授权并分发的，用于查看、分发和共享PDF文件。 3.2.1 转换限制。您未被授权在将PDF文件转换为其他文件格式时（例如将PDF文件转换为TIFF、JPEG或SVG文 件）将Adobe Reader与使用或基于Adobe Reader的任何其他软件、插件或增强程序集成，或配合使用。 3.2.2 插件限制。您并未被授权将Adobe Reader与未按照Adobe集成关键字许可协议开发的插件软件集成或配合使用。 3.2.3 禁用功能。Adobe Reader可能含有被隐藏、禁用或“灰色显示”的功能（“禁用功能”）。只有在打开使用仅由Adobe提供的相关 启用技术创建的PDF文档之后，才会激活这些禁用功能。除非通过使用该类启用技术，您不得访问，或尝 试访问任何禁用功能，仰赖Adobe Reader创建与任何禁用功能基本相似的特性，或绕开任何控制此类特性激活的技术。有关禁用功能的详细 信息，请参见http://www.adobe.com/go/readerextensions_cn。 3.3 声明。您制作的任何软件副本，必须包含与本软件上或本软件中使用的相同的版权和其他所有权声明。 3.4 不得进行修改或逆向工程。您不得修改、改编或翻译本软件，或基于本软件创作衍生作品。您不得进行逆 向工程、反编译、反汇编或以其他方式尝试发现本软件的源代码；若适用的法规明确允许您进行逆向工程 或反编译则不在此限。 4. 转让。 除非本协议有明示许可，否则不得租赁、出租、发放子许可证、让渡或转让本软件的权利，或者对本软件 的所有或任何部分进行授权而将其复制到其他用户电脑上。但是您可以将使用本软件的所有权限转让给他

人或其他法律实体，但必须付合以下条件：(a)您还将(i)本协议，以及(ii)本软件和与本软件捆绑或预安装在 一起的所有其他软件或硬件（包括所有副本、更新版和先前版本）转让给他人或其他实体；(b)您不留任何 副本，包括电脑上存储的备份和副本；以及(c)接收方接受本协议的条款和条件以及您合法为本软件购买许 可证时接受的任何其他条款和条件。尽管有前述内容，您还是不能转让本软件的教学、预发行或非转售副 本。 5. 知识产权所有权，保留权利。 本软件及您制作的任何授权副本均为Adobe Systems Incorporated及其供应商的知识产权。本软件的结构、组织和代码均为Adobe Systems Incorporated及其供应商的有价商业秘密和保密信息。本软件受法律（包括但不限于美国和其他国家的版权 法）以及国际协约条款保护。除非明确表述，否则本协议不授予您对本软件的任何知识产权，且Adobe及其 供应商保留未明确授予的其他所有权利。 6. 连通性和隐私。 6.1 PDF文件的使用。使用本软件打开已经通过注册Ads for Adobe PDF服务启用广告显示功能的PDF文件时，您的计算机可能会连接到由Adobe、广告商或其他第三方运营的 网站。此时会发送您的互联网协议(IP)地址。网站托管方可能会使用技术向打开的文件或其附近发送（或“ 服务”）广告或其它电子内容。网站经营者还可能使用JavaScript、网站信标（亦称作动作标签或单点图）和 其他技术提高和衡量广告的有效性，以及个性化广告内容。您与Adobe网站的通信受到位于下列网址的《A dobe在线隐私策略》的制约：http://www.adobe.com/go/privacy_cn。Adobe不得访问或控制第三方可能使用的 功能，并且第三方网站信息处理实践不在《Adobe在线隐私策略》范围之内。 6.2 更新。您承认并同意本软件可能会造成计算机自动连接到互联网，检查可自动下载的更新并告知Adobe软件 已成功安装。此时不会发送个人身份信息到Adobe。您与Adobe网站的通信受到位于下列网址的《Adobe在 线隐私策略》的制约：http://www.adobe.com/go/privacy_cn。有关改变默认更新设置的信息，请查阅文档。 6.3 设置管理器。Flash播放器可能会将某些用户设置作为本地共享对象存储在您的计算机上。这些设置并非与 您联系在一起，而是允许您在Flash播放器中进行某些设置。您可以在http://www.adobe.com/go/flashplayer_se curity_cn上找到有关本地共享对象的更多信息，在http://www.adobe.com/go/settingsmanager_cn上找到有关设 置管理器的更多信息。 7. 第三方产品。 本软件可能允许您访问并与第三方网站、软件应用程序、数据服务进行交互协作，包括丰富互联网应用程 序（“第三方产品”）。访问和使用任何第三方产品，包括任何此类产品的物品、服务或信息，均受第三方 产品的条款和条件的限制。第三方产品不归Adobe所有或运营。 8. 数字证书。 8.1 使用。Adobe AIR使用数字证书帮助您识别第三方创建的Adobe AIR应用程序发行商。Adobe Reader使用数字证书签署和验证PDF文件内的签名，以及验证PDF认证文件。您的计算机可能会在验证数字 证书时连接到互联网。数字证书由第三方认证中心颁发，包括http://www.adobe.com/go/partners_cds_cn列出 的Adobe认证文件服务(CDS)供应商（“认证中心”），或自行签署。

8.2 条款和条件。购买、使用和信任数字证书是您和认证中心的责任。在您信赖任何认证文件、数字签名或认 证中心服务之前，您应该审阅相关认证中心提供服务时所依据的适用条款和条件，包括诸如任何订户协议 、证书信任方协议、证书政策和惯例声明。参见http://www.adobe.com/go/partners_cds_cn上有关Adobe CDS供应商信息的链接。 8.3 同意书。您同意(a)数字证书可以在核证时被撤消，使数字签名或证书看上去有效，尽管实际上并非如此；( b)由于本文档的签名人、适用的认证中心或任何其他第三方的行为或疏忽可能危及数字证书的安全性或完 整性；以及(c)证书可能是自行签发的而非由认证中心提供。您需要自行决定是否信赖证书。除非认证中心 为您单独提供书面担保，否则使用数字证书的风险一概由您自行承担。 8.4 第三方受益人。您同意您信赖的任何认证中心均为本协议的第三方受益人，并且，同Adobe一样，有权以自 己的名义强制执行此协议。 8.5 补偿。对于因使用或信任任何认证中心服务，或与此有关而使Adobe及任何适用认证中心服务提供商（除非 其条款和条件中明确规定）受到任何及所有责任、损失、诉讼、损害或索赔（包括所有合理的开支、费用 和律师费），您同意使Adobe及该认证中心服务提供商免受损害；上述使用或信任包括但不限于(a)信任逾期 或撤销之证书；(b)未正确核证证书；(c)在未经适用之条款和条件、本协议或适用法律授权的情况下使用证 书；(d)在信任认证中心服务的情况下未能行使合理判断；或(e)未能依服务相关的条款和条件要求履行任何 义务。 9. 拒绝保证。 本软件按“原样”提供，并且不保证没有错误。ADOBE及其供应商以及认证中心不保证也不能保证使用本软 件、认证中心服务或其他第三方产品所可能获得的性能或结果。除非依据您所在区域的适用法律不能或不 得排除或限制前述任何保证、条件、陈述或条款，否则，ADOBE及其供应商以及认证中心不做出保证条件 、陈述或条款（明示的或暗示的无论是依据条例、普通法、惯例、常例，还是其他任何原因）包括但不限 于不侵犯第三方权益、适销性、完整性、满意的质量或适用于任何特殊用途。第9部分和第10部分在本协议 终止后应继续有效，无论終止的原因如何，但是这并非暗示或创造在本协议终止后继续使用本软件的权利 。 10. 责任限制。 ADOBE及其供应商或认证中心在任何情况下都不对任何损失、索赔或费用或任何相应而生、间接、附带的 损失或任何失去的利润或储蓄承担任何责任，即使ADOBE代表已被告知出现这种损失、伤害、或索赔的可 能性。前述限制和除外责任在您所在地区的适用法律允许范围内适用。无论任何情况下，依照本协议或与 本协议有关的ADOBE及其供应商以及认证中心所承担的集合责任或以其他方式规定的责任均限于购买本软 件所支付的款项（如果有的话）。本协议包含的任何内容都不限制Adobe因Adobe疏忽所造成的死亡或个人 伤害或对欺骗（诈骗）而对你的责任。Adobe代表供应商及认证中心而否认、拒绝和/或限制本协议中提供 的责任、担保和义务，但不在其他方面或为其他目的代表其供应商。要获取进一步的信息，请参见本协议 末尾的地区特定信息（如适用于您的话）或者与Adobe的客户支持部门联系。 11. 出口规则。 您同意不将本软件装运、转让或出口到《美国出口管理法》或任何其他出口法规、限制或规则（统称“出口 法规”）所禁止之国家或任何方式使用本软件。此外，如果依据出口法规本软件被视为出口控制制品，您须

声明并保证您不是贸易禁运国（包括但不限于伊朗、叙利亚、苏丹、古巴和朝鲜人民共和国）的公民或不 居住在这些国家以及依据出口法规您不会被禁止接收本软件。授予您使用本软件的所有权限的前提条件是 ，如果您不能遵守本协议的条款，您将丧失本软件的使用权限。 12. 管辖法规。 本协议将受现行的下列国家或地区的主要法规管理并按照这些法规进行解释：(a)加利福尼亚州，如果您在 美国、加拿大或墨西哥购买了本软件的许可证；或者(b)日本，如果您在日本、中国、韩国或其他以表意文 字（如，汉字、日本汉字或hanja）和/或以在结构上以表意文字为基础的其他文字（如朝鲜字母、日语字母 ）作为官方书面语言的东南亚国家购买本软件的许可证；或者(c)英格兰，如果您在上述未涉及的任何其他 地区购买本软件的许可证。加利福尼亚州圣克拉拉法院（当加利福尼亚州法律适用时）、日本东京地方法 院（当日本法律适用时）以及英格兰伦敦的法院（当英格兰法律适用时）应对与本协议相关的争议有其各 自的非独占性管辖地区。本协议不受任何管辖地区法规冲突或《联合国国际货物销售合同公约》（其适用 性已被明示拒绝）的限制。 13. 一般规定。 如果发现本协议的任何部分无效且无法履行，将不会影响本协议其他部份的有效性。它们将依然有效且其 条款可以履行。本协议不会损害任何消费者方的法定权限。本协议仅在有Adobe指定高级职员的亲笔签名时 方可修改。发行更新版时，Adobe发放的许可证可能会有附加的或不同的条款。这是Adobe与您之间有关本 软件的整个协议，它将取代先前任何与本软件相关的陈述、讨论、承诺、书信或宣传。 14. 美国政府最终用户须知。 对于美国政府最终用户，Adobe同意遵守所有适用的平等机会法规，其中包括（如果适用的话）Executive Order 11246（修订版）、1974年的Vietnam Era Veterans Readjustment Assistance Act第402部分(38 USC 4212)、1973年Rehabilitation Act（修订版）第503部分的规定以及41 CFR中第60-1到60-60、60-250和60741部分的规则。前一句中提到的确认性行动条款和规则可以引用至本协议中并适用。 15. 遵守许可证。 如果您是一家营利事业或组织，您须同意在得到Adobe或Adobe的授权代表的通知后三十天(30)内充分证明 并保证在获得通知之时使用的任何和所有软件均符合Adobe的有效许可证。 16. 特殊规定和例外情形。 16.1 仅适用于居住在德国或奥地利的用户的责任限制。 16.1.1 如果您在德国或奥地利获得本软件，而您通常居住在该国，那么第10部分不适用，这时，在符合第16.1.2部 分的规定的前提下，Adobe就赔偿金的法定责任应仅限于：(i)Adobe仅对因疏忽而轻微违反实质性契约责任 所造成的损失承担责任，赔偿金不超过在达成许可协议时可预见的典型损失数额；以及(ii)Adobe对因疏忽 而轻微违反非实质性契约责任所造成的损失不承担责任。 16.1.2 上述责任限制不应适用于任何强制性法定责任，尤其是属于德国产品责任法的责任、规定具体担保的责任 或因失责造成人身伤害的责任。

16.1.3 您必须采取所有合理措施以避免和减少损失，尤其应根据本协议规定制作本软件和计算机数据的备份副本 。

如果您对本协议有任何疑问或者希望从Adobe获得任何信息，请使用本产品中附带的地址和联系信息或通过 网站www.adobe.com/cn与您所属地区的Adobe办事处联系。 Adobe、AIR、Authorware、Flash、Reader和Shockwave是Adobe Systems Incorporated在美国和/或其他国家的注册商标或商标。

Reader_Player_AIR_WWEULA-zh_CN-20080204_1313

 

ADOBE SYSTEMS INCORPORATED 保證免責聲明及軟體授權協議。 本文件包括保證資訊(第1部分)及規範ADOBE軟體使用方式之授權合約(第2部分)。 第1部分：保證免責聲明。 本軟體及其他資訊按「現況」提供，所有錯誤已包含在內。ADOBE、其供應商及認證機構對於貴使用戶藉 使用本軟體、認證機構服務或第三方提供物所獲得之效能或結果不作出任何保證亦不能作出任何保證。除 了貴使用戶所在管轄地之適用法律不准許加以限制或排除之任何保證或承諾外，ADOBE、其供應商及認證 機構並未作任何保證或承諾(明示、默示、法定、普通法、慣例、習慣或其他事宜)，包括但不限於︰不保證 不侵害第三方權利、不保證本軟體的適銷性、不保證本軟體之整合、滿意之品質或適用於任何特定之用途 。 第2部分：軟體授權協議。 一經使用、複製或發送ADOBE軟體之全部或任何部分，即視為貴使用戶接受本協議之全部條款，尤其包括 下列各條款之規定︰第2節有關使用；第4節有關可轉讓性；第6節有關連接性及隱私權；第9節有關保證； 以及第10節及第16節有關責任事宜。一經貴使用戶同意，本協議之效力及於貴使用戶和任何其他取得本軟 體之實體及為該實體使用本軟體之人士。如貴使用戶不同意此條件，請勿使用本軟體。 ADOBE僅准許貴使用戶得在符合本協議條款的情況下使用本軟體。使用本軟體中包括的某些第三方材料可 能會受其他條款或條件的約束，這通常可以在一個單獨的授權協議，即這些材料附帶的「讀我」檔案中， 或於http://www.adobe.com/go/thirdparty_tw之「第三方軟體通知及/或附加條款及條件」中找到。 1. 定義。 「Adobe」：如適用本協議第12(a)款，則應指Adobe Systems Incorporated，為美國達拉威爾州公司組織，設址於345 Park Avenue, San Jose, California 95110；否則應指Adobe Systems Incorporated所授權之關係事業Software Ireland Limited，為據愛爾蘭法律成立之公司組織，設址於Unit 3100, Lake Drive, City West Campus, Saggart D24, Republic of Ireland。「電腦」：指可以接受數位或其他類似形式資訊並依據一系列指令加以處理以獲得特定結果之虛 擬或實體個人電子裝置。「軟體」：指(a)本協議所涵蓋之檔案(提供電子下載或以有形媒體提供)、磁碟或其 他媒體之全部內容，可能包括︰(i)Adobe或第三方電腦資訊或軟體，包含 Adobe Reader®(「Adobe Reader」)、Adobe® AIR™(「Adobe AIR」)、Adobe Flash® Player、Shockwave® Player及Authorware® Player (Adobe AIR、Flash、Shockwave及Authorware播放器通稱為「Adobe Runtime」)；(ii)相關之解釋資料或檔案(「說明文件」)；以及(iii)字型；以及(b)Adobe不定時對Adobe所提供 之前開各項目之升級版本、更新、修正版本以及增加與副本(以下通稱為「更新」)。「使用」：係指存取、 安裝、下載、複製或從利用本軟體之功能獲得其他益處。 2. 軟體授權。 如貴使用戶自Adobe或其授權之人處取得本軟體，於遵守本協議之條款，包含第3節所述之限制之情況下， Adobe即授權貴使用戶就本「說明文件」所述之如下方式及用途「使用」本軟體，此是項授權非為獨家授權 。

2.1 一般用途。貴使用戶可在相容的電腦上安裝及使用本軟體一份副本。有關使用本軟體的重要限制，請參閱 第3節。 2.2 伺服器用途。本協議不准許貴使用戶在電腦檔案伺服器上安裝或使用本軟體。有關在電腦檔案伺服器上使 用本軟體的資訊，請參閱http://www.adobe.com/go/acrobat_distribute_tw網頁上的Adobe Reader相關資訊；或參閱http://www.adobe.com/go/licensing_tw網頁上的Adobe Runtime相關資訊。 2.3 發送。本授權並未授予貴使用戶轉授權或發送軟體之權利。有關取得在有形媒體上配送本軟體、透過公司 內部網路發送本軟體，或連同貴使用戶的產品或服務配送本軟體之權利，請參閱http://www.adobe.com/go/ac robat_distribute_tw網頁上的Adobe Reader相關資訊；或參閱http://www.adobe.com/go/licensing_tw網頁上的Adobe Runtime相關資訊。 2.4 備份。貴使用戶可製作一份本軟體之備份，但不得安裝或使用此備份。除非按第4節之規定轉讓本軟體之全 部權利，否則貴使用戶不得將權利轉讓給此類備份。 3. 義務與限制。 3.1 Adobe Runtime之限制。貴使用戶不得於任何非個人電腦之裝置上或與任何作業系統之嵌入式或裝置版本一同使用 任何Adobe Runtime。為避免疑義，且僅為舉例，貴使用戶不得使用Adobe Runtime於任何(a)可攜式裝置、視訊轉換器(STB)、掌上型電腦、電話、聯網板、數位板及非使用Windows XP Tablet PC Edition及其下一代產品之平板電腦、遊戲機、電視、DVD播放機、媒體中心(不包含Windows XP Media Center Edition及其下一代產品)、電子看板或其他數位看板、網路應用產品及其他網路連接裝置、掌上電腦(PDA) 、醫療裝置、自動櫃員機、遠程訊息處理裝置、遊戲機器、家庭自動化系統、自助機台、遙控裝置或任何 其他消費性電子產品；(b)系統業者手機、有線電視、衛星或電視系統或(c)其他封閉式系統裝置。有關取得 Adobe Runtime授權以在前開系統上使用Adobe Runtime之資訊，請參閱http://www.adobe.com/go/licensing_tw網頁。 3.2 Adobe Reader之限制。Adobe Reader是Adobe為針對檢視、分發和共享PDF檔案所授權及發送的。 3.2.1 轉換限制。貴使用戶不得將Adobe Reader與在將PDF文件轉換成另一種格式時(例如將PDF檔案轉成TIFF、JPEG或SVG檔案)需要使用或依靠Ad obe Reader之任何其他軟體、插件或增強程式整合或一起使用。 3.2.2 插件限制。貴使用戶不得將Adobe Reader軟體與未按Adobe整合鍵授權協議而開發出的Adobe Reader Plug-in軟體整合或一起使用。 3.2.3 停用特性。本軟體可能含有被隱藏、顯示成停用或「灰色顯示」的特性和功能(「停用特性」)。唯有在開啟 使用Adobe獨家提供的啟動技術建立的一個PDF檔案之後，停用特性才會啟動。除透過使用此啟動技術之外 ，貴使用戶不得存取或嘗試存取任何「停用特性」，也不得仰賴Adobe Reader建立實質類似任何「停用特性」的特性，或規避控制任何此類特性之啟動作業的技術。有關停用特 性的詳細資訊，請參閱http://www.adobe.com/go/readerextensions_tw網頁。 3.3 聲明。貴使用戶製作的任何本軟體之副本，必須包含與本軟體上或本軟體中使用的相同之著作權及其他所 有權聲明。

3.4 不得修改或進行逆向工程。貴使用戶不得修改、變更、翻譯本軟體或自本軟體改作出衍生著作。貴使用戶 不得就本軟體進行逆向工程、反編譯、反彙編或以其他方式試圖探究本軟體之原始碼；若適用的法律明文 規定准許進行逆向工程或反編譯，則不在此限。 4. 轉讓。 除非本協議條款明文授權，否則貴使用戶不得出借、出租、再授權、讓渡或轉讓本軟件之權利，或授權將 本軟體之全部或任何部分複製至其他使用者之電腦。貴使用戶可於符合下述條件之情況下將使用本軟體之 全部權利轉讓給另一個人或法律實體：(a)貴使用戶同時對此等個人或機構轉讓(i)本協議、(ii)本軟體以及與 本軟體結合或預安裝於本軟體之其他軟體或硬體，包括本軟體之所有副本、更新或舊版本，(b)貴使用戶不 得保留本軟體之任何副本，包括備份及貯存於電腦內之軟體副本；並且(c)受讓人應接受本協議之全部條款 以及貴使用戶取得本軟體有效授權時所約定之其他條款。無論上文如何規定，貴使用戶皆不得轉讓本軟體 之教育版、測試版、或不可轉售之副本。 5. 智慧財產所有權，保留權利。 本軟體及貴使用戶製作的任何授權副本均為Adobe Systems Incorporated及其供應商的智慧財產。本軟體之結構、組織和代碼均為Adobe Systems Incorporated及其供應商的有價商業秘密和保密資訊。本軟體受法律保護，其中包括但不限於美國及其他國 家之著作權法以及國際協約條款。除非明確表述，否則本協議不授予貴使用戶對本軟體之任何智慧產權， 此外Adobe及其供應商保留未明確授予之其他全部權利。 6. 連接性及隱私權。 6.1 PDF檔案之使用。當貴使用戶以本軟體開啟已透過登錄Ads for Adobe PDF服務啟用廣告顯示功能的PDF檔案時，貴使用戶之電腦可能會連接至由Adobe、廣告商或其他第三方所 營運之網站。此時，本軟體會傳送貴使用戶之網際網路通訊協定(IP)位址。代管網站方可能使用相關技術來 傳送(或稱「伺服」)出現在已開啟檔案中或附近的廣告內容或其他電子內容。網站營運者可能也會利用Java Script、網站信標(又稱行動標籤或單畫素gif圖檔)及其他技術來增加或評估廣告的有效性，並個人化廣告內 容。貴使用戶與Adobe網站之間的通訊交流受Adobe線上隱私權政策(請上網http://www.adobe.com/go/privacy _tw瀏覽)之約束。Adobe可能無法存取或控制第三方可能使用之功能，且第三方網站之資訊處理慣例也不在 Adobe線上隱私權政策之涵蓋範圍內。 6.2 更新。貴使用戶暸解並同意本軟體可能導致貴使用戶的電腦自動連接至網際網路，以檢查是否有可自動下 載至貴使用戶電腦的更新檔，並讓Adobe得知本軟體已順利安裝完成。此時，軟體僅會將非個人識別資料傳 送至Adobe。貴使用戶與Adobe網站之間的通訊交流受Adobe線上隱私權政策(請上網http://www.adobe.com/go /privacy_tw瀏覽)之約束。有關變更預設更新設定之資訊，請參閱本軟體「說明文件」。 6.3 設定管理員。Flash Player可能使本軟體得以於貴使用戶的電腦中將某些使用者設定儲存為本地共享物件。這些設定雖與您無關 ，但能使您在Flash Player中設定某些設定組態。請參閱http://www.adobe.com/go/flashplayer_security_tw上更多有關本地共享物 件之資訊，及http://www.adobe.com/go/settingsmanager_tw上更多有關設定管理員之資訊。 7. 第三方提供物。

本軟體可能允許貴使用戶存取第三方網站、軟體應用程式及資料服務(包括豐富式網路應用程式)，並與之進 行交互運作(「第三方提供物」)。貴使用戶對於任何「第三方提供物」(包括任何商品、服務或資訊)之存取 及使用以該提供物相關條款為準據法。第三方提供物不歸Adobe所有或提供。 8. 數位證書。 8.1 用途。Adobe AIR利用數位證書幫助貴使用戶識別第三方所建立之Adobe AIR應用程式發行者。Adobe Reader使用數位證書在PDF文件內簽名及核證簽名，及核證已證明的PDF文件。在進行數位證書核證時，貴 使用戶的電腦可能會連接網際網路。數位證書由第三方認證機構核發，包括列在http://www.adobe.com/go/pa rtners_cds_tw中的Adobe證明文件服務(CDS)供應商(「認證機構」，或可自行簽名。 8.2 條款及條件。購買、使用及信任數位證書是貴使用戶及認證機構之責任。信任任何證明文件、數位簽名或 認證機構服務之前，貴使用戶應先檢閱相關認證機構據以提供服務之適用條款及條件，包括諸如訂戶合約 、證書信任方協議、證書政策和慣例聲明。有關Adobe CDS供應商的資訊，請參閱http://www.adobe.com/go/partners_cds_tw網頁上的連結。 8.3 確認聲明。貴使用戶同意(a)數位證書可能在接受核證之前遭到撤銷，致使無效之數位簽名或證書顯示為有 效，(b)數位證書之安全性或完整性可能因文件簽名人、適用認證機構或任何第三方之行為或疏忽而有所減 損，以及(c)證書可能是非認證機構提供的自行簽名證書。貴使用戶自行負起決定是否信任證書之責任。除 非認證機構另行提供個別的書面保證給貴使用戶，否則貴使用戶應自行承擔使用數位證書之風險。 8.4 第三方受益人。貴使用戶同意貴使用戶信任之任何認證機構皆為本協議之第三方受益人，且有權以其自身 名義如Adobe般執行本協議。 8.5 補償。對於因使用或信任任何相關認證機構服務，或與此有關而使Adobe及此類認證機構(除非其條款及條 件中明確規定)受到任何及所有責任、損失、訴訟、損害或索賠(包括所有合理的費用、成本和律師費)，貴 使用戶同意使Adobe及此類認證機構免受傷害；上述使用或信任包括但不限於(a)信任逾期或經撤銷之證書； (b)未正確核證證書；(c)在未經適用之條款及條件、本協議或適用法律授權的情況下使用證書；(d)在信任發 行商服務或證書的情況下未能做出合理的判斷；或(e)未能依適用服務相關條款及條件之要求履行任何義務 。 9. 不保證事項。 本軟體按「現況」提供，所有錯誤已包含在內。ADOBE、其供應商及認證機構對於貴使用戶藉使用本軟體 、認證機構服務或第三方提供物所獲得之效能或結果不作出任何保證亦不能作出任何保證。除了貴使用戶 所在管轄地之適用法律不准許加以限制或排除之任何保證或承諾外，ADOBE、其供應商及認證機構並未作 任何保證或承諾(明示、默示、法定、普通法、慣例、習慣或其他事宜)，包括但不限於︰不保證不侵害第三 方權利、不保證本軟體的適銷性、不保證本軟體之整合、滿意之品質或適用於任何特定之用途。第9節和第 10節在本協議終止後應繼續有效，無論終止之原因如何，惟此並非暗示或創造在本協議終止後繼續使用本 軟體的權利。 10. 責任限制。 ADOBE、其供應商或認證機構在任何情況下皆不向貴使用戶負責任何損害、索賠或費用，包括任何衍生、 間接、附帶的損失或利潤或盈餘之喪失，即使ADOBE之代表已預先獲知可能發生此類損失、損害、索賠， ADOBE仍不須負責。前述限制及排除條款應於使用者所在之管轄地的法律許可範圍內適用本協議。ADOB E、其供應商及認證機構按本協議規定所負之所有責任之總額，應以貴使用戶為本軟體所支付之金額(如有

的話)為上限。本協議之任何條款並不限制Adobe因怠忽或詐欺造成人身傷害或死亡所應負之責任。Adobe僅 就本協議所述之不保證事項、義務、保證及責任之排除及/或限制等事宜代表其供應商及認證機構，但不就 任何其他事宜或其他目的代表其供應商及認證機構。詳細說明請參閱本協議末尾所附各管轄地之特定資訊 ，或聯絡「Adobe客服部門」。 11. 出口規則。 貴使用戶不得將本軟體裝運、轉送或出口至「美國出口管理法」或其他出口法規、限制或管制規定(以下統 稱「出口法規」)所禁止之國家或任何方式使用本軟體。此外，如本軟體依出口法規視為管制項目，則貴使 用戶應聲明及保證其並非禁運國家之公民且不在此等國家境內(包括但不限於伊朗、敘利亞、蘇丹、古巴、 以及北韓)，並且貴使用戶之獲得本軟體不受出口法規之禁止。如貴使用戶未遵守本協議之條款，則貴使用 戶所享有之本軟體使用權即告沒收，此為授權使用本軟體之先決條件。 12. 準據法。 本協議應以現行實體法為執行與釋義之準據：(a)取得本軟體授權之地點如為美國、加拿大或墨西哥，則以 美國加州之法律為準據法；或(b)取得本軟體授權之地點如為日本、中國、韓國或其他東南亞國家，而其官 方文字係以表意(如漢字、日本漢字或韓文漢字)或類似方式(如韓語字母、日語字母)書寫，則以日本法律為 準據法；或(c)在上述以外之司法轄域取得本軟體之授權，則以英格蘭之法律。適用加州法律時，加州聖塔 克拉拉郡加州法院；適用日本法律時，東京地方法院；適用英格蘭法律時，英格蘭倫敦法院為本協議所有 相關爭議之非唯一轄權法院。本協議不受任何管轄地之法律抵觸原則或《聯合國國際商品買賣契約公約》 約束，故本協議明文排除該公約之適用。 13. 一般條款。 本協議之任何部分如經認定為無效或無執行效力，不影響其餘部分之效力，且其餘部分應在條款規定下繼 續充份有效並可以執行。本協議不會妨礙任何當事人以消費者身份應享有之法定權利。本協議之修訂需以 書面為之並經Adobe授權之主管簽名始具效力。Adobe可按追加或經修改之條款對貴使用戶授權更新版本。 本協議已構成Adobe與使用者之間就本軟體相關事宜所為之全部協議，並取代雙方先前就本軟體相關事宜所 為之一切申述、討論、承諾、溝通、或廣告。 14. 對美國政府使用者之聲明。 對於美國政府使用者，Adobe同意遵守所有適用之公平機會法，包括第11246號行政命令及其修訂條款之規 定、1974年越戰退伍軍人輔助法第402節(38 USC 4212)、1973年殘障就業法第503節及其修訂、以及41 CFR Parts 60-1至60-60, 60-250，以及60741之管制規定。前句所述之確認行動條款以及管制規定將視為納入本協議。 15. 遵守授權條件。 如貴使用戶為營利事業或非營利機構，則一經Adobe或Adobe所授權之代表人指示，應於三十(30)日內作成 完整記錄並簽證聲明當時所有軟體之使用情形完全符合Adobe之授權。 16. 特殊條款及例外情況。 16.1 僅適用於居住在德國或奧地利的使用者之責任限制。 16.1.1 如貴使用戶在德國或奧地利取得本軟體，而貴使用戶通常居住在該國，則第10節不適用，這時，在符合第1

6.1.2節之規定的前提下，Adobe就賠償金的法定責任僅限於：(i)Adobe僅對因疏忽而輕微違反實質性契約責 任所造成之損失承擔責任，而賠償金不逾在達成授權協議時可預見之典型損失數額；且(ii)Adobe對因疏忽 而輕微違反非實質性契約責任所造成之損失不承擔責任。 16.1.2 上述責任限制不應適用於任何強制性法定責任，尤其是屬於德國産品責任法之責任、規定具體擔保之責任 或因故意造成人身傷害之責任。 16.1.3 貴使用戶必須採取全部合理措施以避免和減少損失，尤其應根據本協議規定製作本軟體和電腦資料之備份 副本。

如貴使用戶對本協議有任何疑問或需向本公司索取任何資訊，請按本產品所附地址及聯絡資訊或透過http:// www.adobe.com/tw網站聯絡本公司負責服務貴地區之業務單位。 Adobe、AIR、Authorware、Flash、Reader及Shockwave為Adobe Systems Incorporated在美國及其他國家之註冊商標或商標。

Reader_Player_AIR_WWEULA-zh_TW-20080204_1313

 

ADOBE SYSTEMS INCORPORATED Odricanje od odgovornosti za jamstvo i sporazum o licenci za softver. OVAJ DOKUMENT SADRŽI INFORMACIJE O JAMSTVU (I. DIO) I SPORAZUM O LICENCI ZA SOFTVER KOJI DEFINIRA KORIŠTENJE SOFTVERA TVRTKE ADOBE (II. DIO). I. DIO: ODRICANJE OD ODGOVORNOSTI ZA JAMSTVO. SOFTVER I DRUGE INFORMACIJE ISPORUČUJU VAM SE U STANJU „U KAKVOM JESU“ I SA SVIM POGREŠKAMA. TVRTKA ADOBE I NJEZINI DOBAVLJAČI TE NADLEŽNA TIJELA ZA IZDAVANJE CERTIFIKATA NE DAJU JAMSTVA NA PERFORMANSE ILI REZULTATE KOJE BISTE MOGLI DOBITI KORIŠTENJEM SOFTVERA, USLUGA NADLEŽNIH TIJELA ZA IZDAVANJE CERTIFIKATA ILI PONUDA TREĆE STRANE. OSIM DO MJERE KOJOM SE PREMA MJERODAVNOM PRAVU BILO KOJE JAMSTVO, UVJET, IZJAVA ILI ODREDBA NE MOGU ISKLJUČITI ILI OGRANIČITI, TVRTKA ADOBE I NJEZINI DOBAVLJAČI TE NADLEŽNA TIJELA ZA IZDAVANJE CERTIFIKATA NE DAJU NIKAKVA JAMSTVA, UVJETE, IZJAVE ILI ODREDBE (IZRIČITE ILI IMPLICIRANE, BILO ZAKONOM, OBIČAJNIM PRAVOM, OBIČAJEM, UPOTREBOM ILI DRUGAČIJE) GLEDE BILO KOJEG PITANJA, UKLJUČUJUĆI, BEZ OGRANIČENJA, NEKRŠENJE PRAVA TREĆE STRANE, TRŽIŠNU KURENTNOST, INTEGRACIJU, ZADOVOLJAVAJUĆU KVALITETU ILI PODOBNOST ZA BILO KOJU POJEDINAČNU SVRHU. II. DIO: SPORAZUM O LICENCI ZA SOFTVER. UPOTREBOM, KOPIRANJEM ILI DISTRIBUCIJOM ČITAVOG SOFTVERA TVRTKE ADOBE ILI NEKOG NJEGOVA DIJELA PRIHVAĆATE SVE UVJETE I ODREDBE OVOG SPORAZUMA UKLJUČUJUĆI, POSEBNO, ODREDBE O UPOTREBI SADRŽANE U STAVKU 2, PRENOSIVOSTI U STAVKU 4, POVEZIVANJU I PRIVATNOSTI U STAVKU 6, JAMSTVU U STAVKU 9 TE O ODGOVORNOSTI U STAVCIMA 10 I 16. NAKON PRIHVAĆANJA SPORAZUM OBVEZUJE VAS I SVAKU PRAVNU OSOBU KOJA JE PRIBAVILA SOFTVER I U ČIJE IME SE ON KORISTI. AKO SE NE SLAŽETE S UVJETIMA OVOG SPORAZUMA, NEMOJTE KORISTITI SOFTVER. TVRTKA ADOBE DOPUŠTA VAM UPOTREBU SOFTVERA SAMO U SKLADU S UVJETIMA OVOG SPORAZUMA. UPOTREBA MATERIJALA TREĆIH STRANA KOJI SU SADRŽANI U SOFTVERU MOŽE PODLIJEGATI DRUGIM UVJETIMA I ODREDBAMA KOJI SE OBIČNO NALAZE U ZASEBNOM SPORAZUMU O LICENCI, U TEKSTNOJ DATOTECI POD NAZIVOM „READ ME“ KOJA SE ISPORUČUJE UZ TAKVE MATERIJALE I USLUGE, ODNOSNO U „OBAVIJESTIMA U VEZI SA SOFTVEROM TREĆIH STRANA I/ILI DODATNIM UVJETIMA I ODREDBAMA“ KOJE SE NALAZE NA ADRESI http://www.adobe.com/go/thirdparty_hr. 1. Definicije. „Adobe“ označava Adobe Systems Incorporated, poslovnu organizaciju iz Delawarea, 345 Park Avenue, San Jose, Kalifornija 95110, ako se primjenjuje podstavak 12 (a) ovog sporazuma; u suprotnom označava Adobe Systems Software Ireland Limited, Unit 3100, Lake Drive, City West Campus, Saggart D24, Republika Irska, tvrtku koja je organizirana u skladu sa zakonima Irske te je povezano društvo i nositelj licence društva Adobe Systems Incorporated. „Računalo“ označava virtualni ili fizički osobni elektronički uređaj koji prima informacije u digitalnom ili sličnom obliku i upravlja njima radi dobivanja specifičnog rezultata na osnovi slijeda naredbi. „Softver“ označava (a) sve sadržaje datoteka (isporučenih elektronički ili putem fizičkih medija), odnosno diskova ili drugih medija uz koje se isporučuje ovaj sporazum, koji mogu obuhvaćati (i) računalne informacije ili softver tvrtke Adobe ili trećih strana, uključujući Adobe Reader® („Adobe Reader“), Adobe® AIR™ („Adobe AIR“), Adobe Flash® Player, Shockwave® Player i Authorware® Player (zajednički se Adobe AIR te komponente Flash, Shockwave i Authorware nazivaju „Adobe Runtimes“); (ii) popratne pisane materijale ili datoteke („Dokumentacija“); te (iii) fontove; i (b) nadogradnje, izmijenjene verzije, ažuriranja, dodatke i kopije navedenog

koje u bilo kojem trenutku dobijete od tvrtke Adobe (zajednički: „Ažuriranja“). „Upotreba“ označava pristup, instalaciju, preuzimanje, kopiranje i druge pogodnosti proistekle iz funkcija Softvera. 2. Licenca za Softver. Ako ste Softver dobili od tvrtke Adobe ili nekog od njezinih ovlaštenih nositelja licence te pod uvjetom da poštujete odredbe ovog sporazuma, uključujući ograničenja iz stavka 3, Adobe vam dodjeljuje neekskluzivnu licencu za korištenje Softvera u svrhu i na način opisan u Dokumentaciji, kao što slijedi: 2.1 Općenita upotreba. Smijete instalirati i koristiti jednu kopiju Softvera na svojem kompatibilnom Računalu. Važna ograničenja upotrebe Softvera potražite u stavku 3. 2.2 Korištenje poslužitelja. Ovaj vam sporazum ne dopušta instalaciju ni korištenje softvera na računalnom datotečnom poslužitelju. Informacije o korištenju softvera na računalnim datotečnim poslužiteljima potražite na adresi http://www.adobe.com/go/acrobat_distribute_hr, na kojoj se nalaze informacije o programu Adobe Reader, ili na adresi http://www.adobe.com/go/licensing_hr, na kojoj se nalaze informacije o programima iz skupine Adobe Runtimes. 2.3 Distribucija. Ova vam licenca ne daje pravo na podlicenciranje ili distribuciju Softvera. Informacije o dobivanju prava na distribuciju Softvera na fizičkim medijima ili putem interne mreže ili pak uz vlastiti proizvod ili uslugu potražite na adresi http://www.adobe.com/go/acrobat_distribute_hr, na kojoj se nalaze informacije o programu Adobe Reader, odnosno na adresi http://www.adobe.com/go/licensing_hr, na kojoj se nalaze informacije o programima iz skupine Adobe Runtimes. 2.4 Sigurnosna kopija. Smijete izraditi jednu sigurnosnu kopiju Softvera, pod uvjetom da se ta sigurnosna kopija ne instalira i ne koristi. Ne smijete prenositi prava na sigurnosnu kopiju, osim ukoliko prenesete sva prava na Softver kao što je navedeno u Stavku 4. 3. Obveze i ograničenja. 3.1 Ograničenja korištenja programa iz skupine Adobe Runtime. Nijedan program iz skupine Adobe Runtime ne smijete koristiti na uređajima koji nisu osobna računala niti uz bilo koju ugrađenu verziju bilo kojeg operacijskog sustava ili uz bilo koju verziju operacijskog sustava namijenjenu određenom uređaju. Radi pojašnjenja, i samo kao primjer, ne smijete koristiti programe iz skupine Adobe Runtime na bilo kakvim (a) mobilnim uređajima, dodatnim prijamnicima (set top box - STB) ili dlanovnicima, telefonima, web pad i tablet-računalima, Tablet PC računalima (osim na onima na kojima se može pokrenuti operacijski sustav Windows XP Tablet PC Edition i njegovim nasljednicima), igraćim konzolama, televizorima, DVD reproduktorima, medijskim centrima (osim na onima s operacijskim sustavom Windows XP Media Center Edition i njegovim nasljednicima), elektroničkim oglasnim pločama i drugim sredstvima digitalnog videooglašavanja, internetskim uređajima ili drugim uređajima povezanima s internetom, PDA uređajima, medicinskim uređajima, bankomatima, telematičkim uređajima, automatima za kockanje, kućnim automatizacijskim sustavima, kioscima, uređajima za daljinsko upravljanje, odnosno na bilo kojim elektroničkim uređajima za potrošače, (b) na mobilnim, kabelskim, satelitskim ili televizijskim sustavima, ili (c) na drugim uređajima u sklopu zatvorenih sustava. Informacije o licenciranju programa iz skupine Adobe Runtimes za korištenje na takvim sustavima potražite na adresi http://www.adobe.com/go/licensing_hr. 3.2 Ograničenja korištenja programa Adobe Reader. Tvrtka Adobe licencira i distribuira program Adobe Reader za pregledavanje, distribuciju i zajedničko korištenje PDF datoteka. 3.2.1 Ograničenja pretvorbe. Niste ovlašteni integrirati Adobe Reader ili ga koristiti s bilo kojim drugim softverom, dodatkom ili poboljšanjem koje koristi program Adobe Reader ili se na njega oslanja prilikom pretvorbe ili transformacije PDF datoteka u druge datotečne oblike (npr. pretvorbe PDF datoteke u TIFF, JPEG ili SVG datoteku). 3.2.2 Ograničenja dodataka. Niste ovlašteni integrirati Adobe Reader ili ga koristiti s bilo kojim softverom za dodatke koji nije razvijen u skladu s Adobeovim licencnim ugovorom o integracijskom ključu.

3.2.3 Onemogućene značajke. Adobe Reader može sadržavati značajke ili funkcije koje su skrivene ili se prikazuju onemogućene ili u sivoj boji („Onemogućene značajke“). Onemogućene značajke aktivirat će se samo prilikom otvaranja PDF dokumenta stvorenog pomoću tehnologije omogućivanja koju je moguće dobiti samo od tvrtke Adobe. Ne smijete pristupati niti pokušavati pristupiti bilo kojoj Onemogućenoj značajci na način koji ne obuhvaća navedene tehnologije omogućivanja. Ne smijete na temelju programa Adobe Reader stvarati značajke u bitnom slične bilo kojoj Onemogućenoj značajci ili koje na drugi način zaobilaze tehnologiju koja upravlja aktivacijom bilo koje takve značajke. Dodatne informacije o onemogućenim značajkama potražite na adresi http://www.adobe.com/go/readerextensions_hr. 3.3 Obavijesti. Svaka kopija Softvera koju izradite mora sadržavati iste obavijesti o autorskom pravu i druge obavijesti o vlasništvu koje se nalaze na Softveru ili u njemu. 3.4 Zabranjene izmjene i obrnuti inženjering. Ne smijete mijenjati, prilagođavati ili prevoditi Softver niti izrađivati radove koji se temelje na Softveru. Ne smijete vršiti obrnuti inženjering, dekompilirati, rastavljati ili na drugi način pokušavati otkriti izvorni kôd Softvera osim u mjeri u kojoj vam je prema mjerodavnom pravu izričito dopušteno vršiti obrnuti inženjering ili dekompilirati Softver. 4. Transfer. Ne smijete davati u najam ili leasing, podlicencirati, ustupati ili prenositi svoja prava nad Softverom, odnosno ovlastiti kopiranje čitavog Softvera ili nekog njegova dijela na računalo drugog korisnika, osim na način izričito dopušten ovim sporazumom. Smijete, međutim, prenijeti sva svoja prava na korištenje Softvera na drugu fizičku ili pravnu osobu uz uvjet da na tu drugu fizičku ili pravnu osobu: (a) prenesete i (i) ovaj sporazum, (ii) Softver te sav drugi softver ili hardver koji se isporučuje sa Softverom ili je Softver na njega unaprijed instaliran, uključujući sve kopije, ažuriranja i starije verzije; (b) da ne zadržite nikakve kopije, uključujući sigurnosne kopije i kopije pohranjene na Računalu; te (c) da strana primatelj prihvati odredbe i uvjete ovog sporazuma i bilo koje druge odredbe i uvjete prema kojima ste pribavili valjanu licencu za Softver. Bez obzira na gornje, ne smijete prenositi kopije softvera za obrazovanje, preliminarno izdane kopije ili one koje nisu namijenjene za prodaju. 5. Pravo intelektualnog vlasništva, zadržavanje prava. Softver i sve ovlaštene kopije koje izradite intelektualno su vlasništvo društva Adobe Systems Incorporated i njegovih dobavljača. Struktura, organizacija i kod Softvera su vrijedne trgovinske tajne i povjerljive informacije društva Adobe Systems Incorporated i njegovih dobavljača. Softver je zaštićen zakonom, uključujući, bez ograničenja, zakone o autorskom pravu Sjedinjenih Američkih Država i drugih zemalja, te odredbama međunarodnog ugovora. Osim kako je ovdje izričito navedeno, ovaj sporazum ne daje vam prava intelektualnog vlasništva nad Softverom, te su sva prava koja nisu izričito dodijeljena pridržana od strane Adobe-a i njegovih dobavljača. 6. Povezivanje i privatnost. 6.1 Upotreba PDF datoteka. Kada koristite softver da biste otvorili PDF datoteku za koju je putem registracije pri servisu Ads for Adobe PDF (Oglasi za Adobe PDF) omogućeno prikazivanje oglasa, vaše se računalo može povezati s web-mjestom kojim upravlja tvrtka Adobe, oglašivač ili neka treća strana. Kada se to dogodi, šalje se vaša IP adresa. Strana koja daje prostor na kojem se nalazi web-mjesto može pomoću tehnologije poslati (ili „poslužiti“) oglašivački ili drugi elektronički sadržaj koji se pojavljuje u otvorenoj datoteci ili u njezinoj blizini. Upravitelj webmjesta može koristiti JavaScript, web-orijentire (koji se još nazivaju i akcijske oznake ili jednopikselni gifovi) te druge tehnologije da bi povećao i izmjerio učinkovitost oglasa te oglašivački sadržaj učinio osobnijim. Vaša komunikacija s Adobeovim web-mjestima podliježe Adobeovim pravilima za zaštitu privatnosti na mreži koja se nalaze na adresi http://www.adobe.com/go/privacy_hr. Adobe ne mora imati pristup značajkama koje koristi treća strana niti nadzor nad njima, a informacije i načini rada web-mjesta trećih strana ne podliježu Adobeovim pravilima za zaštitu privatnosti na mreži. 6.2 Ažuriranje. Prihvaćate mogućnost da Softver može izazvati automatsko povezivanje vašeg Računala s Internetom radi traženja ažuriranja dostupnih za automatsko preuzimanje na vaše Računalo i zbog slanja obavijesti

tvrtki Adobe o uspješnoj instalaciji Softvera i slažete se s tom mogućnošću. Kada se to dogodi, tvrtki Adobe šalju se samo neosobne identifikacijske informacije. Vaša komunikacija s Adobeovim web-mjestima podliježe Adobeovim pravilima za zaštitu privatnosti na mreži koja se nalaze na adresi http://www.adobe.com/go/privacy_hr. Informacije o izmjeni zadanih postavki ažuriranja potražite u Dokumentaciji. 6.3 Upravljanje postavkama. Program Flash Player može prouzročiti pohranu određenih korisničkih postavki na vaše Računalo u obliku lokalnog zajedničkog objekta. Te postavke nisu povezane s Vama, ali Vam omogućuju da konfigurirate određene postavke s Flash Playerom. Dodatne informacije o lokalnim zajedničkim objektima potražite na adresi http://www.adobe.com/go/flashplayer_security_hr, a dodatne informacije o značajci upravljanja postavkama na adresi http://www.adobe.com/go/settingsmanager_hr. 7. Ponude trećih strana. Softver vam može dopustiti pristup web-mjestima trećih strana, softverskim aplikacijama i datotečnim servisima, uključujući bogate internetske aplikacije („Ponude trećih strana“), te omogućiti interoperabilnost s tim ponudama. Vaš pristup svim ponudama trećih strana uključujući sva dobra, servise i informacije te njihovo korištenje podliježe uvjetima i odredbama koje vrijede za svaku pojedinu ponudu. Adobe nije vlasnik internetskih stranica trećih strana niti njima upravlja. 8. Digitalni certifikati. 8.1 Upotreba. Adobe AIR koristi digitalne certifikate kako bi vam olakšao identifikaciju izdavača aplikacija Adobe AIR koje su stvorile treće strane. Adobe Reader koristi digitalne certifikate kako bi omogućio potpisivanje i provjeru potpisa unutar PDF dokumenata te provjeru certificiranih PDF dokumenata. U trenutku provjere digitalnog certifikata vaše će se Računalo možda povezati s internetom. Digitalne certifikate izdaju nadležna tijela trećih strana, uključujući partnere iz programa Adobe Certified Document Services (CDS), čiji se popis nalazi na adresi http://www.adobe.com/go/partners_cds_hr („Nadležna tijela za izdavanje certifikata“), a dokumenti mogu biti i samopotpisani. 8.2 Uvjeti i odredbe. Za kupnju i upotrebu digitalnih certifikata te procjenu njihove pouzdanosti odgovorni ste vi i Nadležna tijela za izdavanje certifikata. Prije nego bilo koji certificirani dokument, digitalni potpis ili uslugu Nadležnog tijela za izdavanje certifikata ocijenite pouzdanima, trebali biste proučiti primjenjive uvjete i odredbe pod kojima Nadležno tijelo za izdavanje certifikata pruža usluge, uključujući primjerice sve ugovore o pretplati, ugovore sa stranom koja se oslanja na certifikate, pravila o certifikatima te izjave o načinu poslovanja. Na adresi http://www.adobe.com/go/partners_cds_hr nalaze se veze na web-stranice s informacijama o partnerima iz Adobeova programa CDS. 8.3 Izjava o pristanku. Prihvaćate mogućnost (a) da je digitalni certifikat možda povučen prije trenutka provjere, zbog čega digitalni potpis ili certifikat djeluju valjano, a u stvari to nisu; (b) da su sigurnost ili pravovaljanost digitalnog certifikata možda ugrožene zbog postupka ili omaške potpisnika dokumenta, odgovarajućeg Nadležnog tijela za izdavanje certifikata ili bilo koje treće strane; te (c) da je certifikat možda samopotpisani certifikat koji ne izdaje Nadležno tijelo za izdavanje certifikata. JEDINO STE VI ODGOVORNI ZA ODLUKU O TOME HOĆETE LI CERTIFIKAT SMATRATI POUZDANIM. OSIM AKO OD NADLEŽNOG TIJELA ZA IZDAVANJE CERTIFIKATA NE DOBIJETE PISANO JAMSTVO, DIGITALNI CERTIFIKAT KORISTITE NA VLASTITI RIZIK. 8.4 Korisnici treće strane. Prihvaćate da je Nadležno tijelo za izdavanje certifikata koje smatrate pouzdanim korisnik treća strana ovog sporazuma te da ima pravo provoditi ovaj sporazum u svoje ime kao da je riječ o tvrtki Adobe. 8.5 Obeštećenje. Pristajete štititi Adobe i svako eventualno Nadležno tijelo za izdavanje certifikata (osim ako je u njegovim uvjetima i odredbama izričito navedeno drugačije) od svih odgovornosti, gubitaka, postupaka, šteta ili potraživanja (uključujući sve razumne izdatke, troškove i odvjetničke naknade) koji proizlaze iz bilo kakve usluge takvog nadležnog tijela ili su vezani uz nju, uključujući, bez ograničenja (a) oslanjanje na istekao ili povučeni certifikat; (b) nepravilnu provjeru valjanosti certifikata; (c) upotrebu certifikata na način koji nije dopušten bilo kojim uvjetima i odredbama, ovim sporazumom ili mjerodavnim pravom; (d) neizvršavanje razumne procjene okolnosti pri odluci o pouzdanosti usluga ili certifikata; te (e) neizvršavanje bilo koje obveze definirane u uvjetima i odredbama povezanima s uslugama.

9. Nepostojanje jamstva. Softver vam se isporučuje u stanju „U KAKVOM JEST“ i sa SVIM POGREŠKAMA. TVRTKA ADOBE I NJEZINI DOBAVLJAČI TE NADLEŽNA TIJELA ZA IZDAVANJE CERTIFIKATA NE DAJU JAMSTVA NA PERFORMANSE ILI REZULTATE KOJE BISTE MOGLI DOBITI KORIŠTENJEM SOFTVERA, USLUGA NADLEŽNIH TIJELA ZA IZDAVANJE CERTIFIKATA ILI PONUDA TREĆE STRANE. OSIM DO MJERE KOJOM SE PREMA MJERODAVNOM PRAVU BILO KOJE JAMSTVO, UVJET, IZJAVA ILI ODREDBA NE MOGU ISKLJUČITI ILI OGRANIČITI, TVRTKA ADOBE I NJEZINI DOBAVLJAČI TE NADLEŽNA TIJELA ZA IZDAVANJE CERTIFIKATA NE DAJU NIKAKVA JAMSTVA, UVJETE, IZJAVE ILI ODREDBE (IZRIČITE ILI IMPLICIRANE, BILO ZAKONOM, OBIČAJNIM PRAVOM, OBIČAJEM, UPOTREBOM ILI DRUGAČIJE) GLEDE BILO KOJEG PITANJA, UKLJUČUJUĆI, BEZ OGRANIČENJA, NEKRŠENJE PRAVA TREĆE STRANE, TRŽIŠNU KURENTNOST, INTEGRACIJU, ZADOVOLJAVAJUĆU KVALITETU ILI PODOBNOST ZA BILO KOJU POJEDINAČNU SVRHU. Odredbe stavka 9 i stavka 10 ostat će na snazi i nakon raskida ovog sporazuma, bez obzira na uzrok raskida, ali to neće implicirati niti stvoriti bilo kakav nastavak prava na korištenje Softvera nakon raskida ovog sporazuma. 10. Ograničenje odgovornosti. TVRTKA ADOBE, NJEZINI DOBAVLJAČI ILI NADLEŽNA TIJELA ZA IZDAVANJE CERTIFIKATA NI U KOJEM SLUČAJU NEĆE VAM BITI ODGOVORNI ZA BILO KOJU ŠTETU, POTRAŽIVANJA ILI TROŠKOVE BILO KOJE VRSTE, UKLJUČUJUĆI BILO KOJE POSLJEDIČNE, NEIZRAVNE ILI NEPREDVIĐENE ŠTETE, BILO KAKVU IZGUBLJENU DOBIT ILI GUBITAK UŠTEDE, ČAK I AKO JE PREDSTAVNIK TVRTKE ADOBE BIO OBAVIJEŠTEN O MOGUĆNOSTI TAKVOG GUBITKA, ŠTETE ILI POTRAŽIVANJA. GORNJA OGRANIČENJA I ISKLJUČENJA PRIMJENJUJU SE U MJERI DOPUŠTENOJ VAŽEĆIM ZAKONOM U VAŠOJ SUDSKOJ NADLEŽNOSTI. SVEUKUPNA ODGOVORNOST TVRTKE ADOBE, NJEZINIH DOBAVLJAČA I NADLEŽNIH TIJELA ZA IZDAVANJE CERTIFIKATA PREMA OVOME SPORAZUMU ILI VEZANO UZ NJEGA BIT ĆE OGRANIČENA NA IZNOS PLAĆEN ZA SOFTVER, AKO POSTOJI. Ništa sadržano u ovom sporazumu ne ograničava Adobe-ovu odgovornost prema Vama u slučaju smrti ili osobne ozljede proizišle iz Adobe-ovog nemara ili za nezakonit čin obmane (prevare). Adobe djeluje u ime svojih dobavljača i Nadležnih tijela za izdavanje certifikata u svrhu odricanja od odgovornosti, isključivanja i/ili ograničavanja obveza, jamstava i odgovornosti, kao što je navedeno u ovom sporazumu, ali ni u kojem drugom pogledu i ni u koju drugu svrhu. Dodatne informacije potražite u informacijama koje se odnose na sudsku nadležnost na kraju ovog sporazuma ili se obratite Adobeovu odjelu za podršku kupcima. 11. Pravila izvoza. Prihvaćate da Softver nećete otpremati, prenositi niti izvoziti u bilo koju državu ili ga koristiti na bilo koji način zabranjen Zakonom o izvozu Sjedinjenih Američkih Država ili bilo kojim drugim zakonima, ograničenjima ili propisima o izvozu (zajedničkim nazivom „Zakoni o izvozu“). Osim toga, ako je Softver naveden kao stavka čiji se izvoz kontrolira prema Zakonima o izvozu, izjavljujete i jamčite da niste državljanin države pod embargom niti se na drugi način nalazite na njezinu teritoriju (uključujući, bez ograničenja, Iran, Siriju, Sudan, Libiju, Kubu i Sjevernu Koreju) te da vam primitak Softvera nije zabranjen nekom drugom odredbom Zakonâ o izvozu. Sva prava na korištenje Softvera dodjeljuju se uz uvjet da se ta prava gube ukoliko ne poštujete odredbe ovog sporazuma. 12. Mjerodavno pravo. Na odredbe i uvjete ovog sporazuma, kao i na njihovo tumačenje, primjenjivat će se zakoni koji su na snazi: (a) u američkoj saveznoj državi Kaliforniji, ako licencu za Softver kupujete u Sjedinjenim Američkim Državama, Kanadi ili Meksiku; (b) u Japanu, ako licencu za Softver kupujete u Japanu, Kini, Koreji ili nekoj drugoj državi jugoistočne Azije u kojoj se svi službeni jezici pišu ideografskim pismom (kao što su hanzi, kandži ili handža) i/ili drugim pismom koje se temelji na ideografskom pismu ili mu je strukturno slično, kao što su hangul ili kana; (c) u Engleskoj, ako licencu za Softver kupujete u bilo kojoj jurisdikciji koja nije opisana u prethodnim podstavcima. Isključivu sudsku nadležnost u svim sporovima vezanima uz ovaj sporazum imaju sudovi Okruga Santa Clara u Kaliforniji kada se primjenjuje kalifornijsko pravo, Okružni sud Tokija u Japanu kada se primjenjuje japansko pravo te nadležni sudovi Londona u Engleskoj kada se primjenjuje englesko pravo. Ovaj sporazum neće se rukovoditi

pravilima o sukobu zakona bilo koje sudske nadležnosti ili Konvencijom Ujedinjenih naroda o ugovorima u međunarodnoj prodaji robe, čija je primjena izričito isključena. 13. Opće odredbe. Ako se bilo koji dio ovog sporazuma proglasi nevaljanim i neprovedivim, to neće utjecati na valjanost preostalog dijela sporazuma koji će ostati valjan i provediv u skladu s odredbama sporazuma. Ovaj sporazum neće ići na štetu zakonskih prava bilo koje strane koja je u položaju potrošača. Ovaj sporazum može se izmijeniti samo pisanim putem i uz potpis ovlaštenog predstavnika tvrtke Adobe. Tvrtka Adobe može vam dati licencu za ažuriranja uz dodatne ili drugačije uvjete. Ovo je cjelokupni sporazum između Adobe-a i vas koji se odnosi na Softver i nadilazi sve prethodne izjave, razgovore, preuzete obveze, priopćenja ili reklamiranje vezano uz Softver. 14. Obavijest krajnjim korisnicima iz tijela državne uprave SAD-a. Kada je riječ o krajnjim korisnicima iz tijela državne uprave SAD-a, Adobe pristaje poštovati sve važeće zakone o zaštiti tržišnog natjecanja uključujući, ako su važeće, odredbe Izvršnog naloga 11246 s dopunama, Stavka 402 Zakona za pomoć prilagođavanju veterana iz vijetnamskog perioda donesenog 1974. godine (38 USC 4212) i Stavka 503 Zakona o rehabilitaciji donesenog 1973. godine s dopunama te propisa iz CFR 41, Stavci 60-1 do 60-60, 60-250 te 60-741. Klauzula i propisi o afirmativnom djelovanju sadržani u prethodnoj rečenici smatraju se sastavnim dijelom ovog ugovora. 15. Poštivanje licenci. Ako ste tvrtka ili ustanova, pristajete na zahtjev tvrtke Adobe ili njezinih ovlaštenih predstavnika u roku od trideset (30) dana u potpunosti dokumentirati i potvrditi da je upotreba cjelokupnog Softvera ili njegovih dijelova u trenutku zahtjeva u skladu s valjanim licencama koje ste dobili od tvrtke Adobe. 16. Specifične odredbe i izuzeci. 16.1 Ograničenje odgovornosti za korisnike s boravištem u Njemačkoj ili Austriji. 16.1.1 Ako ste Softver nabavili u Njemačkoj ili Austriji te imate boravište u jednoj od tih zemalja, Stavak 10 se ne primjenjuje. Umjesto toga, ovisno o odredbama u Stavku 16.1.2, zakonska odgovornost tvrtke Adobe za štetu bit će ograničena kako slijedi: (i) tvrtka Adobe je odgovorna samo do iznosa štete kakva je tipično predvidljiva u trenutku sklapanja sporazuma o licenci kada je riječ o štetama prouzročenim neznatno nemarnom povredom materijalne ugovorne obveze i (ii) tvrtka Adobe nije odgovorna za štete prouzročene neznatno nemarnom povredom nematerijalne ugovorne obveze. 16.1.2 Navedeno ograničenje odgovornosti ne odnosi se na bilo koju obveznu zakonsku odgovornost, osobito na odgovornost prema njemačkom Zakonu o odgovornosti za proizvod, na odgovornost za preuzimanje nekog specifičnog jamstva ili na odgovornost za kažnjivo prouzročene osobne ozljede. 16.1.3 Od vas se traži da poduzmete sve razumne mjere da biste izbjegli i smanjili štete, posebno da izradite sigurnosne kopije Softvera i podataka koji se nalaze na vašem računalu na koje se odnose odredbe ovog sporazuma.

Ako imate bilo kakvih pitanja vezanih uz ovaj sporazum ili želite zatražiti bilo kakve informacije od tvrtke Adobe, poslužite se adresom i informacijama za kontakt koje ste dobili uz ovaj proizvod ili se putem interneta (www.adobe.com/hr) obratite uredu tvrtke Adobe koji pruža usluge u vašoj jurisdikciji. Adobe, AIR, Authorware, Flash, Reader i Shockwave registrirani su zaštitni znakovi ili zaštitni znakovi društva Adobe Systems Incorporated u Sjedinjenim Američkim Državama i/ili drugim državama.

Reader_Player_WWEULA-hr_HR-20080204_1313

 

ADOBE SYSTEMS INCORPORATED Prohlášení o vyloučení záruk a licenční smlouva k počítačovému programu. TENTO DOKUMENT OBSAHUJE INFORMACE O ZÁRUKÁCH (ČÁST I) A LICENČNÍ SMLOUVU UPRAVUJÍCÍ POUŽÍVÁNÍ SOFTWARU SPOLEČNOSTI ADOBE (ČÁST II). ČÁST I. PROHLÁŠENÍ O VYLOUČENÍ ZÁRUK TENTO PROGRAM A OSTATNÍ ÚDAJE VÁM JSOU DODÁVÁNY „TAK JAK JSOU“ A SE VŠEMI CHYBAMI. SPOLEČNOST ADOBE, JEJÍ DODAVATELÉ ANI CERTIFIKAČNÍ ÚŘADY NEDÁVAJÍ ZÁRUKU A NEMOHOU RUČIT ZA FUNKČNOST NEBO ZA VÝSLEDKY, KTERÉ ZÍSKÁTE PŘI POUŽÍVÁNÍ TOHOTO PROGRAMU, SLUŽEB CERTIFIKAČNÍCH ÚŘADŮ ČI JINÝCH NABÍDEK TŘETÍCH STRAN. S VÝJIMKOU LIBOVOLNÉ ZÁRUKY, PODMÍNKY NEBO VYJÁDŘENÍ V TAKOVÉM ROZSAHU, V JAKÉM NEMOHOU BÝT VŮLÍ SMLUVNÍCH STRAN OMEZENY NEBO VYLOUČENY PODLE USTANOVENÍ ZÁKONA PLATNÉHO VE VAŠÍ ZEMI, ADOBE A JEJÍ PŘIDRUŽENÉ SPOLEČNOSTI, DODAVATELÉ ANI CERTIFIKAČNÍ ÚŘADY NEPOSKYTUJÍ ŽÁDNÉ ZÁRUČNÍ PODMÍNKY, VYJÁDŘENÍ NEBO USTANOVENÍ (VÝSLOVNĚ VYJÁDŘENÁ NEBO PŘEDPOKLÁDANÁ, AŤ UŽ ZÁKONEM, OBYČEJEM NEBO ZVYKOVÝM PRÁVEM NEBO JAKÝMKOLIV JINÝM ZPŮSOBEM), VE VZTAHU K LIBOVOLNÉ ZÁLEŽITOSTI VČETNĚ, AVŠAK NIKOLI VÝLUČNĚ, NEZASAHOVÁNÍ DO PRÁV TŘETÍ STRANY, PRODEJNOSTI, INTEGROVATELNOSTI, USPOKOJIVÉ KVALITY NEBO VHODNOSTI K URČITÉMU ÚČELU. ČÁST II. LICENČNÍ SMLOUVA K POČÍTAČOVÉMU PROGRAMU POUŽÍVÁNÍM, KOPÍROVÁNÍM NEBO DISTRIBUOVÁNÍM CELÉHO NEBO ČÁSTI PROGRAMU ADOBE PŘIJÍMÁTE PODMÍNKY TÉTO SMLOUVY, ZAHRNUJÍCÍ ZEJMÉNA USTANOVENÍ O: POUŽITÍ OBSAŽENÉM V ČLÁNKU 2; PŘEVODITELNOSTI V ČLÁNKU 4; PŘIPOJENÍ A OCHRANĚ OSOBNÍCH ÚDAJŮ V ČLÁNKU 6; ZÁRUCE V ČLÁNKU 9 A ODPOVĚDNOSTI V ČLÁNCÍCH 10 A 16. PO PŘIJETÍ TĚCHTO PODMÍNEK LZE DODRŽOVÁNÍ TÉTO SMLOUVY NA VÁS I NA KAŽDÉ PRÁVNICKÉ OSOBĚ, KTERÁ TENTO PROGRAM ZÍSKÁ A JEJÍMŽ JMÉNEM JE POUŽIT, PRÁVNĚ VYMÁHAT. POKUD S VÝŠE UVEDENÝM NESOUHLASÍTE, TENTO PROGRAM NEPOUŽÍVEJTE. ADOBE SVOLUJE K POUŽITÍ TOHOTO PROGRAMU POUZE V SOULADU S PODMÍNKAMI TÉTO SMLOUVY. POUŽITÍ MATERIÁLŮ TŘETÍCH STRAN OBSAŽENÝCH V TOMTO PROGRAMU MŮŽE BÝT PŘEDMĚTEM DALŠÍCH PODMÍNEK OBSAŽENÝCH OBVYKLE V SAMOSTATNÝCH LICENČNÍCH PODMÍNKÁCH, V SOUBORU „READ ME“ UMÍSTĚNÉM V BLÍZKOSTI TĚCHTO MATERIÁLŮ NEBO V „OZNÁMENÍCH K PROGRAMŮM TŘETÍCH STRAN A/NEBO DODATEČNÝCH PODMÍNKÁCH“, KTERÉ NALEZNETE NA ADRESE http://www.adobe.com/go/thirdparty_cz. 1. Definice. „Adobe“ znamená, platí-li článek 12 (a) této smlouvy, Adobe Systems Incorporated, společnost zaregistrovanou ve státu Delaware, 345 Park Avenue, San Jose, Kalifornie 95110. V ostatních případech znamená Adobe Systems Software Ireland Limited, Unit 3100, Lake Drive, City West Campus, Saggart D24, Irsko, společnost založenou dle zákonů Irska, která je přidruženou společností a nabyvatelem licencí Adobe Systems Incorporated. „Počítač“ znamená virtuální či fyzické osobní elektronické zařízení, které přijímá informace v digitální nebo podobné formě a nakládá s nimi s cílem dosáhnout určitého výsledku na základě souboru pokynů. „Program“ znamená (a) veškerý obsah souborů (poskytnutý v elektronické podobě nebo na fyzickém nosiči), disků nebo jiných nosičů, se kterými je tato smlouva dodávána, zejména (i) počítačových informací nebo programů Adobe nebo třetích stran, zejména Adobe Reader® („Adobe Reader“), Adobe® AIR™ („Adobe AIR“), Adobe Flash® Player, Shockwave® Player a Authorware® Player (Adobe AIR a přehrávače Flash, Shockwave a Authorware, dále jen společně „Moduly Runtime Adobe“), (ii) souvisejícího vysvětlujícího tištěného materiálu a souborů (dále jen „Dokumentace“) a (iii) písem a (b) upgradů, upravené verze, aktualizace a jejich kopie, které vám poskytuje společnost Adobe (společně

dále jen „Aktualizace“). „Užití“ nebo „Užívání“ znamená přístup, instalaci, stažení, kopírování nebo jiné získávání užitku z používání funkcí Programu. 2. Licence k programu. Pokud jste získali Program od společnosti Adobe nebo jejích oprávněných držitelů licence a dokud budete plnit podmínky této smlouvy včetně omezení uvedených v části 3, uděluje vám Adobe nevýhradní licenci k užití tohoto Programu způsobem a pro účely popsané v Dokumentaci následujícím způsobem. 2.1 Všeobecné podmínky použití. Na svém kompatibilním počítači smíte instalovat a používat jedinou kopii Programu. Důležitá omezení týkající se použití Programu naleznete v části 3. 2.2 Užívání serverů. Tato smlouva vám nedovoluje instalovat ani používat Program na počítači, který je souborovým serverem. Informace o použití Programu v počítači, který je souborovým serverem, naleznete na adrese http://www.adobe.com/go/acrobat_distribute_cz (pro aplikaci Adobe Reader) nebo na adrese http://www.adobe.com/go/licensing_cz (pro Moduly Runtime Adobe). 2.3 Distribuce. Tato licence vám neuděluje právo k sublicencování ani distribuci Programu. Informace ohledně získání práva k distribuci Programu na nosičích nebo prostřednictvím interní sítě, popřípadě společně s vaším produktem či službou naleznete na adrese http://www.adobe.com/go/acrobat_distribute_cz (pro aplikaci Adobe Reader) nebo na adrese http://www.adobe.com/go/licensing_cz (pro Moduly Runtime Adobe). 2.4 Záložní kopie. Za předpokladu, že nebude nainstalována nebo používána, si smíte vytvořit jednu záložní kopii Programu. Práva k záložní kopii se převádět nesmí, pokud současně nebudou nepřevedena všechna práva k Programu, jak je stanoveno v článku 4. 3. Povinnosti a omezení. 3.1 Omezení pro Moduly Runtime Adobe. Žádné moduly Runtime Adobe nesmíte používat na zařízení jiném než počítači ani s jakýmkoli včleněným operačním systémem nebo jeho verzí pro takovéto zařízení. Aby nedošlo k pochybnostem, nesmíte žádný modul Runtime Adobe používat například v (a) mobilních zařízeních, set-top boxech (STB), kapesních počítačích, telefonech, web padech, tabletech a tabletových zařízeních (jiné než s Windows XP Media Center Edition a dalšími verzemi tohoto systému), herních konzolách, televizích, DVD přehrávačích, mediálních centrech (jiných než s Windows XP Media Center Edition a dalšími verzemi tohoto systému), elektronických billboardech či jiných digitálních vývěskách, internetových zařízeních či jiných zařízeních připojených na Internet, zařízeních PDA, zdravotnických zařízeních, bankomatech, telematických zařízeních, herních přístrojích, systémech domácí automatizace, kioscích, zařízeních dálkového ovládání či jakýchkoli jiných zařízeních spotřební elektroniky, (b) mobilních, kabelových, satelitních či televizních systémech provozovaných operátorem nebo (c) jiných zařízeních s uzavřeným systémem. Informace o licencování modulů Runtime Adobe pro použití v těchto systémech naleznete na adrese http://www.adobe.com/go/licensing_cz. 3.2 Omezení pro Adobe Reader. Adobe Reader je licencován a distribuován společností Adobe pro potřeby zobrazování, šíření a sdílení souborů PDF. 3.2.1 Omezení při převádění. Nemáte oprávnění integrovat ani používat Adobe Reader s jiným programem, rozšiřujícím modulem plug-in nebo rozšířením, které používá či využívá Adobe Reader při konverzi nebo transformaci souborů PDF na jiné formáty (např. soubor PDF na soubor TIFF, JPEG nebo SVG). 3.2.2 Omezení pro rozšiřující moduly plug-in. Nemáte oprávnění integrovat ani používat Adobe Reader s jakýmkoli rozšiřujícím modulem plug-in, který nebyl vyvinut v souladu s Licenční smlouvou pro integrační klíč Adobe. 3.2.3 Zakázané funkce. Aplikace Adobe Reader může obsahovat určité vlastnosti či funkce, které jsou skryté nebo jsou zobrazeny jako zakázané či „šedé“ (dále jen „Zakázané funkce“). Tyto Zakázané funkce se aktivují pouze při otevření PDF dokumentu vytvořeného technologií, jež takovou aktivaci umožňuje a která je k dispozici pouze od společnosti Adobe. Spouštění Zakázaných funkcí, popřípadě pokus o jejich spuštění, nesmíte provádět jiným způsobem než pomocí těchto technologií. Nesmíte se ani spoléhat na to, že aplikace Adobe Reader vytvoří funkci,

která je v zásadě shodná se Zakázanou funkcí, nebo jinak obcházet technologii, která řídí aktivaci těchto funkcí. Více informací o Zakázaných funkcích naleznete na adrese http://www.adobe.com/go/readerextensions_cz. 3.3 Oznámení. Všechny kopie Programu, které vytvoříte, musí obsahovat stejná upozornění na autorská práva a ostatní informace o vlastnictví, které jsou uvedeny v tomto Programu. 3.4 Zákaz úprav či zpětné analýzy. Nesmíte modifikovat, upravovat, překládat ani vytvářet odvozené práce na základě Programu. Nejste oprávněni provádět zpětnou analýzu, dekompilovat, rozkládat nebo se jinak snažit zjistit zdrojový kód programu s výjimkou případů, kdy máte podle platného práva výslovné povolení provést dekompilaci či zpětnou analýzu. 4. Převod. Nesmíte pronajmout, prodat, poskytnout další licenci, postoupit nebo převést vaše práva k tomuto Programu nebo povolit zkopírování libovolné části tohoto Programu do Počítače jiného uživatele, vyjma případů výslovně uvedených v této smlouvě. Veškerá práva k používání tohoto Programu však smíte převést na jinou fyzickou nebo právnickou osobu za předpokladu, že: (a) převedete také (i) tuto smlouvu, (ii) sériová čísla Programu a dalšího softwaru nebo hardwaru dodaného v jednom balení nebo předinstalovaného u tohoto Programu, včetně všech kopií, aktualizací a předchozích verzí, (b) si neponecháte žádné kopie, včetně záložních kopií uložených v Počítači a (c) příjemce akceptuje všechny podmínky této smlouvy a všechny další podmínky, na základě kterých byla zakoupena platná licence k Programu. Bez ohledu na výše uvedené není dovoleno převádět výukové nebo zkušební verze nebo verze Programu, které nejsou určené k prodeji. 5. Duševní vlastnictví, vyhrazení práv. Program a všechny povolené kopie, které vytvoříte, jsou duševním vlastnictvím společnosti Adobe Systems Incorporated a jejích dodavatelů. Struktura, organizace a zdrojový kód Programu představují cenné obchodní tajemství a utajované skutečnosti Adobe Systems Incorporated a jejích dodavatelů. Program je chráněn zákony, zejména zákony Spojených států amerických a dalších zemí na ochranu autorských práv a ustanoveními mezinárodních smluv. Není-li zde výslovně uvedeno jinak, na základě této smlouvy vám nevznikají žádná práva duševního vlastnictví na tento Program a veškerá práva, která vám nejsou výslovně udělena, si vyhrazuje společnost Adobe a její dodavatelé. 6. Připojení a ochrana osobních údajů. 6.1 Používání souborů PDF Použijete-li Program k otevření souboru PDF, který umožňuje zobrazení reklam prostřednictvím služby Reklamy pro Adobe PDF, může se váš počítač připojit k webové stránce provozované společností Adobe, inzerentem nebo jinou třetí stranou. V takovém případě bude odeslána vaše adresa IP. Strana hostující daný server může používat technologii pro odesílání (nebo „nabízení“) reklamy či jiného elektronického obsahu, který se zobrazí v otevřeném souboru, případně v jeho blízkosti. Správce webového serveru může dále používat skript JavaScript, funkční odkazy (nazývané též action tags či single-pixel gif) a další technologie pro zvýšení a měření efektivity reklamy a přizpůsobení reklamního obsahu. Vaše komunikace s webovými servery společnosti Adobe se řídí Zásadami ochrany soukromí Adobe Online, které naleznete na adrese http://www.adobe.com/go/privacy_cz. Společnost Adobe nemusí mít přístup ani kontrolu nad funkcemi, které může používat třetí strana, a na strategii ochrany informací na webových serverech této třetí strany se nevztahují Zásady ochrany soukromí Adobe Online. 6.2 Aktualizace. Souhlasíte s tím, že prostřednictvím Programu může dojít k automatickému připojení vašeho počítače k Internetu za účelem kontroly aktualizací, které jsou k dispozici k automatickému stažení do vašeho počítače, a oznámení společnosti Adobe o úspěšné instalaci Programu. V takovém případě budou společnosti Adobe předány pouze informace neosobního charakteru. Vaše komunikace s webovými servery společnosti Adobe se řídí Zásadami ochrany soukromí Adobe Online, které naleznete na adrese http://www.adobe.com/go/privacy_cz. Informace o změně výchozích nastavení pro aktualizaci naleznete v Dokumentaci. 6.3 Manažer nastavení. Aplikace Flash Player může způsobit, že určitá uživatelská nastavení ve vašem Počítači budou uložena jako místní sdílený objekt. Tato nastavení se netýkají vás, ale umožňují vám konfigurovat některá

nastavení v rámci Flash Player. Více informací o místních sdílených objektech najdete na http://www.adobe.com/go/flashplayer_security_cz a více informací o Manažeru nastavení na http://www.adobe.com/go/settingsmanager_cz. 7. Nabídky třetích stran. Program vám může umožnit přístup a komunikaci s webovými servery třetích stran, softwarovými aplikacemi a datovými službami včetně internetových aplikací (dále jen „Nabídky třetích stran“). Přístup a použití libovolné Nabídky třetí strany včetně veškerého zboží, služeb či informací se řídí podmínkami týkajícími se těchto nabídek. Společnost Adobe nevlastní ani neposkytuje Nabídky třetích stran. 8. Digitální certifikáty. 8.1 Použití. Adobe AIR používá digitální certifikáty pro usnadnění identifikace vydavatele aplikací Adobe AIR vytvořených třetími stranami. Aplikace Adobe Reader používá digitální certifikáty za účelem podpisu a jeho ověření v dokumentech PDF a k ověření certifikovaných dokumentů PDF. V průběhu ověřování digitálního certifikátu může dojít k připojení vašeho Počítače k Internetu. Digitální certifikáty jsou vydávány certifikačními úřady třetích stran, včetně prodejců služeb CDS (Certified Document Services) společnosti Adobe uvedených na adrese http://www.adobe.com/go/partners_cds_cz (dále jen „certifikační úřady“), nebo mohou být podepsány sebou samými. 8.2 Podmínky. Za nákup, používání a spoléhání se na digitální certifikáty nesete odpovědnost vy a příslušný certifikační úřad. Dříve než se spolehnete na jakýkoli certifikovaný dokument, digitální podpis nebo služby certifikačních úřadů, pročtěte si platné podmínky, na jejich základě příslušný certifikační úřad poskytuje své služby, včetně například ujednání o předplatném, souhlas smluvních stran, prohlášení o zásadách certifikace a bezpečnosti. Informace o prodejcích služeb CDS společnosti Adobe naleznete v odkazech na adrese http://www.adobe.com/go/partners_cds_cz. 8.3 Potvrzení. Souhlasíte s tím, že (a) digitální certifikát může být před ověřením odvolán, což způsobí, že digitální podpis nebo certifikát se jeví jako platný, i když ve skutečnosti není, (b) k narušení bezpečnosti a integrity digitálního certifikátu může dojít z důvodu nějaké činnosti či opomenutí podepsané osoby tohoto certifikátu, příslušného certifikačního úřadu nebo jiné třetí strany a (c) certifikát může být certifikátem podepsatelným sebou samým, který neposkytuje certifikační úřad. ZA ROZHODOVÁNÍ O SPOLEHLIVOSTI ČI NESPOLEHLIVOSTI DANÉHO CERTIFIKÁTU NESETE VÝHRADNÍ ODPOVĚDNOST VY. POKUD VÁM DANÝ CERTIFIKAČNÍ ÚŘAD NEPOSKYTNE SAMOSTATNOU PÍSEMNOU ZÁRUKU, POUŽÍVÁTE DIGITÁLNÍ CERTIFIKÁTY NA VLASTNÍ RIZIKO. 8.4 Oprávněné třetí strany. Souhlasíte s tím, že všechny certifikační úřady, na něž se spoléháte, jsou třetí oprávněnou stranou této dohody a mají právo uplatnit nároky z této dohody svým jménem tak, jako by šlo o společnost Adobe. 8.5 Odškodnění. Zavazujete se, že odškodníte Adobe a všechny příslušné certifikační úřady (s výjimkou případů výslovně uvedených v jeho podmínkách) za veškeré závazky, ztráty, úkony, škody, případně nároky (včetně důvodných výdajů, nákladů a poplatků právního zastoupení) vyplývající nebo se vztahující na jakékoliv případy využívání (či spolehnutí se) služby tohoto úřadu, zejména (a) spolehnutí se na certifikát, jehož platnost uplynula, případně byla zrušena, (b) nesprávné ověření certifikátu, (c) použití certifikátu, který není povolen příslušnými podmínkami, touto smlouvou nebo příslušným zákonem, (d) nesprávné posouzení okolností při využívání služeb či certifikátů vydavatele nebo (e) nesplnění závazků požadovaných příslušnými podmínkami, které se vztahují k této službě. 9. Žádná záruka. Tento Program je dodáván „TAK JAK JE“ a se VŠEMI CHYBAMI. SPOLEČNOST ADOBE, JEJÍ DODAVATELÉ ANI CERTIFIKAČNÍ ÚŘADY NEDÁVAJÍ ZÁRUKU A NEMOHOU RUČIT ZA FUNKČNOST NEBO ZA VÝSLEDKY, KTERÉ ZÍSKÁTE PŘI POUŽÍVÁNÍ TOHOTO PROGRAMU, SLUŽEB CERTIFIKAČNÍCH ÚŘADŮ ČI JINÝCH NABÍDEK TŘETÍCH STRAN. S VÝJIMKOU LIBOVOLNÉ ZÁRUKY, PODMÍNKY NEBO VYJÁDŘENÍ V TAKOVÉM ROZSAHU, V JAKÉM NEMOHOU BÝT VŮLÍ

SMLUVNÍCH STRAN OMEZENY NEBO VYLOUČENY PODLE USTANOVENÍ ZÁKONA PLATNÉHO VE VAŠÍ ZEMI, ADOBE A JEJÍ PŘIDRUŽENÉ SPOLEČNOSTI, DODAVATELÉ ANI CERTIFIKAČNÍ ÚŘADY NEPOSKYTUJÍ ŽÁDNÉ ZÁRUČNÍ PODMÍNKY, VYJÁDŘENÍ NEBO USTANOVENÍ (VÝSLOVNĚ VYJÁDŘENÁ NEBO PŘEDPOKLÁDANÁ, AŤ UŽ ZÁKONEM, OBYČEJEM NEBO ZVYKOVÝM PRÁVEM NEBO JAKÝMKOLIV JINÝM ZPŮSOBEM), VE VZTAHU K LIBOVOLNÉ ZÁLEŽITOSTI VČETNĚ, AVŠAK NIKOLI VÝLUČNĚ, NEZASAHOVÁNÍ DO PRÁV TŘETÍ STRANY, PRODEJNOSTI, INTEGROVATELNOSTI, USPOKOJIVÉ KVALITY NEBO VHODNOSTI K URČITÉMU ÚČELU. Ustanovení článku 9 a článku 10 zůstávají v platnosti i po ukončení této smlouvy, bez ohledu na důvody, za kterých k němu dojde, avšak nezakládají ani nevytvářejí právo na další použití Programu po ukončení této Smlouvy. 10. Omezení odpovědnosti. ADOBE, JEJÍ DODAVATELÉ ANI CERTIFIKAČNÍ ÚŘADY NEJSOU V ŽÁDNÉM PŘÍPADĚ ZODPOVĚDNI ZA ŽÁDNÉ ŠKODY, ZTRÁTY, NÁKLADY, ANI ZA ŽÁDNÉ VEDLEJŠÍ, NEPŘÍMÉ NEBO NÁHODNÉ ŠKODY NEBO ZA UŠLÝ ZISK NEBO ZTRÁTY ÚSPOR, A TO ANI TEHDY, POKUD BYL ZÁSTUPCE ADOBE NA MOŽNOST VZNIKU TĚCHTO ZTRÁT, ŠKOD NEBO NÁROKŮ UPOZORNĚN. PŘEDCHÁZEJÍCÍ OMEZENÍ A VÝJIMKY PLATÍ V ROZSAHU PŘÍPUSTNÉM PODLE PLATNÉHO PRÁVA VE VAŠÍ ZEMI. CELKOVÁ ODPOVĚDNOST SPOLEČNOSTI ADOBE, JEJÍCH DODAVATELŮ A CERTIFIKAČNÍCH ÚŘADŮ PODLE TÉTO SMLOUVY NEBO VE SPOJENÍ S TOUTO SMLOUVOU JE OMEZENA NA ČÁSTKU ZAPLACENOU ZA TENTO PROGRAM. Žádné ustanovení obsažené v této smlouvě neomezuje odpovědnost společnosti Adobe, ve vztahu k vám, v případě smrti nebo úrazu v důsledku opomenutí Adobe nebo záměrného uvedení v omyl (podvodu). Adobe jedná jménem svých přidružených společností, dodavatelů a certifikačních úřadů za účelem popření, vyloučení a omezení závazků, záruk a odpovědností dle této smlouvy, avšak v žádném dalším ohledu ani za žádným dalším účelem. Další informace jsou k dispozici v rámci specifických zákonných informací na konci této smlouvy, případně je možno se obrátit na oddělení péče o zákazníky Adobe. 11. Pravidla pro vývoz. Souhlasíte s tím, že nebudete tento Program přepravovat, přenášet nebo vyvážet do žádné země nebo používat způsobem zakázaným zákony USA o kontrole vývozu nebo jinými zákony, omezeními či předpisy regulujícími podmínky vývozu (společně jen „Exportní zákony“). Navíc, pokud je podle Exportních zákonů tento Program identifikován jako kontrolovaná položka, prohlašujete tímto a zaručujete se, že nejste občanem nebo nesídlíte v zemi, na kterou se vztahuje embargo nebo jiná omezení (včetně, bez nároku na úplnost, Íránu, Sýrie, Súdánu, Kuby a Severní Koreje), a že v souvislosti s Exportními zákony nemáte zakázáno tento Program přijmout. Všechna práva na používání Programu jsou vám zaručena s tím, že pokud porušíte podmínky této smlouvy, můžete těchto práv pozbýt. 12. Rozhodné právo. Tato smlouva se řídí a byla sestavena v souladu s platným právem: (a) státu Kalifornie, pokud je licence k tomuto Programu získána na území Spojených států, Kanady nebo Mexika nebo (b) Japonska, pokud je licence k tomuto Programu získána na území Japonska, Číny, Koreje, nebo jiné země Jihovýchodní Asie, kde jsou všechny úřední jazyky zapisovány ideografickým písmem (např. hanzi, kanji nebo hanja) a/nebo jiným písmem, které vychází nebo má podobnou strukturu jako ideografické písmo, např. hangul nebo kana nebo (c) Anglie, pokud je licence k tomuto Programu pořízena na území, které patří pod libovolnou jinou jurisdikci, než je uvedeno výše. Příslušné soudy v regionu Santa Clara v Kalifornii, aplikuje-li se právo státu Kalifornie, okresní soud v Tokiu v Japonsku, aplikuje-li se japonské právo, a příslušné soudy v Londýně v Anglii, aplikuje-li se anglické právo, mají nevýlučnou soudní pravomoc ke všem sporům týkajícím se této smlouvy. Tato smlouva se neřídí kolizními normami žádné jurisdikce ani Vídeňskou úmluvou OSN o mezinárodní koupi zboží, jejíž uplatnění se tímto výslovně vylučuje. 13. Všeobecná ustanovení.

Pokud bude kterýkoliv článek této smlouvy shledán bezobsažným a nevynutitelným, platnost zbylých článků smlouvy nebude nijak dotčena a tyto články zůstanou i nadále v platnosti a budou vynutitelné v souladu se svými podmínkami. Zákonná ustanovení o ochraně spotřebitele nejsou touto smlouvou dotčena. Tato smlouva může být změněna pouze písemně a musí být podepsána oprávněným zástupcem Adobe. Licence na aktualizace mohou být společností Adobe poskytovány za dalších nebo odlišných podmínek. Toto je úplné ujednání mezi vámi a Adobe týkající se Programu a nahrazuje všechna předchozí vyjádření, jednání, opatření a reklamní prohlášení týkající se tohoto Programu. 14. Poznámka pro koncové uživatele ze skupiny vládních institucí USA. Pro koncové uživatele ze skupiny vládních institucí USA, Adobe prohlašuje, že dodržuje všechny platné zákony včetně opatření Prováděcího příkazu 11246, v platném znění, oddíl 402 zákona na podporu veteránů vietnamské války z roku 1974 (38 USC 4212) a oddíl 503 zákona proti diskriminaci z roku 1973, v platném znění, a vyhlášky 41 CFR oddíl 60-1 až 60-60, 60-250 a 60-741. Opatření a články týkající se afirmativní akce uvedené v předchozí větě jsou v této smlouvě uvedeny odkazem. 15. Shoda s licencemi. Pokud jste firma, společnost nebo organizace, souhlasíte s tím, že na základě žádosti Adobe nebo jejího oprávněného zástupce předložíte do třiceti (30) dní úplnou dokumentaci a prokážete, že v okamžiku žádosti používáte všechny programy Adobe ve shodě s platnými licencemi Adobe. 16. Specifická ustanovení a výjimky. 16.1 Omezení odpovědnosti pro uživatele sídlící v Německu a Rakousku. 16.1.1 Pokud jste program získali v Německu nebo v Rakousku, kde také převážně přebýváte, neplatí ustanovení článku 10. Namísto toho, podle ustanovení článku 16.1.2, bude zákonná odpovědnost Adobe a jeho přidružených společností omezena následujícím způsobem: (i) Adobe a jeho přidružené společnosti odpovídají za škody pouze do výše rozumně předvídatelné v čase uzavření licenční smlouvy vzhledem ke škodám způsobeným mírným porušením podstatných smluvních povinnosti z nedbalosti a (ii) Adobe a jeho přidružené společnosti neodpovídají za škody způsobené mírným nedbalostním porušením nepodstatných smluvních povinností. 16.1.2 Výše uvedené omezení záruky se nevztahuje na žádnou zákonnou statutární odpovědnost, jako je zejména odpovědnost z německého zákona o záruce na zboží, odpovědnost k zajištění zvláštní záruky nebo odpovědnost za zaviněné škody na zdraví. 16.1.3 Jste povinni přijmout všechna důvodná opatření za účelem zabránění a omezení škod, zvláště pak vytvoření záložní kopie Programu a svých počítačových dat, jež jsou předmětem této smlouvy.

Pokud máte jakékoli dotazy týkající se této smlouvy nebo pokud se chcete dozvědět cokoliv jiného, použijte prosím adresu a kontaktní informace obsažené v tomto produktu nebo na internetové adrese www.adobe.com/cz pro kontaktování kanceláře Adobe, která má na starosti vaší zemi. Adobe, AIR, Authorware, Flash, Reader a Shockwave jsou zapsané ochranné známky nebo chráněné známky Adobe Systems Incorporated ve Spojených státech a/nebo dalších zemích.

Reader_Player_AIR_WWEULA-cs_CZ-20080204_1313

 

ADOBE SYSTEMS INCORPORATED Garantifraskrivelse og softwarelicensaftale. DETTE DOKUMENT INDEHOLDER GARANTI OPLYSNINGER (DEL I) OG EN LICENSAFTALE GÆLDENDE FOR BRUG AF ADOBE SOFTWARE (DEL II). DEL I. GARANTIFRASKRIVELSE. SOFTWAREN OG ANDRE INFORMATIONER LEVERES SOM DE ER OG FOREFINDES, OG MED ALLE FEJL ADOBE ELLER SELSKABETS LEVERANDØRER OG CERTIFIKATUDSTEDENDE MYNDIGHEDER GARANTERER IKKE OG KAN IKKE GARANTERE FOR FUNKTIONALITETEN ELLER DE RESULTATER, DU KAN OPNÅ VED AT BRUGE SOFTWAREN, CERTIFIKATUDSTEDENDE MYNDIGHEDERS TJENESTER ELLER ANDRE TREDJEPARTSTILBUD. BORTSET FRA, OG I DET OMFANG EN GARANTI, BETINGELSE, ELLER ANDET VILKÅR SOM IKKE KAN ELLER IKKE MÅ FRAVIGES ELLER BEGRÆNSES I HENHOLD TIL GÆLDENDE RET I DIT RETSOMRÅDE, FORPLIGTER ADOBE, DETTE SELSKABS LEVERANDØRER OG CERTIFIKATUDSTEDENDE MYNDIGHEDER SIG IKKE TIL AT HONORERE NOGEN GARANTIER, BETINGELSER, ELLER VILKÅR (HVERKEN UDTRYKKELIGE ELLER STILTIENDE, SOM FØLGE AF LOV, SÆDVANERET, RET, SÆDVANE, SKIK ELLER PÅ ANDEN VIS) I HENSEENDE TIL NOGET FORHOLD, HERUNDER BLANDT ANDET MEN UDEN BEGRÆNSNING VEDRØRENDE IKKE-KRÆNKELSE AF TREDJEMANDS RETTIGHEDER, SALGBARHED, INTEGRATION, TILFREDSSTILLENDE KVALITET ELLER EGNETHED TIL ET BESTEMT FORMÅL. DEL II. SOFTWARELICENSAFTALE. VED AT BENYTTE, KOPIERE ELLER DISTRIBUERE HELE ELLER DELE AF ADOBE SOFTWAREN ACCEPTERER DU ALLE AFTALENS VILKÅR OG BETINGELSER, HERUNDER I SÆRDELESHED BESTEMMELSERNE OM: BRUGEN SOM BESKREVET I AFSNIT 2; OVERDRAGELIGHED SOM BESKREVET I AFSNIT 4; KONNEKTIVITET OG PRIVATLIV SOM BESKREVET I AFSNIT 6; GARANTI SOM BESKREVET I AFSNIT 9; ANSVAR SOM BESKREVET I AFSNIT 10 OG 16. SPECIFIKKE BESTEMMELSER OG UNDTAGELSER SOM BESKREVET I AFSNIT 16. DU ACCEPTERER, AT DENNE AFTALE HAR RETSKRAFT OVER FOR DIG OG ENHVER ENHED, SOM HAR ERHVERVET SOFTWAREN, OG PÅ HVIS VEGNE DEN BENYTTES.. HVIS DU IKKE ER INDFORSTÅET, MÅ DU IKKE BENYTTE SOFTWAREN. ADOBE TILLADER DIG UDELUKKENDE AT BRUGE SOFTWAREN I OVERENSSTEMMELSE MED VILKÅRENE I DENNE AFTALE BRUG AF VISSE MATERIALER FRA TREDJEPART, DER FØLGER MED SOFTWAREN, KAN VÆRE UNDERLAGT ANDRE VILKÅR OG BETINGELSER, DER NORMALT FINDES I EN SÆRSKILT LICENSAFTALE, EN ”READ ME”-FIL I DET PÅGÆLDENDE MATERIALE ELLER I ”THIRD PARTY SOFTWARE NOTICES AND/OR ADDITIONAL TERMS AND CONDITIONS” PÅ http://www.adobe.com/go/thirdparty_dk. 1. Definitioner. ”Adobe” betyder Adobe Systems Incorporated, et selskab registreret i staten Delaware, 345 Park Avenue, San Jose, California 95110, såfremt denne aftale er reguleret af underafsnit 12 (a). I alle andre tilfælde betyder det Adobe Systems Software Ireland Limited, Unit 3100, Lake Drive, City West Campus, Saggart D24, Irland, et selskab, der er oprettet i henhold til irsk ret og et affilieret selskab til og licenstager fra Adobe Systems Incorporated. ”Computer” betyder en virtuel eller fysisk personlig elektronisk enhed, der accepterer oplysninger i digital eller lignende form, og som kan manipulere sådanne oplysninger med henblik på at opnå et bestemt resultat baseret på en sekvens af instruktioner. ”Software” betyder (a) det fulde indhold af filerne (som leveres enten via elektronisk overførsel eller på et fysisk medie) eller andre medier omfattet af denne aftale (i) computerinformation eller software fra Adobe eller andre firmaer, herunder Adobe Reader® (”Adobe Reader”), Adobe® AIR™ (”Adobe AIR”), Adobe Flash® Player, Shockwave® Player og Authorware® Player (samlet benævnt, Adobe AIR og Flash,

Shockwave og Authorware-afspillere er ”Adobe Runtimes”); (ii) tilhørende skriftligt materiale eller filer (”Dokumentation”) samt (iii) skrifttyper og (b) opgraderinger, ændrede versioner, opdateringer, tilføjelser og kopier af foranstående, leveret til dig af Adobe på et hvilket som helst tidspunkt (herefter samlet benævnt ”Opdateringer”). ”Brug” betyder at have adgang til, installere, hente fra Internettet, kopiere eller på anden vis have fordel af at bruge funktionaliteten i Softwaren. 2. Softwarelicens. Under forudsætning af, at du har erhvervet softwaren fra Adobe eller en af Adobes autoriserede licenshavere, og at du overholder betingelserne i denne aftale, herunder også begrænsningerne i afsnit 3, meddeler Adobe dig en ikkeeksklusiv licens til at bruge Softwaren til de formål, der er beskrevet i Dokumentationen som følger. 2.1 Generel brug. Du er berettiget til at installere og bruge en kopi af Softwaren på din kompatible Computere. Se begrænsningerne i afsnit 3 vedrørende brugen af softwaren. 2.2 Serverbrug. Denne aftale tillader dig ikke at installere eller bruge softwaren på en filserver. For information om brug på en filserver, venligst se http://www.adobe.com/go/acrobat_distribute_dk for information om Adobe Reader; eller http://www.adobe.com/go/licensing_dk for information om Adobe Runtimes. 2.3 Distribution. Denne licens giver dig ikke ret viderelicensere eller distribuere Softwaren. Venligst se for information om at erhverve retten til at distribuere Softwaren på et fysisk medie eller over et internt netværk eller sammen med dit produkt eller service http://www.adobe.com/go/acrobat_distribute_dk for information om Adobe Reader eller http://www.adobe.com/go/licensing_dk for information om Adobe Runtimes. 2.4 Sikkerhedskopi. Du er berettiget til at lave en sikkerhedskopi af Softwaren, forudsat at din sikkerhedskopi ikke installeres eller anvendes. Du er ikke berettiget til at overdrage rettighederne til en sikkerhedskopi, med mindre du overdrager alle rettigheder til Softwaren som beskrevet i afsnit 4. 3. Forpligtelser og begrænsninger. 3.1 Begrænsninger vedrørende Adobe Runtime. Du må ikke bruge en Adobe Runtime på en anden enhed end en personlig computer eller med en integreret eller enhedsversion af et operativsystem. Du må for eksempel ikke bruge en Adobe Runtime på en (a) mobil enhed, STB-boks (set top box), håndholdt enhed, telefon, web pad, tablet og Tablet PC, der ikke kører Windows XP Tablet PC Edition og senere versioner, spilkonsol, tv, dvd-afspiller, mediecenter (dog ikke Windows XP Media Center Edition og senere versioner), elektronisk opslagstavle eller andre former for digitale skilte, internetudstyr eller andet udstyr med internetadgang, PDA, medicinsk udstyr, betalingsautomat, telematisk udstyr, spilmaskine, system til automatisering af hjemmet, kiosk, fjernbetjeningsenhed eller anden elektronisk enhed, (b) operatørbaseret mobiltelefon, kabel, satellit eller tv-system eller (c) en anden enhed i et lukket system. For information om licens til Adobe Runtimes til brug på sådanne systemer, besøg http://www.adobe.com/go/licensing_dk. 3.2 Begrænsninger vedrørende Adobe Reader. Adobe Reader gives i licens og distribueres af Adobe med henblik på visning, distribution og deling af PDF-filer. 3.2.1 Begrænsninger vedrørende konvertering. Du må ikke integrere Adobe Reader i eller bruge Adobe Reader sammen med anden software, plug-in eller forbedring, der bruger eller bygger på Adobe Reader, når pdf-filer konverteres eller omdannes til et andet filformat (f.eks. fra en pdf-fil til en tiff-, jpeg- eller svg-fil). 3.2.2 Begrænsninger vedrørende plug-in. Du må ikke integrere Adobe Reader i eller bruge Adobe Reader sammen med plug-in-software, der ikke er udviklet i overensstemmelse med Adobe Integration Key License Agreement. 3.2.3 Deaktiverede faciliteter. Adobe Reader kan indeholde faciliteter eller funktioner, som er skjult eller vises deaktiveret eller ”nedtonet” (den ”deaktiverede facilitet”). Deaktiverede faciliteter aktiveres kun ved åbning af et pdf-dokument, der er oprettet ved hjælp af aktiveringsteknologi, der kun fås fra Adobe. Du vil ikke tilgå eller forsøge at tilgå nogen deaktiveret facilitet på andre måder end ved brug af sådanne aktiveringsteknologier. Venligst se http://www.adobe.com/go/readerextensions_dk for flere oplysninger om deaktiverede faciliteter.

3.3 Oplysninger. Enhver kopi af Softwaren, som du fremstiller, skal indeholde de samme meddelelser om ophavsret og ejendomsret, som fremgår af eller i Softwaren. 3.4 Ingen ændring eller reverse engineering. Du må ikke ændre, tilpasse, oversætte eller skabe afledte værker på baggrund af Softwaren. Du må ikke foretage reverse engineering, dekompilering, og du må ikke adskille eller på anden vis forsøge at afsløre Softwarens kildekode, undtaget i det omfang du i henhold til gældende lov udtrykkeligt er berettiget til at foretage reverse engineering og at dekompilere. 4. Ingen Overdragelse. Du er ikke berettiget til at udleje, lease, viderelicensere, tildele eller overdrage dine rettigheder til Softwaren eller bemyndige kopiering af hele eller dele af Softwaren til en anden brugers Computer undtagen i det omfang, det måtte være udtrykkeligt tilladt i denne Aftale. Du er dog berettiget til at overdrage alle dine rettigheder til brug af Softwaren til en anden person eller juridisk enhed under forudsætning af, at: (a) du også overdrager (i) denne aftale og (ii) Softwaren og al anden software eller hardware bundlet eller præinstalleret med Softwaren, herunder alle kopier, opdateringer og tidligere versioner, til en sådan person eller juridisk enhed; (b) du ikke beholder kopier, herunder sikkerhedskopier og kopier lagret på en Computer; og (c) modtageren accepterer denne aftales vilkår og betingelser og alle øvrige vilkår og betingelser, som var gældende for din lovformelige erhvervelse af en licens til Softwaren. Desuagtet det foranstående er du uberettiget til at overdrage uddannelseskopier, ”pre-release”- og ”not for resale”-kopier af Softwaren. 5. Ejendomsretten til immaterielle rettigheder, forbehold for rettigheder. Softwaren og alle autoriserede kopier heraf, som du fremstiller, er immateriel ejendom tilhørende Adobe Systems Incorporated og selskabets leverandører. Softwarens struktur, opbygning og kode er værdifulde forretningshemmeligheder og fortrolige oplysninger, der tilhører Adobe Systems Incorporated og selskabets leverandører. Softwaren er beskyttet af lov, herunder bl.a. den i USA og andre lande gældende lovgivning om ophavsret samt internationale konventionsbestemmelser. Medmindre det er udtrykkeligt angivet heri, giver denne aftale dig ingen immaterielle rettigheder til Softwaren, og alle rettigheder, der ikke udtrykkeligt tildeles, er forbeholdt Adobe og dets leverandører. 6. Konnektivitet og privatliv. 6.1 Brug af PDF filer. Når du ved hjælp af Softwaren åbner et PDF-dokument, der er blevet aktiveret til at vise annoncer gennem registrering hos Ads for Adobe PDF servicen, så kan din computer oprette forbindelse til en hjemmeside drevet af Adobe, en annoncør eller anden tredjepart. Når dette sker, så sendes din Internet Protocol (IP) adresse. Den part som hoster siden kan benytte teknologi til at sende (eller “serve”) annoncering eller andet elektronisk indhold. De der driver hjemmesiden kan også benytte JavaScript, web beacons (også kendt som action tags eller single-pixel gift) og andre teknologier for at fremme og måle effektiviteten af annoncer og for at målrette annonceindhold. Din kommunikation med Adobe hjemmesider er underlagt Adobe Online Privacy Policy, der kan findes på http://www.adobe.com/go/privacy_dk. Adobe har hverken adgang til eller kontrol med de faciliteter, som tredjepart måtte bruge, og tredjeparts hjemmesiders praksis med henblik på informationsbrug er ikke omfattet af Adobe Online Privacy Policy. 6.2 Opdatering. Du anerkender og er indforstået med, at Softwaren kan få din computer til automatisk at koble sig på Internettet for at kontrollere for opdateringer, som er tilgængelige til automatisk download til din Computer og give Adobe besked om at installationen af Softwaren er vellykket. Kun ikke personhenførbare oplysninger vil i disse tilfælde blive sendt til Adobe. Din kommunikation med Adobe hjemmesider er underlagt Adobe Online Privacy Policy, der kan findes på http://www.adobe.com/go/privacy_dk. Se venligst Dokumentation for oplysninger om standard indstillinger for opdatering. 6.3 Settings Manager. Flash Player kan bevirke at visse brugerindstillinger gemmes som et lokalt delt objekt på din Computer. Disse indstillinger er ikke knyttet til dig, men giver dig mulighed for at konfigurere bestemte indstillinger i Flash Player. Du kan finde flere oplysninger om lokale, delte objekter på

http://www.adobe.com/go/flashplayer_security_dk og flere oplysninger om Settings Manager på http://www.adobe.com/go/settingsmanager_dk. 7. Tredjepartstilbud. Softwaren kan give dig adgang til tredjeparts websteder, software programmer og datatjenester, inklusiv ”rich Internet applications” (”Tredjepartstilbud”). Du får adgang til og mulighed for at anvende Tredjepartstilbud, inkl. varer, tjenester eller information, er underlagt de vilkår og betingelser der gælder for sådanne tilbud. Tredjepartstilbud ejes ikke og leveres ikke af Adobe. 8. Digitale certifikater. 8.1 Brug. Adobe AIR bruger digitale certifikater for at hjælpe dig med at identificere udgivere af Adobe AIR applikationer skabt af tredjeparter. Adobe Reader anvender digitale certifikater til at signere og validere signaturer i PDF-dokumenter og at validere certificerede PDF-dokumenter. Din Computer kan koble sig på Internettet ved validering af et digitalt certifikat. Digitale certifikater udstedes af tredjemands certifikatudstedende myndigheder, herunder Adobe Certified Document Services (CDS) udbydere som er opført på http://www.adobe.com/go/partners_cds_dk (”certifikatudstedende myndigheder”) eller de kan være egen signeret. 8.2 Vilkår og betingelser. Ansvaret for køb af, brug af og tillid til digitale certifikater ligger hos dig og en certifikatudstedende myndighed. Inden du stoler på noget certificeret dokument, bør du gennemgå alle gældende vilkår og betingelser under hvilken det relevante certifikat udstedende myndighed leverer tjenester, inklusive eksempelvis abonnementsaftaler, aftaler med den part, der skal have tillid, regler og praksis for certifikater. Besøg http://www.adobe.com/go/partners_cds_dk for oplysninger om Adobes CDS forhandlere. 8.3 Anerkendelse. Du er indforstået med at (a) et digital certifikat kan muligvis være tilbagekaldt på verificeringstidspunktet, hvilket betyder, at en digital signatur eller et certifikat kan fremstå som gyldigt, selvom det i virkeligheden ikke er det, (b) en digitalt signaturs sikkerhed eller integritet er muligvis kompromitteret på grund af handlinger eller udeladelser fra den, der har signeret dokumentet, den pågældende certifikat udstedende myndighed anden tredjepart og (c) et certifikat kan være egen signeret og ikke udstedt af et certifikat udstedende myndighed. DU ER ALENE ANSVARLIG FOR AT AFGØRE OM DU VIL STOLE PÅ ET CERTIFIKAT ELLER EJ. Medmindre en separat skriftlig garanti er udstedt af en certifikatudstedende myndighed, så bruger du digitale certifikater på egen risiko. 8.4 Tredjepartbegunstigede. Du er indforstået med at enhver certifikatudstedende myndighed som du stoler på er en tredjepartbegunstiget i forhold til denne aftale og vil være berettiget til at håndhæve denne aftale i eget navn som værende Adobe. 8.5 Skadesløsholdelse. Du er indforstået med at holde Adobe og ethvert relevant certifikatudstedende myndighed (medmindre andet er udtrykkeligt angivet i vilkår og betingelser) skadesløs, hvad angår ethvert form for ansvar, tab, retshandlinger, erstatninger eller krav (herunder alle rimelige udgifter, omkostninger og advokatsalærer), som måtte opstå i forbindelse med brugen af eller tilliden til enhver sådan myndighed, herunder, men ikke begrænset til (a) tillid til et udløbet eller tilbagekaldt certifikat; (b) urigtig verificering af et certifikat; (c) brug af et certifikat på måder, der ikke er tilladt under gældende vilkår og betingelser, denne Aftale eller gældende lov; (d) brug af et certifikat på måder, der ikke er tilladt i henhold til den relevante Udstedererklæring, denne Aftale eller gældende lov; (d) undladelse af at udvise rimelig dømmekraft i situationer, hvor der stoles på udstedende tjeneste eller certifikater eller (e) undladelse af at gennemføre nogen af forpligtelserne som er påkrævet i henhold til vilkår og betingelser for tjenesterne. 9. Ingen garanti. Softwaren leveres som den er og forefindes, og med alle fejl. ADOBE ELLER SELSKABETS LEVERANDØRER OG CERTIFIKATUDSTEDENDE MYNDIGHEDER GARANTERER IKKE OG KAN IKKE GARANTERE FOR FUNKTIONALITETEN ELLER DE RESULTATER, DU KAN OPNÅ VED AT BRUGE SOFTWAREN, CERTIFIKATUDSTEDENDE MYNDIGHEDERS TJENESTER ELLER ANDRE TREDJEPARTSTILBUD. BORTSET FRA, OG I DET OMFANG EN GARANTI, BETINGELSE, ELLER ANDET VILKÅR SOM IKKE

KAN ELLER IKKE MÅ FRAVIGES ELLER BEGRÆNSES I HENHOLD TIL GÆLDENDE RET I DIT RETSOMRÅDE, FORPLIGTER ADOBE, DETTE SELSKABS LEVERANDØRER OG CERTIFIKATUDSTEDENDE MYNDIGHEDER SIG IKKE TIL AT HONORERE NOGEN GARANTIER, BETINGELSER, ELLER VILKÅR (HVERKEN UDTRYKKELIGE ELLER STILTIENDE, SOM FØLGE AF LOV, SÆDVANERET, RET, SÆDVANE, SKIK ELLER PÅ ANDEN VIS) I HENSEENDE TIL NOGET FORHOLD, HERUNDER BLANDT ANDET MEN UDEN BEGRÆNSNING VEDRØRENDE IKKEKRÆNKELSE AF TREDJEMANDS RETTIGHEDER, SALGBARHED, INTEGRATION, TILFREDSSTILLENDE KVALITET ELLER EGNETHED TIL ET BESTEMT FORMÅL. Bestemmelserne i afsnit 9 og 10 vil fortsat være gældende efter aftalens ophør uanset årsag. Dette indebærer dog ikke en fortsat ret til at bruge Softwaren efter denne aftales ophør. 10. Ansvarsbegrænsning. I INTET TILFÆLDE ER ADOBE, SELSKABETS LEVERANDØRER ELLER CERTIFIKATUDSTEDENDE MYNDIGHEDER ERSTATNINGSANSVARLIGE OVER FOR DIG FOR SKADER, KRAV, TAB ELLER OMKOSTNINGER UANSET DISSES ART ELLER DRIFTSTAB, INDIREKTE TAB ELLER FØLGETAB, OG UANSET OM EN ADOBE-REPRÆSENTANT MÅTTE VÆRE BLEVET UNDERRETTET OM MULIGHEDEN FOR SÅDANNE TAB, SKADER ELLER KRAV. OVENSTÅENDE BEGRÆNSNINGER OG FRASKRIVELSER FINDER ANVENDELSE I DET OMFANG, GÆLDENDE RET I DIT RETSOMRÅDE TILLADER DET. DEN SAMLEDE HÆFTELSE FOR ADOBE, LEVERANDØRER OG CERTIFIKATUDSTEDENDE MYNDIGHEDER I MEDFØR AF ELLER I FORBINDELSE MED DENNE AFTALE, UANSET OM DET DREJER SIG OM KONTRAKTMÆSSIGT ERSTATNINGSANSVAR ELLER ERSTATNINGSRETLIGT ANSVAR UDEN FOR KONTRAKT (I BEGGE TILFÆLDE OMFATTENDE UDEN BEGRÆNSNING UAGTSOMHED) ELLER PÅ ANDEN VIS, ER BEGRÆNSET TIL DET BELØB, SOM MÅTTE VÆRE BETALT FOR SOFTWAREN. Intet i denne aftale begrænser Adobes ansvar over for dig i tilfælde af død eller personskade som følge af Adobes uagtsomhed eller svig. Adobe optræder på vegne af sine leverandører og certifikatudstedende myndigheder i henseende til fraskrivelse, udelukkelse og/eller begrænsning af forpligtelser, garantier og ansvar som anført i denne aftale, men ikke i andre henseender eller for noget andet formål. Yderligere oplysninger kan eventuelt findes i afsnittet med oplysninger om dit retsområde sidst i denne aftale eller kan fås ved henvendelse til Adobes Customer Support Department. 11. Eksportregler. Du accepterer, at Softwaren ikke bliver sendt, overført eller eksporteret til noget land eller på nogen måde brugt på en måde, som er forbudt af United States Export Administration Act eller anden eksportlovgivning, restriktioner eller regulativer (samlet kaldet ”Eksportlovgivningen”). Såfremt Softwaren betragtes som hørende ind under eksportregulerede emner i medfør af Eksportlovgivningen, erklærer og garanterer du desuden, at du ikke er statsborger eller på anden måde bosiddende i et land omfattet af eksportforbud (herunder uden begrænsning Iran, Syrien, Sudan, Cuba og Nordkorea) og at det ikke er dig i medfør af Eksportlovgivning på anden vis forbudt at modtage Softwaren. Alle rettigheder til brug af Softwaren gives på betingelse af, at sådanne rettigheder fortabes, såfremt du undlader at efterleve denne aftales vilkår. 12. Lovvalg. Denne aftale er underlagt og skal fortolkes i henhold til gældende ret: (a) i Staten Californien, hvis en licens til Softwaren anskaffes, mens du opholder dig i USA, Canada eller Mexico; eller (b) i Japan, hvis en licens til Softwaren anskaffes, mens du opholder dig i Japan, Kina, Korea, Folkerepubliken Kina eller et andet land i Sydøstasien, hvor alle officielle sprog skrives med enten ideografisk skrift (f.eks. hanzi, kanji eller hanja), og/eller anden skrift baseret på eller med samme struktur som ideografisk skrift som f.eks. hangul eller kana; eller (c) England, hvis en licens til Softwaren anskaffes, mens du opholder dig i et andet retsområde, der ikke er beskrevet ovenfor. Domstolene i henholdsvis Santa Clara County, Californien, såfremt Aftalen er underlagt californisk ret, Tokyo District Court i Japan, såfremt Aftalen er underlagt japansk ret, og domstolene i London, England, såfremt Aftalen er underlagt engelsk ret, skal hver have ikke-eksklusiv jurisdiktion i henseende til alle tvister vedrørende denne aftale. Nærværende aftale er hverken underlagt lovvalgsregler for noget retsområde eller de Forenende

Nationers konvention om aftaler om internationale køb (CISG), hvis anvendelse udtrykkeligt er udelukket ved nærværende aftale. 13. Generelle bestemmelser. Hvis nogen del af denne aftale erklæres ugyldig eller ikke kan håndhæves, har det ingen indflydelse på gyldigheden af denne aftales status, som forbliver gyldig og kan håndhæves i henhold til dens vilkår. Denne aftale skal være uden præjudice i forhold til sådanne lovbestemte rettigheder, som en part, der handler som forbruger, måtte have. Denne aftale kan alene ændres ved skriftlig aftale underskrevet af en af Adobe dertil bemyndiget repræsentant. Du kan få Opdateringer givet i licens fra Adobe med yderligere eller ændrede vilkår. Denne Aftale udgør den samlede aftale mellem Adobe og dig i henseende til Softwaren, og den træder i stedet for enhver tidligere tilkendegivelse, diskussion, løfte, meddelelse eller annoncering vedrørende Softwaren. 14. Bemærkninger til slutbrugere i den amerikanske forvaltning. For så vidt angår slutbrugere i den amerikanske forvaltning, forpligter Adobe sig til at overholde alle love om ligeret, i det omfang disse måtte være relevante, herunder, bestemmelserne i Executive Order 11246, med senere ændringer, paragraf 402 i loven ”Vietnam Era Veterans Readjustment Assistance Act” fra 1974 (38 USC 4212), og paragraf 503 i loven ”Rehabilitation Act” fra 1973, med senere ændringer, og reglerne i 41 CFR Parts 60-1 til 60-60, 60-250, og 60-741. Reglen om positiv særbehandling og bestemmelserne i foregående afsnit skal ved henvisning dertil udgøre en del af denne aftale. 15. Overholdelse af licensvilkår. Hvis du er en virksomhed eller en organisation, accepterer du hermed, at du på anmodning fra Adobe eller fra en af Adobe bemyndiget repræsentant inden for tredive (30) dage vil dokumentere og bekræfte, at brugen af alt Software på tidspunktet for henvendelsen er i overensstemmelse med dine gyldige licenser fra Adobe. 16. Specifikke bestemmelser og undtagelser. 16.1 Ansvarsbegrænsning for brugere bosiddende i Tyskland eller Østrig. 16.1.1 Hvis du har anskaffet Softwaren i Tyskland eller Østrig, og du normalt er bosiddende i disse lande, gælder afsnit 10 ikke for dig. Under hensyntagen til bestemmelserne i afsnit 16.1.2 er Adobes lovmæssige erstatningsansvar i stedet begrænset, som følger: (i) For så vidt angår erstatningskrav opstået på grund af et mindre uagtsomt brud på en væsentlig kontraktforpligtelse er Adobe udelukkende ansvarlig over for dig op til det erstatningsbeløb, der typisk kan forudsiges på tidspunktet for licensaftalens indgåelse, og (ii) Adobe er ikke ansvarlig for erstatningskrav opstået på grund af et mindre uagtsomt brud på en ikke-væsentlig kontraktforpligtelse. 16.1.2 Ovennævnte ansvarsbegrænsning gælder ikke obligatoriske, lovbestemte ansvar, herunder særligt ikke ansvar under tysk lov om produktansvar, ansvar i forbindelse med indeståelsen for en specifik garanti eller ansvar for uagtsomme påførte personskader. 16.1.3 Du skal træffe alle rimelige forholdsregler for at undgå og begrænse skader. Særligt skal du sørge for at foretage sikkerhedskopiering af software og data på den Computer, der er genstand for bestemmelserne i denne aftale.

Såfremt du har spørgsmål vedrørende denne aftale, eller du ønsker yderligere oplysninger fra Adobe, beder vi dig bruge den adresse og de kontaktoplysninger, der følger med dette produkt, når du kontakter det Adobe-kontor, der betjener dit retsområde. Du kan også kontakte Adobe over Internettet på www.adobe.com/dk. Adobe, AIR, Authorware, Flash, Reader og Shockwave er enten registrerede varemærker eller varemærker, der tilhører Adobe Systems Incorporated i USA og/eller andre lande.

Reader_Player_AIR_WWEULA-da_DK-20080204_1313

 

ADOBE SYSTEMS INCORPORATED Afwijzing van garantie en overeenkomst van de softwarelicentie. DIT DOCUMENT BEVAT GARANTIEGEGEVENS (DEEL I) EN EEN LICENTIEOVEREENKOMST WAARIN HET GEBRUIK VAN ADOBE SOFTWARE IS VASTGELEGD (DEEL II). DEEL I. AFWIJZING VAN GARANTIE. DE SOFTWARE EN DE OVERIGE INFORMATIE WORDEN AAN U VERSTREKT IN DE STAAT WAARIN DEZE ZICH BEVINDEN (“AS IS”) EN MET ALLE FOUTEN. ADOBE EN HAAR LEVERANCIERS EN CERTIFICERENDE INSTANTIES KUNNEN EN ZULLEN NIET DE PRESTATIES OF RESULTATEN GARANDEREN DIE U MOGELIJK VERKRIJGT DOOR DE SOFTWARE, DIENSTEN VAN CERTIFICERENDE INSTANTIES OF AANBIEDINGEN VAN DERDEN TE GEBRUIKEN. BEHOUDENS VOOR ZOVER GARANTIES, BEPALINGEN, VERKLARINGEN OF VOORWAARDEN NIET KUNNEN WORDEN UITGESLOTEN OF BEPERKT ONDER HET OP U VAN TOEPASSING ZIJNDE RECHT IN HET RECHTSGEBIED WAAR U BENT GEVESTIGD, VERLENEN ADOBE EN HAAR LEVERANCIERS EN CERTIFICERENDE INSTANTIES GEEN ENKELE GARANTIE, VOORWAARDE, VERKLARING OF BEPALING (UITDRUKKELIJK OF IMPLICIET, BIJ OF KRACHTENS DE WET, GEWOONTE OF ANDERSZINS), DAARONDER BEGREPEN DOCH NIET BEPERKT TOT GARANTIES DAT GEEN INBREUK WORDT GEMAAKT OP RECHTEN VAN DERDEN, OF GARANTIES MET BETREKKING TOT VERHANDELBAARHEID, INTEGRATIE, KWALITEIT OF GESCHIKTHEID VOOR EEN SPECIFIEK DOEL. DEEL II. LICENTIEOVEREENKOMST VOOR SOFTWARE. DOOR DE SOFTWARE OF EEN DEEL VAN DE ADOBE SOFTWARE TE GEBRUIKEN, TE KOPIËREN OF TE DISTRIBUEREN, STEMT U IN MET ALLE VOORWAARDEN EN BEPALINGEN VAN DEZE OVEREENKOMST, DAARONDER MET NAME INBEGREPEN DE BEPALINGEN INZAKE: GEBRUIK ZOALS BESCHREVEN IN ARTIKEL 2; OVERDRAAGBAARHEID ZOALS BESCHREVEN IN ARTIKEL 4; CONNECTIVITEIT EN PRIVACY ZOALS BESCHREVEN IN ARTIKEL 6; GARANTIE ZOALS BESCHREVEN IN ARTIKEL 9 EN AANSPRAKELIJKHEID ZOALS BESCHREVEN IN ARTIKEL 10 EN 16. NADAT U DE OVEREENKOMST HEBT GEACCEPTEERD, IS DEZE AFDWINGBAAR JEGENS U EN ELKE RECHTSPERSOON DIE DE SOFTWARE HEEFT VERKREGEN EN TEN BEHOEVE WAARVAN DEZE WORDT GEBRUIKT. INDIEN U NIET HIERMEE INSTEMT, DIENT U DE SOFTWARE NIET TE GEBRUIKEN. ADOBE STAAT U SLECHTS TOE DE SOFTWARE TE GEBRUIKEN OVEREENKOMSTIG DE VOORWAARDEN VAN DEZE OVEREENKOMST. TEN AANZIEN VAN HET GEBRUIK VAN MATERIALEN VAN DERDEN DIE ONDERDEEL VORMEN VAN DE SOFTWARE KUNNEN ANDERE VOORWAARDEN EN BEPALINGEN VAN TOEPASSING ZIJN, DIE U OVER HET ALGEMEEN KUNT VINDEN IN EEN AFZONDERLIJKE LICENTIEOVEREENKOMST, EEN “READ-ME”-BESTAND (“LEESMIJ”) DAT ZICH BIJ DE BETREFFENDE MATERIALEN BEVINDT OF IN DE “SOFTWARE KENNISGEVINGEN VAN DERDEN” (“THIRD PARTY SOFTWARE NOTICES”) EN/OF DE “AANVULLENDE VOORWAARDEN EN BEPALINGEN” (“ADDITIONAL TERMS AND CONDITIONS”) TE VINDEN OP http://www.adobe.com/go/thirdparty_nl. 1. Definities. “Adobe” betekent Adobe Systems Incorporated, een naar het recht van Delaware, V.S. gevestigde vennootschap, kantoorhoudende te 345 Park Avenue, San Jose, Californië 95110, indien lid 12(a) van deze overeenkomst van toepassing is; zo niet, betekent het Adobe Systems Software Ireland Limited, Unit 3100, Lake Drive, City West Campus, Saggart D24, Republiek Ierland, een naar het recht van Ierland gevestigde vennootschap en een nevenvestiging en licentiehouder van Adobe Systems Incorporated. “Computer” betekent een virtueel of fysiek persoonlijk elektronisch apparaat dat informatie in digitale of gelijksoortige vorm leest en manipuleert teneinde een

specifiek resultaat te behalen, gebaseerd op een reeks instructies. “Software” betekent (a) alle inhoud van de bestanden (elektronisch of op fysieke media geleverd), of een of meer schijven of andere media waarop deze overeenkomst wordt verstrekt en die het volgende kunnen bevatten: (i) computerinformatie of software van Adobe of derden, zoals Adobe Reader® (“Adobe Reader”), Adobe® AIR™ (“Adobe AIR”), Adobe Flash® Player, Shockwave® Player en Authorware® Player (gezamenlijk zijn Adobe AIR en de Flash-, Shockwave- en Authorware-spelers de “Adobe Runtimes”); (ii) bijbehorende schriftelijke materialen of bestanden ter uitleg (“Documentatie”); en (iii) fonts; en (b) upgrades, gewijzigde versies, updates, aanvullingen en exemplaren van het voorgaande, die aan u op enig moment door Adobe zijn geleverd (gezamenlijk “Updates”). “Gebruik” betekent het openen, installeren, downloaden, kopiëren of op enigerlei andere wijze benutten van de functionaliteit van de Software overeenkomstig de Documentatie. 2. Softwarelicentie. Als u de Software van Adobe of een van haar licentienemers heeft verkregen en onder de voorwaarde dat u zich houdt aan de bepalingen van deze overeenkomst voor software, inclusief de beperkingen van artikel 3, verleent Adobe u een niet-exclusieve licentie om de Software als volgt te gebruiken voor de doeleinden beschreven in de Documentatie: 2.1 Algemeen Gebruik. U mag één exemplaar van de Software op uw compatibele Computer installeren en gebruiken. Zie artikel 3 voor belangrijke beperkingen betreffende het gebruik van de Software. 2.2 Servergebruik. Volgens deze overeenkomst mag u de software niet installeren of gebruiken op een bestandsserver. Als u meer wilt weten over het gebruik van software op een bestandsserver, gaat u naar http://www.adobe.com/go/acrobat_distribute_nl voor meer informatie over Adobe Reader of naar http://www.adobe.com/go/licensing_nl voor meer informatie over de Adobe Runtimes. 2.3 Distributie. Deze licentie verleent u niet het recht om de Software in sublicentie te verstrekken of te distribueren. Als u wilt weten hoe u het recht verkrijgt om de Software te distribueren op tastbare media of via een intern netwerk of met uw product of dienst, gaat u naar http://www.adobe.com/go/acrobat_distribute_nl voor meer informatie over Adobe Reader of http://www.adobe.com/go/licensing_nl voor meer informatie over de Adobe Runtimes. 2.4 Back-upexemplaar. U mag één kopie van de Software maken voor back-updoeleinden, mits uw backupexemplaar niet wordt geïnstalleerd of gebruikt. Het is u niet toegestaan de rechten over te dragen ten aanzien van een back-upexemplaar, tenzij u alle rechten en verplichtingen met betrekking tot de Software overdraagt zoals aangegeven in artikel 4. 3. Verplichtingen en beperkingen. 3.1 Beperkingen voor Adobe Runtime. U mag Adobe Runtime niet gebruiken op een apparaat dat geen PC is, of met enige ingebouwde of apparaatversie van een besturingssysteem. Om misverstanden te voorkomen en slechts ter illustratie mag u geen Adobe Runtime gebruiken op (a) mobiele apparaten, set-top boxen (STB), draagbaren (“handhelds”), telefoons, web pads, tablets en tablet PC’s (behalve Windows XP Tablet PC Edition en diens opvolgers), game consoles, tv’s, DVD-spelers, media centers (behalve Windows XP Media Center Edition en diens opvolgers), elektronische billboards of andere digitale borden, internet toepassingen of andere aan internet verbonden apparatuur, PDA’s, medische apparatuur, pinautomaten, telematische apparatuur, gokautomaten, home automation systemen, kiosken, afstandsbedieningen en elke andere elektronische apparatuur voor consumenten, (b) extern bediende mobiele, kabel, satelliet of televisie systemen of (c) andere apparatuur met een gesloten systeem. Als u wilt weten hoe u licenties verkrijgt voor het gebruik van Adobe Runtimes op deze systemen, gaat u naar http://www.adobe.com/go/licensing_nl. 3.2 Beperkingen voor Adobe Reader. Adobe Reader wordt gelicentieerd en gedistribueerd door Adobe voor het bekijken, distribueren en delen van PDF-bestanden. 3.2.1 Beperkingen voor conversies. U mag de Software niet integreren of gebruiken met andere software, plug-in of verbetering die gebruikmaakt van of afhankelijk is van de Software bij het converteren of het transformeren van PDF-bestanden naar andere indelingen (bijvoorbeeld een PDF-bestand naar een TIFF-, JPEG- of SVG-bestand).

3.2.2 Beperkingen voor plug-ins. U mag de Software niet integreren of gebruiken met enige plug-in software die niet conform de Adobe Integration Key License Agreement is ontwikkeld. 3.2.3 Uitgeschakelde Opties. Adobe Reader kan opties of functies bevatten die zijn verborgen of die uitgeschakeld of grijs worden weergegeven (de “Uitgeschakelde Opties”). Uitgeschakelde Opties worden alleen geactiveerd wanneer een PDF-document wordt geopend dat is gemaakt met gebruikmaking van ondersteunende technologie die uitsluitend verkrijgbaar is bij Adobe. U mag Uitgeschakelde Opties alleen gebruiken of proberen te gebruiken via deze ondersteunende technologieën en u mag geen gebruik maken van Adobe Reader om een optie te maken die wezenlijk lijkt op een Uitschakelde Optie of anderszins de technologie te omzeilen waarmee de activering van een dergelijke optie wordt geregeld. Voor meer informatie over Uitgeschakelde Opties gaat u naar http://www.adobe.com/go/readerextensions_nl. 3.3 Kennisgevingen. Alle kopieën die u maakt, dienen dezelfde kennisgevingen met betrekking tot het auteursrecht en andere eigendomsrechten te bevatten als zijn aangebracht op of in de Software. 3.4 Wijzigingen of terugwerkend ontwikkelen is niet toegestaan. U mag de Software niet wijzigen, aanpassen, vertalen of afgeleide werken gebaseerd op de Software vervaardigen. U mag de Software niet aan terugwerkend ontwikkelen onderwerpen, decompileren, deassembleren of anderszins trachten de broncode van de Software te achterhalen, behoudens voor zover decompileren uitdrukkelijk is toegestaan op grond van toepasselijke regelgeving. 4. Overdracht. Het is u niet toegestaan de Software of enig deel daarvan te verhuren, in lease of in sublicentie te geven, op de Computer van een derde persoon te laten kopiëren, of uw rechten op de Software toe te wijzen of over te dragen, behoudens voor zover uitdrukkelijk is toegestaan krachtens deze overeenkomst. U bent daarentegen wel bevoegd al uw rechten op het gebruik van de Software aan een derde natuurlijke of rechtspersoon over te dragen onder de voorwaarde dat: (a) u daarbij ook overgaat tot overdracht aan de (rechts)persoon in kwestie van (i) deze overeenkomst en (ii) de Software en alle overige software of hardware die met de Software is gebundeld of standaard wordt geïnstalleerd, inclusief alle kopieën, updates en eerdere versies, (b) u geen kopieën achterhoudt, daaronder begrepen back-ups en kopieën die op een Computer zijn opgeslagen en (c) de ontvangende partij instemt met de voorwaarden en bepalingen van deze overeenkomst en alle andere voorwaarden en bepalingen waaronder u een licentie voor de Software hebt verkregen. Niettegenstaande het voorgaande mag u geen kopieën van de Software overdragen, die zijn bestemd voor educatie, op proef zijn verkregen of anderszins niet voor de handel zijn bestemd. 5. Intellectuele eigendom, voorbehouden rechten. De Software en alle geautoriseerde kopieën die u daarvan maakt, zijn de intellectuele eigendom van Adobe Systems Incorporated en haar leveranciers. De structuur, organisatie en code van de Software behoren tot de handelsgeheimen (trade secrets) en de vertrouwelijke informatie van Adobe Systems Incorporated en haar leveranciers. De Software is wettelijk beschermd, onder meer door de auteurswetten van de Verenigde Staten van Amerika en andere landen en door internationale verdragsbepalingen. Behoudens voor zover uitdrukkelijk in deze overeenkomst uiteengezet, worden u onder deze overeenkomst geen intellectuele eigendomsrechten inzake de Software verleend, en zijn alle rechten die hierbij niet uitdrukkelijk worden verleend voorbehouden door Adobe en haar leveranciers. 6. Connectiviteit en privacy. 6.1 Gebruik van PDF-bestanden. Wanneer u met de Software een PDF-document opent waarin de weergave van advertenties via registratie bij de service Ads for Adobe PDF is ingeschakeld, maakt uw computer mogelijk verbinding met een website die door Adobe, een adverteerder of derden wordt beheerd. Uw IP-adres (Internet Protocol) wordt verzonden wanneer dit gebeurt. De partij die de site host, kan technologie gebruiken voor het verzenden (of “leveren”) van reclame of andere elektronische inhoud die in of in de buurt van het geopende bestand wordt weergegeven. De websitebeheerder kan ook JavaScript, webbeacons (ook actietags of single-pixel GIF’s genoemd) en andere technologieën gebruiken om de effectiviteit van reclame te verbeteren en meten en reclameinhoud te personaliseren. Uw communicatie met Adobe-websites is vastgelegd in het privacybeleid van Adobe

Online Privacy, dat u kunt nalezen op http://www.adobe.com/go/privacy_nl. Adobe heeft mogelijk geen toegang tot of zeggenschap over de functies die derden mogelijk gebruiken en de informatiepraktijken van andere websites vallen niet onder het privacybeleid van Adobe Online. 6.2 Updates. U erkent en accepteert dat de Software automatisch vanaf uw Computer verbinding kan maken met het internet om te controleren of er updates beschikbaar zijn die automatisch naar uw Computer kunnen worden gedownload en om Adobe te laten weten dat de Software met succes is geïnstalleerd. Wanneer dit gebeurt, worden naar Adobe alleen gegevens verzonden die niet tot personen kunnen worden herleid. Uw communicatie met Adobewebsites is vastgelegd in het privacybeleid van Adobe Online Privacy, dat u kunt nalezen op http://www.adobe.com/go/privacy_nl. Zie de Documentatie voor informatie over het wijzigen van standaardinstellingen voor updates. 6.3 Instellingenbeheer. Flash Player kan ervoor zorgen dat bepaalde gebruikersinstellingen op uw Computer moeten worden opgeslagen als lokaal gedeeld object. Deze instellingen zijn niet verbonden met u, maar stellen u in staat om bepaalde instellingen te configureren binnen de Flash Player. U kunt meer informatie vinden over de lokaal gedeelde objecten (“local shared objects”) op http://www.adobe.com/go/flashplayer_security_nl en meer informatie over het Instellingenbeheer op http://www.adobe.com/go/settingsmanager_nl. 7. Aanbiedingen van derden. Met de Software kunt u mogelijk websites, softwareapplicaties en gegevensdiensten van derden openen en gebruiken, waaronder geavanceerde webapplicaties (“Aanbiedingen van Derden”). Uw toegang tot en gebruik van een Aanbieding van Derden, waaronder goederen, diensten of informatie, vallen onder de voorwaarden en bepalingen met betrekking tot dergelijke aanbiedingen. Aanbiedingen van Derden zijn geen eigendom van Adobe en worden niet verstrekt door Adobe. 8. Digitale certificaten. 8.1 Gebruik. Adobe AIR gebruikt digitale certificaten om u te helpen bij het identificeren van Adobe AIRapplicaties die door derden zijn gemaakt. In Adobe Reader worden digitale certificaten gebruikt om PDFdocumenten te ondertekenen alsmede dergelijke handtekeningen en gecertificeerde PDF-documenten te valideren. Uw Computer maakt mogelijk verbinding met het internet op het moment dat een digitaal certificaat wordt gevalideerd. Digitale certificaten worden door derde certificerende instanties gebruikt, zoals Adobe CDSleveranciers (Certified Document Services) die zijn vermeld op http://www.adobe.com/go/partners_cds_nl (“Certificerende Instanties”) of kunnen zelfondertekend zijn. 8.2 Voorwaarden en bepalingen. Als u digitale certificaten aanschaft, gebruikt en erop vertrouwt, bent uzelf en een Certificerende Instantie hiervoor verantwoordelijk. Voordat u een gecertificeerd document, een digitale handtekening of de diensten van een Certificerende Instantie vertrouwt, dient u na te gaan onder welke voorwaarden en bepalingen de betreffende Certificerende Instantie diensten aanbiedt, zoals overeenkomsten van abonnees, overeenkomsten van belanghebbende partijen, verklaringen omtrent beleid en praktijk ten aanzien van certificaten. Klik op de koppelingen op http://www.adobe.com/go/partners_cds_nl voor meer informatie over CDS-leveranciers van Adobe. 8.3 Verklaring. U gaat ermee akkoord dat (a) een digitaal certificaat kan zijn ingetrokken voorafgaand aan de verificatie, waardoor de digitale handtekening of het digitale certificaat ongeldig lijkt terwijl dit in werkelijkheid niet het geval is, (b) de veiligheid of integriteit van een digitaal certificaat in opspraak kan raken doordat de ondertekenaar van het document, de betreffende Certificerende Instantie of een derde partij iets heeft gedaan of nagelaten en (c) een certificaat kan een zelfondertekend certificaat zijn dat niet door een Certificerende Instantie is verstrekt. U BENT ZELF VOLLEDIG VERANTWOORDELIJK OM TE BEPALEN OF U AL DAN NIET VERTROUWT OP EEN CERTIFICAAT. TENZIJ EEN AFZONDERLIJKE, SCHRIFTELIJKE GARANTIE AAN U IS VERSTREKT DOOR EEN CERTIFICERENDE INSTANTIE, GEBRUIKT U DIGITALE CERTIFICATEN OP EIGEN RISICO. 8.4 Begunstigde derde partijen. U gaat ermee akkoord dat iedere Certificerende Instantie waarop u vertrouwt, een begunstigde derde partij van deze overeenkomst is en het recht heeft om deze overeenkomst op eigen initiatief af te dwingen alsof de Certificerende Instantie Adobe is.

8.5 Schadeloosstelling. U verbindt zich ertoe Adobe en elke van toepassing zijnde Certificerende Instantie (tenzij uitdrukkelijk anderszins is vermeld in de betreffende voorwaarden en bepalingen) te vrijwaren van aansprakelijkheid, verliezen, rechtszaken, schade of vorderingen (daaronder mede begrepen redelijke onkosten en advocaatkosten) die voortkomen uit of betrekking hebben op het gebruik van, of het vertrouwen op, een dienst van een Certificerende Instantie, daaronder mede begrepen maar niet beperkt tot (a) het vertrouwen op een verlopen of ingetrokken certificaat; (b) de onjuiste verificatie van een certificaat; (c) het gebruik van een certificaat op een andere manier dan is toegestaan door van toepassing zijnde bepalingen, deze overeenkomst of toepasselijke regelgeving; (d) het, in gegeven omstandigheden, niet aanwenden van een redelijk inzicht of beoordelingsvermogen bij het vertrouwen op de diensten van de uitgever of certificaten of (e) het niet nakomen van de verplichtingen zoals neergelegd in de bepalingen in verband met de diensten. 9. Geen garantie. De software wordt aan u verstrekt in de staat waarin deze zich bevindt (“AS IS”) en met ALLE FOUTEN. ADOBE EN HAAR LEVERANCIERS EN CERTIFICERENDE INSTANTIES KUNNEN EN ZULLEN NIET DE PRESTATIES OF RESULTATEN GARANDEREN DIE U MOGELIJK VERKRIJGT DOOR DE SOFTWARE, DIENSTEN VAN CERTIFICERENDE INSTANTIES OF AANBIEDINGEN VAN DERDEN TE GEBRUIKEN. BEHOUDENS VOOR ZOVER GARANTIES, BEPALINGEN, VERKLARINGEN OF VOORWAARDEN NIET KUNNEN WORDEN UITGESLOTEN OF BEPERKT ONDER HET OP U VAN TOEPASSING ZIJNDE RECHT IN HET RECHTSGEBIED WAAR U BENT GEVESTIGD, VERLENEN ADOBE EN HAAR LEVERANCIERS EN CERTIFICERENDE INSTANTIES GEEN ENKELE GARANTIE, VOORWAARDE, VERKLARING OF BEPALING (UITDRUKKELIJK OF IMPLICIET, BIJ OF KRACHTENS DE WET, GEWOONTE OF ANDERSZINS), DAARONDER BEGREPEN DOCH NIET BEPERKT TOT GARANTIES DAT GEEN INBREUK WORDT GEMAAKT OP RECHTEN VAN DERDEN, OF GARANTIES MET BETREKKING TOT VERHANDELBAARHEID, INTEGRATIE, KWALITEIT OF GESCHIKTHEID VOOR EEN SPECIFIEK DOEL. De bepalingen van artikel 9 en artikel 10 blijven ook na beëindiging van deze overeenkomst gelden, wat de oorzaak van deze beëindiging ook is, maar hierdoor wordt geen recht geïmpliceerd of in het leven geroepen tot verder gebruik van de Software na beëindiging van deze overeenkomst. 10. Beperking van aansprakelijkheid. ADOBE, HAAR LEVERANCIERS OF CERTIFICERENDE INSTANTIES ZIJN IN GEEN GEVAL AANSPRAKELIJK JEGENS U VOOR ENIGE SCHADE, VORDERINGEN OF KOSTEN, MET INBEGRIP VAN ENIGE GEVOLGSCHADE, INDIRECTE SCHADE, INCIDENTELE SCHADE OF GEDERFDE WINST OF GEMISTE BESPARINGEN, ZELFS WANNEER EEN VERTEGENWOORDIGER VAN ADOBE TEVOREN OP DE HOOGTE WAS GESTELD VAN DE MOGELIJKHEID VAN HET OPTREDEN VAN DERGELIJKE VERLIEZEN, SCHADE OF VORDERINGEN. DE VOORGAANDE UITSLUITINGEN EN BEPERKINGEN ZIJN SLECHTS GELDIG VOOR ZOVER ZIJ TOEGESTAAN ZIJN ONDER HET TOEPASSELIJKE RECHT IN UW JURISDICTIE. DE TOTALE AANSPRAKELIJKHEID VAN ADOBE, HAAR LEVERANCIERS EN CERTIFICERENDE INSTANTIES OP GROND VAN OF IN SAMENHANG MET DEZE OVEREENKOMST IS BEPERKT TOT HET BEDRAG DAT VOOR DE SOFTWARE IS BETAALD, INDIEN VAN TOEPASSING. Niets in deze overeenkomst dient te worden opgevat als een beperking van Adobe’s aansprakelijkheid jegens u in geval van overlijden of persoonlijk letsel tengevolge van Adobe’s nalatigheid of bedrog (fraude). Adobe treedt op namens haar leveranciers en certificerende instanties waar het de afwijzing, uitsluiting en/of beperking van verplichtingen, garanties en aansprakelijkheid betreft, zoals bepaald in deze overeenkomst, doch niet voor wat betreft andere zaken of doeleinden. Voor verdere informatie kunt u de informatie omtrent specifieke jurisdicties aan het eind van deze overeenkomst raadplegen, indien aanwezig, of contact opnemen met de afdeling Customer Support van Adobe. 11. Exportbepalingen. U verbindt zich ertoe de Software niet te verzenden, over te brengen of te exporteren naar landen, of te gebruiken op enigerlei wijze waarvoor een verbod geldt op grond van de Export Administration Act (wet op de exportadministratie) van de Verenigde Staten van Amerika of andere exportwetten, -beperkingen of -regelgeving (de “Export Laws”). Bovendien, indien de Software wordt geïdentificeerd als exportartikel vallend onder de Export

Laws, garandeert u dat u geen ingezetene of anderszins inwoner bent van een natie onder embargo (daaronder mede begrepen maar niet beperkt tot Iran, Syrië, Soedan, Cuba en Noord-Korea) en dat u niet op enige andere wijze volgens de Export Laws bent uitgesloten van het ontvangen van de Software. Alle rechten tot gebruik van de Software zijn verleend onder de voorwaarde dat die rechten vervallen indien u verzuimt de bepalingen van deze overeenkomst na te leven. 12. Toepasselijk recht. Deze overeenkomst wordt beheerst door en zal worden uitgelegd overeenkomstig het van kracht zijnde recht: (a) in de staat Californië, indien een licentie voor de Software wordt verkregen als u in de Verenigde Staten, Canada of Mexico verblijft, of (b) in Japan, indien een licentie voor de Software wordt verkregen als u in Japan, China, Korea, of ander Zuidoost-Aziatisch land verblijft waar alle officiële talen worden geschreven in ideografisch schrift (zoals Hanzi, Kanji of Hanja) en/of in ander schrift dat is gebaseerd op een gelijksoortige structuur als ideografisch schrift, zoals Hangul of Kana; of (c) in Engeland, indien een licentie voor de Software wordt verkregen als u in enige andere staat of rechtsgebied verblijft dan hierboven is beschreven. De rechtbanken respectievelijk in Santa Clara County, Californië, indien Californisch recht van toepassing is, de Tokyo District Court in Japan, indien Japans recht van toepassing is, en de bevoegde rechtbanken in Londen, Engeland, indien Engels recht van toepassing is, hebben nietexclusieve rechtsbevoegdheid met betrekking tot alle geschillen betreffende of gerelateerd aan deze overeenkomst. Deze overeenkomst is niet onderworpen aan conflictregels van welke staat of rechtsgebied dan ook of aan het Verdrag der Verenigde Naties inzake internationale koopovereenkomsten betreffende roerende zaken, waarvan de toepassing dan ook expliciet is uitgesloten. 13. Algemene bepalingen. Als enig onderdeel van deze overeenkomst ongeldig, niet bindend en/of niet afdwingbaar blijkt, heeft dit geen effect op de geldigheid van de rest van deze overeenkomst, die geldig en afdwingbaar blijft onder de van toepassing zijnde bepalingen. Deze overeenkomst doet geen afbreuk aan de dwingendrechtelijke rechten van partijen die handelen als consument. Deze overeenkomst kan alleen door een schriftelijk document worden gewijzigd dat is ondertekend door een daartoe bevoegde vertegenwoordiger van Adobe. De licentie die Adobe u verleent voor Updates kan additionele of afwijkende bepalingen bevatten. Dit is de gehele overeenkomst tussen Adobe en u met betrekking tot de Software en deze overeenkomst treedt in de plaats van alle voorgaande verklaringen, besprekingen, toezeggingen, mededelingen of reclame met betrekking tot de Software. 14. Kennisgeving aan eindgebruikers binnen de overheid van de Verenigde Staten van Amerika. Met betrekking tot eindgebruikers binnen de overheid van de Verenigde Staten van Amerika zal Adobe voldoen aan van toepassing zijnde wetgeving met betrekking tot gelijke rechten, waaronder mede begrepen, indien van toepassing, de bepalingen van “Executive Order 11246”, zoals geamendeerd, “Section 402” van de “Vietnam Era Veterans Readjustment Assistance Act” van 1974 (38 USC 4212) en “Section 503” van de “Rehabilitation Act” van 1973, zoals geamendeerd, en de voorschriften van 41 CFR Parts 60-1 t/m 60-60, 60-250 en 60-741. De clausule en voorschriften met betrekking tot positieve discriminatie van minderheden ingesloten in voorgaande zin worden geacht met deze verwijzing te zijn opgenomen in deze overeenkomst. 15. Naleving van licenties. Indien u een bedrijf of organisatie bent, stemt u ermee in dat u op verzoek van Adobe of de bevoegde vertegenwoordiger van Adobe binnen dertig (30) dagen volledig gedocumenteerd zult verklaren dat uw gebruik van alle Software op het moment van het verzoek in overeenstemming is met uw geldige licenties van Adobe. 16. Specifieke uitzonderingen. 16.1 Beperking van aansprakelijkheid voor gebruikers die woonachtig zijn in Duitsland of Oostenrijk.

16.1.1 Als u de Software hebt verkregen in Duitsland of Oostenrijk en u normaal gesproken uw verblijfplaats in één van die landen hebt, is artikel 10 niet van toepassing. In plaats hiervan is, met inachtneming van het bepaalde in artikel 14.2.2, de wettelijke aansprakelijkheid van Adobe als volgt beperkt: (i) de aansprakelijkheid van Adobe is beperkt tot het schadebedrag dat normaliter voorzienbaar is op het moment dat de aankoopovereenkomst wordt afgesloten voor wat betreft schade die wordt veroorzaakt door een enigszins nalatige inbreuk op een wezenlijke contractuele verplichting en (ii) Adobe is niet aansprakelijk voor schade die wordt veroorzaakt door een enigszins nalatige inbreuk op een niet-wezenlijke contractuele verplichting. 16.1.2 De hiervoor vermelde beperking van aansprakelijkheid geldt niet voor verplichte wettelijke aansprakelijkheden, in het bijzonder voor aansprakelijkheden onder de German Product Liability Act, aansprakelijkheid voor het verstrekken van een specifieke garantie of aansprakelijkheid voor persoonlijk letsel door schuld. 16.1.3 U dient alle redelijke maatregelen te nemen om schade te voorkomen en te beperken, in het bijzonder door back-upexemplaren te maken van de Software en van uw computergegevens in overeenstemming met de bepalingen in deze overeenkomst.

Indien u vragen hebt over deze overeenkomst of indien u informatie van Adobe wilt aanvragen, kunt u gebruikmaken van de bij het product gevoegde adres- en contactinformatie of via het web op www.adobe.com/nl om contact op te nemen met de vestiging van Adobe in uw land. Adobe, AIR, Authorware, Flash, Reader en Shockwave zijn hetzij gedeponeerde merken dan wel merken van Adobe Systems Incorporated in de Verenigde Staten en/of andere landen.

Reader_Player_AIR_WWEULA-nl_NL-20080204_1313

 

ADOBE SYSTEMS INCORPORATED Garantii välistamine ja tarkvara litsentsileping KÄESOLEV DOKUMENT SISALDAB TEAVET GARANTII KOHTA (I OSA) JA ADOBE’I TARKVARA KASUTAMIST REGULEERIVAT LITSENTSILEPINGUT (II OSA). I OSA. GARANTII VÄLISTAMINE. TARKVARA NING MUU INFORMATSIOON TARNITAKSE PÕHIMÕTTEL “NAGU ON” KOOS KÕIKIDE SELLES OLEVATE VIGADEGA. ADOBE JA TEMA TARNIJAD NING SERTIFITSEERIMISKESKUSED EI GARANTEERI EGA SAA GARANTEERIDA TOIMIVUST EGA TULEMUSI, MILLE VÕITE TARKVARA, SERTIFITSEERIMISKESKUSE TEENUSTE VÕI KOLMANDATE ISIKUTE POOLT PAKUTAVA KASUTAMISEL SAADA. VÄLJA ARVATUD KÕIK GARANTIID, TINGIMUSED, KINNITUSED VÕI SÄTTED, MIDA EI SAA VÕI EI TOHI TEIE JURISDIKTSIOONIS KEHTIVA SEADUSE JÄRGI VÄLISTADA EGA PIIRATA, EI PAKU ADOBE, TEMA TARNIJAD EGA SERTIFITSEERIMISKESKUSED GARANTIISID, TINGIMUSI, KINNITUSI EGA SÄTTEID (OTSESEID EGA KAUDSEID EI SEADUSJÄRGSEID, TAVAÕIGUSE, TAVA EGA KASUTUSE KOHASEID EGA MUID) MINGISUGUSTES KÜSIMUSTES, SEALHULGAS KOLMANDATE ISIKUTE ÕIGUSTE RIKKUMISE PUUDUMINE, TURUSTATAVUS, INTEGRATSIOON, RAHULDAV KVALITEET VÕI SOBIVUS MINGIKS KINDLAKS OTSTARBEKS. II OSA. TARKVARA LITSENTSILEPING. KUI KASUTATE, KOPEERITE VÕI LEVITATE KOGU ADOBE’I TARKVARA VÕI SELLE MIS TAHES OSA, NÕUSTUTE KÄESOLEVA LEPINGU KÕIGI SÄTETE JA TINGIMUSTEGA, SEALHULGAS EELKÕIGE JÄRGMISTE SÄTETEGA: KASUTUSPIIRANGUD PUNKTIS 2, ÜLEANDMISPIIRANGUD PUNKTIS 4, ÜHENDUVUSE JA PRIVAATSUSPIIRANGUD PUNKTIS 6; GARANTIIPIIRANGUD PUNKTIS 9 JA VASTUTUSPIIRANGUD PUNKTIDES 10 JA 16. NÕUSTUMISE KORRAL ON KÄESOLEV LEPING JÕUSTATAV TEIE JA IGA JURIIDILISE ISIKU SUHTES, KES ON TARKVARA HANKINUD JA KELLE NIMEL SEDA KASUTATAKSE. KUI TE LEPINGUTINGIMUSTEGA EI NÕUSTU, SIIS ÄRGE TARKVARA KASUTAGE. ADOBE LUBAB TEIL TARKVARA KASUTADA ÜKSNES KÄESOLEVA LEPINGU TINGIMUSTEGA KOOSKÕLAS. MÕNEDE TARKVARAS SISALDUVATE KOLMANDA ISIKU MATERJALIDE KASUTAMISE KOHTA VÕIVAD KEHTIDA MUUD TINGIMUSED JA SÄTTED, MIS TAVALISELT ON TOODUD ERALDI LITSENTSILEPINGUS, “LOE MIND”-FAILIS, MIS ASUB NIISUGUSTE MATERJALIDE LÄHEDUSES VÕI SÄTETES “THIRD PARTY SOFTWARE NOTICES AND/OR ADDITIONAL TERMS AND CONDITIONS”, MILLE LEIATE AADRESSIL http://www.adobe.com/go/thirdparty_ee. 1. Määratlused. “Adobe” tähendab Delaware’i äriühingut Adobe Systems Incorporated aadressiga 345 Park Avenue, San Jose, California 95110, kui on kohaldatav käesoleva lepingu alapunkt 12 (a). Muul juhul tähendab see äriühingut Adobe Systems Software Ireland Limited aadressiga Unit 3100, Lake Drive, City West Campus, Saggart D24, Iiri Vabariik, mis tegutseb Iiri seaduste kohaselt ning on Adobe Systems Incorporated’i sidusettevõtja ja litsentsisaaja. “Arvuti” tähendab virtuaalset või füüsilist personaalset elektroonikaseadet, mis võtab andmeid vastu digitaalsel või sellele sarnasel kujul ja töötleb neid eesmärgiga saada käskude jada alusel spetsiifiline tulemus. “Tarkvara” tähendab (a) kogu sisu failides (antakse kas elektrooniliselt või füüsilise meedia abil), kettal või ketastel või muudel andmekandjatel, millega koos käesolev leping antakse, mis võivad sisaldada (i) Adobe’i või kolmandate isikute arvutiandmeid või tarkvara, kaasa arvatud Adobe Reader® (“Adobe Reader”), Adobe® AIR™ (“Adobe AIR”), Adobe Flash® Player, Shockwave® Player ja Authorware® Player (Adobe AIR’i, Flashi, Shockwave’i ja Authorware’i mängija on kokku “Adobe Run-Time’id”); (ii) seotud selgitavaid kirjalikke materjale või faile (“Dokumentatsioon”); ja (iii) kirju; ning (b) Adobe’i poolt mis tahes ajahetkel teile antud täiendeid, modifitseeritud versioone, värskendusi, lisasid ja eelnimetatu koopiaid (kokku “Värskendused”). “Kasutus” tähendab Tarkvara

poole pöördumist, selle installimist, allalaadimist, kopeerimist või muul viisil Tarkvara funktsioonidest kasu saamist. 2. Tarkvaralitsents. Kui olete hankinud Tarkvara Adobe’ilt või ühelt tema volitatud litsentsisaajatest ning eeldusel, et täidate käesoleva lepingu tingimusi, sealhulgas punktis 3 toodud piiranguid, annab Adobe teile lihtlitsentsi Tarkvara kasutamiseks Dokumentatsioonis kirjeldatud viisil ja eesmärgil, nagu järgnevalt Dokumentatsioonis täpsemalt määratletud: 2.1 Üldkasutus. Te võite installida ühe Tarkvara koopia oma ühilduvasse Arvutisse ja seda seal kasutada. Lugege punkti 3 Tarkvara kasutamise oluliste piirangute kohta. 2.2 Serverikasutus. Käesolev leping ei luba teil installida Tarkvara arvuti failiserverisse ega kasutada seda seal. Teabe saamiseks Tarkvara kasutamise kohta arvuti failiserveris palume lugeda Adobe Reader’i kohta aadressilt http://www.adobe.com/go/acrobat_distribute_ee või Adobe Run-Time’ide kohta aadressilt http://www.adobe.com/go/licensing_ee. 2.3 Levitamine. Käesolev litsents ei anna teile õigust Tarkvara all-litsentsida ega levitada. Teabe saamiseks selle kohta, kuidas levitada Tarkvara füüsilistel andmekandjatel või sisevõrgu kaudu või teie toodete või teenuste kaudu, lugege Adobe Reader’i kohta aadressilt http://www.adobe.com/go/acrobat_distribute_ee või Adobe Run-Time’ide kohta aadressilt http://www.adobe.com/go/licensing_ee. 2.4 Varukoopia. Te võite teha Tarkvarast ühe varukoopia eeldusel, et teie varukoopiat ei installita ega kasutata. Te ei tohi anda üle varukoopiaga seonduvaid õigusi, kui te ei anna punkti 4 sätete kohaselt üle kõiki Tarkvaraga seotud õigusi. 3. Kohustused ja piirangud. 3.1 Adobe Run-Time’i puhul kehtivad kitsendused. Te ei kasuta ühtegi Adobe Run-Time’i üheski mittepersonaalarvuti tüüpi seadmes ega koos ühegi operatsioonisüsteemi manustatud versiooni või seadmeversiooniga. Kahtluse vältimiseks ja üksnes näitena: te ei tohi kasutada Adobe Run-Time’i üheski (a) mobiiliseadmes, digiboksis (STB), pihuarvutis, telefonis, veebiplokis, tahvlis ega tahvelarvutis (välja arvatud Windows XP tahvelarvuti redaktsiooni Tablet PC Edition või selle järglaste korral), mängukonsoolis, teleris, DVDmängijas, meediumikeskuses (välja arvatud Windows XP meediumikeskuse redaktsiooni Media Center Edition ja selle järglaste korral), elektroonilises kuulutustahvlis ega muus digitaaltähistuse seadmes, Interneti-seadmes ega muus Interneti-ühendusega seadmes, elektronmärkmikus, meditsiiniseadmes, rahaautomaadis, telemaatikaseadmes, mänguautomaadis, koduautomaatikasüsteemis, kioskis, kaugjuhtimisseadmes ega üheski muus tarbeelektroonikaseadmes; (b) operaatoripõhises mobiili-, kaabli-, satelliidi- ega televisioonisüsteemis ega (c) muus suletud süsteemiga seadmes. Teabe saamiseks Adobe Run-Time’ide litsentsimiseks sellistes süsteemides külastage aadressi http://www.adobe.com/go/licensing_ee. 3.2 Adobe Reader’i puhul kehtivad kitsendused. Adobe litsentsib ja levitab Adobe Reader’it PDF-failide vaatamise, levitamise ja ühiskasutuse jaoks. 3.2.1 Teisendamise puhul kehtivad piirangud. Teil ei ole õigust integreerida ega kasutada Adobe Reader’it ühegi muu tarkvara, lisandprogrammi või laiendusega, mis kasutab PDF-failide teistesse failivormingutesse (nt PDF-faili TIFF-, JPEG- või SVG-failiks) teisendamisel Adobe Reader’it või tugineb sellele. 3.2.2 Lisandtarkvara puhul kehtivad kitsendused. Teil ei ole õigust integreerida ega kasutada Adobe Reader’it ühegi lisandtarkvaraga, mis ei ole välja töötatud kooskõlas Adobe’i integratsioonivõtme litsentsilepinguga. 3.2.3 Blokeeritud funktsioonid. Adobe Reader võib sisaldada funktsioone, mis paistavad blokeerituna või hallina (“Blokeeritud funktsioonid”). Blokeeritud funktsioonid aktiveeruvad ainult sellise PDF-dokumendi avamisel, mis on loodud üksnes Adobe’i käest saadaoleva lubava tehnoloogia abil. Te ei tohi pöörduda ega proovi pöörduda Blokeeritud funktsioonide poole, välja arvatud sellise lubava tehnoloogia kasutamisel, ega tugine Adobe Reader’ile Blokeeritud funktsioonidega väga sarnase funktsiooni loomiseks ega hiili muul viisil mööda tehnoloogiast, mis

reguleerib niisuguste funktsioonide aktiveerimist. Täpsema teabe saamiseks Blokeeritud funktsioonide kohta palume külastada aadressi http://www.adobe.com/go/readerextensions_ee. 3.3 Teated. Kõik teie tehtud koopiad Tarkvarast peavad sisaldama samu autori- ja omandiõigust käsitlevaid teateid, mis on olemas Tarkvara peal või sees. 3.4 Muutmiste ja pöördprojekteerimiste keeld. Te ei tohi Tarkvara muuta, kohandada, tõlkida ega luua Tarkvaral põhinevaid tuletistöid. Te ei pöördprojekteeri, pöördkompileeri ega pöördtransleeri ega proovi muul viisil Tarkvara lähtekoodi teada saada. Eelnev ei kehti ulatuses, mida lubab kohalduv seadus, mille kohaselt võib pöördkompileerimine või pöördtransleerimine olla selgesõnaliselt lubatud. 4. Üleandmine. Te ei tohi oma õigusi Tarkvara suhtes rentida, liisida, all-litsentsida, loovutada ega võõrandada, samuti mitte lubada Tarkvara või selle suvalise osa kopeerimist teise kasutaja Arvutisse, välja arvatud käesolevas lepingus selgesõnaliselt lubatud juhtudel. Te võite siiski anda oma Tarkvara kasutamise õigused püsivalt üle teisele füüsilisele või juriidilisele isikule järgmistel tingimustel: (a) te annate niisugusele füüsilisele või juriidilisele isikule üle ka (i) käesoleva lepingu, (ii) Tarkvara ja kogu muu tark- või riistvara, mis on Tarkvaraga komplektis või koos sellega eelinstallitud, sealhulgas kõik koopiad, värskendused ja varasemad versioonid; (b) te ei jäta endale koopiaid, kaasa arvatud varukoopiad ja Arvutis talletatavad koopiad; ja (c) vastuvõttev isik nõustub käesoleva lepingu sätete ja tingimustega ning kõigi muude sätete ja tingimustega, mille kohaselt te olete Tarkvara kehtiva litsentsi seaduslikult omandanud. Eeltoodule vaatamata ei tohi te üle anda Tarkvara haridusala ega väljalaskmiseelseid eksemplare ja samuti mitte eksemplare, mis ei ole edasimüügiks ette nähtud. 5. Intellektuaalse omandi õigus, õiguste säilitamine. Tarkvara ja kõik teie tehtud lubatud koopiad on ettevõtte Adobe Systems Incorporated ja tema tarnijate intellektuaalomand. Tarkvara struktuur, korraldus ja kood on ettevõtte Adobe Systems Incorporated ja tema tarnijate väärtuslikud ärisaladused ning konfidentsiaalne teave. Tarkvara kaitseb seadus, sealhulgas Ameerika Ühendriikide ja teiste riikide autoriõiguse seadused, ning rahvusvaheliste lepete sätted. Käesolev leping ei anna teile mingeid intellektuaalse omandi õigusi Tarkvara suhtes, välja arvatud siin selgesõnaliselt sätestatud juhtudel. Kõik õigused, mida pole selgesõnaliselt antud, jäävad Adobe’ile ja tema tarnijatele. 6. Ühenduvus ja privaatsus. 6.1 PDF-failide kasutamine. Kui kasutate tarkvara sellise PDF-faili avamiseks, millel on reklaamide kuvamine läbi “Ads for Adobe PDF” teenuse aktiveeritud, võib teie Arvuti luua ühenduse Adobe’i, reklaamipakkuja või kolmanda osapoole opereeritava veebisaidiga. Kui nii juhtub, saadetakse teie Internetiprotokolli (IP) aadress sinna. Veebisaiti hooldav osapool võib kasutada tehnoloogiat, mis saadab (või “serveerib”) reklaame või muud elektroonilise sisuga infot, mis ilmub avatud failis või selle läheduses. Veebisaidi haldaja võib kasutada ka JavaScripti, veebimajakaid (samuti tuntud tegevussiltide või ühepiksliste graafikatena) ning muid tehnoloogiaid, mis parandavad ja mõõdavad reklaamide tõhusust ja isiklikustavad reklaami sisu. Teie ühendus Adobe’i veebisaitidega põhineb Adobe’i Onlineprivaatsuspõhimõtetel, mille leiate aadressilt: http://www.adobe.com/go/privacy_ee. Adobe ei pääse ligi ega oma kontrolli funktsioonide üle, mida kolmas osapool võib kasutada ning Adobe’i Online-privaatsuspõhimõtted ei hõlma kolmanda osapoole veebisaitide infotavasid. 6.2 Värskendamine. Te olete teadlik ja nõustute, et Tarkvara võib automaatselt luua Interneti-ühenduse teie Arvutis kontrollimaks värskendusi, mis on teie Arvutisse automaatseks allalaadimiseks kättesaadavad ning teavitamaks Adobe’i edukast installimisest. Sellisel juhul edastatakse Adobe’ile ainult mitteisiklik identifitseerimisteave. Teie ühendus Adobe’i veebisaitidega põhineb Adobe’i Online-privaatsuspõhimõtetel, mille leiate aadressilt: http://www.adobe.com/go/privacy_ee. Värskenduste vaikimisi seadistuste muutmiseks palume lugeda Dokumentatsiooni. 6.3 Seadehaldur. Flash Player’i kasutamine võimaldab salvestada teatud kasutajaseaded lokaalsete ühisobjektidena teie Arvutisse. Need seaded ei ole seotud teiega, aga need võimaldavad teil Flash Player’i sees teatud seadeid häälestada. Lisateavet lokaalsete ühisobjektide kohta võite leida aadressilt

http://www.adobe.com/go/flashplayer_security_ee ja lisateavet Seadehalduri kohta aadressilt http://www.adobe.com/go/settingsmanager_ee. 7. Kolmandate isikute poolt pakutav. Tarkvara võib võimaldada teie ligipääsu kolmandate isikute veebisaitidele, tarkvararakendustele ja andmeteenustele, sealhulgas külluslikele Interneti rakendustele (“Kolmandate isikute poolt pakutav”), ning hõlbustada nende kasutamist. Kõige kolmandate isikute poolt pakutava, sealhulgas kaupade, teenuste ja teabe, teiepoolse ligipääsu ja kasutamise suhtes kohaldatakse selliseid pakkumisi pooldavaid sätteid ja tingimusi. Kolmandate isikute poolt pakutavat ei oma ega paku Adobe. 8. Digitaalsed sertifikaadid. 8.1 Kasutamine. Adobe AIR kasutab digitaalseid sertifikaate, mis aitavad teil identifitseerida kolmandate isikute poolt loodud Adobe AIR rakenduste väljaandja. Adobe Reader kasutab digitaalseid sertifikaate PDF-dokumentide allkirjastamiseks ja allkirjade kinnitamiseks ning Sertifitseeritud PDF-dokumentide kinnitamiseks. Digitaalse sertifikaadi kinnitamise ajal võib teie Arvuti luua ühenduse Internetiga. Digitaalseid sertifikaate väljastavad kolmandatest osapooltest sertifitseerimiskeskused, sealhulgas Adobe’i Sertifitseeritud dokumentide teenuste (SDT) pakkujad, kelle nimekiri on toodud aadressil http://www.adobe.com/go/partners_cds_ee (“Sertifitseerimiskeskused”), või sertifikaate võib iseseisvalt allkirjastada. 8.2 Sätted ja tingimused. Digitaalse sertifikaadi ostmine, kasutamine ja selle usaldamine on teie ja Sertifitseerimiskeskuse kohustus. Enne ühegi sertifitseeritud dokumendi, digitaalallkirja või Sertifitseerimiskeskuse usaldamist peaksite esmalt läbi vaatama kohaldatavad sätted ja tingimused, mille kohaselt asjaomane Sertifitseerimiskeskus teenuseid pakub, sealhulgas näiteks tellijalepingud, huvitatud isiku lepingud, sertifikaadipoliisid ja protseduuriselgitused. Adobe’i SDT pakkujate kohta teabe saamiseks vaadake aadressil http://www.adobe.com/go/partners_cds_ee toodud linke. 8.3 Kinnitus. Te nõustute, et (a) digitaalne sertifikaat võis olla tühistatud enne kinnitamisaega, mille järgi digitaalallkiri või digitaalne sertifikaat näib kehtivana, kuid tegelikult ei ole seda, (b) digitaalse sertifikaadi turvalisus või terviklikkus võib olla rikutud dokumendi allkirjastaja, asjaomase Sertifitseerimiskeskuse või mis tahes muu kolmanda osapoole poolse tegevuse või tegematajätmise tõttu ning (c) sertifikaat võib olla sertifikaat, mille võib iseseisvalt allkirjastada ja mida ei ole väljastanud Sertifitseerimiskeskus. TE VASTUTE AINUISIKULISELT OTSUSE EEST, KAS SERTIFIKAATI VÕIB USALDADA VÕI MITTE. JUHUL, KUI SERTIFITSEERIMISKESKUS EI OLE TEILE VÄLJASTANUD KIRJALIKKU ERALDI GARANTIID, KASUTATE DIGITAALSET SERTIFIKAATI OMA RIISIKOL. 8.4 Kolmandast isikust kasusaaja. Te nõustute, et teie usaldatav Sertifitseerimiskeskus on käesoleva lepingu kolmandast isikust kasusaaja ning omab õigust jõustada käesolevat lepingut enda nimel nii, nagu ta oleks Adobe. 8.5 Kahju hüvitamine. Te nõustute hüvitama Adobe’ile ja kõigile asjakohastele Sertifitseerimiskeskustele (välja arvatud nende sätetes ja tingimustes selgesõnaliselt sätestatud juhtudel) kõik kohustused, kahjumid, hagid, kahjud või nõuded (sealhulgas kõik mõistlikud väljaminekud, kulud ja advokaaditasud), mis tulenevad mis tahes sellise Sertifitseerimiskeskuse teenuse kasutamisest või on sellega seotud või selle usaldamisest, muu hulgas, kuid mitte ainult, (a) aegunud või tühistatud sertifikaadi usaldamisest; (b) sertifikaadi õigsuse ebaõigest kontrollimisest; (c) sertifikaadi kasutamisest muul viisil peale kohalduvates sätetes ja tingimustes, käesolevas lepingus või kohalduvas seaduses lubatu; (d) väljastaja teenuste või sertifikaatide usaldamisel teatud olukorras mõistliku otsustusvõime rakendamata jätmisest; või (e) igasuguste kohustuste täitmata jätmisest teenustega seotud kohalduvate sätete ja tingimuste nõuete kohaselt. 9. Garantii puudumine. Tarkvara tarnitake põhimõttel “NAGU ON” koos KÕIKIDE VIGADEGA. ADOBE JA TEMA TARNIJAD NING SERTIFITSEERIMISKESKUSED EI GARANTEERI EGA SAA GARANTEERIDA TOIMIVUST EGA TULEMUSI, MILLE VÕITE TARKVARA, SERTIFITSEERIMISKESKUSE TEENUSTE VÕI KOLMANDATE ISIKUTE POOLT PAKUTAVA KASUTAMISEL SAADA. VÄLJA ARVATUD KÕIK GARANTIID,

TINGIMUSED, KINNITUSED VÕI SÄTTED, MIDA EI SAA VÕI EI TOHI TEIE JURISDIKTSIOONIS KEHTIVA SEADUSE JÄRGI VÄLISTADA EGA PIIRATA, EI PAKU ADOBE, TEMA TARNIJAD EGA SERTIFITSEERIMISKESKUSED GARANTIISID, TINGIMUSI, KINNITUSI EGA SÄTTEID (OTSESEID EGA KAUDSEID EI SEADUSJÄRGSEID, TAVAÕIGUSE, TAVA EGA KASUTUSE KOHASEID EGA MUID) MINGISUGUSTES KÜSIMUSTES, SEALHULGAS KOLMANDATE ISIKUTE ÕIGUSTE RIKKUMISE PUUDUMINE, TURUSTATAVUS, INTEGRATSIOON, RAHULDAV KVALITEET VÕI SOBIVUS MINGIKS KINDLAKS OTSTARBEKS. Punktide 9 ja 10 sätted jäävad kehtima ka pärast käesoleva lepingu lõppemist, olenemata lepingu lõppemise põhjusest, kuid see ei tähenda ega tekita mingisugust jätkuvat õigust kasutada Tarkvara pärast käesoleva lepingu lõppemist. 10. Vastutuse piiramine. ADOBE, TEMA TARNIJAD EGA SERTIFITSEERIMISKESKUSED EI VASTUTA ÜHELGI JUHUL TEIE EES MINGISUGUSTE KAHJUDE, NÕUETE VÕI KULUDE EEST, SAMUTI MITTE MINGITE KAASNEVATE, KAUDSETE VÕI ETTENÄGEMATUTE KAHJUDE EGA MINGI SAAMATA JÄÄNUD KASUMI VÕI KOKKUHOIU EEST. SEE KEHTIB ISEGI JUHUL, KUI ADOBE’I ESINDAJAT ON NIISUGUSE KAHJUMI, KAHJUDE, NÕUETE VÕIMALUSEST TEAVITATUD. EELTOODUD PIIRANGUD JA VÄLISTUSED KEHTIVAD TEIE JURISDIKTSIOONIS KOHALDATAVA SEADUSEGA LUBATUD ULATUSES. ADOBE’I NING TEMA TARNIJATE JA SERTIFITSEERIMISKESKUSTE KÄESOLEVA LEPINGU JÄRGNE VÕI SELLEGA SEOTUD KOGUVASTUTUS PIIRNEB TARKVARA EEST TASUTUD SUMMAGA, KUI SEE ON KOHALDATAV. Mitte miski käesolevas lepingus sisalduvast ei piira Adobe’i vastutust teie ees surmajuhtumi või tervisekahjustuse korral, mille põhjuseks on Adobe’i hooletus, ega lepinguvälise pettusliku rikkumise (pettuse) eest. Adobe tegutseb oma tarnijate ja Sertifitseerimiskeskuste nimel, et käesoleva lepingu sätete kohaselt kohustustest, garantiidest ja vastutusest loobuda, neid välistada ja/või piirata, aga mitte muudel eesmärkidel. Lisateabe saamiseks vaadake palun käesoleva lepingu lõpus toodud jurisdiktsiooni suhtes spetsiifilist teavet, kui seda on, või võtke ühendust Adobe’i klienditoeosakonnaga. 11. Ekspordireeglid. Te nõustute, et Tarkvara ei tarnita, anta üle ega ekspordita ühtegi riiki ega kasutata ühelgi viisil, mis on keelatud Ameerika Ühendriikide ekspordiseaduse või mõne muu ekspordiseaduse, piirangu või õigusaktiga (kokku “Ekspordiseadused”). Lisaks, kui Tarkvara on Ekspordiseadustes nimetatud ekspordikontrolli alla kuuluvaks, kinnitate ja garanteerite, et te ei asu riigis, millele on rakendatud embargot või muid piiranguid (muu hulgas Iraan, Süüria, Sudaan, Kuuba ja Põhja-Korea), ega ole niisuguse riigi kodanik ning et Ekspordiseadused ei keela muul viisil teil Tarkvara saada. Kõik Tarkvara kasutamise õigused antakse tingimusel, et käesoleva lepingu tingimuste täitmata jätmisel jäädakse nendest õigustest ilma. 12. Kohaldatav seadus. Käesoleva lepingu suhtes kohaldatakse ja selle tõlgendamisel rakendatakse materiaalõigust, mis kehtib (a) California osariigis, kui Tarkvara litsents hangitakse Ameerika Ühendriikides, Kanadas või Mehhikos viibimise ajal; või (b) Jaapanis, kui Tarkvara litsents hangitakse, viibides Jaapanis, Hiinas, Koreas või muus Kagu-Aasia riigis, kus kõigi ametlike keelte puhul kasutatakse kirjutamiseks kas ideograafilist kirja (nt hanzi, kanji või hanja) ja/või muud ideograafilisele kirjale tuginevat või ülesehituselt sarnast kirja, näiteks hangul või kana; või (c) Inglismaal, kui Tarkvara litsents hangitakse eespool kirjeldamata jurisdiktsioonis viibimise ajal. Kõik käesoleva lepinguga seotud vaidlused kuuluvad California õiguse kohaldamisel California Santa Clara vastavate kohtute, Jaapani õiguse kohaldamisel Jaapanis asuva Tokio ringkonnakohtu ning Inglismaa õiguse kohaldamisel Inglismaa pädevate kohtute mitteainuõigusliku jurisdiktsiooni alla. Käesoleva lepingu suhtes ei kohaldata ühegi jurisdiktsiooni kollisiooninormi ega ÜRO konventsiooni kaupade rahvusvahelise ostu-müügi lepingute kohta, mille kohaldamine selgesõnaliselt välistatakse. 13. Üldsätted.

Kui mõni käesoleva lepingu osa leitakse olevat õigustühine ja jõustamatu, ei mõjuta see käesoleva lepingu tasakaalu kehtivust, mis jääb oma tingimuste järgi kehtivaks ja jõustatavaks. Käesolev leping ei riiva ühegi tarbijana tegutseva lepinguosalise seadusjärgseid õigusi. Käesolevat lepingut tohib muuta üksnes Adobe’i juhtkonna vastavate volitustega liige ning need muudatused peavad olema kirjalikult allkirjastatud. Värskendused võib Adobe litsentsida teile täiendavatel või erinevatel tingimustel. See on kogu Adobe’i ja teie vaheline Tarkvaraga seotud leping ning see tühistab kõik varasemad Tarkvaraga seotud kinnitused, arutelud, kohustused, kokkulepped ja reklaami. 14. Teade USA valitsuse lõppkasutajatele. USA valitsuse lõppkasutajate puhul nõustub Adobe täitma kõiki kohaldatavaid võrdsete võimaluste seadusi, kaasa arvatud (kui need on asjakohased) rakenduskorraldust 11246 (Executive Order 11246) koos parandustega, 1974. aasta Vietnami veteranide taaskohandumisele kaasaaitamise seaduse (Vietnam Era Veterans Readjustment Assistance Act) (38 USC 4212) punkti 402 ja 1973. aasta rehabilitatsiooniseaduse (Rehabilitation Act) punkti 503 koos parandustega ning 41 CFR-i osades 60-1 kuni 60-60, 60-250 ja 60-741 sisalduvaid õigusakte. Eelmises lauses sisalduv positiivse diskrimineerimise klausel ja õigusaktid lisatakse käesolevale lepingule viite vormis. 15. Litsentsivastavus. Kui olete ettevõte või organisatsioon, nõustute Adobe’i või Adobe’i volitatud esindaja nõudel kolmekümne (30) päeva jooksul täielikult dokumenteerima ja tõendama, et nõude esitamise ajal vastab igasuguse ja kogu Tarkvara kasutamine kehtivatele litsentsidele, mille te Adobe’ilt olete saanud. 16. Spetsiifilised sätted ja erandid. 16.1 Vastutuse piiramine Saksamaal ja Austrias elavate kasutajate puhul. 16.1.1 Kui olete hankinud Tarkvara Saksamaal või Austrias ja elate tavaliselt eelmainitud riigis, siis lepingu punkt 10 ei kehti. Selle asemel piiratakse Adobe’i seadusjärgset vastutust kahjude eest lepingu punkti 16.1.2 sätete kohaselt järgmiselt: (i) Adobe vastutab kahjude eest ainult sellise summa ulatuses, nagu on litsentsilepingu sõlmimise ajal tüüpiliselt prognoositav kahjude puhul, mis on tingitud olulise lepingulise kohustuse rikkumisest kerge hooletuse tõttu, ja (ii) Adobe ei vastuta kahjude eest, mis on tingitud ebaolulise lepingulise kohustuse rikkumisest kerge hooletuse tõttu. 16.1.2 Eespool nimetatud vastutuse piiramine ei kehti ühegi kohustusliku seadusjärgse vastutuse kohta, eriti Saksa tootevastutusseaduse (German Product Liability Act) järgse vastutuse kohta, vastutuse kohta spetsiifilise garantii eeldamise puhul ega süüdlasena põhjustatud tervisekahjustuste puhul. 16.1.3 Teilt nõutakse kõigi mõistlike meetmete rakendamist, et kahju ära hoida ja vähendada, eelkõige Tarkvarast ja oma arvuti andmetest varukoopiate tegemist käesoleva lepingu sätete kohaselt.

Kui teil on seoses käesoleva lepinguga küsimusi või kui soovite saada Adobe’ilt mingit teavet, siis kasutage käesoleva tootega kaasas olevat aadressi ja kontaktandmeid või tehke seda veebi kaudu aadressil www.adobe.com/ee, et võtta ühendust teie jurisdiktsiooni teenindava Adobe’i kontoriga. Adobe, AIR, Authorware, Flash, Reader ja Shockwave on kas ettevõtte Adobe Systems Incorporated registreeritud kaubamärgid või kaubamärgid Ameerika Ühendriikides ja/või teistes riikides.

Reader_Player_AIR_WWEULA-et_EE-20080204_1313

 

ADOBE SYSTEMS INCORPORATED Takuun vastuuvapauslauseke ja Ohjelmiston käyttöoikeussopimus. TÄMÄ ASIAKIRJA SISÄLTÄÄ TAKUUTIEDOT (OSA I) JA ADOBEN OHJELMISTON KÄYTTÖÖN SOVELLETTAVAN KÄYTTÖOIKEUSSOPIMUKSEN (OSA II). OSA 1. TAKUUN VASTUUVAPAUSLAUSEKE. OHJELMISTO JA MUUT TIEDOT TOIMITETAAN ”SELLAISENAAN” JA KAIKKINE VIRHEINEEN. ADOBE, SEN TOIMITTAJAT JA CERTIFICATE AUTHORITY -TAHOT EIVÄT TAKAA EIVÄTKÄ VOI TAATA OHJELMISTON, CERTIFICATE AUTRHORITY -TAHON PALVELUJEN TAI MUUN KOLMANNEN OSAPUOLEN TARJONNAN TOIMINTAA TAI NIIDEN KÄYTTÄMISESTÄ MAHDOLLISESTI SAATAVIA TULOKSIA. LUKUUN OTTAMATTA SIINÄ LAAJUUDESSA MILLÄ MITÄ TAHANSA TAKUUTA, EHTOA TAI VAKUUTUSTA EI KÄYTTÄJÄN LAINKÄYTTÖALUEELLA SOVELLETTAVAN LAIN MUKAAN VOIDA SULKEA POIS TAI RAJOITTAA, ADOBE, SEN TOIMITTAJAT JA CERTIFICATE AUTHORITY TAHOT EIVÄT MYÖNNÄ MINKÄÄNLAISIA NIMENOMAISIA TAI KONKLUDENTTISIA, SÄÄDÖSTEN-, TUOMIOISTUINKÄYTÄNNÖN-, YLEISEN TAVAN TAI KÄYTÄNNÖN MUKAISIA TAI MUUTOIN SOVELTUVIA TAKUITA TAI EHTOJA MUKAAN LUKIEN MUUN MUASSA KOLMANSIEN OSAPUOLTEN OIKEUKSIEN LOUKKAAMATTOMUUS, TUOTTEEN SOVELTUVUUS KAUPANKÄYNNIN KOHTEEKSI, TYYDYTTÄVÄ LAATU TAI SOVELTUVUUS TIETTYYN KÄYTTÖTARKOITUKSEEN. OSA II. OHJELMISTON KÄYTTÖOIKEUSSOPIMUS. KÄYTTÄMÄLLÄ, KOPIOIMALLA TAI LEVITTÄMÄLLÄ OHJELMISTOA TAI JOTAKIN SEN OSAA, KÄYTTÄJÄ HYVÄKSYY KAIKKI TÄMÄN SOPIMUKSEN EHDOT, MUKAAN LUKIEN ERITYISESTI SEURAAVAT: KÄYTTÖÄ (KOHTA 2), SIIRRETTÄVYYTTÄ (KOHTA 4), YHTEYDEN LUOMISTA JA TIETOSUOJAA (KOHTA 6), TAKUUTA (KOHTA 9) JA VASTUUTA (KOHDAT 10 JA 16) KOSKEVAT EHDOT. KUN SOPIMUS ON HYVÄKSYTTY, SE ON TÄYTÄNTÖÖNPANTAVISSA KÄYTTÄJÄÄ JA TAHOA, JOKA ON SAANUT OHJELMISTON JA JONKA PUOLESTA SITÄ KÄYTETÄÄN, VASTAAN. MIKÄLI ETTE HYVÄKSY NÄITÄ EHTOJA, ÄLKÄÄ KÄYTTÄKÖ TÄTÄ OHJELMISTOA. ADOBE SALLII OHJELMISTON KÄYTÖN VAIN TÄMÄN SOPIMUKSEN EHTOJEN MUKAISESTI. JOIHINKIN OHJELMISTOON SISÄLTYVIIN MUIDEN OSAPUOLTEN MATERIAALEIHIN SAATTAA LIITTYÄ MUITA EHTOJA, JOTKA TAVALLISESTI LÖYTYVÄT KYSEISTEN MATERIAALIEN YHTEYDESSÄ OLEVISTA ERILLISESTÄ KÄYTTÖOIKEUSSOPIMUKSESTA, ”LUE MINUT”TIEDOSTOSTA, TAI ”THIRD PARTY SOFTWARE NOTICES AND/OR ADDITIONAL TERMS AND CONDITIONS” -EHDOISTA JOTKA LÖYTYVÄT OSOITTEESTA http://www.adobe.com/go/thirdparty_fi. 1. Määritelmät. ”Adobe” tarkoittaa Adobe Systems Incorporated -nimistä Delawaren yhtiötä (osoite: 345 Park Avenue, San Jose, California 95110, USA), mikäli tämän sopimuksen kohta 12 (a) tulee sovellettavaksi; muussa tapauksessa se tarkoittaa Irlannin lainsäädännön alaista Adobe Systems Software Ireland Limited -nimistä yhtiötä (osoite: Unit 3100, Lake Drive, City West Campus, Saggart D24, Irlanti), joka on Adobe Systems Incorporated -yhtiön tytäryhtiö ja käyttöoikeudenhaltija. ”Tietokone” tarkoittaa virtuaalista tai fyysistä elektronista laitetta, joka hyväksyy tietoa digitaalisessa tai sitä vastaavassa muodossa ja käsittelee tätä tietoa sille annettujen ohjeiden mukaisesti tietyn tuloksen aikaansaamiseksi. ”Ohjelmisto” tarkoittaa (a) kaikkea tämän sopimuksen yhteydessä toimitettujen tiedostojen (joko sähköisesti ladattujen tai fyysisellä tallennusvälineellä toimitettujen ), levykkeiden tai muiden tallennusvälineiden sisältöä, joihin saattaa kuulua (i) Adoben tai jonkin muun osapuolen tietokoneisiin liittyvät tiedot tai ohjelmistot, mukaan lukien Adobe Reader® (”Adobe Reader”), Adobe® AIR™ (”Adobe AIR”), Adobe Flash® Player, Shockwave® Player ja Authorware® Player (Adobe AIR ja Flash, Shockwave sekä Authorware Player -ohjelmistot ovat yhdessä ”Adobe Runtimes”); (ii) kirjalliset selittävät materiaalit tai tiedostot

(”Dokumentaatio”) ja (iii) fontit; sekä (b) parannukset, muokatut versiot, päivitykset, lisäykset ja kopiot, joita Adobe on toimittanut käyttäjälle milloin tahansa (yhdessä ”Päivitykset”). ”Käyttö” tarkoittaa Ohjelmiston käyttöönottoa, asentamista, lataamista, kopioimista tai Ohjelmiston toiminnoista muulla tavoin hyötymistä. 2. Ohjelmiston käyttöoikeus. Mikäli käyttäjä on hankkinut Ohjelmiston Adobelta tai joltain sen valtuuttamalta jälleenmyyjältä, ja edellyttäen, että käyttäjä noudattaa tämän sopimuksen ehtoja, mukaan lukien kohdan 3 mukaisia rajoituksia, Adobe myöntää käyttäjälle Ohjelmiston yleisen käyttöoikeuden Dokumentaatiossa kuvatulla tavalla ja Dokumentaatiossa kuvattuihin tarkoituksiin seuraavin ehdoin. 2.1 Yleinen käyttö. Käyttäjä voi asentaa yhteensopivaan Tietokoneeseensa Ohjelmiston yhden kopion ja käyttää sitä. Katso Ohjelmistoa käyttöä koskevat tärkeät rajoitukset kohdasta 3. 2.2 Palvelinkäyttö. Tämä sopimus ei salli ohjelmiston asentamista tiedostopalvelimelle, eikä ohjelmiston käyttämistä tiedostopalvelimelta. Tietoa ohjelmiston käyttämisestä tiedostopalvelimella löytyy osoitteesta http://www.adobe.com/go/acrobat_distribute_fi (Adobe Reader) tai http://www.adobe.com/go/licensing_fi (Adobe Runtimes). 2.3 Jakelu. Tämä sopimus ei myönnä käyttäjälle oikeutta myöntää alilisenssejä tai jakaa Ohjelmistoa. Tietoa oikeuden hankkimisesta Ohjelmiston jakelua varten fyysisellä välineellä, sisäisen verkon kautta tai käyttäjän tuotteen tai palvelun mukana löytyy osoitteesta http://www.adobe.com/go/acrobat_distribute_fi (Adobe Reader) tai http://www.adobe.com/go/licensing_fi (Adobe Runtimes). 2.4 Varmuuskopiointi. Käyttäjä voi tehdä Ohjelmistosta yhden varmuuskopion, edellyttäen että tätä varmuuskopiota ei asenneta eikä käytetä. Käyttäjä ei voi luovuttaa kenellekään oikeuksia varmuuskopioon, ellei hän luovuta kaikkia oikeuksia Ohjelmistoon kohdassa 4 kuvatulla tavalla. 3. Velvoitteet ja rajoitukset. 3.1 Adobe Runtimea koskevat rajoitukset. Käyttäjä ei saa käyttää mitään Adobe Runtimea missään laitteessa mikä ei ole PC, eikä minkään käyttöjärjestelmään sulautetun version tai laiteversion kanssa. Epäselvyyksien välttämiseksi käyttäjä ei voi käyttää Adobe Runtimea esimerkiksi (a) mobiililaitteissa, tv-sovittimissa (set top box, STB), kämmenlaitteissa, puhelimissa, kosketusnäyttölaitteissa (web pad), tablet-laitteissa, tablet-mikroissa joihin ei ole asennettu Windows XP Tablet PC Edition -ohjelmistoa, pelikonsoleissa, televisioissa, DVD-soittimissa, mediakeskuksissa (pois lukien Windows XP Media Center Edition ja sen seuraajat), sähköisissä ilmoitustauluissa tai muissa digitaalisissa ilmoituslaitteissa, Internet appliance -laitteissa tai muissa Internetiin kytketyissä laitteissa, kämmenmikroissa, terveydenhuollon laitteissa, pankkiautomaateissa, telemaattisissa laitteissa, pelikoneissa, kotiautomaatiojärjestelmissä, kioskeissa, kaukosäädinlaitteissa tai missä tahansa muussa kuluttajaelektroniikkalaitteessa , (b) operaattoripohjaisissa mobiili-, kaapeli- satelliitti- tai televisiojärjestelmissä tai (c) muissa suljetun järjestelmän laitteissa. Tietoa Adobe Runtime -ohjelmien käyttöoikeussopimuksesta kyseisiä järjestelmiä varten löytyy osoitteessa http://www.adobe.com/go/licensing_fi. 3.2 Adobe Readeria koskevat rajoitukset. Adobe myöntää Adobe Readeria koskevat käyttöoikeudet ja jakaa sitä PDF-tiedostojen katseluun, jakeluun ja jakamiseen. 3.2.1 Muuntamista koskevat rajoitukset. Käyttäjä ei saa yhdistää tai käyttää Adobe Readeria minkään sellaisen muun ohjelmiston, lisälaajennuksen tai lisäyksen kanssa joka käyttää tai on riippuvainen Adobe Readerista silloin, kun PDF-tiedostoja käännetään tai muunnetaan toisenlaiseen tiedostoformaattiin (esimerkiksi PDF-tiedosto TIFF-, JPEG- tai SVG-tiedostoksi). 3.2.2 Laajennuksia koskevat rajoitukset. Käyttäjä ei saa yhdistää tai käyttää Adobe Readeria minkään sellaisen laajennusohjelman kanssa, joka ei ole kehitetty Adobe Integration Key License Agreement -sopimuksen mukaisesti. 3.2.3 Lukitut ominaisuudet. Adobe Reader saattaa sisältää ominaisuuksia tai toimintoja, jotka on piilotettu tai jotka on lukittu tai ”himmennetty” (”Lukitut ominaisuudet”). Lukitut ominaisuudet aktivoituvat ainoastaan avattaessa PDF-asiakirjoja, jotka on luotu käyttämällä vain Adoben tämän mahdollistavaa teknologiaa. Käyttäjä ei saa

käyttöönottaa tai yrittää käyttöönottaa mitään Lukittua ominaisuutta muulla tavalla kuin sen mahdollistavan teknologian kautta, eikä käyttäjän pidä olla riippuvainen Adobe Readerista vastaavanlaisen ominaisuuden luomiseksi, tai muulla tavoin kiertää kyseisen ominaisuuden aktivointia valvovaa teknologiaa. Lisätietoa lukituista ominaisuuksista löytyy osoitteessa http://www.adobe.com/go/readerextensions_fi. 3.3 Tiedoksi käyttäjälle. Kaikkien käyttäjän tekemien Ohjelmiston kopioiden tulee sisältää samat Ohjelmistosta ilmenevät tekijänoikeus- ja muut omistusoikeutta kuvaavat ilmoitukset. 3.4 Muutos- ja purkamiskielto. Käyttäjä ei saa muuttaa, mukauttaa, kääntää tai luoda Ohjelmistoon perustuvia johdannaistöitä. Käyttäjä ei saa tutkia Ohjelmiston valmistustapaa perusteellisesti, hajottaa tai purkaa sitä osiin taikka muutoin pyrkiä selvittämään sen lähdekoodia, paitsi siinä laajuudessa kuin soveltuva laki nimenomaisesti sallii purkamisen tai hajottamisen. 4. Siirtäminen. Käyttäjä ei saa vuokrata, leasingvuokrata, alivuokrata, luovuttaa tai siirtää oikeuksia Ohjelmistossa tai myöntää käyttöoikeutta Ohjelmistoon tai mihinkään sen osaan niin, että Ohjelmisto tai jokin sen osa kopioitaisiin toisen käyttäjän Tietokoneelle, muutoin kuin tässä sopimuksessa erityisesti sallitulla tavalla. Käyttäjä voi kuitenkin siirtää kaikki oikeutensa Ohjelmiston käyttöön toiselle luonnolliselle henkilölle tai oikeushenkilölle seuraavien ehtojen mukaisesti: (a) käyttäjä siirtää kyseiselle henkilölle myös (i) tämän sopimuksen, (ii) Ohjelmiston sekä kaikki Ohjelmistoon tai Tietokoneeseen liitetyt tai sen yhteydessä ennalta asennetut ohjelmistot ja laitteet, mukaan lukien kaikki kopiot, päivitykset ja edeltävät versiot, (b) käyttäjä ei säilytä itsellään mitään kopioita mukaan lukien varmuuskopiot ja Tietokoneelle tallennetut kopiot ja (c) Ohjelmiston oikeudet vastaanottava osapuoli hyväksyy tämän sopimuksen ehdot sekä mahdolliset muut ehdot, joiden alaisena käyttäjä on hankkinut Ohjelmiston käyttöoikeuslisenssin. Edellä todetusta huolimatta käyttäjällä ei ole oikeutta siirtää oikeuksia Ohjelmiston koulutus-, ennakkojulkaisu- tai ”ei jälleenmyyntiin”-kopioihin. 5. Immateriaalioikeudet, oikeuksien pidättäminen. Ohjelmisto ja kaikki käyttäjän siitä valmistamat luvalliset kopiot ovat Adobe Systems Incorporated -yhtiön ja sen toimittajien immateriaalioikeuksin suojattua omaisuutta. Ohjelmiston rakenne, järjestely ja koodi ovat Adobe Systems Incorporated -yhtiön ja sen toimittajien arvokkaita liikesalaisuuksia ja luottamuksellista tietoa. Ohjelmisto on suojattu lailla, mukaan lukien muun muassa Yhdysvaltain sekä muiden maiden tekijänoikeuslait, ja kansainvälisillä sopimusmääräyksillä. Ellei tässä sopimuksessa nimenomaisesti muuta todeta, tämä sopimus ei luo käyttäjälle minkäänlaisia Ohjelmistoa koskevia immateriaalioikeuksia. Adobe ja sen toimittajat pidättävät kaikki oikeudet, joita ei nimenomaisesti ole myönnetty. 6. Yhteyden luominen ja tietosuoja. 6.1 PDF-tiedostojen käyttö. Kun Ohjelmistolla avataan PDF-tiedosto, joka on rekisteröity esittämään mainoksia Ads for Adobe PDF -palveluun rekisteröinnin kautta, käyttäjän tietokone voi luoda yhteyden Adoben, mainostajan tai kolmannen osapuolen ylläpitämään verkkosivustoon. Tämän tapahtuessa käyttäjän Internet Protocol -osoite (IP) lähetetään. Sivustoa ylläpitävä osapuoli voi käyttää teknologiaa, joka lähettää (tai ”palvelee”) avattuun tiedostoon tai sen läheisyyteen mainoksia tai muuta elektronista sisältöä. Verkko-operaattori voi käyttää myös JavaScriptiä, jäljitteitä (tunnetaan myös nimillä action tag tai 1x1 pixel.gifs) tai muuta teknologiaa mainosten tehokkuuden lisäämiseksi ja mittaamiseksi sekä mainosten sisällön personalisoimiseksi. Kommunikointiin Adoben verkkosivustojen kanssa sovelletaan Adoben Online-tietosuojalausuntoa, joka löytyy osoitteesta http://www.adobe.com/go/privacy_fi. Adobella ei ole välttämättä pääsyä tai valvontaa kolmannen osapuolen käyttämistä ominaisuuksista, eikä Adoben Online-tietosuojalausunto kata kolmannen osapuolen verkkosivustojen informaatiokäytäntöjä. 6.2 Päivitykset. Käyttäjä hyväksyy ja suostuu siihen, että Ohjelmisto voit kytkeä Tietokoneen automaattisesti Internetiin Tietokoneelle automaattisesti ladattavien päivitysten tarkistamiseksi ja Adoben tiedottamiseksi Ohjelmiston onnistuneesta asennuksesta. Tämän tapahtuessa Adobelle lähetetään ainoastaan tunnistustietoja, jotka eivät ole henkilökohtaisia. Kommunikointiin Adoben verkkosivustojen kanssa sovelletaan Adoben Online-

tietosuojalausuntoa, joka löytyy osoitteesta http://www.adobe.com/go/privacy_fi. Katso dokumentaatiosta lisätietoa oletuspäivitysasetusten muuttamisesta. 6.3 Asetustenhallintaohjelma. Flash Player saattaa aiheuttaa sen, että jotkut käyttäjäasetukset tallennetaan käyttäjän Tietokoneelle paikallisesti jaettuina. Näitä asetuksia ei liitetä käyttäjään, mutta ne mahdollistavat sen, että käyttäjä voi konfiguroida tiettyjä Flash Playerin asetuksia. Lisätietoa ”local shared object”-tallenteista osoitteessa http://www.adobe.com/go/flashplayer_security_fi, ja lisää tietoa Asetustenhallintaohjelmasta osoitteessa http://www.adobe.com/go/settingsmanager_fi. 7. Kolmannen osapuolen tarjonnat. Ohjelmisto saattaa sallia käyttäjälle pääsyn kolmannen osapuolen verkkosivuille, ohjelmistosovelluksiin ja tietopalveluihin ja käyttää niitä, mukaan lukien Rich Internet Applications -sovellukset (”Kolmannen osapuolen tarjonnat”). Pääsyyn Kolmannen osapuolen tarjontaan ja sen käyttämiseen, mukaan lukien hyödykkeet, palvelut tai tiedot, sovelletaan kyseistä tarjontaa koskevia ehtoja. Adobe ei omista tai toimita Kolmannen osapuolen tarjontaa. 8. Digitaaliset sertifikaatit. 8.1 Käyttö. Adobe AIR käyttää digitaalisia sertifikaatteja kolmannen osapuolen luomien Adobe AIR -sovellusten julkaisijan tunnistamisen helpottamiseksi. Adobe Reader käyttää digitaalisia sertifikaatteja PDF-asiakirjojen allekirjoittamiseen ja niiden sisältämien allekirjoitusten varmentamiseen sekä sertifioitujen PDF-asiakirjojen varmentamiseen. Käyttäjän Tietokone voi luoda yhteyden Internetiin digitaalisen sertifikaatin varmentamisen aikana. Digitaalisia sertifikaatteja myöntävät kolmannen osapuolen Certifikate Authorities -tahot, mukaan lukien Adobe Certified Document Services (CDS) -myyjät, jotka on lueteltu osoitteessa http://www.adobe.com/go/partners_cds_fi (”Certificate Authorities”) tai ne voivat olla itse allekirjoitettuja. 8.2 Ehdot. Käyttäjä ja Certificate Authority -taho ovat vastuussa digitaalisten sertifikaattien hankinnasta, käytöstä ja niihin luottamisesta. Ennen kuin käyttäjä luottaa mihinkään sertifioituun dokumenttiin, digitaaliseen allekirjoitukseen tai Certificate Authority -palveluun, käyttäjän tulee lukea Certificate Authority -tahon palveluihin sovellettavat toimitusehdot, mukaan lukien esimerkiksi tilaajan sopimukset, luotettujen osapuolten sopimukset, sertifikaattikäytännöt ja ilmoitukset. Tietoa Adoben CDS-myyjistä löytyy osoitteessa http://www.adobe.com/go/partners_cds_fi olevien linkkien kautta. 8.3 Hyväksyminen. Käyttäjä hyväksyy, että (a) digitaalinen sertifikaatti on saatettu peruuttaa ennen sen varmennusta, jolloin digitaalinen allekirjoitus tai sertifikaatti näyttää olevan voimassa, vaikka todellisuudessa näin ei ole, (b) digitaalisen sertifikaatin turvallisuus tai eheys voi vaarantua dokumentin allekirjoittajan, vastaavan Certificate Authority -tahon tai muun kolmannen osapuolen toimenpiteestä tai laiminlyönnistä, ja (c) sertifikaatti voi olla itse allekirjoitettu, jota Certificate Authority -taho ei ole toimittanut. KÄYTTÄJÄ ON YKSIN VASTUUSSA SERTIFIKAATTIIN LUOTTAMISESTA. ELLEI SERTIFICATE AUTHORITY -TAHO OLE ANTANUT KÄYTTÄJÄLLE ERILLISTÄ KIRJALLISTA TAKUUTA, DIGITAALISEN SERTIFIKAATIN KÄYTTÖ ON YKSINOMAAN KÄYTTÄJÄN VASTUULLA. 8.4 Kolmannen osapuolen oikeudet. Käyttäjä hyväksyy, että mikä tahansa Certificate Authority -taho, johon käyttäjä luottaa, on kolmantena osapuolena tässä sopimuksessa, ja että sillä on oikeus omissa nimissään vaatia ehtojen täytäntöönpanoa samoin kuin Adobella olisi oikeus sitä vaatia. 8.5 Vahingonkorvaus. Käyttäjä sitoutuu siihen, ettei Adobe tai asianomainen Certificate Authority -taho (ellei sen ehdoissa nimenomaisesti muuta todeta) vastaa mistään vahingoista, menetyksistä, toimista, vahingoista tai vaatimuksista (mukaan lukien kaikki kohtuulliset kustannukset, kulut ja oikeudenkäyntikulut sekä palkkiot), jotka aiheutuvat tai liittyvät asianomaisen Certificate Authority -tahon palvelujen käyttöön tai siihen luottamiseen mukaan lukien rajoituksetta (a) luottaminen päättyneeseen tai peruutettuun sertifikaattiin; (b) riittämätön sertifikaatin varmentaminen; (c) muun kuin soveltuvien ehtojen, tämän sopimuksen tai soveltuvan lainsäädännön mukaisen sertifikaatin käyttäminen; (d) kohtuullisen harkinnan laiminlyöminen julkaisijan palveluihin tai sertifikaatteihin luotettaessa; tai (e) palveluita koskevissa ehdoissa määritettyjen ehtojen laiminlyöminen. 9. Ei takuuta.

Ohjelmisto toimitetaan ”SELLAISENAAN” ja KAIKKINE VIRHEINEEN. ADOBE, SEN TOIMITTAJAT JA CERTIFICATE AUTHORITY -TAHOT EIVÄT TAKAA EIVÄTKÄ VOI TAATA OHJELMISTON, CERTIFICATE AUTRHORITY -TAHON PALVELUJEN TAI MUUN KOLMANNEN OSAPUOLEN TARJONNAN TOIMINTAA TAI NIIDEN KÄYTTÄMISESTÄ MAHDOLLISESTI SAATAVIA TULOKSIA. LUKUUN OTTAMATTA SIINÄ LAAJUUDESSA MILLÄ MITÄ TAHANSA TAKUUTA, EHTOA TAI VAKUUTUSTA EI KÄYTTÄJÄN LAINKÄYTTÖALUEELLA SOVELLETTAVAN LAIN MUKAAN VOIDA SULKEA POIS TAI RAJOITTAA, ADOBE, SEN TOIMITTAJAT JA CERTIFICATE AUTHORITY -TAHOT EIVÄT MYÖNNÄ MINKÄÄNLAISIA NIMENOMAISIA TAI KONKLUDENTTISIA, SÄÄDÖSTEN-, TUOMIOISTUINKÄYTÄNNÖN-, YLEISEN TAVAN TAI KÄYTÄNNÖN MUKAISIA TAI MUUTOIN SOVELTUVIA TAKUITA TAI EHTOJA MUKAAN LUKIEN MUUN MUASSA KOLMANSIEN OSAPUOLTEN OIKEUKSIEN LOUKKAAMATTOMUUS, TUOTTEEN SOVELTUVUUS KAUPANKÄYNNIN KOHTEEKSI, TYYDYTTÄVÄ LAATU TAI SOVELTUVUUS TIETTYYN KÄYTTÖTARKOITUKSEEN. Kohtien 9 ja 10 ehdot pysyvät voimassa tämän sopimuksen irtisanomisesta huolimatta, riippumatta siitä, mistä syystä ne ovat aiheutuneet. Tämä ei kuitenkaan tarkoita tai luo minkäänlaista jatkuvaa oikeutta käyttää Ohjelmistoa tämän sopimuksen irtisanomisen jälkeen. 10. Vastuunrajoitus. ADOBE, SEN TOIMITTAJAT TAI CERTIFICATE AUTHORITY -TAHOT EIVÄT MISSÄÄN OLOSUHTEISSA VASTAA KÄYTTÄJÄLLE MINKÄÄNLAISISTA VAHINGOISTA, VAATEISTA TAI KUSTANNUKSISTA MUKAAN LUKIEN VÄLILLISISET TAI SATUNNAISET VAHINGOT TAI ANSION TAI SÄÄSTÖJEN MENETYKSET. NÄIN SIINÄKIN TAPAUKSESSA, ETTÄ ADOBEN EDUSTAJALLE OLISI ILMOITETTU TÄLLAISTEN MENETYSTEN, VAHINKOJEN TAI VAATEIDEN MAHDOLLISUUS. EDELLÄ OLEVAT RAJOITUKSET OVAT VOIMASSA KÄYTTÄJÄN TOIMIALUEELLA VOIMASSA OLEVAN JA SOVELLETTAVAN LAIN MUKAISESTI. ADOBEN, SEN TOIMITTAJIEN JA CERTIFICATE AUTRHORITY -TAHOJEN TÄHÄN SOPIMUKSEEN PERUSTUVA KOKONAISVASTUU RAJOITTUU MAHDOLLISEEN OHJELMISTOSTA MAKSETTUUN SUMMAAN. Mikään tässä sopimuksessa ei rajoita Adoben vastuuta käyttäjää kohtaan Adoben tuottamuksesta tai vilpillisyydestä (petos) aiheutuneesta kuolemasta tai henkilövahingosta. Adobe toimii toimittajiensa ja Cerificate Authority -tahojen puolesta ainoastaan kiistääkseen, sulkeakseen pois ja rajoittaakseen tämän sopimuksen mukaisia velvoitteita, takuita ja vastuita, mutta ei muussa suhteessa tai tarkoituksessa. Lisätietoja löytyy tämän sopimuksen lopussa olevista paikallisia toimistoja koskevasta osoite ja yhteystietoja -kohdasta. Tarvittaessa voitte ottaa yhteyttä Adoben asiakastukiosastoon. 11. Vientisäännökset. Käyttäjä hyväksyy, että Ohjelmistoa ei saa toimittaa, siirtää tai viedä sellaiseen maahan tai käyttää sellaisella tavalla, jonka Yhdysvaltain tai muut vientiä koskevat lait, rajoitukset tai säännökset (”vientisäännökset”) kieltävät. Lisäksi, mikäli Ohjelmisto on vientisäännösten rajoitusten alainen, käyttäjä vakuuttaa, ettei hän ole kauppasaarron alaisen maan kansalainen tai muutoin oleskele tällaisessa maassa (mukaan lukien muun muassa Iran, Syyria, Sudan, Kuuba ja Pohjois-Korea) ja että vientisäännökset eivät muutoin kiellä käyttäjää vastaanottamasta Ohjelmistoa. Kaikki Ohjelmiston käyttöoikeudet myönnetään sillä ehdolla, että myönnetyt oikeudet menetetään, mikäli käyttäjä ei noudata tämän sopimuksen ehtoja. 12. Sovellettava laki. Tähän sopimukseen ja sen tulkintaan sovelletaan seuraavien maiden voimassaolevia lakeja: (a) Kalifornian osavaltio, jos Ohjelmiston käyttöoikeus on saatu käyttäjän ollessaYhdysvalloissa, Kanadassa tai Meksikossa, (b) Japani, jos Ohjelmiston käyttöoikeus on saatu käyttäjän ollessa Japanissa, Kiinassa, Koreassa tai muussa KaakkoisAasian maassa, jossa kaikki viralliset kielet kirjoitetaan käsitekirjoituksella (esim. hanzi, kanji tai hanja) ja/tai muulla kirjoitustavalla, joka perustuu käsitekirjoitukseen tai muistuttaa rakenteeltaan sitä, kuten hangul tai kana, tai (c) Englanti, jos Ohjelmiston käyttöoikeus on saatu muulla kuin edellä mainitulla lainkäyttöalueella. Vastaavasti kaikissa sopimukseen liittyvissä kiistoissa yleinen tuomiovalta Kalifornian lakia sovellettaessa on Santa Claran piirikunnan tuomioistuimella, Japanin lakia sovellettaessa Tokion aluetuomioistuimella ja Englannin lakia sovellettaessa Englannin toimivaltaisilla tuomioistuimilla. Tähän sopimukseen ei sovelleta minkään lainkäyttöalueen

lainvalintaa koskevia säännöksiä tai yleissopimusta kansainvälistä tavaran kauppaa koskevista sopimuksista (ns. YK:n kauppalaki), jonka soveltaminen erityisesti suljetaan pois. 13. Yleiset määräykset. Mikäli ilmenee, että jokin osa tästä sopimuksesta on mitätön tai ei-täytäntöönpantavissa, tämä seikka ei vaikuta sopimuksen jäljelle jäävien osien sitovuuteen, vaan sopimus säilyy muilta osin sitovana ja täytäntöönpanokelpoisena ehtojensa mukaisesti. Tämä sopimus ei rajoita kuluttajana olevan osapuolen lakiin perustuvia oikeuksia. Tätä sopimusta voidaan muuttaa kirjallisesti ainoastaan edellyttäen, että Adoben valtuuttama toimihenkilö allekirjoittaa muutoksen. Adoben myöntämiin päivitysten käyttöoikeussopimuksiin saattaa sisältyä muita tai erilaisia ehtoja. Tämä Sopimus muodostaa Adoben ja käyttäjän välisen koko Sopimuksen koskien Ohjelmistoa, ja se syrjäyttää kaikki aikaisemmat Ohjelmistoa koskevat esitykset, keskustelut, sitoumukset, yhteydenpidot ja mainonnan. 14. Tiedotus Yhdysvaltain valtionhallinnon palveluksessa oleville loppukäyttäjille. Yhdysvaltain valtionhallinnon palveluksessa olevien Loppukäyttäjien osalta Adobe noudattaa sovellettavissa olevia tasavertaisten mahdollisuuksien takaamiseksi säädettyjä lakeja mukaan lukien mahdollisuuksien mukaan toimeenpanomääräystä (Executive Order) 11246 muutoksineen, Vietnamin sodan veteraanien sopeuttamisen avustamisesta vuonna 1974 annetun lain (38 USC 4212) § 402 ja vuonna 1973 annetun kuntoutuslain § 503 muutoksineen sekä säännöksen 41 CFR osia 60-1 - 60-60, 60-250 ja 60-741. Viittauksella sisällytetään tasavertaisuuslaki (Affirmative Action Clause) ja edeltävän lauseen sisältämät säännökset tähän sopimukseen. 15. Käyttöoikeuksien noudattaminen. Jos käyttäjänä on liikeyritys tai organisaatio, käyttäjä hyväksyy, että Adoben tai Adoben valtuuttaman edustajan niin pyytäessä käyttäjä dokumentoi sekä todistaa kolmenkymmenen (30) päivän kuluessa kirjallisesti, että Ohjelmistojen käyttö pyynnön esittämisajankohtana on Adoben myöntämien käyttöoikeuslisenssien mukaista. 16. Erityiset ehdot ja poikkeukset. 16.1 Vastuunrajoitus Saksassa ja Itävallassa asuville Käyttäjille. 16.1.1 Mikäli Käyttäjä on hankkinut Ohjelmiston Saksasta tai Itävallasta kyseisen maan ollessa hänen tavanmukainen asuinpaikkansa, ei tämän Sopimuksen osa 10 tule sovellettavaksi. Sen sijaan kohdassa 16.1.2 olevien määräysten mukaisesti Adoben lakisääteinen vastuu rajoittuu seuraavaan: (i) Adobe on vastuussa vahingoista ainoastaan siihen käyttöoikeussopimuksen solmimisaikana normaalisti ennakoituun määrään asti ottaen huomioon vahingot, jotka ovat aiheutuneet laiminlyönnistä johtuvasta sopimukseen sisältyvän velvoitteen rikkomisesta ja (ii) Adobe ei ole vastuussa vahingoista, jotka ovat aiheutuneet lievästä huolimattomuudesta aiheutuneesta epäolennaisesta sopimukseen sisältyvän velvoitteen rikkomisesta. 16.1.2 Edellä mainitut rajoitukset eivät kuitenkaan koske pakollisia lakisääteisiä vastuita, erityisesti, eivätkä Saksan voimassa olevan tuotevastuulain vaatimia korvausvastuita eivätkä vastuita, jotka aiheutuvat tuottamuksellisesti aiheutetuista henkilövahingoista eivätkä erityisen takuun ottamista vastattavaksi. 16.1.3 Käyttäjän on ryhdyttävä kaikkiin vaadittaviin toimenpiteisiin välttääkseen ja vähentääkseen vahinkojen syntymistä, erityisesti ottamalla Ohjelmistosta sekä tietokoneen tiedoista varmuuskopiot tämän sopimuksen ehtojen mukaisesti.

Mikäli Teillä on kysyttävää tähän sopimukseen liittyen tai mikäli haluatte pyytää Adobelta lisätietoja, ottakaa yhteyttä paikalliseen Adoben toimistoon käyttäen tämän tuotteen yhteydessä toimitettuja osoite- ja yhteystietoja, tai Internetin kautta osoitteessa www.adobe.com/fi.

Adobe, AIR, Authorware, Flash, Reader, ja Shockwave ovat Adobe Systems Incorporated -yhtiön rekisteröityjä tai rekisteröimättömiä tavaramerkkejä Yhdysvalloissa ja/tai muissa maissa.

Reader_Player_AIR_WWEULA-fi_FI-20080204_1313

 

ADOBE SYSTEMS INCORPORATED Exclusion de garantie et contrat de licence de logiciels CE DOCUMENT COMPREND LES INFORMATIONS SUR LA GARANTIE (PARTIE I) AINSI QU’UN CONTRAT DE LICENCE S’APPLIQUANT À L’UTILISATION DES LOGICIELS D’ADOBE (PARTIE II). PARTIE I. EXCLUSION DE GARANTIE. LE LOGICIEL ET LES INFORMATIONS CONNEXES SONT FOURNIES EN L’ÉTAT « TEL QUEL » ET PEUVENT CONTENIR DES DÉFAUTS. ADOBE, SES FOURNISSEURS ET LES AUTORITÉS DE CERTIFICATION NE GARANTISSENT PAS ET NE PEUVENT PAS GARANTIR LES PERFORMANCES OU LES RÉSULTATS OBTENUS EN UTILISANT LE LOGICIEL, LES SERVICES DE L’AUTORITÉ DE CERTIFICATION OU LES OFFRES TIERCES. SOUS RÉSERVE DES GARANTIES, CONDITIONS, REPRÉSENTATIONS OU AUTRES TERMES, QUI NE PEUVENT ÊTRE EXCLUS OU LIMITÉS PAR LA LOI LOCALE EN VIGUEUR, ADOBE ET SES FOURNISSEURS ET LES AUTORITÉS DE CERTIFICATION N’ACCORDENT AUCUNE GARANTIE, CONDITION, REPRÉSENTATION OU AUCUN TERME, EXPLICITE OU IMPLICITE, EN VERTU DE LA LOI, DE LA COMMON LAW, D’UNE COUTUME, D’UN USAGE OU AUTRE, CONCERNANT D’AUTRES SUJETS, Y COMPRIS NOTAMMENT, LA GARANTIE DE NON-VIOLATION DES DROITS D’UN TIERS, LA QUALITÉ MARCHANDE, L’INTÉGRATION, LA QUALITÉ SATISFAISANTE OU L’ADAPTATION À UN USAGE PARTICULIER. PARTIE II. CONTRAT DE LICENCE DE LOGICIEL EN UTILISANT, COPIANT OU DISTRIBUANT LE LOGICIEL OU TOUTE PARTIE DU LOGICIEL ADOBE, VOUS ACCEPTEZ TOUTES LES CONDITIONS DU PRÉSENT CONTRAT, Y COMPRIS, EN PARTICULIER, LES DISPOSITIONS RELATIVES À : L’UTILISATION DÉCRITE À L’ARTICLE 2 ; LES CONDITIONS DE TRANSFERT DÉCRITES À L’ARTICLE 4 ; LA CONNECTIVITÉ ET LA CONFIDENTIALITÉ DÉCRITES À L’ARTICLE 6, LA GARANTIE DÉCRITE À L’ARTICLE 9 ; ET LA RESPONSABILITÉ DÉCRITE AUX ARTICLES 10 ET 16. SI VOUS L’ACCEPTEZ, LE PRÉSENT CONTRAT EST EXÉCUTOIRE, POUR VOUS, POUR TOUTE ENTITÉ AYANT OBTENU LE LOGICIEL ET POUR LES PERSONNES QUI UTILISERONT LE LOGICIEL. N’UTILISEZ PAS LE LOGICIEL SI VOUS N’ACCEPTEZ PAS LES TERMES DE CE CONTRAT. ADOBE VOUS AUTORISE À UTILISER LE LOGICIEL UNIQUEMENT CONFORMÉMENT AUX TERMES DU PRÉSENT CONTRAT. L’UTILISATION DE CERTAINS COMPOSANTS APPARTENANT À DES TIERS INTÉGRÉS AU LOGICIEL PEUT ÊTRE SOUMISE À D’AUTRES CONDITIONS, GÉNÉRALEMENT ÉNONCÉES DANS UN CONTRAT DE LICENCE DISTINCT, DANS UN FICHIER « LISEZ-MOI » FOURNI AVEC CES COMPOSANTS, OU À LA SECTION « AVIS, ET AUTRES CONDITIONS DESTINÉES AUX UTILISATEURS DE LOGICIELS APPARTENANT À DES TIERS » ACCESSIBLE À http://www.adobe.com/go/thirdparty_fr. 1. Définitions. « Adobe » désigne Adobe Systems Incorporated, société immatriculée dans l’État du Delaware, sise 345 Park Avenue, San José, Californie, 95110 si l’article 12(a) du présent contrat s’applique ; dans le cas contraire, « Adobe » désigne Adobe Systems Software Ireland Limited, sise Unit 3100, Lake Drive, City West Campus, Saggart D24, République d’Irlande, société de droit irlandais et société affiliée et licenciée d’Adobe Systems Incorporated. Le terme « Ordinateur » désigne un appareil électronique personnel virtuel ou physique qui accepte les données au format numérique ou dans un format similaire et les traite en vue d’obtenir des résultats spécifiques à partir d’une séquence d’instructions. Le terme « Logiciel » désigne (a) tout le contenu des fichiers (téléchargés ou sur support physique) ou le ou les disques ou tout autre support fourni avec le présent contrat, pouvant contenir (i) le ou les logiciels ou données informatiques d’Adobe ou de tiers, dont Adobe Reader® (« Adobe Reader »), Adobe® AIR™ (« Adobe AIR »), Adobe Flash® Player, Shockwave® Player et Authorware® Player (Adobe AIR et les lecteurs

Flash, Shockwave et Authorware sont dénommés collectivement les « moteurs d’exécution Adobe ») ; (ii) les fichiers ou documents écrits explicatifs associés correspondants (la « Documentation ») ; et (iii) les polices de caractères, ainsi que (b) toutes les mises à niveau, versions modifiées, mises à jour, ajouts et copies du logiciel, pour lequel Adobe vous concède une licence (ci-après dénommés collectivement les « Mises à Jour »). Le terme « Utilisation » désigne l’accès au Logiciel, son installation, son téléchargement, sa copie ou tout autre avantage tiré de l’utilisation de ses fonctionnalités. 2. Concession de Licence. Si le Logiciel a été fourni par Adobe ou par l’un de ses licenciés agréés et sous réserve du respect des termes du présent contrat, notamment des limitations de l’Article 3, Adobe vous concède une licence non exclusive d’utilisation du Logiciel aux fins décrites dans la documentation comme suit. 2.1 Utilisation générale. Vous êtes autorisé à installer et à utiliser un exemplaire du Logiciel sur votre Ordinateur compatible. Consultez l’Article 3 pour connaître les importantes limitations d’utilisation du Logiciel. 2.2 Utilisation sur le serveur. Ce contrat ne vous autorise pas à installer ou utiliser le Logiciel sur un serveur de fichiers informatique. Pour obtenir plus d’informations sur l’utilisation du Logiciel sur un serveur de fichiers informatique, veuillez consulter http://www.adobe.com/go/acrobat_distribute_fr pour les informations sur Adobe Reader ou http://www.adobe.com/go/licensing_fr pour les informations sur les Moteurs d’exécution d’Adobe. 2.3 Distribution. Ce contrat ne vous accorde aucun droit de sous-licencier ou distribuer le Logiciel. Pour plus d’informations sur l’obtention du droit de distribution du Logiciel sur un support physique ou un réseau interne ou avec votre produit ou service, veuillez consulter http://www.adobe.com/go/acrobat_distribute_fr pour les informations sur Adobe Reader ou http://www.adobe.com/go/licensing_fr pour les informations sur les Moteurs d’exécution d’Adobe. 2.4 Copie de Sauvegarde. Vous pouvez effectuer une copie de sauvegarde du Logiciel à condition qu’elle ne soit pas installée ou utilisée. Vous n’êtes pas autorisé à transférer les droits sur une copie de sauvegarde, sauf si vous transférez tous les droits du Logiciel conformément à l’Article 4. 3. Obligations et limitations. 3.1 Limitations relatives aux Moteurs d’exécution Adobe. Vous n’êtes pas autorisé à utiliser de Moteurs d’exécutions Adobe sur un équipement autre qu’un ordinateur individuel ou sur toute version intégrée ou embarquée de tout système d’exploitation quel qu’il soit. Pour clarifier tout doute, et à titre d’exemple exclusivement, vous n’êtes pas autorisé à utiliser de Moteurs d’exécution Adobe sur (a) des périphériques mobiles, systèmes multimédias de salon, ordinateurs de poche, téléphones, tablettes Internet et tablettes PC (sous un système autre que Windows XP Tablet PC Edition et ses versions ultérieures), consoles de jeux, téléviseurs, lecteurs de DVD, centres multimédias (sous un système autre que Windows XP Édition Media Center et ses versions ultérieures), panneaux d’affichage électroniques ou autres appareils numériques de signalisation, périphériques Internet ou autres appareils connectés à l’Internet, assistants numériques personnels, équipements médicaux, distributeurs automatiques de billets, appareils télématiques, machines de jeux, systèmes d’automatisation domestiques, kiosques, télécommandes ou tout autre appareil électronique grand public, (b) des équipements de téléphonie mobile, systèmes de câble, satellite ou télévision ou (c) tout appareil à système fermé. Consultez http://www.adobe.com/go/licensing_fr pour plus d’informations sur la concession de licence de Moteurs d’exécution Adobe sur ces systèmes. 3.2 Limitations relatives à Adobe Reader. Adobe Reader est concédé et distribué par Adobe pour permettre l’affichage, la distribution et le partage de fichiers en format PDF. 3.2.1 Limitations de conversion. Vous n’êtes pas autorisé à intégrer Adobe Reader ni à l’utiliser conjointement à tout autre logiciel, extension ou amélioration qui utilise ou se base sur Adobe Reader pour convertir ou transformer des fichiers PDF dans un autre format de fichier (par exemple un fichier PDF dans un format de fichier TIFF, JPEG ou SVG).

3.2.2 Limitations d’extension. Vous n’êtes pas autorisé à intégrer ou utiliser Adobe Reader avec tout module d’extension qui n’a pas été développé conformément au Contrat de licence clé d’intégration d’Adobe (Integration Key License Agreement). 3.2.3 Fonctionnalités désactivées. Il se peut qu’Adobe Reader contienne des caractéristiques ou des fonctionnalités qui sont cachées, désactivées ou « grisées » (les « Fonctionnalités désactivées »). Ces fonctionnalités seront activées uniquement après l’ouverture d’un document PDF créé à l’aide de la technologie de validation correspondante disponible uniquement auprès d’Adobe. Vous n’êtes pas autorisé à accéder ou essayer d’accéder à une fonctionnalité désactivée sans utiliser ces technologies de validation. Vous ne pouvez pas non plus utiliser Adobe Reader pour créer une fonctionnalité fort semblable à une fonctionnalité désactivée ou pour contourner la technologie qui contrôle l’activation d’une telle fonctionnalité. Reportez-vous à http://www.adobe.com/go/readerextensions_fr pour obtenir plus d’informations sur les fonctionnalités désactivées. 3.3 Mentions de propriété. Toute copie du Logiciel que vous effectuez doit contenir les mêmes mentions de droits d’auteur et autres mentions relatives aux droits de propriété que celles qui apparaissent dans ou sur le Logiciel. 3.4 Aucune modification ou ingénierie inverse. Vous n’êtes pas autorisé à modifier, à adapter, à traduire ou à créer des produits dérivés du Logiciel. Vous n’êtes pas autorisé à effectuer d’ingénierie inverse, décompiler, désassembler le Logiciel, ni essayer de découvrir d’une manière quelconque son code source, sauf en accord explicite avec la loi en vigueur. 4. Transfert. Vous ne pouvez pas louer, donner en crédit-bail, sous-licencier, céder ou transférer vos droits relatifs au Logiciel ou autoriser la copie du Logiciel ou de toute partie du Logiciel sur l’Ordinateur d’un autre utilisateur sauf avec une autorisation explicite stipulée dans ce contrat. Vous pouvez toutefois transférer tous vos droits d’utilisation du Logiciel à une autre personne physique ou morale sous réserve que : (a) vous lui transfériez également (i) le présent contrat et (ii) le Logiciel ainsi que tous les autres logiciels ou matériels intégrés ou préinstallés avec le Logiciel, y compris toutes les copies, mises à jour et versions antérieures ; (b) vous ne conserviez aucune copie, y compris les copies de sauvegarde et celles qui sont stockées sur un Ordinateur ; et (c) le bénéficiaire accepte les conditions du présent contrat ainsi que toutes les autres conditions en vertu desquelles vous avez obtenu une licence valide du Logiciel. Nonobstant ce qui précède, vous vous interdisez de transférer les copies du Logiciel destinées à la formation, les pré-versions ou les copies non destinées à la vente. 5. Droits de propriété intellectuelle et conservation des droits. Le Logiciel et toute copie autorisée que vous effectuez sont la propriété intellectuelle d’Adobe Systems Incorporated et de ses fournisseurs. La structure, l’organisation et le code du Logiciel constituent des secrets commerciaux et des informations confidentielles de valeur d’Adobe Systems Incorporated et de ses fournisseurs. Le Logiciel est protégé par la loi, y compris, notamment, par les lois américaines et d’autres pays sur les droits d’auteur (« copyright »), et par les dispositions des traités internationaux. Sauf disposition expresse des présentes, le présent contrat ne vous concède aucun droit de propriété intellectuelle sur le Logiciel et Adobe et ses fournisseurs se réservent tous les droits qui ne sont pas expressément concédés. 6. Connectivité et confidentialité. 6.1 Utilisation des fichiers PDF. Lorsque vous utilisez le Logiciel pour ouvrir un fichier PDF dans lequel l’affichage de publicités a été activé au moyen du service « Ads for Adobe PDF », votre ordinateur se connecte à un site Web géré par Adobe, un annonceur ou un autre tiers. Lorsque ceci se produit, votre adresse IP (Internet Protocol) est communiquée. Le gérant du site peut utiliser des technologies pour envoyer (ou « offrir ») des annonces ou tout autre contenu électronique qui apparaît à l’intérieur ou près du fichier ouvert. L’exploitant du site Web peut aussi utiliser JavaScript, des pixels invisibles (aussi appelés pixels espions ou GIF invisibles) et d’autres technologies pour améliorer et mesurer l’efficacité des publicités et pour personnaliser le contenu publicitaire. Vos communications avec les sites Web d’Adobe sont régies par la Charte de traitement des données personnelles disponible à l’adresse http://www.adobe.com/go/privacy_fr. Adobe peut ne pas avoir accès à des fonctionnalités

utilisées par un tiers ou les contrôler, de sorte que le traitement des données par des sites Web tiers n’est pas régi par la Charte de traitement des données personnelles. 6.2 Mise à jour. Vous reconnaissez et acceptez que le Logiciel puisse entraîner la connexion automatique de l’Ordinateur à l’Internet pour vérifier la disponibilité de mises à jour pour un téléchargement automatique sur votre Ordinateur et pour communiquer le bon déroulement de l’installation à Adobe. Lorsque ceci se produit, seules des informations sur l’identification non personnelles sont transmises à Adobe. Vos communications avec les sites Web d’Adobe sont régies par la Charte de traitement des données personnelles se trouvant à http://www.adobe.com/go/privacy_fr. Consultez la Documentation pour apprendre comment modifier les réglages de mise à jour par défaut. 6.3 Gestionnaire de configuration. Flash Player peut stocker certains réglages d’utilisateur sur votre Ordinateur comme objet local partagé. Ces éléments de configuration ne vous sont pas associés, mais vous permettent de gérer certains éléments de configuration dans le cadre de Flash Player. Vous trouverez plus d’informations sur les objets partagés locaux sur le site http://www.adobe.com/go/flashplayer_security_fr et plus d’informations sur le Gestionnaire de configuration sur le site http://www.adobe.com/go/settingsmanager_fr. 7. Offres tierces. Il est possible que le Logiciel permette d’accéder à des sites Web, applications et services d’accès aux données tiers, y compris des applications Internet riches (« Offres tierces »). L’accès aux sites Web tiers et leur utilisation, y compris les produits, services ou informations disponibles sur de tels sites, sont régis par les dispositions relatives à ces offres. Les Offres tierces ne sont ni détenues, ni fournies par Adobe. 8. Certificats numériques. 8.1 Utilisation. Adobe AIR utilise des certificats numériques pour vous aider à identifier l’éditeur des applications tierces Adobe AIR. Adobe Reader utilise des certificats numériques pour signer et valider les signatures dans les documents PDF ainsi que pour valider les documents PDF certifiés. Votre Ordinateur peut se connecter à l’Internet au moment de la validation du certificat numérique. Les certificats numériques sont délivrés par des autorités de certification tierces, y compris les fournisseurs d’Adobe Certified Document Services (CDS) publiés à l’adresse http://www.adobe.com/go/partners_cds_fr (« Certificate Authorities ») ou peuvent être signés par vous-même. 8.2 Dispositions. L’achat, l’utilisation et la fiabilité des certificats numériques sont votre responsabilité et celle de l’autorité de certification. Avant d’utiliser un document certifié, une signature numérique ou les services d’une autorité de certification, vous devriez prendre connaissance des dispositions régissant les services de l’autorité de certification, y compris, par exemple, tout contrat d’adhésion, contrat de tiers dépendant, règlement relatif au certificat et code déontologique. Pour plus d’informations sur les fournisseurs CDS d’Adobe, veuillez consulter http://www.adobe.com/go/partners_cds_fr. 8.3 Accord. Vous acceptez que : (a) un certificat numérique peut avoir été annulé avant sa vérification, de sorte que la signature ou le certificat numérique apparaît alors incorrectement valide ; (b) la sécurité ou l’intégrité d’un certificat numérique risque d’être compromise par un acte ou une omission du signataire du document, de l’autorité de certification, ou de tout autre tiers ; et (c) un certificat peut être un certificat personnel signé par la personne qui n’a pas été fourni par une autorité de certification. VOUS ASSUMEZ ENTIÈREMENT LA RESPONSABILITÉ DE LA DÉCISION D’UTILISER OU NON UN CERTIFICAT. VOUS UTILISEZ LES CERTIFICATS NUMÉRIQUES À VOS PROPRES RISQUES À MOINS QU’UNE GARANTIE ÉCRITE SÉPARÉE NE VOUS SOIT OFFERTE PAR UNE AUTORITÉ DE CERTIFICATION. 8.4 Tiers bénéficiaires. Vous acceptez que toute autorité de certification soit une tierce bénéficiaire de ce contrat et ait le droit de faire appliquer lesdites dispositions en son propre nom, au même titre qu’Adobe. 8.5 Indemnité. Vous vous engagez à exonérer Adobe et toute autre autorité de certification (sauf disposition explicite contraire de ses conditions d’utilisation) de toutes responsabilités, pertes, actions, dommages-intérêts ou réclamations (y compris les dépenses, coûts et honoraires d’avocat raisonnables) résultant de ou liés à l’utilisation de tout service d’une autorité de certification, notamment (a) l’utilisation d’un certificat périmé ou annulé ; (b) la vérification insuffisante d’un certificat ; (c) l’utilisation d’un certificat autre que celui qui est autorisé par toute

disposition pertinente, par le présent contrat ou par toute loi en vigueur ; (d) le manque de discernement raisonnable au vu des circonstances en ce qui concerne les certificats ou services de l’émetteur ; ou (e) le non-respect des obligations telles qu’énoncées dans les conditions pertinentes aux services. 9. Exclusion de garantie. Le logiciel est fourni en l’état « TEL QUEL » et peut contenir des DÉFAUTS. ADOBE, SES FOURNISSEURS ET LES AUTORITÉS DE CERTIFICATION NE GARANTISSENT PAS ET NE PEUVENT PAS GARANTIR LES PERFORMANCES OU LES RÉSULTATS OBTENUS EN UTILISANT LE LOGICIEL, LES SERVICES DE L’AUTORITÉ DE CERTIFICATION OU LES OFFRES TIERCES. SOUS RÉSERVE DES GARANTIES, CONDITIONS, REPRÉSENTATIONS OU AUTRES TERMES, QUI NE PEUVENT ÊTRE EXCLUS OU LIMITÉS PAR LA LOI LOCALE EN VIGUEUR, ADOBE ET SES FOURNISSEURS ET LES AUTORITÉS DE CERTIFICATION N’ACCORDENT AUCUNE GARANTIE, CONDITION, REPRÉSENTATION OU TERME, EXPLICITE OU IMPLICITE, EN VERTU DE LA LOI, DE LA COMMON LAW, D’UNE COUTUME, D’UN USAGE OU AUTRE, CONCERNANT D’AUTRES SUJETS, Y COMPRIS NOTAMMENT, LA GARANTIE DE NON-VIOLATION DES DROITS D’UN TIERS, LA QUALITÉ MARCHANDE, L’INTÉGRATION, LA QUALITÉ SATISFAISANTE OU L’ADAPTATION À UN USAGE PARTICULIER. Les dispositions des Articles 9 et 10 resteront en vigueur après la résiliation du présent contrat, quelle qu’en soit la cause, mais cela ne sousentend pas ou ne crée pas de droits d’utilisation permanents du Logiciel après la résiliation du présent Contrat. 10. Limitation de responsabilité. EN AUCUN CAS ADOBE, SES FOURNISSEURS OU LES AUTORITÉS DE CERTIFICATION NE SONT RESPONSABLES DE DOMMAGES-INTÉRÊTS, RÉCLAMATIONS OU COÛTS DE QUELQUE NATURE QUE CE SOIT, Y COMPRIS DE TOUS DOMMAGES CONSÉCUTIFS, INDIRECTS OU ACCIDENTELS, DE TOUT MANQUE À GAGNER, ET CE MÊME SI UN REPRÉSENTANT D’ADOBE A ÉTÉ INFORMÉ DE LA POSSIBILITÉ DE TELS DOMMAGES, PERTES OU RÉCLAMATIONS. LES LIMITATIONS ET EXCLUSIONS CI-DESSUS S’APPLIQUENT DÈS LORS QU’ELLES SONT AUTORISÉES PAR LA LOI APPLICABLE DANS VOTRE JURIDICTION. LA RESPONSABILITÉ GÉNÉRALE D’ADOBE ET DE SES FOURNISSEURS AINSI QUE DES AUTORITÉS DE CERTIFICATION DANS LE CADRE DE CE CONTRAT OU EN RAPPORT AVEC CE DERNIER, EST LIMITÉE AU MONTANT VERSÉ POUR L’ACQUISITION DU LOGICIEL, LE CAS ÉCHÉANT. Aucune disposition du présent contrat ne limite la responsabilité d’Adobe envers vous en cas de décès ou de préjudices corporels résultant d’une négligence de la part d’Adobe ou d’un acte frauduleux. Adobe agit pour le compte de ses fournisseurs et des autorités de certification en ce qui concerne l’exclusion et/ou la limitation d’obligations, de garanties et de responsabilités, tel qu’indiqué dans le présent contrat, mais à aucun autre égard et dans aucun autre but. Pour tout autre renseignement, veuillez consulter les informations relatives à chaque juridiction à la fin de ce contrat, s’il y a lieu, ou contactez le Service clientèle d’Adobe (Adobe Customer Support Department). 11. Lois sur l’Exportation. Vous acceptez que le Logiciel ne soit pas utilisé, expédié, transféré ou exporté vers un pays ou utilisé d’une manière interdite par la United States Export Administration Act (loi américaine sur le contrôle des exportations) ou par toutes autres lois, restrictions ou réglementations concernant l’exportation (ci-après collectivement les « Lois sur l’exportation »). En outre, si le Logiciel est identifié comme étant un article dont l’exportation est contrôlée dans le cadre des Lois sur l’exportation, vous reconnaissez et garantissez que vous n’êtes pas citoyen ou résident, d’une nation frappée d’embargo (y compris, notamment, l’Iran, la Syrie, le Soudan, Cuba et la Corée du Nord) et que les Lois sur l’exportation ne vous interdisent pas non plus de recevoir le Logiciel. Tous les droits d’utilisation du Logiciel sont concédés sous réserve que vous en soyez déchu dans le cas où vous ne respecteriez pas les clauses du présent contrat. 12. Loi applicable.

Le présent contrat est régi par et interprété selon les droits positifs en vigueur : (a) dans l’État de Californie si vous avez acheté une licence du Logiciel aux États-Unis, au Canada ou au Mexique ; ou (b) au Japon, si vous avez acheté une licence du Logiciel au Japon, en Chine, en Corée ou dans tout autre pays d’Asie du Sud-est dans lequel toutes les langues officielles s’écrivent en script idéographique (par exemple le Hanzi, Kanji ou Hanja) et/ou dans d’autres scripts de même structure ou de structure similaire, comme le Hangul ou le Kana ; ou (c) en Angleterre, si vous avez obtenu une licence du Logiciel dans toute autre juridiction non mentionnée ci-dessus. Les tribunaux respectifs du comté de Santa Clara en Californie, lorsque s’applique la loi de l’État de Californie, du Tokyo District Court au Japon, lorsque s’applique la loi du Japon, et les tribunaux compétents de Londres, Angleterre, lorsque s’applique la loi anglaise, ont chacun juridiction non exclusive sur tous les conflits liés à ce Contrat. Le présent contrat n’est pas régi par les règles de conflits de lois de ces pays, ni par la Convention des Nations Unies sur les contrats de vente internationale de marchandises, dont l’application est expressément exclue. 13. Stipulations générales. Si une disposition du présent contrat s’avère nulle et non exécutoire, cela n’affectera pas la validité des autres dispositions du présent contrat qui resteront valables et exécutoires, selon ses termes. Les dispositions du présent contrat ne doivent pas affecter les droits statutaires de toute partie agissant en qualité de consommateur. Le présent contrat ne peut être modifié que par un document écrit signé par un responsable d’Adobe dûment habilité à cet effet. Des mises à jour contenant des conditions supplémentaires ou différentes peuvent vous être concédées par Adobe. Ceci constitue l’intégralité du contrat conclu entre Adobe et vous-même concernant le Logiciel ; il se substitue à toutes déclarations, discussions, engagements, communications ou publicités antérieures relatives au Logiciel. 14. Avis aux utilisateurs finaux du Gouvernement des États-Unis. Dans le cas d’utilisateurs finaux travaillant pour le gouvernement des États-Unis, Adobe s’engage à se conformer à toutes les lois en vigueur sur l’égalité des chances, y compris, s’il y a lieu, aux dispositions du décret-loi (Executive Order) 11246, telles que modifiées, du Paragraphe 402 de la Vietnam Era Veterans Readjustment Assistance Act (loi sur l’aide à la réadaptation des vétérans du Vietnam) de 1974 (38 USC 4212), et du Paragraphe 503 de la Rehabilitation Act (loi sur la réhabilitation) de 1973, tel que modifié, et aux réglementations spécifiées à l’Article 41 CFR sections 60-1 à 60-60, 60-250, et 60-741. Les réglementations et les dispositions relatives aux actions affirmatives contenues dans la phrase précédente devront être intégrées par référence au présent contrat. 15. Respect des licences. Si vous êtes une entreprise ou un organisme, vous vous engagez à prouver et certifier, dans un délai de trente (30) jours, à la demande d’Adobe ou d’un de ses représentants agréés, qu’à la date de ladite demande, l’utilisation de tous logiciels quelconques est conforme aux licences en vigueur concédées par Adobe. 16. Exceptions et dispositions particulières. 16.1 Limitation de responsabilité applicable aux Utilisateurs résidant en Allemagne et en Autriche. 16.1.1 Si vous avez obtenu le Logiciel en Allemagne ou en Autriche et que vous résidez principalement dans l’un de ces pays, l’Article 10 n’est pas applicable. En revanche, sous réserve des dispositions de l’Article 16.1.2, la responsabilité légale d’Adobe en ce qui concerne les dommages-intérêts sera limitée comme suit : (i) Adobe ne peut être tenu responsable que des dommages typiquement prévisibles au moment de la conclusion du contrat de licence en ce qui concerne les dommages causés par une légère violation par négligence d’une obligation contractuelle importante et (ii) Adobe ne peut pas être tenu responsable des dommages causés par une légère violation par négligence d’une obligation contractuelle peu importante. 16.1.2 Les limitations de responsabilité susmentionnées ne s’appliquent pas dans le cas d’une responsabilité légale obligatoire et plus particulièrement, de celle qui est établie dans le cadre de la loi allemande applicable sur la responsabilité de fait des produits, de celle qui est liée à une garantie spécifique ou de celle qui est liée aux préjudices corporels causés de manière volontaire.

16.1.3 Vous êtes tenu de prendre toutes les mesures raisonnables pour éviter et réduire les dommages, en particulier de faire des copies de sauvegarde du Logiciel et de vos données informatiques sous réserve des dispositions du présent contrat.

Si vous avez des questions concernant le présent Contrat ou si vous souhaitez obtenir des informations auprès d’Adobe, veuillez vous reporter aux coordonnées du service d’informations jointes à ce produit ou au site www.adobe.com/fr pour contacter le bureau d’Adobe de votre région. Adobe AIR, Authorware, Flash, Reader, et Shockwave sont soit des marques déposées, soit des marques commerciales d’Adobe Systems Incorporated aux États-Unis et/ou dans d’autres pays.

Reader_Player_AIR_WWEULA-fr_FR-20080204_1313

 

ADOBE SYSTEMS INCORPORATED Gewährleistungsausschluss und Software-Lizenzvertrag. DIESES DOKUMENT ENTHÄLT INFORMATIONEN ZUR GEWÄHRLEISTUNG (TEIL I) UND EINEN LIZENZVERTRAG FÜR DIE VERWENDUNG VON ADOBE-SOFTWARE (TEIL II). TEIL I. GEWÄHRLEISTUNGSAUSSCHLUSS. DIE SOFTWARE UND ANDERE INFORMATIONEN WERDEN „WIE BESEHEN“ UND MIT ALLEN MÄNGELN ZUR VERFÜGUNG GESTELLT. ADOBE, SEINE LIEFERANTEN UND SEINE ZERTIFIZIERUNGSDIENSTANBIETER KÖNNEN KEINE GEWÄHRLEISTUNG FÜR DIE LEISTUNGSFÄHIGKEIT DER SOFTWARE ODER DIE ERZIELTEN ARBEITSERGEBNISSE BEI VERWENDUNG DER SOFTWARE BZW. BEI INANSPRUCHNAHME VON DIENSTEN VON ZERTIFIZIERUNGSDIENSTANBIETERN ODER ANDEREN ANGEBOTEN DRITTER ÜBERNEHMEN. ADOBE, SEINE LIEFERANTEN UND SEINE ZERTIFIZIERUNGSDIENSTANBIETER GEWÄHREN KEINE GARANTIEN, ZUSICHERUNGEN, BESTIMMUNGEN ODER BEDINGUNGEN (AUSDRÜCKLICHER ODER STILLSCHWEIGENDER NATUR, DIE ENTWEDER AUS DER NUTZUNG ODER EINEM HANDELSBRAUCH ENTSTEHEN, ODER AUS GESETZLICHEN, GEWOHNHEITSRECHTLICHTEN ODER ANDEREN VORSCHRIFTEN ABGELEITET WERDEN) HINSICHTLICH MARKTGÄNGIGKEIT, RECHTSMÄNGELFREIHEIT, INTEGRIERUNG, ZUFRIEDENSTELLENDER QUALITÄT ODER BRAUCHBARKEIT FÜR BESTIMMTE ZWECKE, ES SEI DENN, DERARTIGE GARANTIEN, ZUSICHERUNGEN, BESTIMMUNGEN ODER BEDINGUNGEN SIND GEMÄSS GELTENDEM RECHT DER JEWEILIGEN RECHTSORDNUNG VORGESCHRIEBEN UND KÖNNEN NICHT EINGESCHRÄNKT WERDEN. TEIL II. SOFTWARE-LIZENZVERTRAG. WENN SIE DIE ADOBE SOFTWARE VOLLSTÄNDIG ODER IN TEILEN VERWENDEN, KOPIEREN ODER VERTREIBEN, AKZEPTIEREN SIE ALLE BESTIMMUNGEN DIESES VERTRAGES, EINSCHLIESSLICH UND INSBESONDERE DIE FOLGENDEN EINSCHRÄNKUNGEN: VERWENDUNG GEMÄSS ZIFFER 2, ÜBERTRAGBARKEIT GEMÄSS ZIFFER 4, KONNEKTIVITÄT UND DATENSCHUTZ GEMÄSS ZIFFER 6, GEWÄHRLEISTUNG GEMÄSS ZIFFER 9 UND HAFTUNG GEMÄSS ZIFFERN 10 UND 16. BEI ANNAHME IST DIESER VERTRAG IHNEN UND JEDER JURISTISCHEN PERSON GEGENÜBER, DIE DIE SOFTWARE ERHALTEN HAT UND IN DEREN NAMEN SIE GENUTZT WIRD, EINKLAGBAR. WENN SIE DEN BEDINGUNGEN NICHT ZUSTIMMEN, VERWENDEN SIE DIESE SOFTWARE BITTE NICHT. ADOBE ERLAUBT IHNEN DIE VERWENDUNG DER SOFTWARE NUR GEMÄSS DEN BESTIMMUNGEN DIESES VERTRAGS. PRODUKTE VON DRITTEN, DIE IN DER SOFTWARE ENTHALTEN SIND, KÖNNEN ANDEREN GESCHÄFTBEDINGUNGEN UNTERLIEGEN. INFORMATIONEN HIERZU FINDEN SIE NORMALERWEISE IN FORM EINES SEPARATEN LIZENZVERTRAGS, IN DER SOLCHEN PRODUKTEN BEIGEFÜGTEN „READ-ME“-DATEI ODER IN FORM VON „FREMDSOFTWARE-VERMERKEN UND/ODER ZUSÄTZLICHEN BEDINGUNGEN“, DIE UNTER http://www.adobe.com/go/thirdparty_de EINSEHBAR SIND. 1. Definitionen. „Adobe“ steht für Adobe Systems Incorporated, eine Delaware-Kapitalgesellschaft mit Hauptsitz in 345 Park Avenue, San Jose, California 95110, USA, wenn Ziffer 12(a) dieses Vertrags Anwendung findet; in anderen Fällen steht „Adobe“ für Adobe Systems Software Ireland Limited, Unit 3100, Lake Drive, City West Campus, Saggart D24, Republik Irland, eine Gesellschaft nach den Gesetzen Irlands und ein Konzernunternehmen und Lizenznehmer von Adobe Systems Incorporated. „Computer“ steht für einen virtuellen oder physischen elektronischen Arbeitsplatzrechner, der Informationen in digitaler oder ähnlicher Form aufnehmen und in ein spezielles Resultat entsprechend einer Befehlsfolge umformen kann. „Software” umfasst (a) den gesamten Inhalt der Dateien (gleich ob

elektronisch oder auf physischen Datenträgern bereitgestellt), der Diskette(n) oder eines anderen Datenträgers, mit dem dieser Vertrag geliefert wird. Dazu gehören unter anderem (i) Computerinformationen oder Software von Adobe oder Dritten, einschließlich Adobe Reader® („Adobe Reader“), Adobe® AIR™ („Adobe AIR“), Adobe Flash® Player, Shockwave® Player und Authorware® Player (Adobe AIR und Flash, Shockwave und Authorware Player zusammenfassend als „Adobe Runtimes“ bezeichnet); (ii) dazugehörige Begleitmaterialien oder Dateien („Dokumentation“) sowie (iii) Schrifttypen und (b) alle Upgrades, modifizierten Versionen, Updates, Ergänzungen sowie deren Kopien, die Ihnen Adobe zu irgendeinem Zeitpunkt zur Verfügung stellt (zusammenfassend „Updates“). Der Begriff „Verwendung“ bezieht sich auf den Zugriff, die Installation, das Herunterladen, das Kopieren oder eine anderweitige Nutzung der Funktionen der Software. 2. Softwarelizenz. Sofern Sie die Software von Adobe oder von einem seiner autorisierten Lizenznehmer bezogen haben und solange Sie die Bestimmungen dieses Vertrags, einschließlich der Beschränkungen aus Absatz 3, einhalten, gewährt Ihnen Adobe eine nicht exklusive Lizenz zur Verwendung der Software in der in der Dokumentation beschriebenen Weise und zu den darin beschriebenen Zwecken gemäß den nachfolgenden Bestimmungen. 2.1 Allgemeine Verwendung. Sie dürfen eine Kopie der Software auf Ihrem kompatiblen Computer installieren und verwenden. Wichtige Beschränkungen bei der Verwendung der Software finden Sie in Ziffer 3. 2.2 Serververwendung. Dieser Vertrag berechtigt Sie nicht zur Installation oder Verwendung der Software auf einem Dateiserver eines Computers. Informationen zur Verwendung von Software auf einem Dateiserver eines Computers finden Sie unter http://www.adobe.com/go/acrobat_distribute_de (Adobe Reader) bzw. unter http://www.adobe.com/go/licensing_de (Adobe Runtimes). 2.3 Verbreitung. Diese Lizenz berechtigt Sie nicht zur Unterlizenzierung oder zum Vertrieb der Software. Informationen zur Erlangung des Rechts zum Vertrieb der Software auf beweglichen Datenträgern oder über ein internes Netzwerk oder mit Ihrem Produkt oder Dienst finden Sie unter http://www.adobe.com/go/acrobat_distribute_de (Adobe Reader) bzw. http://www.adobe.com/go/licensing_de (Adobe Runtimes). 2.4 Sicherungskopie. Sie sind zur Erstellung einer Sicherungskopie der Software unter der Voraussetzung berechtigt, dass diese Sicherungskopie nicht installiert oder verwendet wird. Eine Übertragung der Rechte zur Erstellung einer Sicherungskopie ist nicht zulässig, es sei denn, es werden sämtliche Rechte an der Software gemäß Ziffer 4 übertragen. 3. Verpflichtungen und Einschränkungen. 3.1 Adobe Runtime Nutzungsbeschränkungen. Sie dürfen kein Adobe Runtime auf Geräten verwenden, die keine PCs sind, oder mit einer integrierten oder einer Geräteversion eines Betriebsystems nutzen. Sie dürfen Adobe Runtime beispielsweise u.a. nicht auf (a) mobilen Geräten, Digitalempfängern (STB), tragbaren Geräten, Telefonen, Web-Pads, Tablets und Tablet PCs, die nicht mit Windows XP Tablet PC Edition oder ihren Folgeversionen arbeiten, Spielkonsolen, Fernsehgeräten, DVD-Spielern, Media Centern (ausgenommen Windows XP Media Center Edition und ihre Folgeversionen), digitalen Werbetafeln oder anderen digitalen Schildern, Internetanwendungen oder anderen mit dem Internet verbundenen Geräten, PDAs, medizinischen Geräten, Geldautomaten, telematischen Geräten, Spielautomaten, Haustechnik-Systemen, Kiosken, fernbedienten Geräten oder anderen elektronischen Verbrauchergeräten, (b) betreiberbasierten mobilen, Kabel-, Satelliten- oder Fernsehsystemen oder (c) anderen Geräten mit einem geschlossenen System verwenden. Informationen zur Lizenzierung von Adobe Runtimes zur Verwendung mit derartigen Systemen finden Sie unter http://www.adobe.com/go/licensing_de. 3.2 Adobe Reader Nutzungsbeschränkungen. Adobe Reader wird von Adobe zur Anzeige, Veröffentlichung und gemeinsamen Nutzung von PDF-Dateien in Lizenz vergeben und verteilt. 3.2.1 Konvertierungsbeschränkungen. Sie sind nicht befugt, den Adobe Reader mit anderer Software, Plug-Ins oder Erweiterungen zu integrieren oder zu verwenden, die sich bei der Konvertierung oder Umwandlung von PDFDateien in ein anderes Dateiformat auf den Adobe Reader stützen oder diesen verwenden (z. B. die Konvertierung von PDF-Dateien in TIFF-, JPEG- oder SVG-Dateien).

3.2.2 Plug-In-Beschränkungen. Ferner sind Sie nicht berechtigt, den Adobe Reader mit Plug-In-Software zu integrieren oder zu verwenden, die nicht gemäß dem Adobe Integration Key-Lizenzvertrag entwickelt wurde. 3.2.3 Deaktivierte Funktionen. Adobe Reader kann Funktionen enthalten, die verborgen oder ausgeblendet sind oder deaktiviert angezeigt werden („deaktivierte Funktionen“). Deaktivierte Funktionen werden nur beim Öffnen von PDF-Dokumenten aktiviert, die mit der entsprechenden, nur von Adobe erhältlichen Aktivierungstechnologie erstellt wurden. Es ist Ihnen nicht gestattet, außer durch Verwendung derartiger Aktivierungstechnologien auf deaktivierte Funktionen zuzugreifen oder dies zu versuchen, und Sie dürfen sich weder auf Adobe Reader stützen, um eine Funktion zu erstellen, die einer deaktivierten Funktion im Wesentlichen ähnlich ist, noch die Technologie, die die Aktivierung einer derartigen Funktion steuert, auf andere Weise umgehen. Zusätzliche Informationen zu deaktivierten Funktionen finden Sie unter http://www.adobe.com/go/readerextensions_de. 3.3 Schutzvermerke. Jede Kopie der Software, die Sie anfertigen, muss dieselben Urheberrechts- und Schutzrechtsvermerke tragen, die auch auf oder in der Software selbst vorhanden sind. 3.4 Keine Modifizierung oder Rückentwicklung. Das Ändern, Anpassen, Übersetzen oder Erstellen von Bearbeitungen der Software ist Ihnen nicht gestattet. Sie dürfen die Software nicht zurückentwickeln, dekompilieren bzw. disassemblieren oder auf andere Weise versuchen, den Quellcode der Software zu ermitteln, ausgenommen in dem Maße, in dem Sie gemäß geltendem Recht eine Rückentwicklung oder Dekompilierung vornehmen dürfen. 4. Übertragung. Mit Ausnahme der in diesem Vertrag ausdrücklich erlaubten Fälle dürfen Sie die Rechte an der Software nicht vermieten, verleihen, unterlizenzieren, abtreten oder übertragen oder das Kopieren der Software weder in Teilen noch als Ganzes auf den Computer eines anderen Benutzers genehmigen. Sie dürfen jedoch alle Ihre Rechte zur Verwendung der Software auf eine andere natürliche oder juristische Person unter der Voraussetzung übertragen, dass: (a) Sie den (i) vorliegenden Vertrag und (ii) die Software und sonstige Software oder Hardware, die mit der Software gebündelt oder auf dieser vorinstalliert ist, einschließlich aller Kopien, Updates und früherer Versionen an diese natürliche oder juristische Person übertragen, (b) Sie keine Kopien, einschließlich Sicherungskopien und sonstiger Kopien, die auf einem Computer gespeichert sind, zurückbehalten und (c) der Empfänger die Bestimmungen dieses Vertrags sowie sonstige Bestimmungen akzeptiert, nach denen Sie eine gültige Softwarelizenz erworben haben. Ungeachtet der vorstehenden Ausführungen, dürfen Sie keine Schulungs-, Vorab- oder Musterkopien der Software übertragen. 5. Rechte an geistigem Eigentum, Rechtsvorbehalte. Die Software und sämtliche autorisierten Kopien dieser Software, die Sie anfertigen, sind geistiges Eigentum von Adobe Systems Incorporated und seinen Lieferanten. Struktur, Organisation und Code der Software stellen wertvolle Betriebsgeheimnisse und vertrauliche Informationen von Adobe Systems Incorporated und seinen Lieferanten dar. Die Software ist gesetzlich geschützt, einschließlich des Urheberrechts der Vereinigten Staaten und anderer Länder sowie durch internationale Verträge. Ausgenommen der vorliegenden Ausführungen, gewährt Ihnen dieser Vertrag keinerlei geistige Eigentumsrechte an der Software, und alle nicht ausdrücklich gewährten Rechte sind Adobe und seinen Lieferanten vorbehalten. 6. Konnektivität und Datenschutz. 6.1 Verwendung von PDF-Dateien. Wenn Sie die Software zum Öffnen einer PDF-Datei verwenden, die durch Anmeldung beim Dienst „Werbung für Adobe-PDF-Dateien“ zur Anzeige von Werbung aktiviert wurde, kann Ihr Computer eine Verbindung zu einer von Adobe, einer Werbeagentur oder einem anderen Dritten betriebenen Website herstellen. In diesem Fall wird Ihre IP-Adresse (Internetprotokolladresse) gesendet. Der Betreiber der Website kann Technologien zum Senden (oder „Darbieten“) von Werbung oder anderem elektronischen Inhalt, der sich in der geöffneten Datei oder in deren Nähe befindet, verwenden. Der Website-Betreiber kann auch JavaScript, Zählpixel (diese werden auch als Webwanzen oder Einzelpixel-GIF bezeichnet) und andere Technologien verwenden, um die Wirksamkeit von Werbung zu erhöhen und zu messen und den Inhalt der Werbung individuell anzupassen. Ihre Kommunikation mit Websites von Adobe unterliegt der Richtlinie für den Online-Datenschutz von

Adobe, die Sie unter http://www.adobe.com/go/privacy_de finden. Adobe hat unter Umständen keinen Zugriff auf bzw. keine Kontrolle über von Dritten verwendete Funktionen, und die Informationspraktiken im Zusammenhang mit Websites von Dritten unterliegen nicht der Richtlinie für den Online-Datenschutz von Adobe. 6.2 Aktualisierungen. Sie geben Ihre Zustimmung dazu, dass die Software Ihren Computer dazu veranlassen kann, automatisch eine Verbindung zum Internet herzustellen, um zu überprüfen, ob Updates zum automatischen Herunterladen auf Ihren Computer verfügbar sind, und Adobe zu melden, dass die Software erfolgreich installiert wurde. In diesem Fall werden Adobe nur nicht personenbezogene Erkennungsinformationen übermittelt. Ihre Kommunikation mit Websites von Adobe unterliegt der Richtlinie für den Online-Datenschutz von Adobe, die Sie unter http://www.adobe.com/go/privacy_de finden. Informationen zum Ändern standardmäßiger Aktualisierungseinstellungen finden Sie in der Dokumentation. 6.3 Einstellungsmanager. Bei Verwendung des Flash Player können bestimmte Nutzereinstellungen als LSO (Local Shared Object) auf Ihrem Computer gespeichert werden. Diese Einstellungen werden nicht mit Ihnen in Verbindung gebracht, erlauben es Ihnen aber, bestimmte Einstellungen Ihres Flash Payers zu konfigurieren. Weitere Informationen zu LSO finden sie unter http://www.adobe.com/go/flashplayer_security_de, weitere Informationen zum Einstellungsmanager unter http://www.adobe.com/go/settingsmanager_de. 7. Angebote Dritter. Die Software ermöglicht Ihnen ggf. den Zugriff auf Websites, Softwareanwendungen und Datendienste Dritter einschließlich RIA (Rich Internet Applications) und deren Interoperation („Angebote Dritter“). Der Zugriff auf Angebote Dritter einschließlich Waren, Dienste oder Informationen und deren Verwendung unterliegen den Bestimmungen der jeweiligen Angebote. Die Angebote Dritter sind nicht Eigentum von Adobe und werden nicht von Adobe bereitgestellt. 8. Digitale Zertifikate. 8.1 Verwendung. Adobe AIR verwendet digitale Zertifikate zur Identifizierung des Herausgebers von Adobe AIRAnwendungen, die von Dritten erstellt wurden. Adobe Reader verwendet digitale Zertifikate zur Ausstellung und Validierung von Signaturen in PDF-Dokumenten und zur Validierung zertifizierter PDF-Dokumente. Bei der Validierung eines digitalen Zertifikats kann Ihr Computer eine Verbindung zum Internet herstellen. Digitale Zertifikate werden von Zertifizierungsdiensten Dritter, einschließlich der unter http://www.adobe.com/go/partners_cds_de aufgeführten Zertifizierungsdienstanbieter von Adobe, („Zertifizierungsdienste“) erstellt oder können selbst ausgestellt werden. 8.2 Bestimmungen. Der Erwerb und die Verwendung von digitalen Zertifikaten sowie das damit verbundene Vertrauen unterliegt Ihrer Verantwortung und der Verantwortung eines Zertifizierungsdienstes. Bevor Sie auf ein zertifiziertes Dokument, eine digitale Signatur oder Zertifizierungsdienste vertrauen, sollten Sie die geltenden Bedingungen durchlesen, zu denen der jeweilige Zertifizierungsdienstanbieter die Dienste anbietet, insbesondere z.B. Bezugsverträge, Vereinbarungen mit vertrauenden Parteien, Zertifizierungsrichtlinien und Geschäftsgepflogenheiten. Unter http://www.adobe.com/go/partners_cds_de finden Sie Informationen zu den Zertifizierungsdienstanbietern von Adobe. 8.3 Anerkenntnis. Sie erklären sich damit einverstanden, dass (a) ein digitales Zertifikat vor dem Zeitpunkt der Verifizierung widerrufen worden sein kann, wodurch die digitale Signatur oder das Zertifikat gültig zu sein scheint, obwohl dies nicht der Fall ist, (b) die Sicherheit und Integrität eines digitalen Zertifikats aufgrund einer Handlung oder Unterlassung des Unterzeichners des Dokuments, des entsprechenden Zertifizierungsdienstanbieters oder eines anderen Dritten gefährdet sein können und (c) es sich um ein selbst ausgestelltes und nicht von einem Zertifizierungsdienstanbieter ausgefertigtes Zertifikat handeln kann. DIE ENTSCHEIDUNG, OB SIE AUF EIN ZERTIFIKAT VERTRAUEN, LIEGT AUSSCHLIESSLICH IN IHRER VERANTWORTUNG. IHRE VERWENDUNG DIGITALER ZERTIFIKATE ERFOLGT AUF EIGENES RISIKO, ES SEI DENN, EIN ZERTIFIZIERUNGSDIENSTANBIETER ERTEILT IHNEN EINE GESONDERTE SCHRIFTLICHE GARANTIE.

8.4 Drittbegünstigte. Sie stimmen zu, dass der Zertifizierungsdienstanbieter, auf den Sie vertrauen, ein Drittbegünstigter dieses Vertrags und somit berechtigt ist, die Bestimmungen dieses Vertrags in seinem eigenen Namen in gleicher Weise wie Adobe durchzusetzen. 8.5 Haftungsfreistellung. Sie stimmen zu, Adobe und den betreffenden Zertifizierungsdienstanbieter (außer im Rahmen seiner ausdrücklich festgelegten Bedingungen) von allen Haftungs-, Verlust-, Gewährleistungs- oder Schadensersatzansprüchen und -klagen (einschließlich aller damit verbundenen angemessenen Auslagen und Kosten sowie der angemessenen Kosten der Rechtsverteidigung), die aus oder in Zusammenhang mit der Verwendung oder dem Vertrauen auf einen Dienst des entsprechenden Anbieters entstehen, freizustellen, insbesondere durch (a) Vertrauen in ein abgelaufenes oder widerrufenes Zertifikat, (b) die inkorrekte Verifizierung eines Zertifikats, (c) die Verwendung eines Zertifikats, die nicht im Rahmen der geltenden Bestimmungen, dieses Vertrages oder des geltenden Rechts zugelassen ist, (d) die Nichtausübung einer angemessenen Einschätzung der Umstände, unter denen auf Dienste oder Zertifikate des Anbieters vertraut wurde, oder (e) die Nichterfüllung von Verpflichtungen, die gemäß den entsprechenden Bestimmungen im Zusammenhang mit den Diensten erforderlich sind. 9. Gewährleistungsausschluss. Die Software wird „WIE BESEHEN“ und mit ALLEN MÄNGELN zur Verfügung gestellt. ADOBE, SEINE LIEFERANTEN UND SEINE ZERTIFIZIERUNGSDIENSTANBIETER KÖNNEN KEINE GEWÄHRLEISTUNG FÜR DIE LEISTUNGSFÄHIGKEIT DER SOFTWARE ODER DIE ERZIELTEN ARBEITSERGEBNISSE BEI VERWENDUNG DER SOFTWARE BZW. BEI INANSPRUCHNAHME VON DIENSTEN VON ZERTIFIZIERUNGSDIENSTANBIETERN ODER ANDEREN ANGEBOTEN DRITTER ÜBERNEHMEN. ADOBE, SEINE LIEFERANTEN UND SEINE ZERTIFIZIERUNGSDIENSTANBIETER GEWÄHREN KEINE GARANTIEN, ZUSICHERUNGEN, BESTIMMUNGEN ODER BEDINGUNGEN (AUSDRÜCKLICHER ODER STILLSCHWEIGENDER NATUR, DIE ENTWEDER AUS DER NUTZUNG ODER EINEM HANDELSBRAUCH ENTSTEHEN, ODER AUS GESETZLICHEN, GEWOHNHEITSRECHTLICHTEN ODER ANDEREN VORSCHRIFTEN ABGELEITET WERDEN) HINSICHTLICH MARKTGÄNGIGKEIT, RECHTSMÄNGELFREIHEIT, INTEGRIERUNG, ZUFRIEDENSTELLENDER QUALITÄT ODER BRAUCHBARKEIT FÜR BESTIMMTE ZWECKE, ES SEI DENN, DERARTIGE GARANTIEN, ZUSICHERUNGEN, BESTIMMUNGEN ODER BEDINGUNGEN SIND GEMÄSS GELTENDEM RECHT DER JEWEILIGEN RECHTSORDNUNG VORGESCHRIEBEN UND KÖNNEN NICHT EINGESCHRÄNKT WERDEN. Die Bestimmungen in Ziffern 9 und 10 gelten über die Beendigung dieses Vertrags hinaus fort, ungeachtet der Gründe für die Beendigung. Daraus folgt jedoch weder stillschweigend noch ausdrücklich die Gewährung eines Nutzungsrechts an der Software für die Zeit nach Beendigung dieses Vertrags. 10. Haftungsbeschränkung. ADOBE, SEINE LIEFERANTEN ODER SEINE ZERTIFIZIERUNGSDIENSTANBIETER ÜBERNEHMEN KEINE HAFTUNG FÜR SCHÄDEN, ANSPRÜCHE ODER KOSTEN JEGLICHER ART, EINSCHLIESSLICH FOLGESCHÄDEN, MITTELBARE ODER ZUFÄLLIGE SCHÄDEN SOWIE FÜR ENTGANGENEN GEWINN BZW. VERLUSTE, AUCH WENN EIN VERTRETER VON ADOBE ÜBER DIE MÖGLICHKEIT SOLCHER VERLUSTE, SCHÄDEN ODER ANSPRÜCHE UNTERRICHTET WAR. DIE VORGENANNTEN BESCHRÄNKUNGEN UND AUSSCHLÜSSE GELTEN NUR SOWEIT NACH ANWENDBAREN ZWINGENDEN VORSCHRIFTEN DES NATIONALEN RECHTS ZULÄSSIG. DIE GESAMTE HAFTUNG VON ADOBE, SEINEN LIEFERANTEN UND SEINEN ZERTIFIZIERUNGSDIENSTANBIETERN IM RAHMEN DIESES VERTRAGES IST AUF DEN BETRAG BEGRENZT, DER GEGEBENENFALLS FÜR DIE SOFTWARE ENTRICHTET WURDE. Nicht beschränkt wird im Rahmen dieses Vertrags die Haftung im Falle von Tod oder Verletzung von Personen, wenn dies auf Fahrlässigkeit oder arglistige Täuschung seitens Adobe zurückzuführen ist. Adobe handelt im Namen seiner Lieferanten und Zertifizierungsdienstanbieter ausschließlich zum Zweck der Ablehnung, des Ausschlusses und/oder der Einschränkung von Verpflichtungen, Gewährleistungen oder Haftung gemäß diesem Vertrag, ansonsten aber handelt Adobe nicht in deren Auftrag. Weitere Angaben sind ggf. in den länderspezifischen Informationen am Ende dieses Vertrages zu finden oder bei der Kundendienstabteilung von Adobe erhältlich.

11. Exportbestimmungen. Sie verpflichten sich, die Software nicht auf eine Weise zu verwenden bzw. nicht in ein Land zu versenden, zu übertragen oder auszuführen, in das laut Ausfuhrbestimmungen der Vereinigten Staaten bzw. anderer Ausfuhrgesetze, -beschränkungen oder -regelungen (im Folgenden als, „Ausfuhrgesetze“ bezeichnet) eine Ausfuhr untersagt ist. Unterliegt die Software darüber hinaus der Ausfuhrkontrolle gemäß den Ausfuhrgesetzen, sichern Sie zu, dass Sie weder Staatsangehöriger noch Ansässiger eines Landes sind, für das ein Embargo verhängt wurde (einschließlich, aber nicht beschränkt auf, Iran, Syrien, Sudan, Kuba und Nordkorea) und für Sie kein Verbot nach den Ausfuhrgesetzen gilt, die Software entgegenzunehmen. Alle Rechte zur Verwendung der Software werden unter der Bedingung gewährt, dass diese Rechte verwirkt werden, wenn Sie sich nicht an die Bedingungen dieses Vertrags halten. 12. Geltendes Recht. Dieser Vertrag unterliegt dem geltenden materiellen Recht: (a) des US-Bundesstaates Kalifornien, wenn Sie eine Softwarelizenz in den Vereinigten Staaten, Kanada oder Mexiko erwerben, (b) Japans, wenn Sie eine Softwarelizenz in Japan, China, Korea oder einem andern Land in Südostasien erwerben, in dem alle offiziellen Sprachen mit ideografischer Schrift (z. B. Hanzi, Kanji oder Hanja) und/oder anderen Schriften mit ähnlicher Struktur wie ideografische Schriften (z. B. Hangul oder Kana) geschrieben werden oder (c) Englands, wenn Sie eine Softwarelizenz in einem Land außerhalb der oben genannten Länder erwerben. Nichtausschließlicher Gerichtsstand für sämtliche Streitigkeiten, die sich aus diesem Vertrag ergeben, sind die jeweils zuständigen Gerichte von Santa Clara County, Kalifornien (bei Anwendbarkeit kalifornischen Rechts); das Bezirksgericht Tokio, Japan (bei Anwendbarkeit japanischen Rechts); und die Gerichte in England (bei Anwendbarkeit englischen Rechts). Ausgeschlossen wird die Anwendbarkeit gesetzlicher Kollisionsnormen und des Abkommens der Vereinten Nationen über Verträge für den Internationalen Verkauf von Waren. Die Anwendung dieser Bestimmungen ist ausdrücklich ausgeschlossen. 13. Allgemeine Bestimmungen. Für den Fall, dass eine Bestimmung dieses Vertrages für nichtig und undurchführbar erachtet wird, so ist die Gültigkeit der übrigen Bestimmungen dieses Vertrages hiervon nicht betroffen, der ansonsten gemäß seinen Bestimmungen gültig und durchführbar bleibt. Dieser Vertrag darf die gesetzlichen Rechte keiner Partei beeinträchtigen, die als Verbraucher handelt. Eine Änderung des vorliegenden Vertrags ist nur in schriftlicher Form zulässig, die von einem bevollmächtigten Vertreter von Adobe unterzeichnet werden muss. Von Adobe gewährte Lizenzen von Updates können zusätzliche bzw. andere Bestimmungen enthalten. Dies ist der vollständige Vertrag zwischen Ihnen und Adobe bezüglich der Software. Er ersetzt alle bisherigen Erklärungen, Besprechungen, Zusicherungen, Mitteilungen oder Werbungen mit Bezug zur Software. 14. Hinweis für US-Behörden als Endnutzer. Ist der Endnutzer eine US-Regierungsbehörde, so verpflichtet sich Adobe, alle anwendbaren Gesetze zur Chancengleichheit anzuwenden, einschließlich der Bestimmungen der Executive Order 11246, einschließlich Ergänzungen, Abschnitt 402 des Vietnam Era Veterans Readjustment Assistance Act von 1974 (38 USC 4212), und Abschnitt 503 des Rehabilitation Act von 1973, einschließlich Ergänzungen, sowie den Vorschriften in 41 CFR, 601 bis 60-60, 60-250 und 60-741. Die Gesetze und Vorschriften über aktive Förderungsmaßnahmen zugunsten von Minderheiten im vorgenannten Satz sind als Bezug in diesen Vertrag aufzunehmen. 15. Beachtung von Lizenzen. Unternehmen und Organisationen sind hiermit verpflichtet, nach Aufforderung von Adobe oder einem Bevollmächtigten von Adobe innerhalb von dreißig (30) Tagen vollständig zu belegen und zu bestätigen, dass die Verwendung jedweder Software zum Zeitpunkt der Anfrage gemäß den Bestimmungen gültiger Adobe-Lizenzen erfolgt.

16. Besondere Bestimmungen und Ausnahmen. 16.1 Haftungsbeschränkung für Benutzer in Deutschland und Österreich. 16.1.1 Wenn Sie die Software in Deutschland oder Österreich erworben haben und Sie Ihren gewöhnlichen Aufenthalt in einem dieser Länder haben, trifft Ziffer 10 nicht zu. Vorbehaltlich der Bestimmungen in Ziffer 16.1.2 ist die gesetzliche Haftung von Adobe stattdessen auf folgende Punkte beschränkt: (i) Adobe übernimmt die Haftung nur bis zur Höhe des zur Zeit des Abschlusses des Lizenzvertrags typischerweise vorhersehbaren Schadens hinsichtlich derjenigen Schäden, die aus einer leicht fahrlässigen Verletzung einer wesentlichen Vertragspflicht herrühren und (ii) Adobe haftet nicht für Schäden, die auf einer leicht fahrlässigen Verletzung nicht wesentlicher Vertragspflichten beruhen. 16.1.2 Die vorstehenden Haftungsbeschränkungen gelten jedoch nicht für Fälle der gesetzlich zwingenden Haftung, insbesondere nicht für die Haftung nach dem deutschen Produkthaftungsgesetz, die Haftung aufgrund einer Beschaffenheitsgarantie oder für die Haftung für schuldhaft verursachte Personenschäden. 16.1.3 Sie sind vorbehaltlich der Bestimmungen dieses Vertrags dazu verpflichtet, alle zur Vermeidung oder Minderung von Schäden angemessenen Maßnahmen zu ergreifen, insbesondere das Erstellen von Sicherungskopien der Software und Ihrer Computerdaten.

Wenn Sie Fragen zu diesem Vertrag haben oder Informationen von Adobe wünschen, wenden Sie sich bitte an die für Ihren Rechtsbereich zuständige Adobe-Niederlassung. Anschriften und Kontaktinformationen liegen dem Produkt bei oder sind auf unserer Website www.adobe.com/de zu finden. Adobe, AIR, Authorware, Flash, Reader und Shockwave sind entweder eingetragene Marken oder Marken von Adobe Systems Incorporated in den Vereinigten Staaten und/oder anderen Ländern.

Reader_Player_AIR_WWEULA-de_DE-20080204_1313

 

ADOBE SYSTEMS INCORPORATED Αποποίηση Εγγύησης και Σύμβαση Παροχής Άδειας Χρήσης Λογισμικού. ΣΤΟ ΠΑΡΌΝ ΈΓΓΡΑΦΟ ΠΕΡΙΈΧΟΝΤΑΙ ΠΛΗΡΟΦΟΡΊΕΣ ΣΧΕΤΙΚΆ ΜΕ ΤΗΝ ΕΓΓΎΗΣΗ (ΜΈΡΟΣ Ι) ΚΑΙ ΜΊΑ ΣΎΜΒΑΣΗ ΠΑΡΟΧΉΣ ΆΔΕΙΑΣ ΧΡΉΣΗΣ ΤΟΥ ΛΟΓΙΣΜΙΚΟΎ ADOBE (ΜΈΡΟΣ ΙΙ). ΜΕΡΟΣ Ι. ΑΠΟΠΟΙΗΣΗ ΕΓΓΥΗΣΗΣ. ΤΟ ΠΑΡΟΝ ΛΟΓΙΣΜΙΚΟ ΚΑΙ ΟΙ ΛΟΙΠΕΣ ΠΛΗΡΟΦΟΡΙΕΣ ΣΑΣ ΠΑΡΑΔΙΔΟΝΤΑΙ «ΩΣ ΕΧΟΥΝ» ΚΑΙ ΜΕ ΌΛΑ ΤΑ ΣΦΑΛΜΑΤΑ. Η ADOBE, ΟΙ ΠΡΟΜΗΘΕΥΤΕΣ ΤΗΣ ΚΑΙ ΟΙ ΑΡΧΕΣ ΠΙΣΤΟΠΟΙΗΣΗΣ ΔΕΝ ΕΓΓΥΩΝΤΑΙ ΟΥΤΕ ΔΥΝΑΝΤΑΙ ΝΑ ΕΓΓΥΗΘΟΥΝ ΤΗ ΛΕΙΤΟΥΡΓΙΑ ΚΑΙ ΤΑ ΟΠΟΙΑ ΑΠΟΤΕΛΕΣΜΑΤΑ ΕΝΔΕΧΕΤΑΙ ΝΑ ΠΡΟΚΥΨΟΥΝ ΑΠΟ ΤΗ ΧΡΗΣΗ ΤΟΥ ΛΟΓΙΣΜΙΚΟΥ, ΤΩΝ ΥΠΗΡΕΣΙΩΝ ΤΗΣ ΕΚΑΣΤΟΤΕ ΑΡΧΗΣ ΠΙΣΤΟΠΟΙΗΣΗΣ Ή ΠΡΟΣΦΟΡΩΝ ΤΡΙΤΩΝ. ΜΕ ΤΗΝ ΕΞΑΙΡΕΣΗ ΟΠΟΙΑΣΔΗΠΟΤΕ ΕΓΓΥΗΣΗΣ, ΥΠΟΧΡΕΩΣΗΣ, ΔΗΛΩΣΗΣ Ή ΟΡΟΥ ΣΤΟ ΒΑΘΜΟ ΠΟΥ ΔΕΝ ΕΙΝΑΙ ΔΥΝΑΤΗ Η ΑΠΟΠΟΙΗΣΗ Ή Ο ΠΕΡΙΟΡΙΣΜΟΣ ΑΥΤΩΝ ΜΕ ΒΑΣΗ ΤΗΝ ΙΣΧΥΟΥΣΑ ΣΤΗΝ ΠΕΡΙΠΤΩΣΗ ΣΑΣ ΔΙΚΑΙΟΔΟΣΙΑ, Η ADOBE ΚΑΙ ΟΙ ΠΡΟΜΗΘΕΥΤΕΣ ΤΗΣ ΔΕΝ ΠΑΡΕΧΟΥΝ ΕΓΓΥΗΣΕΙΣ, ΔΕΝ ΠΡΟΒΑΙΝΟΥΝ ΣΕ ΔΗΛΩΣΕΙΣ, ΔΕΝ ΑΝΑΛΑΜΒΑΝΟΥΝ ΥΠΟΧΡΕΩΣΕΙΣ, ΡΗΤΕΣ Ή ΣΙΩΠΗΡΕΣ, ΕΙΤΕ ΔΙΑ ΝΟΜΟΥ ΕΠΙΒΑΛΛΟΜΕΝΕΣ, Ή ΕΚ ΤΟΥ ΕΘΙΜΙΚΟΥ ΔΙΚΑΙΟΥ, Ή ΕΚ ΤΩΝ ΣΥΝΑΛΛΑΚΤΙΚΩΝ ΕΘΙΜΩΝ Ή ΤΗ ΣΥΝΗΘΕΙΑ Ή ΑΛΛΩΣ ΣΧΕΤΙΚΑ ΜΕ ΟΠΟΙΑΔΗΠΟΤΕ ΑΛΛΑ ΘΕΜΑΤΑ, ΟΠΩΣ ΕΙΝΑΙ ΕΝΔΕΙΚΤΙΚΑ Η ΜΗ ΠΡΟΣΒΟΛΗ ΔΙΚΑΙΩΜΑΤΩΝ ΤΡΙΤΩΝ, Η ΕΝΣΩΜΑΤΩΣΗ, Η ΙΚΑΝΟΠΟΙΗΤΙΚΗ ΠΟΙΟΤΗΤΑ Ή ΚΑΤΑΛΛΗΛΟΤΗΤΑ ΓΙΑ ΟΠΟΙΟΝΔΗΠΟΤΕ ΣΥΓΚΕΚΡΙΜΕΝΟ ΣΚΟΠΟ. ΜΕΡΟΣ ΙΙ. ΣΎΜΒΑΣΗ ΠΑΡΟΧΉΣ ΑΔΕΙΑΣ ΧΡΉΣΗΣ ΛΟΓΙΣΜΙΚΟΎ. ΜΕ ΤΗ ΧΡΉΣΗ, ΑΝΤΙΓΡΑΦΉ Ή ΔΙΑΝΟΜΉ ΟΛΌΚΛΗΡΟΥ Ή ΟΠΟΙΟΥΔΉΠΟΤΕ ΜΈΡΟΥΣ ΤΟΥ ΛΟΓΙΣΜΙΚΟΎ ADOBE ΑΠΟΔΈΧΕΣΤΕ ΌΛΟΥΣ ΤΟΥΣ ΌΡΟΥΣ ΚΑΙ ΠΡΟΫΠΟΘΈΣΕΙΣ ΤΗΣ ΠΑΡΟΎΣΑΣ ΣΎΜΒΑΣΗΣ, ΣΥΜΠΕΡΙΛΑΜΒΑΝΟΜΈΝΩΝ, ΕΙΔΙΚΌΤΕΡΑ, ΤΩΝ ΔΙΑΤΆΞΕΩΝ ΠΕΡΊ: ΧΡΗΣΗΣ, ΕΝΌΤΗΤΑ 2, ΔΥΝΑΤΟΤΗΤΑΣ ΜΕΤΑΒΙΒΑΣΗΣ, ΕΝΌΤΗΤΑ 4, ΣΥΝΔΕΣΙΜΟΤΗΤΑΣ ΚΑΙ ΙΔΙΩΤΙΚΟΥ ΑΠΟΡΡΗΤΟΥ, ΕΝΌΤΗΤΑ 6, ΕΓΓΥΗΣΗΣ, ΕΝΌΤΗΤΑ 9, ΚΑΙ ΕΥΘΥΝΗΣ, ΕΝΌΤΗΤΕΣ 10 ΚΑΙ 16. ΜΕ ΤΗΝ ΑΠΟΔΟΧΉ, Η ΠΑΡΟΎΣΑ ΣΎΜΒΑΣΗ ΕΊΝΑΙ ΕΚΤΕΛΕΣΤΉ ΕΝΑΝΤΊΟΝ ΣΑΣ ΚΑΙ ΕΝΑΝΤΊΟΝ ΚΆΘΕ ΦΥΣΙΚΟΎ Ή ΝΟΜΙΚΟΎ ΠΡΟΣΏΠΟΥ ΠΟΥ ΈΧΕΙ ΑΠΟΚΤΉΣΕΙ ΤΟ ΛΟΓΙΣΜΙΚΌ ΚΑΙ ΕΚ ΜΈΡΟΥΣ ΤΟΥ ΟΠΟΊΟΥ ΑΥΤΌ ΧΡΗΣΙΜΟΠΟΙΕΊΤΑΙ. ΕΆΝ ΔΕΝ ΣΥΜΦΩΝΕΊΤΕ, ΜΗΝ ΧΡΗΣΙΜΟΠΟΙΕΊΤΕ ΤΟ ΠΑΡΌΝ ΛΟΓΙΣΜΙΚΌ. Η ADOBE ΕΠΙΤΡΈΠΕΙ ΤΗ ΧΡΉΣΗ ΤΟΥ ΛΟΓΙΣΜΙΚΟΎ ΜΌΝΟ ΕΦΌΣΟΝ Η ΧΡΉΣΗ ΑΥΤΉ ΔΙΈΠΕΤΑΙ ΑΠΌ ΤΟΥΣ ΌΡΟΥΣ ΤΗΣ ΠΑΡΟΎΣΑΣ ΣΎΜΒΑΣΗΣ. Η ΧΡΉΣΗ ΚΆΠΟΙΩΝ ΥΛΙΚΏΝ ΤΡΊΤΩΝ ΜΕΡΏΝ ΠΟΥ ΠΕΡΙΈΧΟΝΤΑΙ ΣΤΟ ΛΟΓΙΣΜΙΚΌ ΕΝΔΕΧΟΜΈΝΩΣ ΝΑ ΥΠΌΚΕΙΤΑΙ ΣΕ ΆΛΛΟΥΣ ΌΡΟΥΣ ΚΑΙ ΠΡΟΫΠΟΘΈΣΕΙΣ, ΠΟΥ ΣΥΝΉΘΩΣ ΒΡΊΣΚΟΝΤΑΙ ΣΕ ΚΆΠΟΙΑ ΞΕΧΩΡΙΣΤΉ ΣΥΜΦΩΝΊΑ ΠΑΡΟΧΉΣ ΆΔΕΙΑΣ, ΣΕ ΈΝΑ ΑΡΧΕΊΟ «READ ME» ΠΟΥ ΠΑΡΈΧΕΤΑΙ ΜΑΖΊ ΜΕ ΤΑ ΕΝ ΛΌΓΩ ΥΛΙΚΆ Ή ΣΤΙΣ «ΑΝΑΚΟΙΝΏΣΕΙΣ ΛΟΓΙΣΜΙΚΟΎ ΤΡΊΤΩΝ ΜΕΡΏΝ Ή/ΚΑΙ ΤΟΥΣ ΠΡΌΣΘΕΤΟΥΣ ΌΡΟΥΣ ΚΑΙ ΤΙΣ ΠΡΟΫΠΟΘΈΣΕΙΣ» ΣΤΗ ΔΙΕΎΘΥΝΣΗ http://www.adobe.com/go/thirdparty_gr. 1. Ορισμοί. Με τον όρο «Adobe» θα νοείται η Adobe Systems Incorporated, εταιρεία συσταθείσα βάσει της νομοθεσίας της πολιτείας του Delaware, στη διεύθυνση 345 Park Avenue, San Jose, California 95110, σε περίπτωση που ισχύει η υποενότητα 12 (α) της παρούσας Σύμβασης, σε αντίθετη περίπτωση θα νοείται η Adobe Systems Software Ireland Limited, Unit 3100, Lake Drive, City West Campus, Saggart D24, Δημοκρατία της Ιρλανδίας, εταιρεία που έχει συσταθεί βάσει της νομοθεσίας της Ιρλανδίας και είναι θυγατρική και έλκει δικαιώματα εκμετάλλευσης του Λογισμικού δυνάμει αδείας παρασχεθείσας από την Adobe Systems Incorporated. Με τον όρο «Υπολογιστής» θα νοείται μια εικονική ή φυσική προσωπική ηλεκτρονική συσκευή που δέχεται πληροφορίες σε ψηφιακή ή συναφή μορφή και τις επεξεργάζεται για κάποιον συγκεκριμένο σκοπό βάσει μίας σειράς εντολών. Ως «λογισμικό» θα νοούνται (α) όλα τα περιεχόμενα των αρχείων (που παρέχονται είτε με ηλεκτρονική λήψη, είτε με υλικά μέσα ή με οποιαδήποτε άλλη μέθοδο διανομής), δίσκου (δίσκων), δίσκου (δίσκων) ή άλλων μέσων που συνοδεύουν την

παρούσα σύμβαση, όπως είναι ενδεικτικά (i) πληροφορίες υπολογιστών ή λογισμικά της Adobe ή τρίτων, συμπεριλαμβανομένων των Adobe Reader® («Adobe Reader»), Adobe® AIR™ («Adobe AIR»), Adobe Flash® Player, Shockwave® Player και Authorware® Player (το Adobe AIR και τα λογισμικά αναπαραγωγής εικόνας/ήχου Flash, Shockwave και Authorware καλούνται συλλήβδην «Χρόνοι Εκτέλεσης Adobe»), (ii) το σχετικό επεξηγηματικό έντυπο υλικό ή αρχεία («Τεκμηρίωση») και (iii) οι γραμματοσειρές· και (β) αναβαθμίσεις, τροποποιημένες εκδόσεις, ενημερώσεις, προσθήκες και αντίγραφα των ανωτέρω, που σας έχουν παραχωρηθεί από την Adobe οποιαδήποτε στιγμή (συλλήβδην καλούμενα εφεξής «Ενημερώσεις». Ο όρος «Χρήση» σημαίνει την πρόσβαση, εγκατάσταση, λήψη (downloading), αντιγραφή ή άλλο όφελος που προκύπτει από τη χρήση της λειτουργικότητας του Λογισμικού. 2. Άδεια Χρήσης Λογισμικού. Εάν έχετε αποκτήσει το Λογισμικό από την Adobe ή από εξουσιοδοτημένους από αυτή τρίτους που έλκουν δικαιώματα εκμετάλλευσης του Λογισμικού δυνάμει αδείας και εφόσον τηρείτε τους όρους της παρούσας σύμβασης, συμπεριλαμβανομένων των περιορισμών της Ενότητας 3, η Adobe σας παρέχει μη αποκλειστική άδεια χρήσης του Λογισμικού με τον τρόπο και για τους σκοπούς που αναφέρονται στην Τεκμηρίωση ως ακολούθως: 2.1 Γενική Χρήση. Επιτρέπεται η εγκατάσταση και χρήση ενός αντιγράφου του Λογισμικού στο συμβατό Υπολογιστή σας. Ανατρέξτε στη Ενότητα 3 για σημαντικούς περιορισμούς ως προς τη χρήση του Λογισμικού. 2.2 Χρήση Διακομιστή. Με την παρούσα σύμβαση δεν σας παρέχεται άδεια εγκατάστασης ή χρήσης του λογισμικού σε διακομιστή αρχείων υπολογιστή. Για πληροφορίες σχετικά με τη χρήση λογισμικού σε διακομιστή αρχείων υπολογιστή, ανατρέξτε στη διεύθυνση http://www.adobe.com/go/acrobat_distribute_gr για πληροφορίες σχετικά με το Adobe Reader ή στη διεύθυνση http://www.adobe.com/go/licensing_gr για πληροφορίες σχετικά με τους Χρόνους Εκτέλεσης Adobe. 2.3 Διανομή. Με την παρούσα σύμβαση δεν σας παρέχεται άδεια υπεκμίσθωσης ή διανομής του Λογισμικού. Για πληροφορίες σχετικά με την απόκτηση δικαιωμάτων διανομής του Λογισμικού με υλικά μέσα ή μέσω ενός εσωτερικού δικτύου ή μαζί με το προϊόν ή την υπηρεσία σας, ανατρέξτε στη διεύθυνση http://www.adobe.com/go/acrobat_distribute_gr για πληροφορίες σχετικά με το Adobe Reader ή στη διεύθυνση http://www.adobe.com/go/licensing_gr για πληροφορίες σχετικά με τους Χρόνους Εκτέλεσης Adobe. 2.4 Αντίγραφο ασφαλείας. Μπορείτε να δημιουργήσετε ένα αντίγραφο ασφαλείας του Λογισμικού, εφόσον αυτό δεν είναι εγκατεστημένο και δε χρησιμοποιείται. Δεν μπορείτε να μεταβιβάσετε τα δικαιώματα σε ένα αντίγραφο ασφαλείας εκτός αν μεταβιβάσετε όλα τα δικαιώματα για το Λογισμικό ως προβλέπεται στην Ενότητα 4. 3. Υποχρεώσεις και Περιορισμοί. 3.1 Περιορισμοί σχετικοί με τους Χρόνους Εκτέλεσης Adobe. Δεν επιτρέπεται η χρήση οποιουδήποτε Χρόνου Εκτέλεσης Adobe σε οποιαδήποτε συσκευή εκτός προσωπικού υπολογιστή (PC) ή με οποιαδήποτε ενσωματωμένη ή μη έκδοση οποιουδήποτε λειτουργικού συστήματος. Προς αποφυγή πάσης αμφιβολίας, και όλως ενδεικτικώς, δεν επιτρέπεται η χρήση ενός Χρόνου Εκτέλεσης Adobe σε οποιαδήποτε (α) κινητή συσκευή, αποκωδικοποιητή, συσκευή χειρός, τηλέφωνο, σημειωματάριο μέσω του Ιστού (web pad), πινακίδα γραφικών και επίπεδο υπολογιστή χειρός (εξαιρουμένων όσων χρησιμοποιούν Windows XP Media Center Edition και νεώτερες εκδόσεις αυτού), κονσόλα παιχνιδιών, τηλεόραση, συσκευή DVD, κέντρο οικιακής ψυχαγωγίας (media center) (εξαιρουμένου του Windows XP Media Center Edition και των διαδόχων του) ηλεκτρονικό πίνακα ανακοινώσεων και άλλες ψηφιακές επιγραφές, διαδικτυακή εφαρμογή ή άλλες συνδεδεμένες στο Διαδίκτυο συσκευές, υπολογιστή τσέπης (PDA), ιατρική συσκευή, αυτόματη ταμειολογιστική μηχανή (ATM), συσκευές τηλεματικής, μηχανές παιχνιδιών, συστήματα οικιακού αυτοματισμού, περίπτερα, τηλεχειριστήρια ή κάθε άλλη ηλεκτρονική συσκευή ευρείας χρήσης, (β) κινητά, καλωδιακά, δορυφορικά ή τηλεοπτικά συστήματα που απαιτούν χειριστή, ή (γ) άλλες συσκευές κλειστού συστήματος. Για πληροφορίες σχετικά με την απόκτηση άδειας χρήσης για τους Χρόνους Εκτέλεσης Adobe στα ανωτέρω συστήματα επισκεφθείτε τη διεύθυνση http://www.adobe.com/go/licensing_gr. 3.2 Περιορισμοί σχετικοί με το Adobe Reader. Το Adobe Reader συνοδεύεται από άδεια χρήσης και διανέμεται από την Adobe για προβολή, διανομή και κοινή χρήση αρχείων PDF.

3.2.1 Περιορισμοί Μετατροπής. Δεν επιτρέπεται να ενσωματώσετε ή να χρησιμοποιήσετε το Adobe Reader με οποιοδήποτε άλλο λογισμικό, συμπληρωματικό plug-in ή βελτίωση που χρησιμοποιεί ή βασίζεται στο Adobe Reader κατά τη μετατροπή ή την τροποποίηση αρχείων PDF σε άλλες μορφές αρχείων (π.χ. ένα αρχείο PDF σε αρχείο TIFF, JPEG ή SVG). 3.2.2 Περιορισμοί ως προς τα συμπληρωματικά λογισμικά Plug-in. Δεν επιτρέπεται να ενσωματώσετε ή να χρησιμοποιήσετε το Adobe Reader με οποιοδήποτε συμπληρωματικό λογισμικό plug-in που δεν αναπτύχθηκε σύμφωνα με τη Σύμβαση παροχής άδειας χρήσης του κλειδιού ενσωμάτωσης της Adobe (Adobe Integration Key License Agreement). 3.2.3 Απενεργοποιημένες Λειτουργίες. Το Adobe Reader μπορεί να περιέχει λειτουργίες ή λειτουργικότητες που είναι κρυμμένες ή εμφανίζονται απενεργοποιημένες ή με γκρίζο χρώμα (καλούμενες εφεξής «Απενεργοποιημένες Λειτουργίες»). Οι Απενεργοποιημένες Λειτουργίες θα ενεργοποιούνται μόνο κατά το άνοιγμα ενός εγγράφου PDF που δημιουργήθηκε με τη χρήση τεχνολογίας ενεργοποίησης που διατίθεται μόνο από την Adobe. Δεν επιτρέπεται η πρόσβαση ή απόπειρα πρόσβασης σε οποιαδήποτε Απενεργοποιημένη Λειτουργία με άλλο τρόπο εκτός της χρήσης ανάλογων τεχνολογιών ενεργοποίησης, η χρήση του Adobe Reader ως βάση για τη δημιουργία λειτουργιών που ομοιάζουν σε σημαντικό βαθμό προς οποιαδήποτε Απενεργοποιημένη Λειτουργία ή η παραβίαση με οποιοδήποτε άλλο τρόπο της τεχνολογίας που χρησιμοποιείται για την ενεργοποίηση οποιασδήποτε τέτοιου είδους λειτουργίας. Για περισσότερες πληροφορίες σχετικά με τις απενεργοποιημένες λειτουργίες ανατρέξτε στη διεύθυνση http://www.adobe.com/go/readerextensions_gr. 3.3 Ανακοινώσεις. Η δημιουργία οποιουδήποτε αντιγράφου του Λογισμικού πρέπει να περιέχει τις ίδιες ανακοινώσεις περί πνευματικής ιδιοκτησίας και άλλης ιδιοκτησίας που εμφανίζονται επί ή εντός του Λογισμικού. 3.4 Απαγορεύεται η Τροποποίηση ή Αποσυμπίληση (Reverse Engineering). Δεν επιτρέπεται να τροποποιήσετε, προσαρμόσετε, μεταφράσετε ή δημιουργήσετε παράγωγα έργα με βάση το Λογισμικό. Δεν επιτρέπεται να προβείτε σε αποσυμπίληση, ανακατασκευή του πηγαίου ή αντικειμενικού κώδικα ή άλλως να επιχειρήσετε να ανακαλύψετε τον πηγαίο κώδικα του Λογισμικού με εξαίρεση στο βαθμό στον οποίο επιτρέπεται ρητώς η αποσυμπίληση ή η ανακατασκευή του πηγαίου κώδικα σύμφωνα με την ισχύουσα νομοθεσία. 4. Μεταβίβαση. Δεν μπορείτε να νοικιάζετε, εκμισθώνετε, υπεκμισθώνετε, παραχωρείτε, εκχωρείτε ή μεταβιβάζετε τα δικαιώματά σας στο Λογισμικό, ή να εξουσιοδοτείτε την αντιγραφή του συνόλου ή μέρους του Λογισμικού στον Υπολογιστή κάποιου άλλου χρήστη εκτός και αν επιτρέπεται ρητώς στην παρούσα σύμβαση. Ωστόσο, μπορείτε να μεταβιβάσετε όλα τα δικαιώματα χρήσης του Λογισμικού σε τρίτο φυσικό ή νομικό πρόσωπο εφόσον: (α) επίσης εκχωρείτε (i) την παρούσα Σύμβαση, και (ii) Λογισμικό και κάθε λογισμικό ή υλικό που είναι σε πακέτο, ή προεγκατεστημένο με το Λογισμικό, περιλαμβανομένων όλων των αντιγράφων, Ενημερώσεων και προηγούμενων εκδόσεων στο εν λόγω πρόσωπο φυσικό ή νομικό, (β) δεν διατηρείτε αντίγραφα, περιλαμβανομένων των αντιγράφων ασφαλείας και εκείνων που βρίσκονται αποθηκευμένα σε Υπολογιστή· και (γ) ο αποδέκτης αποδέχεται τους όρους και τις προϋποθέσεις της παρούσας Σύμβασης, καθώς επίσης κάθε άλλον όρο και προϋπόθεση βάσει του οποίου αποκτήσατε νομίμως την άδεια χρήσης του Λογισμικού. Με την επιφύλαξη των παραπάνω, δεν μπορείτε να μεταβιβάσετε εκπαιδευτικά αντίγραφα, αντίγραφα προέκδοσης ή αντίγραφα του Λογισμικού που δεν προορίζονται για μεταπώληση. 5. Δικαιώματα Πνευματικής Ιδιοκτησίας, Επιφύλαξη Δικαιωμάτων. Το Λογισμικό και τα νόμιμα αντίγραφα που δημιουργείτε αποτελούν πνευματική ιδιοκτησία της Adobe Systems Incorporated και των προμηθευτών αυτής. Η δομή, η οργάνωση και ο κώδικας του Λογισμικού αποτελούν πολύτιμα εμπορικά μυστικά και εμπιστευτικές πληροφορίες της Adobe Systems Incorporated και των προμηθευτών της. Το Λογισμικό προστατεύεται από τη νομοθεσία, συμπεριλαμβανομένων ενδεικτικά των νόμων περί πνευματικής ιδιοκτησίας των Ηνωμένων Πολιτειών Αμερικής και άλλων χωρών, και από τις διατάξεις των διεθνών συμβάσεων. Με την επιφύλαξη των όσων ορίζονται ρητώς στην παρούσα, η παρούσα Σύμβαση δεν σας εκχωρεί δικαιώματα πνευματικής ιδιοκτησίας επί του Λογισμικού και όλα τα δικαιώματα τα οποία δεν εκχωρούνται ρητώς επιφυλάσσονται υπέρ της Adobe και των προμηθευτών αυτής.

6. Συνδεσιμότητα και Ιδιωτικό Απόρρητο. 6.1 Χρήση Αρχείων PDF. Όταν χρησιμοποιείτε το Λογισμικό για να ανοίξετε ένα αρχείο PDF που επιτρέπει την εμφάνιση διαφημίσεων μέσω εγγραφής στην υπηρεσία Ads for Adobe PDF, υπάρχει το ενδεχόμενο σύνδεσης του υπολογιστή σας με ένα δικτυακό τόπο, τον οποίο διαχειρίζεται η Adobe, διαφημιστής ή τρίτοι. Κατά τη σύνδεση αυτή πραγματοποιείται αποστολή της διεύθυνσης Internet Protocol (IP) που διαθέτετε. Ο διαχειριστής του δικτυακού τόπου μπορεί να χρησιμοποιήσει τεχνολογία προκειμένου να αποστείλει (ή να προωθήσει) διαφημιστικό ή άλλο ηλεκτρονικό περιεχόμενο που εμφανίζεται εντός ή πλησίον του αρχείου που έχετε ανοίξει. Ο χειριστής του δικτυακού τόπου μπορεί επίσης να προβεί σε χρήση JavaScript, web beacons (γνωστά και ως αρχεία gif ενός pixel) και άλλων τεχνολογιών προκειμένου να αυξήσει και να μετρήσει την αποτελεσματικότητα των διαφημίσεων και να εξατομικεύσει το περιεχόμενο των διαφημιστικών μηνυμάτων. Η επικοινωνία σας με δικτυακούς τόπους της Adobe διέπεται από την Πολιτική Ηλεκτρονικής Προστασίας Ιδιωτικού Απορρήτου της Adobe, η οποία είναι διαθέσιμη στο http://www.adobe.com/go/privacy_gr. Η Adobe μπορεί να μην έχει πρόσβαση σε ή έλεγχο επί των λειτουργιών που μπορεί να χρησιμοποιηθούν από τρίτους, ενώ οι πρακτικές συλλογής πληροφοριών των δικτυακών τόπων τρίτων δεν καλύπτονται από την Πολιτική Ηλεκτρονικής Προστασίας Ιδιωτικού Απορρήτου της Adobe. 6.2 Λήψη Ενημερώσεων. Αποδέχεστε και συμφωνείτε ότι η χρήση του Λογισμικού μπορεί να έχει ως αποτέλεσμα την αυτόματη σύνδεση του Υπολογιστή σας στο Internet για έλεγχο τυχόν ενημερώσεων διαθέσιμων για αυτόματη λήψη στον Υπολογιστή σας καθώς και για ενημέρωση της Adobe σχετικά με την επιτυχή εγκατάσταση του Λογισμικού. Κατά την ανωτέρω σύνδεση μεταδίδονται στην Adobe μόνο μη-προσωπικές πληροφορίες που δεν καθιστούν δυνατή την εξακρίβωση της ταυτότητας. Η επικοινωνία σας με τοποθεσίες Web της Adobe διέπεται από την Πολιτική Ηλεκτρονικής Προστασίας Ιδιωτικού Απορρήτου της Adobe, η οποία είναι διαθέσιμη στο http://www.adobe.com/go/privacy_gr Συμβουλευθείτε την Τεκμηρίωση για πληροφορίες σχετικά με την αλλαγή των προεπιλεγμένων ρυθμίσεων σχετικά με τη λήψη ενημερώσεων. 6.3 Διαχειριστής Ρυθμίσεων. Η χρήση του Flash Player μπορεί να οδηγήσει σε αποθήκευση ορισμένων ρυθμίσεων χρήστη στον Υπολογιστή σας ως τοπικό κοινόχρηστο αντικείμενο. Οι ρυθμίσεις αυτές δεν συνδέονται με εσάς, αλλά σας επιτρέπουν να διαμορφώσετε ορισμένες ρυθμίσεις εντός του Flash Player. Μπορείτε να βρείτε περισσότερες πληροφορίες σχετικά με τα τοπικά κοινόχρηστα αντικείμενα στη διεύθυνση http://www.adobe.com/go/flashplayer_security_gr και περισσότερες πληροφορίες σχετικά με τον Διαχειριστή Ρυθμίσεων στη διεύθυνση http://www.adobe.com/go/settingsmanager_gr. 7. Προσφορές από Τρίτους. Το Λογισμικό μπορεί να επιτρέψει την πρόσβαση και διαλειτουργικότητα με δικτυακούς τόπους, εφαρμογές λογισμικού και υπηρεσίες δεδομένων τρίτων, όπως εμπλουτισμένες εφαρμογές Internet (Rich Internet Application) («Προσφορές από Τρίτους»). Η πρόσβαση και χρήση οποιασδήποτε Προσφοράς από Τρίτους, συμπεριλαμβανομένων οποιωνδήποτε προϊόντων, υπηρεσιών ή πληροφοριών, διέπεται από τους όρους και προϋποθέσεις που αφορούν τις εν λόγω προσφορές. Οι Προσφορές από Τρίτους δεν ανήκουν στην και δεν παρέχονται από την Adobe. 8. Ψηφιακά Πιστοποιητικά. 8.1 Χρήση. Το Adobe AIR χρησιμοποιεί ψηφιακά πιστοποιητικά προκειμένου να σας διευκολύνει στον εντοπισμό του εκδότη των εφαρμογών του Adobe AIR που έχουν αναπτυχθεί από τρίτους. Το Adobe Reader χρησιμοποιεί ψηφιακά πιστοποιητικά προκειμένου να υπογράψει και να επικυρώσει τις υπογραφές των εγγράφων PDF καθώς και για να επικυρώσει πιστοποιημένα έγγραφα PDF. Ο Υπολογιστής σας μπορεί να συνδεθεί στο Internet κατά τη διάρκεια της επικύρωσης ενός ψηφιακού πιστοποιητικού. Τα ψηφιακά πιστοποιητικά εκδίδονται από αρχές πιστοποίησης τρίτων, συμπεριλαμβανομένων των παρόχων Υπηρεσιών Πιστοποιημένων Εγγράφων της Adobe (Adobe Certified Document Services, CDS), κατάλογος των οποίων διατίθεται στη διεύθυνση http://www.adobe.com/go/partners_cds_gr («Αρχές Πιστοποίησης», «Certificate Authorities») ή μπορεί να είναι αυτο-υπογεγραμμένα. 8.2 Όροι και Προϋποθέσεις. Η αγορά, χρήση και επίδειξη εμπιστοσύνης σε ψηφιακά πιστοποιητικά είναι ευθύνη αφενός δική σας και αφετέρου της Αρχής Πιστοποίησης. Πριν από την επίδειξη εμπιστοσύνης σε οποιοδήποτε πιστοποιημένο έγγραφο, ψηφιακή υπογραφή ή υπηρεσία Αρχής Πιστοποίησης, πρέπει να διαβάσετε τους ισχύοντες

όρους και προϋποθέσεις που διέπουν τν παροχή υπηρεσιών της εκάστοτε Αρχής Πιστοποίησης, συμπεριλαμβανομένων επί παραδείγματι οποιωνδήποτε των συμβάσεων εγγραφής, συμβάσεων αξιόπιστου μέρους, πολιτικών πιστοποιητικού και δηλώσεων πρακτικής. Ανατρέξτε στους αντίστοιχους συνδέσμους στη διεύθυνση http://www.adobe.com/go/partners_cds_gr για πληροφορίες σχετικά με τους παρόχους Υπηρεσιών Πιστοποιημένων Εγγράφων της Adobe (CDS). 8.3 Βεβαίωση. Αποδέχεστε ότι (α) ένα ψηφιακό πιστοποιητικό μπορεί να έχει ακυρωθεί πριν από την επαλήθευση και συνεπώς το ψηφιακό πιστοποιητικό ή η ψηφιακή υπογραφή να εμφανίζονται ως έγκυρα χωρίς να είναι στην πραγματικότητα, (β) η ασφάλεια ή η ακεραιότητα ενός ψηφιακού πιστοποιητικού μπορεί να διακυβευθούν εξαιτίας ενέργειας ή παράλειψης εκ μέρους του υπογράφοντος του εγγράφου, της ισχύουσας Αρχής Πιστοποίησης ή οποιουδήποτε τρίτου μέρους και (γ) ένα πιστοποιητικό μπορεί να είναι αυτο-υπογεγραμμένο και συνεπώς να μην έχει χορηγηθεί από Αρχή Πιστοποίησης. Η ΑΠΟΦΑΣΗ ΕΠΙΔΕΙΞΗΣ Ή ΜΗ ΕΠΙΔΕΙΞΗΣ ΕΜΠΙΣΤΟΣΥΝΗΣ ΣΕ ΕΝΑ ΠΙΣΤΟΠΟΙΗΤΙΚΟ ΕΙΝΑΙ ΑΠΟΚΛΕΙΣΤΙΚΑ ΠΡΟΣΩΠΙΚΗ ΣΑΣ ΕΥΘΥΝΗ. ΑΠΟΔΕΧΕΣΤΕ ΤΟΥΣ ΚΙΝΔΥΝΟΥΣ ΠΟΥ ΑΠΟΡΡΕΟΥΝ ΑΠΟ ΤΗ ΧΡΗΣΗ ΨΗΦΙΑΚΩΝ ΠΙΣΤΟΠΟΙΗΤΙΚΩΝ ΠΟΥ ΔΕΝ ΣΥΝΟΔΕΥΟΝΤΑΙ ΑΠΟ ΧΟΡΗΓΗΣΗ ΧΩΡΙΣΤΗΣ ΕΓΓΡΑΦΗΣ ΕΓΓΥΗΣΗΣ ΑΠΟ ΚΑΠΟΙΑ ΑΡΧΗ ΠΙΣΤΟΠΟΙΗΣΗΣ. 8.4 Σύμβαση υπέρ τρίτου - Τρίτοι Δικαιούχοι . Αποδέχεστε ότι οποιαδήποτε Αρχή Πιστοποίησης στην οποία βασίζεστε αποτελεί τρίτο δικαιούχο της παρούσας σύμβασης και έχει το δικαίωμα να την εκτελέσει στο όνομά της σαν να ήταν η Adobe. 8.5 Αποζημίωση. Συμφωνείτε να αποζημιώνετε την Adobe και την εκάστοτε Αρχή Πιστοποίησης (με εξαίρεση των όσων ορίζονται ρητά στους όρους και προϋποθέσεις της) για οποιεσδήποτε αξιώσεις αποζημίωσης, ζημιές, ή απαιτήσεις (συμπεριλαμβανομένων όλων των εύλογων δαπανών, και των αμοιβών δικηγόρων) που θα προκύψουν από ή σχετικά με κάθε χρήση, ή επίδειξη εμπιστοσύνης σε κάθε υπηρεσία της εν λόγω αρχής, συμπεριλαμβάνοντας ενδεικτικά (α) την επίδειξη εμπιστοσύνης σε πιστοποιητικό που έχει λήξει ή ανακληθεί (β) εσφαλμένη επικύρωση πιστοποιητικού (γ) χρήση πιστοποιητικού άλλου από αυτό που επιτρέπεται από τους ισχύοντες όρους και προϋποθέσεις, την παρούσα Συμφωνία ή το εφαρμοστέο δίκαιο (δ) αδυναμία άσκησης εύλογης κρίσης υπό τις συγκεκριμένες περιστάσεις για επίδειξη εμπιστοσύνης στις υπηρεσίες έκδοσης ή σε πιστοποιητικά ή (ε) αδυναμία εκτέλεσης όλων των υποχρεώσεων ως απαιτείται από τους ισχύοντες όρους και προϋποθέσεις που σχετίζονται με τις υπηρεσίες. 9. Δεν παρέχεται εγγύηση. Το Λογισμικό σας παραδίδεται «ΩΣ ΕΧΕΙ» και με ΟΛΑ ΤΑ ΣΦΑΛΜΑΤΑ. Η ADOBE, ΟΙ ΠΡΟΜΗΘΕΥΤΕΣ ΤΗΣ ΚΑΙ ΟΙ ΑΡΧΕΣ ΠΙΣΤΟΠΟΙΗΣΗΣ ΔΕΝ ΕΓΓΥΩΝΤΑΙ ΟΥΤΕ ΔΥΝΑΝΤΑΙ ΝΑ ΕΓΓΥΗΘΟΥΝ ΤΗ ΛΕΙΤΟΥΡΓΙΑ ΚΑΙ ΤΑ ΟΠΟΙΑ ΑΠΟΤΕΛΕΣΜΑΤΑ ΕΝΔΕΧΕΤΑΙ ΝΑ ΠΡΟΚΥΨΟΥΝ ΑΠΟ ΤΗ ΧΡΗΣΗ ΤΟΥ ΛΟΓΙΣΜΙΚΟΥ, ΤΩΝ ΥΠΗΡΕΣΙΩΝ ΤΗΣ ΕΚΑΣΤΟΤΕ ΑΡΧΗΣ ΠΙΣΤΟΠΟΙΗΣΗΣ Ή ΠΡΟΣΦΟΡΩΝ ΤΡΙΤΩΝ. ΜΕ ΤΗΝ ΕΞΑΙΡΕΣΗ ΟΠΟΙΑΣΔΗΠΟΤΕ ΕΓΓΥΗΣΗΣ, ΥΠΟΧΡΕΩΣΗΣ, ΔΗΛΩΣΗΣ Ή ΟΡΟΥ ΣΤΟ ΒΑΘΜΟ ΠΟΥ ΔΕΝ ΕΙΝΑΙ ΔΥΝΑΤΗ Η ΑΠΟΠΟΙΗΣΗ Ή Ο ΠΕΡΙΟΡΙΣΜΟΣ ΑΥΤΩΝ ΜΕ ΒΑΣΗ ΤΗΝ ΙΣΧΥΟΥΣΑ ΣΤΗΝ ΠΕΡΙΠΤΩΣΗ ΣΑΣ ΔΙΚΑΙΟΔΟΣΙΑ, Η ADOBE ΚΑΙ ΟΙ ΠΡΟΜΗΘΕΥΤΕΣ ΤΗΣ ΔΕΝ ΠΑΡΕΧΟΥΝ ΕΓΓΥΗΣΕΙΣ, ΔΕΝ ΠΡΟΒΑΙΝΟΥΝ ΣΕ ΔΗΛΩΣΕΙΣ, ΔΕΝ ΑΝΑΛΑΜΒΑΝΟΥΝ ΥΠΟΧΡΕΩΣΕΙΣ, ΡΗΤΕΣ Ή ΣΙΩΠΗΡΕΣ, ΕΙΤΕ ΔΙΑ ΝΟΜΟΥ ΕΠΙΒΑΛΛΟΜΕΝΕΣ, Ή ΕΚ ΤΟΥ ΕΘΙΜΙΚΟΥ ΔΙΚΑΙΟΥ, Ή ΕΚ ΤΩΝ ΣΥΝΑΛΛΑΚΤΙΚΩΝ ΕΘΙΜΩΝ Ή ΤΗ ΣΥΝΗΘΕΙΑ Ή ΑΛΛΩΣ ΣΧΕΤΙΚΑ ΜΕ ΟΠΟΙΑΔΗΠΟΤΕ ΑΛΛΑ ΘΕΜΑΤΑ, ΟΠΩΣ ΕΙΝΑΙ ΕΝΔΕΙΚΤΙΚΑ Η ΜΗ ΠΡΟΣΒΟΛΗ ΔΙΚΑΙΩΜΑΤΩΝ ΤΡΙΤΩΝ, Η ΕΝΣΩΜΑΤΩΣΗ, Η ΙΚΑΝΟΠΟΙΗΤΙΚΗ ΠΟΙΟΤΗΤΑ Ή ΚΑΤΑΛΛΗΛΟΤΗΤΑ ΓΙΑ ΟΠΟΙΟΝΔΗΠΟΤΕ ΣΥΓΚΕΚΡΙΜΕΝΟ ΣΚΟΠΟ. Οι διατάξεις της Ενότητας 9 και της Ενότητας 10 θα συνεχίσουν να ισχύουν και μετά τη λύση της παρούσας σύμβασης, σε οποιοδήποτε αιτία και αν οφείλεται αυτή, αλλά αυτό δεν θα συνεπάγεται ή γεννά δικαίωμα για τη συνέχιση της χρήσης του Λογισμικού με τη λύση της παρούσας. 10. Περιορισμός της Ευθύνης. ΣΕ ΚΑΜΙΑ ΠΕΡΙΠΤΩΣΗ Η ADOBE Ή ΟΙ ΠΡΟΜΗΘΕΥΤΕΣ Ή ΟΙ ΑΡΧΕΣ ΠΙΣΤΟΠΟΙΗΣΗΣ ΔΕΝ ΕΥΘΥΝΟΝΤΑΙ ΓΙΑ ΟΠΟΙΕΣ ΖΗΜΙΕΣ, ΑΞΙΩΣΕΙΣ Ή ΔΑΠΑΝΕΣ Ή ΔΙΑΦΥΓΟΝΤΑ ΚΕΡΔΗ, ΕΜΜΕΣΕΣ Ή ΑΠΟΘΕΤΙΚΕΣ ΖΗΜΙΕΣ Ή ΑΠΟΛΕΣΘΕΝΤΑ ΚΕΡΔΗ Η ΕΞΟΙΚΟΝΟΜΗΘΕΙΣΕΣ ΔΑΠΑΝΕΣ, ΑΚΟΜΗ ΚΑΙ ΣΤΗΝ ΠΕΡΙΠΤΩΣΗ ΠΟΥ ΕΚΠΡΟΣΩΠΟΣ ΤΗΣ ADOBE ΕΧΕΙ ΕΝΗΜΕΡΩΘΕΙ ΓΙΑ ΤΗΝ ΠΙΘΑΝΟΤΗΤΑ

ΤΕΤΟΙΩΝ ΖΗΜΙΩΝ, ΑΞΙΩΣΕΩΝ Ή ΔΑΠΑΝΩΝ. ΟΙ ΠΙΟ ΠΑΝΩ ΠΕΡΙΟΡΙΣΜΟΙ ΚΑΙ ΕΞΑΙΡΕΣΕΙΣ ΙΣΧΥΟΥΝ ΣΤΟ ΒΑΘΜΟ ΠΟΥ ΕΠΙΤΡΕΠΕΤΑΙ ΑΠΟ ΤΟ ΕΦΑΡΜΟΣΤΕΟ ΣΤΗ ΔΙΚΑΙΟΔΟΣΙΑ ΣΑΣ ΔΙΚΑΙΟ. Η ΣΥΝΟΛΙΚΗ ΕΥΘΥΝΗ ΤΗΣ ADOBE ΚΑΙ ΤΩΝ ΠΡΟΜΗΘΕΥΤΩΝ ΑΥΤΗΣ ΚΑΙ ΤΩΝ ΑΡΧΩΝ ΠΙΣΤΟΠΟΙΗΣΗΣ ΒΑΣΕΙ Ή ΣΕ ΣΧΕΣΗ ΜΕ ΤΗΝ ΠΑΡΟΥΣΑ ΣΥΜΦΩΝΙΑ ΠΕΡΙΟΡΙΖΕΤΑΙ ΣΤΟ ΠΟΣΟ ΠΟΥ ΚΑΤΑΒΛΗΘΗΚΕ ΓΙΑ ΤΟ ΛΟΓΙΣΜΙΚΟ, ΑΝ ΙΣΧΥΕΙ ΚΑΤΙ ΤΕΤΟΙΟ. Τίποτα από τα αναφερόμενα στην παρούσα Σύμβαση δεν περιορίζει την ευθύνη της Adobe ενώπιόν σας σε περίπτωση θανάτου ή σωματικής βλάβης που οφείλεται σε αμέλεια της Adobe ή για την διάπραξη απάτης . Η Adobe ενεργεί για λογαριασμό των προμηθευτών της και των Αρχών Πιστοποίησης μόνο όσον αφορά την αποποίηση, αποκλεισμό ή/και περιορισμό των υποχρεώσεων, εγγυήσεων ή άλλων υποχρεώσεων ως προβλέπεται στην παρούσα Σύμβαση, αλλά δεν ενεργεί για λογαριασμό τους όσον αφορά οτιδήποτε άλλο ή για οποιονδήποτε σκοπό. Για περισσότερες πληροφορίες, ανατρέξτε στις πληροφορίες περί δικαιοδοσίας που παρατίθενται στο τέλος της παρούσας Σύμβασης, αν υφίστανται, ή απευθυνθείτε στο τμήμα Υποστήριξης Πελατών της Adobe. 11. Κανόνες περί Εξαγωγών. Συμφωνείτε ότι το Λογισμικό δεν θα αποσταλεί, μεταφερθεί η εξαχθεί σε οποιαδήποτε χώρα ή χρησιμοποιηθεί κατ’ οιονδήποτε τρόπο που απαγορεύεται από τον Νόμο Διαχείρισης Εξαγωγών των Ηνωμένων Πολιτειών της Αμερικής ή οποιοδήποτε άλλο νόμο, περιορισμό ή κανονισμό περί των εξαγωγών (συλλήβδην εφεξής «Νόμοι περί Εξαγωγών»). Επιπροσθέτως, αν το Λογισμικό προσδιοριστεί ως αγαθό ελεγχόμενης εξαγωγής βάσει των Νόμων περί Εξαγωγών, δηλώνετε και εγγυάστε ότι δεν είστε υπήκοος ή άλλως δεν έχετε κατοικία σε χώρα στην οποία έχει ασκηθεί εμπάργκο (όπως είναι ενδεικτικά το Ιράν, η Συρία, το Σουδάν, η Κούβα και η Βόρεια Κορέα) και ότι δεν σας έχει άλλως απαγορευτεί, βάσει των Νόμων περί Εξαγωγών, η παραλαβή του Λογισμικού. Όλα τα δικαιώματα χρήσης του Λογισμικού σας παραχωρούνται υπό την προϋπόθεση ότι θα παύσετε να έχετε αυτά τα δικαιώματα σε περίπτωση μη συμμόρφωσης με τους όρους της παρούσας Συμφωνίας. 12. Εφαρμοστέο Δίκαιο. Η παρούσα Σύμβαση θα διέπεται και θα ερμηνεύεται σύμφωνα με το ισχύον ουσιαστικό δίκαιο: (α) της πολιτείας της Καλιφόρνια, αν αποκτήθηκε η άδεια χρήσης του Λογισμικού κατά την παραμονή σας στις Ηνωμένες Πολιτείες, τον Καναδά ή το Μεξικό ή (β) της Ιαπωνίας, αν η άδεια χρήσης του Λογισμικού αποκτήθηκε κατά την παραμονή σας στην Ιαπωνία, την Κίνα, την Κορέα ή άλλη χώρα της Νοτιοανατολικής Ασίας όπου όλες οι επίσημες γλώσσες χρησιμοποιούν ιδεογράμματα (π.χ. χαρακτήρες Hanzi, Kanji, ή Hanja), ή/και άλλες γραφές όπως είναι οι Hangul ή Kana· ή (γ) της Αγγλίας, αν η άδεια χρήσης του Λογισμικού αποκτήθηκε κατά την παραμονή σας σε οποιαδήποτε άλλη χώρα που δεν αναφέρεται παραπάνω. Τα αντίστοιχα δικαστήρια της Κομητείας της Santa Clara, στην Καλιφόρνια, σε περίπτωση που ισχύει το δίκαιο της εν λόγω πολιτείας, το Περιφερειακό Δικαστήριο του Τόκιο στην Ιαπωνία, σε περίπτωση που ισχύει το ιαπωνικό δίκαιο, και τα αρμόδια δικαστήρια του Λονδίνου, στην Αγγλία, σε περίπτωση που ισχύει το Αγγλικό δίκαιο, θα έχουν μη αποκλειστική δικαιοδοσία σχετικά με οποιαδήποτε διαφορά προκύψει αναφορικά με την παρούσα σύμβαση. Η παρούσα Σύμβαση δεν θα διέπεται από το ιδιωτικό διεθνές δίκαιο οποιασδήποτε χώρας ή από τη Συνθήκη των Ηνωμένων Εθνών για τις Συμβάσεις Διεθνούς Πώλησης Αγαθών, η εφαρμογή των οποίων αποκλείεται ρητά. 13. Γενικές Διατάξεις. Η ακυρότητα μέρους της παρούσας σύμβασης δε θίγει την εγκυρότητα και την ισχύ της υπόλοιπης σύμβασης, η οποία παραμένει σε ισχύ σύμφωνα με τους όρους της. Η παρούσα σύμβαση δεν θίγει τα δικαιώματα οποιουδήποτε μέρους που προβλέπονται από τη νομοθεσία περί προστασίας του καταναλωτή. Η παρούσα μπορεί να τροποποιηθεί μόνο εγγράφως και με την υπογραφή εξουσιοδοτημένου στελέχους της Adobe. Ενδέχεται να σας παρασχεθεί άδεια για τις αναβαθμίσεις από την Adobe με επιπρόσθετους ή διαφορετικούς όρους. Αυτή είναι η πλήρης συμφωνία μεταξύ της Adobe και υμών σχετικά με το Λογισμικό και υπερισχύει οιωνδήποτε προγενέστερων δηλώσεων, συζητήσεων, δεσμεύσεων, ανακοινώσεων ή διαφημίσεων σχετικά με το Λογισμικό. 14. Υπενθύμιση προς τους τελικούς χρήστες της κυβέρνησης των ΗΠΑ.

Σχετικά με τους τελικούς χρήστες της κυβέρνησης των ΗΠΑ, η Adobe συμφωνεί να συμμορφώνεται με όλους τους ισχύοντες νόμους περί ίσων ευκαιριών, περιλαμβανομένων, αν κρίνεται κατάλληλο, των διατάξεων της Εκτελεστικής Εντολής 11246, ως έχει τροποποιηθεί, Ενότητα 402 του Νόμου περί Αναπροσαρμογής της Ενίσχυσης προς τους Βετεράνους του Πολέμου του Βιετνάμ του 1974 (38 USC 4212), και Ενότητα 503 του Νόμου περί Αναπροσαρμογής του 1973 ως έχει τροποποιηθεί, και των κανονισμών της 41 CFR Μέρη 60-1 έως 60-60, 60-250, και 60-741. Η ρήτρα θετικής διάκρισης και οι κανονισμοί που περιέχονται στην προηγούμενη πρόταση ενσωματώνονται εξ’ αναφοράς και αποτελούν αναπόσπαστο τμήμα της παρούσας σύμβασης. 15. Συμμόρφωση με τις Άδειες. Εάν είστε επιχείρηση ή οργανισμός, συμφωνείτε ότι όταν σας ζητηθεί από την Adobe ή από εξουσιοδοτημένο στέλεχος της Adobe θα παρέχετε μέσα σε 30 ημέρες πλήρη στοιχεία που να επιβεβαιώνουν ότι η χρήση κάθε Λογισμικού είναι κατά τη στιγμή της διατύπωσης του αιτήματος σύμφωνη με την έγκυρη άδεια χρήσης που έχετε αποκτήσει από την Adobe. 16. Ειδικές Διατάξεις και Εξαιρέσεις. 16.1 Περιορισμένη Ευθύνη για Χρήστες που διαμένουν στη Γερμανία και την Αυστρία. 16.1.1 Εάν αποκτήσατε το Λογισμικό στη Γερμανία ή την Αυστρία, και έχετε τη συνήθη διαμονή σας στη χώρα αυτή, τότε η Ενότητα 10 δεν ισχύει. Αντίθετα, σύμφωνα με τις διατάξεις στην Ενότητα 16.1.2, η εκ του νόμου υποχρέωση της Adobe σε αποζημίωση, θα περιορίζεται ως ακολούθως: (i) Η Adobe θα φέρει ευθύνη μόνο μέχρι το ποσό των ζημιών που συνήθως είναι προβλέψιμες κατά την σύναψη της σύμβασης άδειας αναφορικά με ζημίες που οφείλονται σε παράβαση ουσιώδους συμβατικού όρου λόγω ελαφράς αμέλειας και (ii) η Adobe δεν θα φέρει καμία ευθύνη για ζημιές που οφείλονται σε παράβαση μη-ουσιώδους συμβατικού όρου λόγω ελαφράς αμέλειας. 16.1.2 Ο ως άνω αναφερθείς περιορισμός ευθύνης δεν θα ισχύει για οποιαδήποτε ευθύνη προς αποζημίωση που επιβάλλεται εκ του νόμου, ειδικότερα όσον αφορά ευθύνη που προβλέπεται από το Γερμανικό Νόμο περί ευθύνης για Ελαττωματικά Προϊόντα, ή στην περίπτωση εγγυητικής ευθύνης ή ευθύνης λόγω τραυματισμών που οφείλονται σε πταίσμα. 16.1.3 Χρειάζεται να λάβετε όλα τα μέτρα που απαιτούνται για την αποφυγή και τη μείωση των ζημιών, ειδικότερα για τη δημιουργία αντιγράφων ασφαλείας του Λογισμικού και των δεδομένων του υπολογιστή σας σύμφωνα με τις διατάξεις της παρούσας Σύμβασης. Αν έχετε οποιεσδήποτε ερωτήσεις σχετικά με την παρούσα σύμβαση ή αν επιθυμείτε οποιεσδήποτε πληροφορίες από την Adobe, χρησιμοποιήστε τη διεύθυνση και τα στοιχεία επικοινωνίας που παρέχονται με αυτό το προϊόν ή, μέσω του Ιστού, τη διεύθυνση www.adobe.com/gr για να επικοινωνήσετε με την υπηρεσία της Adobe που εξυπηρετεί τη χώρα σας. Τα Adobe, AIR, Authorware, Flash, Reader και Shockwave αποτελούν σήματα κατατεθέντα ή εμπορικά σήματα ή εμπορικά σήματα της Adobe Systems Incorporated στις Ηνωμένες Πολιτείες ή/ και άλλες χώρες.

Reader_Player_AIR_WWEULA-el_GR-20080204_1313

 

‫‪ADOBE SYSTEMS INCORPORATED‬‬ ‫הגבלת אחריות והסכם רישיון לתוכנה.‬ ‫מסמך זה כולל מידע לגבי אחריות )חלק ‪ (I‬והסכם רישיון החל על השימוש בתוכנת ‪) ADOBE‬חלק ‪.(II‬‬ ‫חלק ‪ .I‬הגבלת אחריות.‬ ‫תוכנה זו ומידע נוסף נמסרים לידיך "כפי שהם", עם פגמים כלשהם שעשויים להיות בהם. חברת ‪ ADOBE‬וספקיה והסמכויות המאשרות אינן‬ ‫מספקות ואין ביכולתן לספק אחריות בכל הקשור לביצועים או לתוצאות שאתם עשויים להשיג כתוצאה משימוש בתוכנה, בשירותי הסמכות‬ ‫המאשרת או בהצעות מסחריות של צד שלישי אחר כלשהו. פרט לאחריות, תנאי, מצג או התניה שלא ניתן לשלול או להגביל על פי החוק החל‬ ‫עליכם בתחום השיפוט שלכם, חברת ‪ ADOBE‬וספקיה והסמכויות המאשרות אינן מספקות אחריות, תנאים, מצגות או התניות )במפורש או‬ ‫במשתמע, בין אם על פי חוק, על פי המשפט המקובל, על פי הנוהג, על פי השימוש או באופן אחר( ביחס לכל עניין, כולל ללא הגבלה, אי-‬ ‫הפרה של זכויות צד שלישי, סחירות, שילוב, איכות משביעת-רצון או התאמה למטרה מסוימת כלשהי.‬ ‫חלק ‪ .II‬הסכם רישיון לתוכנה.‬ ‫מעצם השימוש, ההעתקה או ההפצה של תוכנת ‪ ,ADOBE‬כולה או מקצתה, הנכם מקבלים על עצמכם את כל התנאים וההתניות האמורים‬ ‫בהסכם זה, ובכלל זה, בפרט, את ההוראות הבאות בעניין: שימוש, כאמור בסעיף 2; עבירוּת, כאמור בסעיף 4; קישוריות ושמירת פרטיות,‬ ‫כאמור בסעיף 6; אחריות, כאמור בסעיף 9 וחבות, כאמור בסעיפים 01 ו-61. עם קבלת האמור לעיל, ניתן יהיה לאכוף הסכם זה כלפיכם‬ ‫וכלפי כל גוף שיקבל לידיו את התוכנה ושמטעמו ייעשה בה שימוש. אם אינכם מסכימים לאמור לעיל, אל תשתמשו בתוכנה זו.‬ ‫חברת ‪ ADOBE‬מתירה לכם לעשות שימוש בתוכנה אך ורק על פי תנאי הסכם זה. על השימוש בחומרים מסוימים של צדדים שלישיים‬ ‫הכלולים בתוכנה עשויים לחול תנאים והתניות אחרים שבדרך כלל מופיעים בהסכם רישיון נפרד, בקובץ "קרא אותי" הממוקם בסמיכות‬ ‫לחומרים כאמור, או בפרק שכותרתו "הודעות בדבר תוכנת צד שלישי ו/או תנאים והתניות נוספים", הנמצא באתר שכתובתו‬ ‫‪http://www.adobe.com/go/thirdparty_il‬‬ ‫1. הגדרות.‬ ‫המונח "‪ "Adobe‬פירושו חברת ‪ ,Adobe Systems Incorporated‬חברה המאוגדת על פי חוקי ‪ Delaware‬ואשר כתובתה היא ‪345 Park‬‬ ‫01159 ‪ ,Avenue, San Jose, California‬במידה ותת-סעיף 21)א( של הסכם זה חל; בכל מקרה אחר, פירושו חברת ‪Adobe Systems‬‬ ‫‪ ,Software Ireland Limited, Unit 3100, Lake Drive, City West Campus, Saggart D24, Republic of Ireland‬חברה‬ ‫המאוגדת תחת חוקי אירלנד וחברה מסונפת ומורשית של ומטעם ‪ ".Adobe Systems Incorporated‬מחשב" פירושו התקן אלקטרוני אישי‬ ‫פיסי או וירטואלי אשר מקבל מידע בצורה דיגיטאלית או צורה דומה אחרת ומעבד מידע זה לתוצאה מסוימת בהתבסס על סדרה של הוראות.‬ ‫"תוכנה" פירושה )א( כל התוכן של הקבצים )המסופק בצורה אלקטרונית או על גבי מדיה פיסית(, או דיסק)ים( או מדיה אחרת הנלווית‬ ‫להסכם זה, לרבות )‪ (i‬מידע מחשב או תוכנה של ‪ Adobe‬או של צד שלישי כלשהו, כולל ®‪) Adobe Reader‬להלן "‪,("Adobe Reader‬‬ ‫™‪) Adobe® AIR‬להלן "‪ Shockwave® Player ,Adobe Flash® Player ,("Adobe AIR‬ו-‪Adobe ) Authorware® Player‬‬ ‫‪ AIR‬ונגני ‪ Shockwave ,Flash‬ו-‪ Authorware‬מכונים להלן במאוחד בשם "‪ (ii) ;("Adobe Runtimes‬חומרי הסבר בכתב או קבצים‬ ‫קשורים )להלן "תיעוד"(; וכן )‪ (iii‬גופנים; ו-)ב( שדרוגים, גרסאות מותאמות, עדכונים, תוספות ועותקים של התוכנות האמורות לעיל שסופקו‬ ‫לכם על ידי ‪ Adobe‬במועד כלשהו )להלן במאוחד )"עדכונים"(. "שימוש" פירושו לגשת, להתקין, להוריד, להעתיק או להפיק תועלת באופן‬ ‫אחר משימוש בתפקודיות של התוכנה.‬ ‫2. רישיון תוכנה.‬ ‫אם קיבלתם את התוכנה מחברת ‪ Adobe‬או מאחד הגופים המורשים שלה, ובכפוף לביצוע תנאי הסכם זה, כולל המגבלות שבסעיף 3, חברת‬ ‫‪ Adobe‬מעניקה לכם רישיון לא-בלעדי להשתמש בתוכנה באופן ולמטרות המתוארות בתיעוד, כדלקמן:‬ ‫1.2 שימוש כללי. הנכם רשאים להתקין ולעשות שימוש בעותק אחד של התוכנה במחשב תואם שברשותכם. ראו סעיף 3 בנוגע להגבלות‬ ‫חשובות החלות על השימוש בתוכנה.‬ ‫2.2 שימוש בשרת. הסכם זה אינו מתיר לכם להתקין או לעשות שימוש בתוכנה בשרת קובצי מחשב. למידע בדבר שימוש בתוכנה בשרת‬ ‫קובצי מחשב, נא לעיין ב-‪ ; http://www.adobe.com/go/acrobat_distribute_il‬למידע אודות ‪ ;Adobe Reader‬או ב-‬ ‫‪http://www.adobe.com/go/licensing_il‬למידע אודות ‪.Adobe Runtimes‬‬

‫3.2 הפצה. רישיון זה אינו מעניק לכם זכות להעניק רישיון-משנה לתוכנה או להפיץ את התוכנה. למידע בדבר השגת הזכות להפיץ את התוכנה‬ ‫על גבי מדיה מוחשית או באמצעות רשת תקשורת פנימית או יחד עם המוצר או השירות שלכם, נא לעיין ב-‬ ‫‪ http://www.adobe.com/go/acrobat_distribute_il‬למידע אודות ‪ ;Adobe Reader‬או ב-‬ ‫‪ http://www.adobe.com/go/licensing_il‬למידע אודות ‪.Adobe Runtimes‬‬ ‫4.2 עותק גיבוי. אתם רשאים להכין עותק גיבוי אחד של התוכנה, בתנאי שעותק הגיבוי אינו מותקן או משמש במחשב אחר כלשהו. אינכם‬ ‫רשאים להעביר את הזכויות לעותק הגיבוי, אלא אם תעבירו את כל הזכויות בתוכנה, כפי שמתואר בסעיף 4.‬ ‫3. התחייבויות והגבלות.‬ ‫1.3 הגבלות ‪ .Adobe Runtime‬אסור לכם להשתמש בתוכנת ‪ Adobe Runtime‬כלשהי בהתקן שאינו מחשב אישי או בהתקן משובץ או‬ ‫בגרסת התקן של מערכת הפעלה כלשהי. כדי למנוע כל ספק, וכדוגמה בלבד, אינכם רשאים להשתמש ב-‪ Adobe Runtime‬ב-)א( התקן נייד,‬ ‫ממיר טלוויזיה )‪ ,(STB‬מחשב כף יד, מכשיר טלפון, לוח מקשים לשימוש באינטרנט, מחשבי ‪ Tablet‬ומחשבי ‪) Tablet-PC‬למעט עם מערכת‬ ‫הפעלה ‪ Windows XP Tablet PC Edition‬וגרסאות מאוחרות יותר(, קונסולת משחקים, טלוויזיה, נגן ‪ ,DVD‬מרכז מדיה )למעט עם‬ ‫‪ Windows XP Media Center Edition‬וגרסאות מאוחרות יותר שלו(, שלט חוצות אלקטרוני או לוח מודעות דיגיטלי אחר, מכשיר‬ ‫אינטרנט או התקן אחר המחובר לאינטרנט, מחשב כף יד מסוג ‪ ,PDA‬התקן רפואי, כספומט )‪ ,(ATM‬התקן טלמאטי, מכונת משחק, מערכת‬ ‫אוטומציה ביתית, קיוסק, שלט רחוק או כל מכשיר צריכה אלקטרוני אחר, )ב( מערכת ניידת, כבלים, לווין או טלוויזיה מבוססות-מפעיל, או‬ ‫)ג( התקן אחר במעגל סגור. למידע בדבר השגת רישיון לשימוש ב-‪ Adobe Runtimes‬על מערכות אלה, נא לעיין ב-‬ ‫‪.http://www.adobe.com/go/licensing_il‬‬ ‫2.3 הגבלות ‪ .Adobe Reader‬חברת ‪ Adobe‬מעניקה רישיונות ומפיצה את תוכנת ‪ Adobe Reader‬לשם צפייה, הפצה ושיתוף קובצי‬ ‫‪.PDF‬‬ ‫1.2.3 הגבלות על המרה. אינכם רשאים לשלב או להשתמש ב-‪ Adobe Reader‬עם תוכנה אחרת כלשהי, תוסף או שיפור המשתמש או‬ ‫מתבסס על ‪ Adobe Reader‬בעת המרה או שינוי של קובצי ‪ PDF‬לפורמט שונה )למשל, המרת קובץ ‪ PDF‬לקובץ ‪ JPEG ,TIFF‬או‬ ‫‪.(SVG‬‬ ‫2.2.3 הגבלות על תוספים )‪ .(Plug-in‬אינכם רשאים לשלב או להשתמש ב-‪ Adobe Reader‬עם כל תוכנת תוסף אחרת שלא פותחה בהתאם‬ ‫להסכם רישיון מפתח לשילוב של ‪.Adobe‬‬ ‫3.2.3 מאפיינים לא זמינים. תוכנת ‪ Adobe Reader‬עשויה לכלול מאפיינים או תפקודים מוסתרים או שמוצגים כלא זמינים או "אפורים"‬ ‫)להלן, "מאפיינים לא זמינים"(. מאפיינים לא זמינים אלו יפעלו אך ורק בעת פתיחת מסמך ‪ PDF‬שנוצר באמצעות טכנולוגיה מאפשרת‬ ‫תואמת, אותה ניתן להשיג אך ורק מחברת ‪ .Adobe‬אינכם רשאים לגשת או לנסות לגשת למאפיינים לא זמינים כלשהם, אלא באמצעות‬ ‫שימוש בטכנולוגיות מאפשרות כאמור, וכן אין להסתמך על תוכנת ‪ Adobe Reader‬ליצירת מאפיין שדומה באופן מהותי למאפיין לא זמין‬ ‫כלשהו, או לעקוף באופן אחר את הטכנולוגיה ששולטת על הפעלת מאפיין לא זמין כאמור. למידע נוסף אודות מאפיינים לא זמינים, אנא עיין‬ ‫ב-‪. http://www.adobe.com/go/readerextensions_il‬‬ ‫3.3 הודעות. כל עותק שתכינו מהתוכנה חייב לכלול את הודעות זכויות היוצרים והודעות הקניין האחרות אשר מופיעות על גבי התוכנה או‬ ‫בתוכה.‬ ‫4.3 איסור על שינויים או הנדסה לאחור. אינכם רשאים לשנות, להתאים, לתרגם או ליצור עבודות נגזרות המבוססות על התוכנה. אין לבצע‬ ‫פעולות של הנדסה לאחור, הידור חוזר, פירוק או ניסיון אחר לגלות את קוד המקור של התוכנה, למעט במידה שהותר לכם במפורש על פי‬ ‫הדין החל לבצע הנדסה לאחור או הידור חוזר.‬ ‫4. העברה.‬ ‫אינכם רשאים להשכיר, להחכיר, להעניק רישיון-משנה, להמחות או להעביר את זכויותיכם בתוכנה, או לאשר את העתקתה של כל התוכנה או‬ ‫חלק ממנה למחשב של משתמש אחר, למעט כפי שהותר במפורש במסגרת הסכם זה. עם זאת, הנכם רשאים להעביר את כל זכויות השימוש‬ ‫שלכם בתוכנה לאדם אחר או לישות משפטית אחרת, בתנאים הבאים: )א( תעבירו לאדם או לגוף כאמור גם )‪ (i‬הסכם זה, ו-)‪ (ii‬את התוכנה‬ ‫וכל התוכנות או החומרות האחרות המסופקות עמה או שהותקנו מראש יחד עם התוכנה, כולל כל העותקים, העדכונים, והגרסאות הקודמות,‬ ‫)ב( לא תמשיכו להחזיק אצלכם כל עותקים, כולל גיבויים ועותקים המאוחסנים במחשב, ו-)ג( הצד המקבל יקבל את התנאים וההתניות של‬ ‫הסכם זה ואת כל התנאים וההתניות האחרים שעל פיהם רכשתם באופן חוקי רישיון לתוכנה. למרות הנ"ל, אינכם רשאים להעביר העתקים‬ ‫המיועדים למטרות חינוכיות, עותקי קדם-הפצה או עותקים של התוכנה שאינם מיועדים למכירה חוזרת.‬

‫5. קניין רוחני, בעלות, שמירת זכויות.‬ ‫התוכנה וכל עותק מאושר שלה שתכינו הם קניינם הרוחני של חברת ‪ Adobe Systems Incorporated‬ושל ספקיה. המבנה, הארגון והקוד‬ ‫של התוכנה הם סודות מסחריים יקרי-ערך ומידע סודי של חברת ‪ Adobe Systems Incorporated‬ושל ספקיה. התוכנה מוגנת על פי חוק,‬ ‫כולל, ללא הגבלה, חוקי זכויות היוצרים של ארה"ב ומדינות אחרות, ותנאי אמנות בינלאומיות. למעט אם נאמר באופן מפורש אחרת בהסכם‬ ‫זה, הסכם זה אינו מעניק לכם זכויות קניין רוחני בתוכנה וכל הזכויות אשר אינן מוענקות לכם באופן מפורש בהסכם זה שמורות בידי ‪Adobe‬‬ ‫וספקיה.‬ ‫6. קישוריות ושמירת פרטיות.‬ ‫1.6 שימוש בקובצי ‪ .PDF‬בעת שימוש בתוכנה לצורך פתיחת קובץ ‪ PDF‬שהותאם להצגת מודעות באמצעות הרשמה לשירות ‪Ads for‬‬ ‫‪ ,Adobe PDF‬המחשב שברשותך עשוי להתחבר לאתר אינטרנט שמופעל על ידי חברת ‪ ,Adobe‬על ידי מפרסם או על ידי צד שלישי. במקרה‬ ‫כזה, נשלחת כתובת פרוטוקול האינטרנט )‪ (IP‬שלכם. הצד המארח את האתר עשוי להשתמש בטכנולוגיה שברשותו כדי לשלוח )או "להגיש"(‬ ‫פרסומות או תוכן אלקטרוני אחר שמופיעים בתוך הקובץ שנפתח או בקרבתו. מפעיל האתר עשוי גם לעשות שימוש ב-‪ ,JavaScript‬במשואות‬ ‫אינטרנט )‪) (web beacons‬המכונות גם "תגיות פעולה" או ‪ gifs‬של פיקסל-יחיד( ובטכנולוגיות אחרות כדי להגביר ולמדוד את מידת‬ ‫האפקטיביות של הפרסומות, וכן כדי לבצע התאמה-אישית של התוכן הפרסומי. חילופי התקשורת שלכם עם אתרי האינטרנט של ‪Adobe‬‬ ‫נעשים בהתאם למדיניות שמירת הפרטיות המקוונת של ‪ ,Adobe‬המפורטת באתר שכתובתו ‪ http://www.adobe.com/go/privacy_il‬אין‬ ‫לחברת ‪ Adobe‬יכולת גישה או בקרה על מאפיינים שבהם עשוי צד שלישי להשתמש, ומדיניות שמירת הפרטיות המקוונת של ‪ Adobe‬אינה‬ ‫חלה על נוהלי השימוש במידע של אתרי אינטרנט של צד שלישי כאמור.‬ ‫2.6 עדכונים. הנכם מאשרים ומסכימים לכך שהתוכנה עשויה לגרום למחשב שברשותכם להתחבר באופן אוטומטי לאינטרנט כדי לבדוק אם‬ ‫קיימים עדכונים לצורך הורדה אוטומטית למחשב שברשותכם, וכן כדי להביא לידיעת ‪ Adobe‬שהתוכנה הותקנה בהצלחה. במקרים כאלה,‬ ‫משודר לחברת ‪ Adobe‬אך ורק מידע שאינו מאפשר זיהוי אישי. חילופי התקשורת שלכם עם אתרי האינטרנט של ‪ Adobe‬נעשים בהתאם‬ ‫למדיניות שמירת הפרטיות המקוונת של ‪ ,Adobe‬המפורטת באתר שכתובתו ‪ .http://www.adobe.com/go/privacy_il‬למידע בדבר‬ ‫שינוי הגדרות ברירת המחדל בכל הקשור לעדכונים, נא לעיין בתיעוד.‬ ‫3.6 מנהל הגדרות. נגן ‪ Flash‬עשוי לגרום לאחסונן של הגדרות משתמש מסוימות במחשב שלכם, בתור עצם משותף מקומי. הגדרות אלו אינן‬ ‫קשורות אליכם, אך מאפשרות לכם להגדיר את התצורה של הגדרות מסוימות בתוך נגן ה-‪ .Flash‬מידע נוסף על עצמים משותפים מקומיים‬ ‫תוכלו למצוא ב-‪ http://www.adobe.com/go/flashplayer_security_il‬ומידע נוסף על מנהל ההגדרות ב-‬ ‫‪.http://www.adobe.com/go/settingsmanager_il‬‬ ‫7. הצעות מסחריות של צד שלישי.‬ ‫התוכנה עשויה לאפשר לכם לגשת ולבצע פעולות באתרי אינטרנט, ביישומי תוכנה ובשירותי נתונים של צד שלישי, לרבות יישומי אינטרנט‬ ‫עשירים )להלן "הצעות מסחריות של צד שלישי"(. הגישה והשימוש שלכם בהצעות מסחריות של צד שלישי כלשהו, לרבות טובין, שירותים‬ ‫או מידע, כפופים לתנאים ולהתניות החלים על הצעות כאמור. הצעות מסחריות של צד שלישי אינן בבעלותה של חברת ‪ Adobe‬ולא מסופקות‬ ‫על ידה.‬ ‫8. אישורים דיגיטליים.‬ ‫1.8 שימוש. תוכנת ‪ Adobe AIR‬עושה שימוש באישורים דיגיטליים על מנת לסייע לכם לזהות את המוציא-לאור של יישומי ‪Adobe AIR‬‬ ‫שנוצרו על ידי צדדים שלישיים. תוכנת ‪ Adobe Reader‬עושה שימוש באישורים דיגיטליים כדי לסמן ולאמת חתימות בתוך מסמכי ‪ PDF‬וכן‬ ‫כדי לאמת מסמכי ‪ PDF‬מאושרים. המחשב שברשותכם עשוי להתקשר לאינטרנט בעת ביצוע הליך אימות של אישור דיגיטלי. אישורים‬ ‫דיגיטליים מונפקים על ידי צדדים שלישיים המשמשים כסמכויות מאשרות, לרבות ספקי )‪Adobe Certified Document Services (CDS‬‬ ‫הרשומים באתר האינטרנט שכתובתו ‪") http://www.adobe.com/go/partners_cds_il‬סמכויות מאשרות"(, ויכולים גם לשאת חתימה-‬ ‫עצמית.‬ ‫2.8 תנאים והתניות. הרכישה, השימוש וההסתמכות על אישורים דיגיטליים הם באחריותכם ובאחריות הסמכות המאשרת. לפני שתסתמכו על‬ ‫מסמך מאושר, חתימה דיגיטלית או שירותי סמכות מאשרת כלשהם, עליכם לעיין בתנאים ובהתניות הישימים שלפיהם מספקת הסמכות‬ ‫המאשרת הרלבנטית את שירותיה, לרבות, לדוגמה, הסכמי מנוי כלשהם, הסכמי צד מסתמך, מדיניות אישורים והצהרות נוהליות. למידע אודות‬ ‫שירותי סמכויות מאשרות של ‪ ,Adobe‬עיינו בקישורים שנמצאים בכתובת ‪.http://www.adobe.com/go/partners_cds_il‬‬ ‫3.8 אישורים. הנכם מסכימים כי )א( ייתכן שאישור דיגיטלי בוטל לפני מועד האימות, וכתוצאה מכך החתימה או האישור הדיגיטליים עשויים‬ ‫להיראות כתקפים בעוד שלמעשה אינם כאלה, )ב( אבטחתו או שלמותו של האישור הדיגיטלי עשויות להיפגע כתוצאה ממעשה או מחדל מצדו‬ ‫של החותם על המסמך, מצד הסמכות המאשרת הרלבנטית, או מצידו של צד שלישי אחר כלשהו, וכן )ג( אישור עשוי להתגלות כאישור‬

‫בחתימה-עצמית שלא סופק על ידי סמכות מאשרת. הנכם נושאים באחריות בלעדית בכל הקשור להחלטה באם להסתמך על אישור, או לא.‬ ‫למעט אם ניתנה לכם אחריות נפרדת בכתב על ידי סמכות מאשרת, השימוש שלכם באישורים דיגיטליים הוא באחריותכם הבלעדית.‬ ‫4.8 מוטבי צד שלישי. הנכם מסכימים לכך שכל סמכות מאשרת עליה הנכם מסתמכים היא מוטב צד שלישי של הסכם זה, ותעמוד לה הזכות‬ ‫לאכוף הסכם זה בשמה היא, כאילו מדובר בחברת ‪.Adobe‬‬ ‫5.8 שיפוי. הנכם מסכימים לפטור את ‪ Adobe‬וכל סמכות מאשרת הנוגעת בדבר )למעט כפי שנקבע במפורש בתנאים ובהוראות של המנפיק(‬ ‫מכל חבות, הפסד, תביעה, נזק או דרישה )לרבות כל ההוצאות, העלויות ושכר טרחת עורכי הדין, במידת הסבירות( אשר ינבעו או יהיו‬ ‫קשורים לכל שימוש או הסתמכות על שירותי אישור מסמכים, לרבות מבלי להגביל את האמור )א( הסתמכות על אישור שפקע או בוטל; )ב(‬ ‫אימות בלתי הולם של אישור; )ג( שימוש באישור שלא בהתאם להרשאה שניתנה בהצהרת המנפיק הנוגעת בדבר, בהסכם זה או על פי חוק;‬ ‫)ד( מחדל בהפעלת שיקול דעת סביר כמתחייב מהנסיבות בהסתמכות על שירותי אישור מסמכים; או )ה( מחדל בביצוען של התחייבויות‬ ‫כלשהן כפי שנדרש בהצהרת המנפיק הנוגעת בדבר.‬ ‫9. היעדר אחריות.‬ ‫התוכנה נמסרת לידיך "כפי שהיא", עם פגמים כלשהם שעשויים להיות בה. חברת ‪ ADOBE‬וספקיה והסמכויות המאשרות אינן מספקות ואין‬ ‫ביכולתן לספק אחריות בכל הקשור לביצועים או לתוצאות שאתם עשויים להשיג כתוצאה משימוש בתוכנה, בשירותי הסמכות המאשרת או‬ ‫בהצעות מסחריות של צד שלישי אחר כלשהו. פרט לאחריות, תנאי, מצג או התניה שלא ניתן לשלול או להגביל על פי החוק החל עליכם‬ ‫בתחום השיפוט שלכם, חברת ‪ ADOBE‬וספקיה והסמכויות המאשרות אינן מספקות אחריות, תנאים, מצגות או התניות )במפורש או‬ ‫במשתמע, בין אם על פי חוק, על פי המשפט המקובל, על פי הנוהג, על פי השימוש או באופן אחר( ביחס לכל עניין, כולל ללא הגבלה, אי-‬ ‫הפרה של זכויות צד שלישי, סחירות, שילוב, איכות משביעת-רצון או התאמה למטרה מסוימת כלשהי. התנאים של סעיף 9 וסעיף 01 יעמדו‬ ‫בתוקפם גם לאחר סיום הסכם זה, בלא קשר לאופן בו הסתיים, ואין בכך כדי לרמוז או ליצור זכות נשמרת להשתמש בתוכנה אחרי סיום הסכם‬ ‫זה.‬ ‫01. הגבלת חבות.‬ ‫חברת ‪ ,ADOBE‬ספקיה או הסמכויות המאשרות לא יהיו אחראים כלפיכם בשום מקרה בגין נזקים, תביעות או עלויות, מכל סוג ומין, לרבות‬ ‫נזקים תוצאתיים, עקיפים ונלווים, או אובדן כלשהו של רווחים או של חסכונות, וזאת אף אם נמסרה הודעה לנציג של ‪ ADOBE‬על אפשרות‬ ‫קיומם של הפסד, נזקים או תביעות כאמור. המגבלות הנ"ל והחריגים הנ"ל ישימים במידה שתותר על פי החוק הישים ברשות השיפוטית‬ ‫שלכם. האחריות המצרפית של ‪ ADOBE‬ושל ספקיה והסמכויות המאשרות על פי הסכם זה או בקשר אליו תוגבל לסכום ששולם עבור‬ ‫התוכנה, אם בכלל. שום דבר מהאמור בהסכם זה לא יגביל את האחריות של ‪ Adobe‬כלפיכם במקרה של מוות או נזק גוף אשר ינבעו‬ ‫מרשלנות של ‪ Adobe‬או בגין עוולה של תרמית )הונאה(. חברת ‪ Adobe‬פועלת מטעם ספקיה והסמכויות המאשרות במטרה להתנער, להחריג‬ ‫ו/או להגביל את ההתחייבות, האחריות והחבות כפי שהוצג בהסכם זה, אך לא בהקשרים אחרים ולא למטרה אחרת כלשהי. למידע נוסף, אנא‬ ‫עיינו במידע הספציפי לרשות השיפוטית בסוף הסכם זה, אם בכלל, או צרו קשר עם מחלקת התמיכה בלקוחות של חברת ‪.Adobe‬‬ ‫11. כללי יצוא.‬ ‫הנכם מסכימים שהתוכנה לא תישלח, תועבר או תיוצא למדינה כלשהי, וכן שלא יעשה בה שימוש כלשהו האסור על פי חוק ניהול היצוא של‬ ‫ארה"ב )‪ (United States Export Administration Act‬או על פי חוקים, מגבלות או תקנות כלשהם המתייחסים ליצוא )ובאופן כולל "חוקי‬ ‫הייצוא"(. בנוסף לכך, אם התוכנה מזוהה כפריט ייצוא מבוקר על פי חוקי היצוא, הנכם מצהירים ומתחייבים שאינכם אזרחים, ואף אינכם‬ ‫ממוקמים באופן אחר במדינה שהוטל עליה אמברגו )כולל, מבלי להגביל את האמור: אירן, סוריה, סודן, קובה וצפון קוריאה( וכי אין עליכם‬ ‫איסור אחר לקבל את התוכנה על פי חוקי היצוא. כל הזכויות לשימוש בתוכנה מוענקות בתנאי שכל הזכויות הללו יחולטו ויבוטלו במקרה שלא‬ ‫תצייתו להוראות הסכם זה.‬ ‫21. החוק החל על ההסכם.‬ ‫על הסכם זה יחול הדין המהותי, והוא יתפרש על פי הדין המהותי החל ב: )א( מדינת קליפורניה, אם הרישיון לתוכנה נרכש כאשר שהיתם‬ ‫בארצות הברית, קנדה או מקסיקו; או )ב( יפן, אם הרישיון לתוכנה נרכש כאשר שהיתם ביפן, סין, קוריאה או מדינה אחרת בדרום מזרח‬ ‫אסיה, שבה כל השפות הרשמיות נכתבות בכתב אידיאוגרפי )לדוגמא: הנזי, קנג'י או הנג'ה(, ו/או כתב אחר המבוסס על כתב אידיאוגרפי או‬ ‫שיש לו מבנה דומה לכתב אידיאוגרפי, כגון הנגול או קאנה; או )ג( אנגליה, אם הרישיון לתוכנה נרכש כאשר שהיתם בכל תחום שיפוט אשר‬ ‫אינו מתואר לעיל. בתי המשפט של מחוז סנטה קלרה, קליפורניה, כאשר חל הדין של קליפורניה, בתי המשפט של מחוז טוקיו, יפן, כאשר חל‬ ‫הדין היפני, ובתי המשפט המוסמכים של אנגליה, כאשר חל הדין האנגלי, יהיו בעלי סמכות שיפוט שאינה ייחודית, בהתאמה, בכל סכסוך‬ ‫המתייחס להסכם זה. על הסכם זה לא יחולו כללי הסתירה בין דינים של תחום שיפוט כלשהו או אמנת האומות המאוחדות בדבר חוזים למכר‬ ‫טובין בין לאומי ותחולתם על הסכם זה נשללת במפורש.‬

‫31. הוראות כלליות.‬ ‫אם חלק כלשהו של הסכם זה יתברר כמבוטל או כבלתי ניתן לאכיפה, לא יהיה בכך כדי להשפיע על התוקף של יתרת ההסכם הנוכחי, שיישאר‬ ‫בתוקף ובר-אכיפה בהתאם לתנאיו. הסכם זה לא יגרע מהזכויות הסטטוטוריות של צד כלשהו הפועל כצרכן. אפשר יהיה לשנות הסכם זה רק‬ ‫במסמך בכתב אשר ייחתם על ידי נושא משרה מורשה של‪ .Adobe‬חברת ‪ Adobe‬רשאית להעניק לכם רישיונות לעדכונים בכפוף לתנאים‬ ‫נוספים או שונים. זהו כלל ההסכם בין ‪ Adobe‬לביניכם המתייחס לתוכנה והוא מחליף ומבטל כל הצהרות קודמות, דיונים, התחייבויות,‬ ‫תכתובות או פרסומים קודמים הקשורים לתוכנה.‬ ‫41. הודעה למשתמשי קצה הנמנים על ממשלת ארצות הברית.‬ ‫‪ Adobe‬מסכימה, ככל שהדבר נוגע למשתמשי קצה הנמנים על ממשלת ארצות הברית, לקיים את כל החוקים העוסקים בשוויון הזדמנויות‬ ‫לרבות, ככל שהדבר מתאים, להוראות צו נשיאותי מספר 64211, כפי שתוקן, סעיף 204 של חוק ההתאמות לסיוע לחיילים משוחררים‬ ‫מתקופת מלחמת ויטנאם משנת 4791 )2124 ‪ (38 USC‬וסעיף 305 של חוק השיקום משנת 3791, כפי שתוקן, והתקנות בחלקים 1-06 ועד‬ ‫06-06, 052-06 וכן 147-06 של ‪ .41 CFR‬סעיף הפליה מתקנת והתקנות שפורטו לעיל יכללו על דרך האזכור בהסכם זה.‬ ‫51. ציות לרישיונות.‬ ‫אם הנכם בית עסק או ארגון, הנכם נותנים את הסכמתכם לכך שלפי דרישה מחברת ‪ Adobe‬או מנציג מוסמך של ‪ ,Adobe‬תתעדו ותאשרו‬ ‫באופן מלא, בתוך שלושים )03( יום, שהשימוש בכל תוכנה נכון למועד הדרישה עולה בקנה אחד עם הרישיונות התקפים שהוענקו לכם על ידי‬ ‫‪.Adobe‬‬ ‫61. תנאים מיוחדים וחריגים.‬ ‫1.61 הגבלה על חבות עבור משתמשים המתגוררים בגרמניה ואוסטריה.‬ ‫1.1.61 אם רכשתם את התוכנה בגרמניה או באוסטריה ואם הנכם מתגוררים באחת ממדינות אלה דרך קבע, אזי סעיף 01 אינו חל עליכם;‬ ‫במקום זאת, בכפוף להוראות האמורות בסעיף 2.1.61, חבותה על פי חוק של חברת ‪ Adobe‬לתשלום פיצויים תוגבל כדלקמן:)‪Adobe (i‬‬ ‫תישא באחריות אך ורק עד לסכום פיצוי-נזק אופייניים שניתן היה לחזותם במועד ההתקשרות בהסכם הרישיון בנוגע לנזקים שנגרמו כתוצאה‬ ‫מהפרה שיסודה ברשלנות קלה של התחייבות מהותית על פי ההסכם ו- )‪ Adobe (ii‬לא תישא באחריות לנזקים אשר יגרמו כתוצאה מהפרה‬ ‫שיסודה ברשלנות קלה של התחייבות לא מהותית על פי ההסכם.‬ ‫2.1.61 הגבלת האחריות כאמור לעיל לא תחול במקרה של אחריות מכוח חוק, ובפרט על אחריות הנובעת מהחוק הגרמני בדבר אחריות‬ ‫למוצרים פגומים, אחריות בגין נטילת אחריות ספציפית או אחריות לנזק גוף שנגרם באשם.‬ ‫3.1.61 הנכם נדרשים לנקוט בכל האמצעים הסבירים למנוע ולהקטין את הנזקים ובפרט להכין עותקי גיבוי של התוכנה ושל הנתונים‬ ‫המאוחסנים במחשב שלכם בכפוף להוראות הסכם זה.‬

‫אם יש לכם שאלות כלשהן בנוגע להסכם זה או אם ברצונכם לבקש מידע מ-‪ Adobe‬אנא השתמשו בכתובת ובמידע הנכלל במוצר זה, או‬ ‫היעזרו באתר שכתובתו ‪ www.adobe.com/il‬כדי ליצור קשר עם המשרד של ‪ Adobe‬המעניק שירותים לתחום השיפוט שלכם.‬ ‫‪ Reader ,Flash ,Authorware ,AIR ,Adobe‬ו-‪ Shockwave‬הם סימנים מסחריים רשומים או סימנים מסחריים של ‪Adobe Systems‬‬ ‫‪ Incorporated‬בארה"ב ו/או במדינות אחרות.‬

‫3131_40208002-‪Reader_Player_AIR_WWEULA-he_IL‬‬

‫ ‬

ADOBE SYSTEMS INCORPORATED Szavatosság kizárása és szoftverfelhasználási szerződés. EZ A DOKUMENTUM A SZAVATOSSÁGRA VONATKOZÓ INFORMÁCIÓKAT (I. RÉSZ) ÉS EGY AZ ADOBE SZOFTVER FELHASZNÁLÁSÁRA VONATKOZÓ LICENCSZERZŐDÉST (II. RÉSZ) TARTALMAZ. I. RÉSZ. A SZAVATOSSÁG KIZÁRÁSA. A SZOFTVERT ÉS AZ EGYÉB INFORMÁCIÓKAT „MEGTEKINTETT ÁLLAPOTBAN” BIZTOSÍTJUK, MINDEN HIBÁVAL EGYÜTT. AZ ADOBE ÉS BESZÁLLÍTÓI, VALAMINT A TANÚSÍTÓ SZERVEZETEK NEM VÁLLALNAK ÉS NEM IS TUDNAK VÁLLALNI GARANCIÁT AZÉRT A TELJESÍTMÉNYÉRT VAGY EREDMÉNYÉRT, AMELY A SZOFTVER HASZNÁLATÁBÓL, A TANÚSÍTÓ SZERVEZETEK SZOLGÁLTATÁSAIBÓL VAGY HARMADIK FÉL AJÁNLATAIBÓL ERED. AZON SZAVATOSSÁG, FELTÉTEL VAGY NYILATKOZAT KIVÉTELÉVEL, AMELYET AZ ÖN SAJÁT ÁLLAMÁBAN IRÁNYADÓ JOG ALAPJÁN NEM ZÁRHATÓ KI ÉS NEM KORLÁTOZHATÓ, AZ ADOBE ÉS BESZÁLLÍTÓI, VALAMINT A TANÚSÍTÓ SZERVEZETEK NEM VÁLLALNAK (SEM KIFEJEZETT SEM HALLGATÓLAGOS, JOGSZABÁLY VAGY SZOKÁSJOG ÁLTAL MEGKÖVETELT, ILLETVE SZOKÁS, HASZNÁLAT VAGY MÁSKÉNT MEGKÍVÁNT) SZAVATOSSÁGOT, FELTÉTELT VAGY NYILATKOZATOT SEMMILYEN ÜGYRE VONATKOZÓAN, IDEÉRTVE KORLÁTOZÁS NÉLKÜL HARMADIK FÉL JOGAINAK TISZTELETBEN TARTÁSÁT, KERESKEDELMI FORGALOMBA HOZHATÓSÁGOT, INTEGRÁCIÓT, MEGFELELŐ MINŐSÉGET, ILLETVE EGY BIZONYOS CÉLNAK VALÓ MEGFELELÉST. II. RÉSZ. SZOFTVERFELHASZNÁLÁSI SZERZŐDÉS. AZ ADOBE SZOFTVER EGÉSZÉNEK VAGY VALAMELY RÉSZÉNEK HASZNÁLATÁVAL, MÁSOLÁSÁVAL VAGY FORGALMAZÁSÁVAL ÖN ELFOGADJA E SZERZŐDÉS FELTÉTELEIT, IDEÉRTVE KÜLÖNÖSKÉPPEN A KÖVETKEZŐ RENDELKEZÉSEKET: A 2. PONTBAN FOGLALT HASZNÁLAT; A 4. PONTBAN ÍRT ÁTRUHÁZHATÓSÁG; A 6. PONTBAN ÍRT ÖSSZEKAPCSOLHATÓSÁG ÉS BIZALMASSÁG; A 9. PONTBAN ÍRT SZAVATOSSÁG; VALAMINT A 10. ÉS 16. PONTBAN ÍRT KÁRTÉRÍTÉSI FELELŐSSÉG. A SZERZŐDÉS ELFOGADÁSÁT KÖVETŐEN KIKÉNYSZERÍTHETŐ ÖNNEL ÉS BÁRMELY JOGI SZEMÉLLYEL SZEMBEN, AMELY A SZOFTVERT MEGSZEREZTE, ÉS AMELYNEK NEVÉBEN AZT HASZNÁLJÁK. HA NEM ÉRT EGYET A JELEN SZERZŐDÉS FELTÉTELEIVEL, NE HASZNÁLJA A SZOFTVERT. AZ ADOBE CSAK A JELEN SZERZŐDÉS FELTÉTELEINEK BETARTÁSA ESETÉN ENGEDÉLYEZI A SZOFTVER HASZNÁLATÁT. A SZOFTVEREN TALÁLHATÓ, HARMADIK FÉL TULAJDONÁBAN ÁLLÓ ANYAGOKAT A KÜLÖN FELHASZNÁLÓI SZERZŐDÉSBEN KIKÖTÖTT EGYÉB FELTÉTELEKNEK MEGFELELŐEN VAGY AZ EZEN ANYAGOK MELLETT TALÁLHATÓ „OLVASS EL” ÁLLOMÁNYBAN VAGY A http://www.adobe.com/go/thirdparty_hu CÍMEN TALÁLHATÓ „HARMADIK SZEMÉLY SZOFTVERÉRE VONATKOZÓ FIGYELMEZTETÉSEK ÉS/VAGY TOVÁBBI FELTÉTELEK”-BEN FOGLALTAK SZERINT LEHET HASZNÁLNI. 1. Értelmező rendelkezések. „Adobe” - a jelen Szerződés 12(a) pontjának alkalmazásában - Adobe Systems Incorporated, a Delaware államban bejegyzett társaságot jelent, melynek címe: 345 Park Avenue, San Jose, California 95110; a többi esetben pedig Adobe Systems Software Ireland Limited, Unit 3100, Lake Drive, City West Campus, Saggart D24, Ír Köztársaság, az ír törvények szerint létrejött társaságot, valamint az Adobe Systems Incorporated kapcsolt vállalkozását és engedélyesét jelenti. A „Számítógép” olyan virtuális vagy fizikai személyi elektronikai számítógépes eszközt jelent, amely digitális vagy hasonló formában információt fogad és az utasítások sorrendjének megfelelően kezel, egy meghatározott eredmény elérése érdekében. A „Szoftver” jelenti (a) a fájlokban (elektronikusan vagy fizikai adathordozón), lemeze(ke)n vagy egyéb adathordozón tárolt minden olyan állományt, amelyről a jelen szerződés

rendelkezik, ideértve többek között (i) az Adobe vagy harmadik fél számítógépes információit vagy szoftverét, beleértve az Adobe Reader® („Adobe Reader”), Adobe® AIR™ („Adobe AIR”), Adobe Flash® Player, Shockwave® Player, valamint Authorware® Player (Adobe AIR és Flash, Shockwave és Authorware player együttesen „Adobe Runtimes”); (ii) kapcsolódó magyarázó írásos anyagokat vagy állományokat (a „Dokumentáció”); és (iii) jelkészleteket; valamint (b) az előző bővítéseit, módosított változatait, frissítéseit, kiegészítéseit, valamint másolatait, amelyeket az Adobe biztosított (együttesen: a „Frissítések”). A „Használat” a Szoftverhez való hozzáférést, a Szoftver telepítését, letöltését, másolását vagy az annak működtetéséből származó bármilyen előnyök élvezését jelenti. 2. Szoftverhasználati jog. Amennyiben az Adobe-tól vagy bármely felhatalmazott engedélyesétől vásárolta a Szoftvert, s a jelen szerződés feltételeit teljesíti, ideértve a 3. pont szerinti korlátozásokat, az Adobe a Dokumentációban leírt módon és célból az alábbiak szerint nem kizárólagos felhasználói engedélyt ad a Szoftverre: 2.1 Általános használat. A Szoftver egy példánya telepíthető és használható az Ön kompatibilis Számítógépén. A Szoftver használatára vonatkozó fontos korlátozásokkal kapcsolatban olvassa el a 3. pontot. 2.2 Szerverhasználat. Ez a szerződés nem engedi, hogy a szoftvert számítógépes állományszerveren telepítse vagy használja. A számítógépes állományszerveren való szoftverhasználatra vonatkozó információk kapcsán kérjük látogasson el a http://www.adobe.com/go/acrobat_distribute_hu honlapra az Adobe Readerre vonatkozó tájékoztatásért vagy a http://www.adobe.com/go/licensing_hu honlapra az Adobe Runtimesra vonatkozó tájékoztatásért. 2.3 Forgalmazás. Ez az engedély nem nyújt jogosultságot a Szoftver továbbadására vagy forgalmazására. A Szoftver hordozható kommunikációs eszközön vagy belső hálózaton keresztül, illetve saját termék vagy szolgáltatás útján történő forgalmazásához szükséges jog megszerzésére vonatkozó információk kapcsán kérjük látogasson el a http://www.adobe.com/go/acrobat_distribute_hu honlapra az Adobe Readerre vonatkozó tájékoztatásért vagy a http://www.adobe.com/go/licensing_hu honlapra az Adobe Runtimes-ra vonatkozó tájékoztatásért. 2.4 Biztonsági másolat. A Szoftverről egy biztonsági másolat készíthető, feltéve hogy a biztonsági másolatot nem telepítik vagy használják. A biztonsági másolatra vonatkozó jog csak akkor ruházható át, ha a Szoftverhez kapcsolódó minden jogot a 4. pontnak megfelelően átruháznak. 3. Kötelezettségek és korlátozások. 3.1 Adobe Runtime Korlátozások. Ön nem jogosult semmilyen Adobe Runtime-ot nem PC egységen vagy bármely más beágyazott vagy készülék verziójú operációs rendszeren használni. A kétségek elkerülése végett és kizárólag példaként említve, Adobe Runtime nem használható (a) mobil eszközökön, set-top-boxokban(STB), kézi készülékeken, telefonokon, web paden, jegyzetelőkön vagy olyan Tablet PC-ken, amelyek nem Windows XP Tablet PC Editionnel futnak, játékkonzolokon, TV-ken, DVD-lejátszókon, médiaközpontokon (kivéve az XP Media Center Editiont és annak tartozékait), elektronikus hirdetőtáblákon vagy más digitális megjelenítőkön, internetes eszközökön vagy internethez kapcsolódó eszközökön, PDA-kon, orvosi eszközökön, ATM-eken, játékgépeken, házi automata rendszerekben, kioskban, távirányítású egységekben vagy bármilyen más fogyasztói elektromos egységekben, (b) operátor alapú mobil, kábeles, műholdas, vagy televíziós rendszerekben, vagy (c) más zárt rendszerű eszközökön. Az Adobe Runtimes ilyen rendszereken való használatának engedélyezésére vonatkozó információért kérjük látogasson el a http://www.adobe.com/go/licensing_hu honlapra. 3.2 Adobe Reader Korlátozások. Az Adobe Readert az Adobe a PDF állományok megtekintése, terjesztése és megosztása céljából engedélyezi és terjeszti. 3.2.1 A konvertálás korlátozásai. Az Adobe Reader nem integrálható vagy használható más szoftverrel, segédprogrammal vagy olyan funkciókiegészítéssel, amely a Adobe Readert használja vagy arra támaszkodik, valamint PDF fájlok más fájlformátumba konvertálásakor és átalakításakor (pl. PDF fájlt TIFF, JPEG vagy SVG fájllá).

3.2.2 Segédprogramok korlátozása. Az Adobe Reader nem intergrálható, illetve használható olyan beépülő (plug-in) szoftverrel, amelynek kifejlesztése nem felel meg az Adobe Integration Key License Agreementben meghatározottakkal. 3.2.3 Kikapcsolt funkciók. Az Adobe Reader tartalmazhat olyan tulajdonságokat vagy funkciókat, amelyek rejtettek vagy úgy tűnnek, hogy ki vannak kapcsolva vagy nincsenek aktiválva („Kikapcsolt funkciók”). Ezek a Kikapcsolt funkciók csak akkor aktiválódnak, amikor kinyitunk egy olyan PDF dokumentumot, amelyet csak az Adobe-tól beszerezhető engedélyező technológia alkalmazása révén hoztak létre. Ezekhez a Kikapcsolt funkciókhoz nem férhet hozzá másként, csak az ilyen engedélyező technológiák használatával; az Adobe Reader segítségével sem hozhat létre hasonló funkciókat, és másként sem kerülheti meg az ilyen funkciók aktiválását ellenőrző technológiát. A kikapcsolt funkciókra vonatkozó információkért kérjük látogasson el a http://www.adobe.com/go/readerextensions_hu honlapra. 3.3 Figyelmeztetések. A Szoftver másolatainak ugyanolyan szerzői jogi és más tulajdonjogi figyelmeztetést kell tartalmazniuk, mint amilyen a Szoftveren vagy a Szoftverben található. 3.4 Módosítás és feltérképezés kizárása. A Szoftvert tilos módosítani, átdolgozni, lefordítani, továbbá tilos a Szoftveren alapuló származékos művet készíteni. A Szoftver forráskódja nem vizsgálható működési módjának megismerése céljából, azt nem lehet visszafordítani, visszafejteni vagy más módon kísérletet tenni a Szoftver forráskódjának feltárására, kivéve annyiban, amennyiben az irányadó jogszabály a vizsgálást vagy visszafordítást kifejezetten megengedi. 4. Átruházás. A Szoftverhez kapcsolódó jogok nem vehetők bérbe, nem adhatók el, nem adhatók tovább felhasználásra, nem engedményezhetők és nem ruházhatók át, illetve tilos a Szoftver egészének vagy bármely részének egy másik felhasználó Számítógépére történő átmásolásának engedélyezése, kivéve, ha a jelen Szerződés kifejezetten megengedi. A szoftverhasználati jogokat csak akkor lehet átruházni másik személyre vagy jogi személyre, amennyiben: (a) az adott személyre vagy jogi személyre szintén átruházásra kerül (i) a jelen Szerződés, valamint (ii) a Szoftver és Szoftverrel együtt kínált vagy előre telepített egyéb szoftver vagy hardver, beleértve a másolatokat, Frissítéseket és a korábbi változatokat; (b) nem őriz meg a Számítógépén másolatokat, beleértve a biztonsági másolatokat és egyéb példányokat; illetve, ha (c) az a személy, akire mindezt átruházták, elfogadja a jelen Szerződés feltételeit és minden olyan feltételt, amelynek alapján Ön jogszerűen engedélyt kapott a Szoftverre. Az előzőek ellenére nem ruházhatók át a Szoftver oktatási célú, kiadás előtti vagy nem kereskedelmi célú példányai. 5. Szellemi tulajdon, jogfenntartás. A Szoftver és az Ön által másolt engedélyezett példányok az Adobe Systems Incorporated és beszállítói szellemi tulajdonai. A Szoftver felépítése, elrendezése és kódja az Adobe Systems Incorporated és beszállítói számára nagy értéket képviselő üzleti titoknak és bizalmas információnak minősül. A Szoftvert jogszabályok védik, ideértve korlátozás nélkül az Egyesült Államok és más országok szerzői jogi törvényeit, illetve nemzetközi egyezmények rendelkezéseit. A jelen Szerződésben foglalt kifejezett rendelkezések hiányában a jelen Szerződés nem engedélyez a Szoftverhez kapcsolódó szellemi tulajdonjogokat, és a jelen Szerződésben kifejezetten megengedett jogokon kívül az Adobe és beszállítói minden más jogot fenntartanak. 6. Összekapcsolhatóság és Bizalmasság. 6.1 A PDF-állományok használata. Ha a Szoftvert olyan PDF-állomány megnyitására használja, amelyet képessé tettek arra, hogy az „Ads for Adobe PDF” szolgáltatáshoz történt regisztráció útján hirdetéseket jelenítsen meg, számítógépe csatlakozhat egy, az Adobe, egy hirdető vagy valamely más, harmadik fél által üzemeltetett weboldalhoz. Ha ez történik, az Ön internet protokoll (IP-) címe elküldésre kerül. Előfordulhat, hogy az oldalt fenntartó fél hirdetéseket vagy egyéb elektronikus tartalmakat küldő (vagy „szolgáltató”) technológiát használ, és ezek a megnyitott állományban vagy amellett jelennek meg. A weboldal üzemeltetője JavaScriptet, webes irányjelzőket (web beacon, más néven action tag vagy egypixeles gif) és egyéb technológiákat is használhat, hogy növelje és mérje a hirdetések hatékonyságát, valamint hogy személyre szabja a hirdetési tartalmat. Az Ön és az

Adobe weboldalai közötti kommunikációt az Adobe Online Adatvédelmi Szabályzata szabályozza, amely a következő címen található: http://www.adobe.com/go/privacy_hu. Azokhoz a funkciókhoz, amelyeket harmadik fél használhat, az Adobe nem fér hozzá és nem is ellenőrizheti azokat, a harmadik felek weboldalainak információs gyakorlatára pedig nem vonatkozik az Adobe Online Privacy Policy. 6.2 Frissítés. Tudomásul veszi és elfogadja, hogy a Szoftver automatikusan csatlakoztathatja Számítógépét az internethez, hogy frissítéseket keressen, amelyeket automatikusan letölthet Számítógépére, és hogy tájékoztassa az Adobe-t arról, hogy a Szoftver telepítése sikeresen megtörtént. Ha sor kerül erre, csak nem személyes azonosító információ továbbítódik az Adobe-hoz. Az Ön és az Adobe weboldalai közötti kommunikációt az Adobe Online Privacy Policy szabályozza, amely a következő címen található: http://www.adobe.com/go/privacy_hu. Kérjük, tanulmányozza át a Dokumentációt az alapértelmezés szerinti (default) frissítési beállításokra vonatkozó információkkal kapcsolatban. 6.3 Beállítások Vezérlő. A Flash Player szükségessé teheti, hogy bizonyos felhasználói beállításokat a Számítógépén tároljon helyi megosztott objektumként. Ezen beállítások nem kapcsolhatók Önhöz, de lehetővé teszik, hogy Ön egyes beállításokat konfiguráljon a Flash Playerben. A helyileg megosztott objektumokról a következő címen talál részletesebb információt: http://www.adobe.com/go/flashplayer_security_hu, a Beállítások Vezérlőről pedig itt tájékozódhat bővebben: http://www.adobe.com/go/settingsmanager_hu. 7. Harmadik fél kínálata. A Szoftver lehetővé teszi, hogy harmadik fél weboldalához, szoftveralkalmazásához és adatszolgáltatójához csatlakozzon, azzal együttműködjön („Harmadik fél kínálata”). A Harmadik fél kínálatához - ideértve az árukat, szolgáltatásokat vagy információkat is - való csatlakozást, illetve annak használatát az adott kínálatra vonatkozó feltételek szabályozzák. Az Adobe-nak nincs a tulajdonában Harmadik fél kínálata, és nem is üzemeltet ilyeneket. 8. Digitális tanúsítványok. 8.1 Használat. Az Adobe AIR digitális tanúsítványokat használ a harmadik felek által létrehozott Adobe AIR alkalmazások kibocsátójának azonosítására. Az Adobe Reader digitális tanúsítványokat használ a PDF dokumentumokban az aláírásokhoz és az aláírások érvényesítéséhez, valamint a hiteles PDF dokumentumok érvényesítéséhez. A digitális tanúsítvány érvényesítésekor Számítógépe csatlakozhat az internethez. A digitális tanúsítványokat harmadik fél tanúsító szervezetek adják ki, ideértve az Adobe Certified Document Services (CDS) nevű szervezetet is, melyről listát a http://www.adobe.com/go/partners_cds_hu címen („Tanúsító Szervezetek Certificate Authorities”) talál; de saját is lehet. 8.2 Feltételek. A digitális tanúsítványokon alapuló vásárlás, használat és az azok iránti bizalom az Ön és a Tanúsító Szervezet felelőssége. Mielőtt megbízik egy tanúsított dokumentumban, digitális aláírásban vagy egy Tanúsító Szervezet szolgáltatásában, vizsgálja meg azokat az érvényes feltételeket, amelyek alapján az adott Tanúsító Szervezet szolgáltatást nyújt, ideértve például az előfizetési megállapodásokat, kölcsönös bizalmon alapuló megállapodásokat, a tanúsítás szabályaira és gyakorlatára vonatkozó nyilatkozatokat. Az Adobe CDS értékesítőire vonatkozó információk a következő linken tekinthetők meg: http://www.adobe.com/go/partners_cds_hu. 8.3 Tudomásulvétel. Tudomásul veszi, hogy (a) az ellenőrzés előtt a digitális tanúsítvány visszavonható, ha a digitális aláírás vagy a tanúsítvány érvényesnek tűnt, holott valójában nem az, (b) a digitális tanúsítvány biztonsága vagy integritása veszélybe kerülhet a dokumentumot aláíró fél, az érintett Tanúsító Szervezet vagy valamely harmadik fél cselekedete vagy mulasztása folytán, és (c) a tanúsítvány egy saját maga által aláírt tanúsítvány is lehet, amelyet nem a Tanúsító Szervezet adott ki. ÖN EGYEDÜL FELEL AZÉRT A DÖNTÉSÉRT, HOGY MEGBÍZIKE A TANÚSÍTVÁNYBAN. AMÍG NEM KAP ÍRÁSBELI BIZTOSÍTÉKOT A TANÚSÍTÓ SZERVEZETTŐL, ADDIG SAJÁT KOCKÁZATÁRA HASZNÁLJA A DIGITÁLIS TANÚSÍTVÁNYT. 8.4 Harmadik fél kedvezményezettek. Hozzájárul ahhoz, hogy valamely Tanúsító Szervezet, amelyben megbízik, e szerződésnek harmadik fél kedvezményezettje, amely saját nevében, mintha az Adobe lenne, kikényszerítheti e szerződést. 8.5 Kártérítés. Ön vállalja, hogy vétlennek tartja és kártalanítja az Adobe-t és az érintett Tanúsító Szervezetet (a feltételekben foglalt kifejezett rendelkezések kivételével) minden olyan anyagi felelősségért, veszteségért,

cselekedetért, kárért vagy követelésért (ideértve az ésszerű kiadásokat, költségeket és jogi díjakat), amelyek a Szervezet szolgáltatásainak igénybevételével kapcsolatban vagy azokkal összefüggésben, illetve azokban bízva keletkeztek, ideértve korlátozás nélkül (a) a lejárt vagy visszavont tanúsítványra történt hagyatkozást; (b) a tanúsítvány nem megfelelő ellenőrzését; (c) a tanúsítvány oly módon történő használatát, amelyet a vonatkozó feltételek, a jelen Szerződés vagy a vonatkozó jogszabályok nem engednek meg; (d) a kibocsátó szolgáltatásaiban vagy tanúsítványaiban bízva ésszerű döntéshozatal elmulasztását az adott körülmények között; illetve (e) a szolgáltatásokra vonatkozó feltételekben megkövetelt kötelezettségek teljesítésének elmulasztását. 9. A Szavatosság kizárása. A Szoftvert „MEGTEKINTETT ÁLLAPOTBAN” biztosítjuk, MINDEN HIBÁVAL együtt. AZ ADOBE ÉS BESZÁLLÍTÓI, VALAMINT A TANÚSÍTÓ SZERVEZETEK NEM VÁLLALNAK ÉS NEM IS TUDNAK VÁLLALNI GARANCIÁT AZÉRT A TELJESÍTMÉNYÉRT VAGY EREDMÉNYÉRT, AMELY A SZOFTVER HASZNÁLATÁBÓL, A TANÚSÍTÓ SZERVEZETEK SZOLGÁLTATÁSAIBÓL VAGY HARMADIK FÉL AJÁNLATAIBÓL ERED. AZON SZAVATOSSÁG, FELTÉTEL VAGY NYILATKOZAT KIVÉTELÉVEL, AMELYET AZ ÖN SAJÁT ÁLLAMÁBAN IRÁNYADÓ JOG ALAPJÁN NEM ZÁRHATÓ KI ÉS NEM KORLÁTOZHATÓ, AZ ADOBE ÉS BESZÁLLÍTÓI, VALAMINT A TANÚSÍTÓ SZERVEZETEK NEM VÁLLALNAK (SEM KIFEJEZETT SEM HALLGATÓLAGOS, JOGSZABÁLY VAGY SZOKÁSJOG ÁLTAL MEGKÖVETELT, ILLETVE SZOKÁS, HASZNÁLAT VAGY MÁSKÉNT MEGKÍVÁNT) SZAVATOSSÁGOT, FELTÉTELT VAGY NYILATKOZATOT SEMMILYEN ÜGYRE VONATKOZÓAN, IDEÉRTVE KORLÁTOZÁS NÉLKÜL HARMADIK FÉL JOGAINAK TISZTELETBEN TARTÁSÁT, KERESKEDELMI FORGALOMBA HOZHATÓSÁGOT, INTEGRÁCIÓT, MEGFELELŐ MINŐSÉGET, ILLETVE EGY BIZONYOS CÉLNAK VALÓ MEGFELELÉST. A 9. és 10. pont rendelkezései a jelen Szerződés - bármilyen okból történő - megszűnését követően is hatályban maradnak, de ez nem vonja maga után azt, és erre nem lehet folytatólagos jogot alapítani ahhoz, hogy a Szoftvert a jelen Szerződés megszűnését követően is használhassák. 10. Felelősségkorlátozás. AZ ADOBE, BESZÁLLÍTÓI VAGY A TANÚSÍTÓ HATÓSÁGOK SEMMILYEN KÖRÜLMÉNYEK KÖZÖTT NEM TARTOZNAK KÁRTÉRÍTÉSI FELELŐSSÉGGEL SEMMILYEN KÁRÉRT, KÖVETELÉSÉRT VAGY KÖLTSÉGÉRT, ILLETVE VALAMI KÖVETKEZTÉBEN ELSZENVEDETT, KÖZVETETT, ELŐRE NEM LÁTOTT KÁROKÉRT, ILLETVE ELMARADT HASZONÉRT VAGY MEGTAKARÍTÁSÉRT, MÉG AKKOR SEM HA AZ ADOBE KÉPVISELŐJÉT TÁJÉKOZTATTÁK EZEN VESZTESÉGEK, KÁROK, KÖVETELÉSEK VAGY KÖLTSÉGEK, ILLETVE HARMADIK FÉL KÖVETELÉSÉNEK LEHETŐSÉGÉRŐL. A FENTI KORLÁTOZÁSOK ÉS KIZÁRÁSOK AZ ÖN ÁLLAMÁBAN IRÁNYADÓ JOGSZABÁLYOK ÁLTAL MEGENGEDETT MÉRTÉKIG ALKALMAZHATÓK. AZ ADOBE, BESZÁLLÍTÓI ÉS A TANÚSÍTÓ SZERVEZETEK TELJES FELELŐSSÉGE - A JELEN SZERZŐDÉS ALAPJÁN ÉS AZZAL KAPCSOLATBAN A SZOFTVERÉRT KIFIZETETT ÖSSZEGRE KORLÁTOZÓDIK. A jelen Szerződésben foglalt rendelkezések nem korlátozzák az Adobe kártérítési felelősségét Önnel szemben olyan haláleset vagy személyi sérülés esetén, amelyet az Adobe gondatlansága vagy megtévesztő vétkes (csalárd) cselekménye idézett elő. Az Adobe jár el beszállítói és a Tanúsító Szervezetek nevében a kötelezettségek, szavatosságok, valamint a jelen Szerződésben rendelkezett kártérítési felelősség kizárása és/vagy korlátozása érdekében, de kizárólag csak a fent írt esetekben és célokból. További tájékoztatás céljából kérjük olvassa el a jelen szerződés végén található joghatóságra vonatkozó rendelkezéseket, vagy lépjen kapcsolatba az Adobe Ügyfélszolgálatával. 11. Kiviteli szabályok. Ön vállalja, hogy a Szoftvert nem szállítja át és nem exportálja más országba, illetve nem használja olyan módon, amelyet az Egyesült Államok exportigazgatási törvénye vagy egyéb, árukivitelre vonatkozó jogszabályok, korlátozások vagy szabályok tiltanak (együttesen: „Kiviteli jogszabályok”). Ezenkívül, amennyiben a Szoftver a Kiviteli jogszabályok alapján exportellenőrzés alá eső tételnek minősül, akkor Ön úgy nyilatkozik és szavatolja azt, hogy nem állampolgára, illetve nem tartózkodik olyan országban, amely embargó vagy más korlátozás alá esik (ideértve korlátozás nélkül Iránt, Szíriát, Szudánt, Kubát és Észak-Koreát), valamint hogy a Kiviteli Jogszabályok másképpen sem tiltják, hogy Szoftvert kapjon. A Szoftver használatára vonatkozó jogok megadásának az a feltétele, hogy a jelen szerződésben foglalt feltételek teljesítésének elmulasztása esetén ezek a jogosultságok elvesznek.

12. Irányadó jog. A jelen Szerződésre és annak értelmezésére az alábbi államok hatályban lévő anyagi jogszabályai az irányadók: (a) Kalifornia Állam, ha a Szoftverre vonatkozó engedélyhez az Egyesült Államokban, Kanadában vagy Mexikóban jutottak hozzá; vagy (b) Japán, ha a Szoftverre vonatkozó engedélyhez Japánban, Kínában, Koreában vagy egyéb olyan délkelet-ázsiai országban jutottak hozzá, ahol a hivatalos nyelvek írásbeli változatához vagy képírást használnak (pl. hanzi, kandzsi vagy handzsa), és/vagy olyan írásrendszert, amely a képíráson alapszik vagy szerkezetében ahhoz hasonló, mint amilyen például a hangul vagy a kana; vagy (c) Anglia, ha a Szoftverre vonatkozó engedélyt nem a fent leírt joghatóságok területén vásárolták. Ha a kaliforniai jog az irányadó, akkor Santa Clara megye (Kalifornia) megfelelő bíróságai, ha a japán jog az irányadó, akkor a Tokiói Kerületi Bíróság (Japán), továbbá ha az angol jog az irányadó, akkor az illetékes londoni bíróságok (Anglia) nem kizárólagos illetékességgel rendelkeznek a jelen szerződéssel kapcsolatos jogviták tekintetében. A jelen szerződésre nem vonatkoznak a nemzetközi kollíziós magánjogi szabályok (egyik államé sem), illetve az Egyesült Nemzetek - áruk nemzetközi adásvételi szerződéseiről szóló - Egyezménye sem, melyeknek alkalmazása kifejezetten kizárt. 13. Általános rendelkezések. Ha a jelen szerződés bármely része érvénytelen vagy kikényszeríthetetlen, az nem érinti a jelen szerződés többi részének érvényességét, amely feltételeinek megfelelően érvényes és kikényszeríthető marad. A jelen szerződés nem sérti a fogyasztói minőségben eljáró fél törvényes jogait. A jelen szerződés csak írásban és az Adobe felhatalmazott tisztségviselője által aláírva módosítható. Az Adobe a frissítéseket további vagy eltérő feltételekkel is engedélyezheti. A jelen Szerződés az Adobe és Ön között a Szoftverrel kapcsolatban létrejött teljes megállapodást képezi, és felváltja a Szoftverre vonatkozóan ezt megelőzően tett minden nyilatkozatot, megbeszélését, kötelezettségvállalást, közlést és nyilvánosságra hozatalt. 14. Felhívás az USA kormányzati végfelhasználók részére. Az USA kormányzati végfelhasználók esetében az Adobe vállalja, hogy eleget tesz a vonatkozó esélyegyenlőségrõl szóló jogszabályoknak, ideértve - amennyiben alkalmazható - a módosított 11246. sz. kormányrendelet rendelkezéseit, a vietnami háborús veteránok beilleszkedését elősegítő 1974. évi törvény 402. §-át (38 USC 4212), a módosított 1973. évi rehabilitációs törvény 503. §-át, továbbá a 41 CFR 60-1-től 60-60-ig terjedő részét, valamint a 60-250 és 60-741 részekben foglalt szabályokat. Az előző mondatban foglalt, hátrányos helyzetűek negatív megkülönböztetése ellenzéséről rendelkező pont és szabályok a jelen szerződésbe utalás révén beleértendők. 15. Engedélyeknek való megfelelés. Ha Ön vállalkozó vagy szervezet, vállalja, hogy az Adobe vagy felhatalmazott képviselőjének kérésére 30 (harminc) napon belül teljes mértékben dokumentálja és igazolja, hogy valamennyi Szoftver használata összhangban áll a kérés idején az Adobe-tól kapott érvényes engedélyekkel. 16. Egyes rendelkezések és kivételek. 16.1 Kártérítési felelősség korlátozása a Németországban és Ausztriában tartózkodó felhasználók részére. 16.1.1 Ha a Szoftvert Németországban vagy Ausztriában vásárolta, és huzamosabb ideig ebben az országban tartózkodik, akkor a 10. pont nem alkalmazható. Helyette a 16.1.2 pont rendelkezéseinek megfelelően az Adobe törvényes kártérítési felelőssége az alábbiak szerint korlátozandó: (i) Az Adobe csak azon károk összegéig vállal felelősséget, amelyek a kárral érintett felhasználási szerződés megkötésének idején jellemzően előreláthatóak voltak, mely kárt egy lényeges szerződéses kötelezettség enyhe gondatlanságból történő megszegése okozta, valamint (ii) az Adobe nem vállal kártérítési felelősséget olyan kárért, amely nem lényeges szerződéses kötelezettség enyhe gondatlanságból elkövetett megszegésének az eredménye. 16.1.2 A fenti felelősségkorlátozás nem vonatkozik a jogszabály szerint kötelező anyagi felelősségre, különösen nem a német termékfelelősségről szóló törvény alapján fennálló felelősségre, valamely adott garanciavállalás miatt vagy vétkesen okozott személyi sérülésért való felelősségre.

16.1.3 Ön köteles minden ésszerű intézkedést megtenni a károk elkerülése vagy enyhítése érdekében, különösen pedig biztonsági másolatokat készíteni a Szoftverről és saját számítógépes adatairól a jelen szerződés rendelkezéseinek megfelelően.

Amennyiben a jelen Szerződéssel kapcsolatban kérdése lenne vagy információt szeretne kapni az Adobe-tól kérjük, hogy a saját államában működő Adobe képviselettel a jelen termékhez mellékelt címen és elérhetőségi információk révén, vagy az interneten a www.adobe.com/hu honlapon keresztül vegye fel a kapcsolatot. Az Adobe, AIR, Authorware, Flash, Reader és a Shockwave az Adobe Systems Incorporated bejegyzett védjegyei vagy védjegyei az Egyesült Államokban és/vagy más országokban.

Reader_Player_AIR_WWEULA-hu_HU-20080204_1313

 

ADOBE SYSTEMS INCORPORATED Esclusione di Garanzia e Contratto di Licenza Software. IL PRESENTE DOCUMENTO INCLUDE INFORMAZIONI SULLA GARANZIA (PARTE I) E UN CONTRATTO DI LICENZA PER L’USO DEL SOFTWARE ADOBE (PARTE II). PARTE I. ESCLUSIONE DI GARANZIA. IL SOFTWARE E ALTRE INFORMAZIONI VENGONO FORNITI ALL’UTENTE “COSÌ COME SONO” E CON DIFETTI. ADOBE, I SUOI FORNITORI E LE AUTORITÀ DI CERTIFICAZIONE NON GARANTISCONO, NÉ POSSONO GARANTIRE, LE PRESTAZIONI O I RISULTATI CHE L’UTENTE PUÒ OTTENERE DALL’UTILIZZO DEL SOFTWARE, DEI SERVIZI DELL’AUTORITÀ DI CERTIFICAZIONE O DI ALTRE OFFERTE DI TERZI. FATTA ECCEZIONE PER QUALUNQUE FORMA DI GARANZIA, CONDIZIONE, DICHIARAZIONE O TERMINE INDEROGABILE CHE NON POSSANO ESSERE ESCLUSI O LIMITATI A MOTIVO DELLE LEGGI VIGENTI NELLA GIURISDIZIONE DELL’UTENTE, ADOBE, I SUOI FORNITORI E LE AUTORITÀ DI CERTIFICAZIONE NON RICONOSCONO ALCUNA GARANZIA, CONDIZIONE, DICHIARAZIONE O TERMINE (ESPRESSI O IMPLICITI, PREVISTI DA LEGGE, COMMON LAW, CONSUETUDINE, USI O ALTRO) COMPRESE, IN VIA ESEMPLIFICATIVA, LE GARANZIE DI NON VIOLAZIONE DI DIRITTI ALTRUI, DI COMMERCIABILITÀ, DI INTEGRAZIONE, DI QUALITÀ SODDISFACENTE O DI IDONEITÀ AD USO SPECIFICO. PARTE II. CONTRATTO DI LICENZA PER IL SOFTWARE. L’UTILIZZO, LA COPIA O LA DISTRIBUZIONE IN TUTTO O IN PARTE DEL SOFTWARE ADOBE COMPORTA L’ACCETTAZIONE DEI TERMINI E DELLE CONDIZIONI DEL PRESENTE CONTRATTO, INCLUSE IN PARTICOLARE LE LIMITAZIONI RELATIVE A: UTILIZZO, ARTICOLO 2; TRASFERIBILITÀ, ARTICOLO 4; CONNETTIVITÀ E PRIVACY, ARTICOLO 6; GARANZIA, ARTICOLO 9 E RESPONSABILITÀ, ARTICOLO 10 E 16. CON L’ACCETTAZIONE, IL PRESENTE CONTRATTO È APPLICABILE NEI CONFRONTI DELL’UTENTE E DI QUALSIASI SOGGETTO GIURIDICO CHE ABBIA ACQUISTATO IL SOFTWARE E NEL CUI INTERESSE LO STESSO VENGA UTILIZZATO. QUALORA L’UTENTE NON ACCETTI I TERMINI DEL CONTRATTO, NON DOVRÀ UTILIZZARE QUESTO SOFTWARE. ADOBE AUTORIZZA L’UTENTE AD UTILIZZARE IL SOFTWARE ESCLUSIVAMENTE IN BASE AI TERMINI DEL PRESENTE CONTRATTO. IL SOFTWARE PUÒ INCLUDERE MATERIALI FORNITI DA TERZI, IL CUI UTILIZZO PUÒ ESSERE SOGGETTO A TERMINI E CONDIZIONI DIVERSI, SOLITAMENTE RIPORTATI IN UN CONTRATTO DI LICENZA A PARTE, UN FILE “LEGGIMI” CHE ACCOMPAGNA TALI MATERIALI O NELLE “AVVERTENZE E/O ULTERIORI TERMINI E CONDIZIONI DI SOFTWARE DI TERZI” REPERIBILI NEL SITO http://www.adobe.com/go/thirdparty_it. 1. Definizioni. Con “Adobe” si intende Adobe Systems Incorporated, società del Delaware con sede in 345 Park Avenue, San Jose, California 95110, Stati Uniti, se si applica l’Art. 12(a) del presente Contratto. In caso contrario si intende Adobe Systems Software Ireland Limited, Unit 3100, Lake Drive, City West Campus, Saggart D24, Repubblica d’Irlanda, società costituita secondo le leggi della Repubblica d’Irlanda e affiliata e licenziataria di Adobe Systems Incorporated. “Computer” indica un dispositivo elettronico virtuale o fisico che accetta informazioni in forma digitale o simile e le elabora per ottenere uno specifico risultato sulla base di una sequenza di istruzioni. Con “Software” si intende (a) tutto il contenuto dei file (distribuito secondo modalità elettroniche o su supporti materiali) o del disco o dischi o di altri supporti forniti con il presente Contratto, che possono includere (i) software o informazioni relative a prodotti di Adobe o di terzi, compresi Adobe Reader® (“Adobe Reader”), Adobe® AIR™ (“Adobe AIR”), Adobe Flash® Player, Shockwave® Player e Authorware® Player (collettivamente Adobe AIR, Flash, Shockwave e Authorware sono “Adobe Runtime”); (ii) materiali scritti o file esplicativi relativi

(“Documentazione”) e (iii) caratteri (“font”); (b) eventuali miglioramenti, versioni modificate, aggiornamenti, aggiunte e copie del Software concessi in licenza all’utente da Adobe (collettivamente, “Aggiornamenti”). Con “Utilizzare” si intende accedere, installare, scaricare, copiare o avvalersi in qualunque altro modo dell’uso della funzionalità del Software. 2. Licenza Software. A condizione che l’utente abbia ottenuto il Software da Adobe o da uno dei suoi licenziatari autorizzati, e subordinatamente al rispetto dei termini del presente contratto, comprese le limitazioni previste nell’Articolo 3, Adobe concede all’utente una licenza non esclusiva per l’Utilizzo del Software per gli scopi descritti nella Documentazione, come segue: 2.1 Condizioni generali di Utilizzo. L’utente può installare ed utilizzare una copia del Software sul proprio Computer compatibile. Si veda l’Articolo3 per le rilevanti limitazioni all’uso del Software. 2.2 Utilizzo su Server. Il presente contratto non consente l’installazione o l’utilizzo del software su un file server. Per informazioni sull’utilizzo del software su un file server, consultare il sito Web http://www.adobe.com/go/acrobat_distribute_it per informazioni su Adobe Reader; oppure http://www.adobe.com/go/licensing_it per informazioni su Adobe Runtime. 2.3 Distribuzione. Questa licenza non permette all’utente di concedere il Software in sublicenza o di distribuirlo. Per informazioni su come ottenere il diritto di distribuire il Software mediante supporti tangibili o una rete interna o con i propri prodotti o servizi, consultare il sito Web http://www.adobe.com/go/acrobat_distribute_it per informazioni su Adobe Reader; oppure http://www.adobe.com/go/licensing_it per informazioni su Adobe Runtime. 2.4 Copia di backup. L’utente ha diritto ad eseguire una copia di backup del Software, a condizione che la stessa non venga installata o utilizzata. L’utente non può trasferire il diritto di Utilizzare copie di backup, tranne nel caso in cui trasferisca tutti i diritti relativi al Software come previsto dall’Art. 4. 3. Obblighi e limitazioni. 3.1 Limitazioni di Adobe Runtime. L’utente non può utilizzare alcun Adobe Runtime su alcun dispositivo non-PC o con alcuna versione incorporata o dispositivo di alcun sistema operativo. A scanso di equivoci, e solo a titolo di esempio, l’utente non può usare un Adobe Runtime su alcun (a) dispositivo mobile, set top box (STB), dispositivo palmare, telefono, web pad, tablet e Tablet PC (ad esclusione dei dispositivi con sistema operativo Windows XP Tablet PC Edition e integrazioni), consolle di giochi, televisori, lettori DVD, media center (tranne i dispositivi con sistema operativo Windows XP Media Center Edition e integrazioni), tabelloni elettronici o altra segnaletica digitale, dispositivi Internet o altri dispositivi connessi a Internet, dispositivi PDA, dispositivi medici, macchine ATM, dispositivi telematici, macchine da gioco, sistemi di automazione per la casa, postazioni Internet, dispositivi di controllo a distanza, o qualsiasi altro dispositivo elettronico per il consumatore, (b) sistemi mobili basati su operatore, via cavo, satellite o televisivo o (c) altri dispositivi di sistema chiuso. Per informazioni sulla concessione in licenza di Adobe Runtime per questo tipo di sistemi, visitare il sito Web http://www.adobe.com/go/licensing_it. 3.2 Limitazioni di Adobe Reader. Adobe Reader è concesso in licenza e distribuito da Adobe per visualizzare, distribuire e condividere file PDF. 3.2.1 Limitazioni di conversione. L’utente non può integrare o usare Adobe Reader con qualsiasi altro software, plug-in o versione successiva che usi o dipenda da Adobe Reader quando si convertono o trasformano i file PDF in altri formati (ad esempio, un file PDF in un file TIFF, JPEG o SVG). 3.2.2 Limitazioni relative ai plug-in. L’utente non può integrare o utilizzare Adobe Reader con qualsiasi software plug-in non sviluppato in conformità con il Contratto di Licenza Adobe Integration Key. 3.2.3 Funzionalità disabilitate. Adobe Reader può contenere funzionalità o funzioni che sono nascoste o appaiono disabilitate (le “Funzioni disabilitate”). Le Funzioni disabilitate si attivano solo all’apertura di un documento PDF che è stato creato utilizzando l’apposita tecnologia di attivazione fornita solo da Adobe. L’utente si impegna a non accedere o a tentare di accedere alle Funzioni disabilitate in altro modo che mediante l’utilizzo di tali tecnologie di

attivazione, si impegna altresì a non utilizzare Adobe Reader per creare una funzione sostanzialmente simile a qualunque Funzione disabilitata o a circonvenire in alcun modo la tecnologia che controlla l’attivazione di tali funzioni. Per ulteriori informazioni sulle funzioni disabilitate, consultare il sito http://www.adobe.com/go/readerextensions_it. 3.3 Informazioni sul Copyright. Qualsiasi copia del Software effettuata dall’utente deve contenere le stesse informazioni sul diritto d’autore e altri diritti esclusivi che appaiono su o nel Software. 3.4 Divieto di modifica o di reverse engineering. Non è possibile modificare, adattare, tradurre o creare opere derivate basate sul Software. L’utente non può compiere operazioni di riverse engineering, decompilare, disassemblare ovvero tentare in altro modo di scoprire il codice sorgente del Software, fatta eccezione per i casi in cui la normativa vigente ne consente espressamente il reverse engineering o la decompilazione. 4. Trasferimento. L’utente non può concedere in locazione, in leasing, in sublicenza, assegnare o trasferire i propri diritti sul Software né consentire la copia integrale o parziale del Software su Computer di altri, fatta eccezione per i casi espressamente contemplati nel presente Contratto. L’utente potrà tuttavia trasferire tutti i diritti a utilizzare il Software ad altra persona fisica o giuridica a condizione che: (a) trasferisca a tale persona fisica o giuridica (i) il presente Contratto, e (ii) il Software e tutti i componenti software o hardware inclusi o preinstallati con il Software, ivi incluse tutte le copie, gli aggiornamenti e le versioni precedenti, (b) l’utente non trattenga copie del Software, ivi incluse copie di backup e copie memorizzate su Computer, e (c) il cessionario accetti le condizioni e i termini del presente Contratto e tutti i termini e le condizioni sulla base dei quali l’utente ha legalmente acquistato la licenza per il Software. In deroga a quanto sopra, l’utente non potrà trasferire copie di versioni del Software destinate all’istruzione, versioni preliminari o copie dimostrative di cui è vietata la vendita. 5. Titolarità dei Diritti Proprietà Intellettuale. Diritti riservati. Il Software e tutte le copie che l’utente è autorizzato ad effettuare costituiscono proprietà intellettuale di Adobe Systems Incorporated e dei suoi fornitori. La struttura, l’organizzazione ed il codice del Software costituiscono importanti segreti industriali ed informazioni confidenziali di proprietà di Adobe Systems Incorporated e dei suoi fornitori. Il Software è protetto dalla legge, incluse, a titolo meramente esemplificativo e non esaustivo, le leggi sul diritto d’autore degli Stati Uniti e di altri paesi e le disposizioni dei trattati internazionali. Fatta eccezione per quanto espressamente previsto nel presente contratto, il presente contratto non concede all’utente alcun diritto di proprietà intellettuale sul Software e tutti i diritti non espressamente concessi sono riservati da Adobe e dai suoi fornitori. 6. Connettività e privacy. 6.1 Utilizzo dei file PDF. Quando si usa il Software per aprire un file PDF in cui è stata attivata la possibilità di visualizzare annunci pubblicitari tramite la registrazione al servizio Ads for Adobe PDF, il computer può connettersi con un sito Web gestito da Adobe, un inserzionista o altra terza parte. L’indirizzo di protocollo Internet (IP) dell’utente viene inviato quando ciò si verifica. La parte che esegue l’hosting del sito può usare sistemi tecnologici per inviare (o “servire”) annunci pubblicitari o altro contenuto elettronico che viene visualizzato nel file o in prossimità dello stesso. L’operatore del sito Web può inoltre utilizzare JavaScript, beacon Web (chiamati anche action tag o single-pixel gif) e altre tecnologie per aumentare e misurare l’efficacia della pubblicità e per personalizzarne il contenuto. Le comunicazioni con i siti Web Adobe sono regolate dalla Online Privacy Policy di Adobe, disponibile all’indirizzo http://www.adobe.com/go/privacy_it. Adobe può non avere accesso o controllare le funzioni utilizzate da terzi e le pratiche relative alle informazioni dei siti Web di terzi non sono coperte dalla Online Privacy Policy di Adobe. 6.2 Aggiornamento. L’utente riconosce e accetta che il Software possa far sì che il Computer si colleghi automaticamente ad Internet per verificare la presenza di aggiornamenti disponibili per il download automatico sul Computer e informi Adobe della corretta installazione del Software. In questo caso, solo informazioni identificative di carattere non personale vengono trasmesse ad Adobe. Le comunicazioni con i siti Web Adobe sono regolate dalla

Online Privacy Policy di Adobe, disponibile all’indirizzo http://www.adobe.com/go/privacy_it. Consultare la Documentazione per informazioni sulla modifica delle impostazioni predefinite di aggiornamento. 6.3 Settaggi Manager. Flash Player può causare l’archiviazione di certi settaggi dell’utente sul Computer sotto forma di oggetto localmente condiviso. Questi settaggi non sono collegati all’utente, ma permettono di configurare determinati settaggi all’interno del Flash Player. Si possono trovare maggiori informazioni sugli oggetti localmente condivisi al sito http://www.adobe.com/go/flashplayer_security_it e maggiori informazioni sui Settaggi Manager al sito http://www.adobe.com/go/settingsmanager_it. 7. Offerte di terzi. Il Software può consentire all’utente di accedere e interagire con siti Web di terze parti, applicazioni software e servizi dati, ad inclusione di applicazioni Internet multimediali (“Offerte di terzi”). L’accesso e l’uso da parte dell’utente di Offerte di terzi, ivi inclusi i beni, i servizi e le informazioni, è soggetto ai termini e alle condizioni relative a tali offerte. Le Offerte di terzi non sono di proprietà di né sono fornite da Adobe. 8. Certificati digitali. 8.1 Utilizzo. Adobe AIR usa certificati digitali per consentire di identificare i fornitori di applicazioni Adobe AIR create da terzi. Adobe Reader utilizza certificati digitali per firmare e convalidare le firme in documenti PDF e per convalidare i documenti PDF certificati. Al momento della convalida di un certificato digitale, il Computer si può connettere ad Internet. I certificati digitali sono emessi da autorità terze di certificazione, ad inclusione dei fornitori di Adobe Certified Document Services (CDS) elencati all’indirizzo http://www.adobe.com/go/partners_cds_it (“Autorità di certificazione”), oppure firmati dall’utente stesso. 8.2 Termini e condizioni. L’acquisto, l’uso ed il fare affidamento su certificati digitali è responsabilità dell’utente e dell’Autorità di certificazione. Prima di fare affidamento su qualunque documento certificato, firma digitale o servizio di Autorità di certificazione, l’utente è tenuto a verificare i termini e le condizioni applicabili in base alle quali la rilevante Autorità di certificazione fornisce servizi fra cui, ad esempio, i contratti con i sottoscrittori, con terzi che fanno affidamento sui servizi prestati, i regolamenti relativi ai certificati, le dichiarazioni relative alla prassi adottata. Vedere i collegamenti all’indirizzo http://www.adobe.com/go/partners_cds_it per informazioni sui fornitori di CDS di Adobe. 8.3 Dichiarazione. L’utente accetta che (a) il certificato digitale può essere stato revocato prima del momento della verifica, con la conseguenza che la firma digitale o il certificato digitale sembrano validi quando in effetti non lo sono; (b) la sicurezza o l’integrità di un certificato digitale possono essere compromesse da un atto o da un’omissione di chi appone la firma sul documento, della relativa Autorità di certificazione ovvero di qualunque parte terza; e (c) il certificato può essere un certificato firmato da chiunque e non fornito dall’Autorità di certificazione. L’UTENTE È IL SOLO RESPONSABILE DELLA DECISIONE SE FARE AFFIDAMENTO O MENO SU UN CERTIFICATO. TRANNE NEL CASO IN CUI SIA STATA FORNITA DA UN’AUTORITÀ DI CERTIFICAZIONE UNA GARANZIA SCRITTA DISTINTA, L’UTILIZZO DEI CERTIFICATI DIGITALI È A PROPRIO RISCHIO. 8.4 Terzi Beneficiari. L’utente concorda che qualunque Autorità di certificazione sulla quale avrà fatto affidamento sarà una terza beneficiaria in relazione al Contratto e avrà diritto a far valere il presente Contratto a proprio nome alla pari di Adobe. 8.5 Indennizzo. L’utente accetta di manlevare Adobe e ogni Autorità di certificazione (fatti salvi i casi espressamente previsti dai termini e dalle condizioni) da ogni e qualsiasi responsabilità, perdita, azione legale, danno o pretesa di terzi (compresi ragionevoli costi e spese legali) derivanti o connessi all’uso di o all’affidamento a servizi di tale autorità, come, senza limitazioni, (a) l’affidamento a un certificato scaduto o revocato, (b) l’inadeguata verifica di un certificato, (c) l’uso di un certificato in modi diversi da quelli consentiti dai termini e dalle condizioni applicabili, dal presente contratto o dalle leggi applicabili, (d) il mancato esercizio di ragionevole discernimento nel fare affidamento ai servizi o ai certificati emessi o (e) la mancata osservanza degli obblighi previsti dai termini e dalle condizioni relative ai servizi.

9. Esclusione di garanzia. Il software viene fornito all’utente “così com’è” e CON DIFETTI. ADOBE, I SUOI FORNITORI E LE AUTORITÀ DI CERTIFICAZIONE NON GARANTISCONO, NÉ POSSONO GARANTIRE, LE PRESTAZIONI O I RISULTATI CHE L’UTENTE PUÒ OTTENERE DALL’UTILIZZO DEL SOFTWARE, DEI SERVIZI DELL’AUTORITÀ DI CERTIFICAZIONE O DI ALTRE OFFERTE DI TERZI. FATTA ECCEZIONE PER QUALUNQUE FORMA DI GARANZIA, CONDIZIONE, DICHIARAZIONE O TERMINE INDEROGABILE CHE NON POSSANO ESSERE ESCLUSI O LIMITATI A MOTIVO DELLE LEGGI VIGENTI NELLA GIURISDIZIONE DELL’UTENTE, ADOBE, I SUOI FORNITORI E LE AUTORITÀ DI CERTIFICAZIONE NON RICONOSCONO ALCUNA GARANZIA, CONDIZIONE, DICHIARAZIONE O TERMINE (ESPRESSI O IMPLICITI, PREVISTI DA LEGGE, COMMON LAW, CONSUETUDINE, USI O ALTRO) COMPRESE, IN VIA ESEMPLIFICATIVA, LE GARANZIE DI NON VIOLAZIONE DI DIRITTI ALTRUI, DI COMMERCIABILITÀ, DI INTEGRAZIONE, DI QUALITÀ SODDISFACENTE O DI IDONEITÀ AD USO SPECIFICO. Le condizioni contenute nell’Art. 9 e nell’Art. 10 continueranno ad essere valide anche dopo la rescissione del presente Contratto, indipendentemente dalle modalità in cui avviene, senza peraltro comportare o generare il diritto a continuare ad Utilizzare il Software dopo la conclusione del Contratto. 10. Limitazione di responsabilità. ADOBE, I SUOI FORNITORI E L’AUTORITÀ DI CERTIFICAZIONE NON POTRANNO IN ALCUN CASO ESSERE RITENUTI RESPONSABILI NEI CONFRONTI DELL’UTENTE PER DANNI, PRETESE DI TERZI O COSTI DI QUALUNQUE TIPO NÉ PER DANNI CONSEQUENZIALI, INDIRETTI O INCIDENTALI OPPURE PER MANCATO GUADAGNO O PERDITE ECONOMICHE, ANCHE QUALORA UN RAPPRESENTANTE DI ADOBE FOSSE A CONOSCENZA DELLA POSSIBILITÀ DI TALI PERDITE, DANNI O PRETESE. LE LIMITAZIONI E LE ESCLUSIONI DI CUI SOPRA SI APPLICANO NELLA MISURA MASSIMA CONSENTITA DALLE LEGGI APPLICABILI NELLA GIURISDIZIONE DELL’UTENTE. LA RESPONSABILITÀ COMPLESSIVA DI ADOBE, QUELLA DEI SUOI FORNITORI E DELL’AUTORITÀ DI CERTIFICAZIONE IN RELAZIONE AL PRESENTE CONTRATTO SARÀ LIMITATA ALLA SOMMA EVENTUALMENTE PAGATA PER IL SOFTWARE. Le disposizioni contenute nel presente contratto non limitano la responsabilità di Adobe nei confronti dell’utente in caso di morte o lesioni personali risultanti da colpa grave od inganno (frode) di Adobe. Adobe agisce per conto dei propri fornitori e delle Autorità di certificazione per quanto riguarda la limitazione di responsabilità, l’esclusione e/o la limitazione di obblighi, garanzie e responsabilità come stabilito nel presente Contratto, ma non per altri scopi. Per ulteriori informazioni, consultare le informazioni specifiche relative alla giurisdizione applicabile alla fine del Contratto, se presenti, oppure rivolgersi al Servizio Assistenza Clienti di Adobe. 11. Regolamentazione dell’esportazione. L’utente si impegna a non inviare, trasferire o esportare il Software in alcun paese, né ad Utilizzarlo, in violazione delle disposizioni dell’Export Administration Act degli Stati Uniti d’America sulle esportazioni e di altre leggi, limitazioni o regolamenti in materia di esportazione (le “Norme sulle Esportazioni”). Inoltre, qualora il Software venga sottoposto a restrizioni all’esportazione in base alle Norme sulle Esportazioni, l’utente garantisce e dichiara di non essere cittadino di una nazione sottoposta a embargo né di esservi stabilito (incluse a titolo esemplificativo Iran, Siria, Sudan, Cuba e Corea del Nord) e di non essere in altro modo soggetto ad alcuna restrizione a ricevere il Software in base alle Norme sulle Esportazioni. Tutti i diritti relativi all’uso del Software sono concessi a condizione di revoca in caso di mancata ottemperanza ai termini del presente contratto. 12. Legge applicabile. Il presente Contratto è regolato dalle leggi in vigore: (a) nello Stato della California, se la licenza è stata ottenuta negli Stati Uniti, Canada o Messico; (b) in Giappone, se la licenza è stata acquistata in Giappone, Cina, Corea o altri paesi dell’Asia sudorientale in cui vengono utilizzate scritture ideografiche (ad esempio Hanzi, Kanji o Hanja) e/o altri tipi di scrittura basati su scrittura ideografica o simile come struttura ad essa, quali Hangul o Kana; (c) in Inghilterra, se la licenza è stata acquistata in un paese diverso dai paesi elencati sopra. Per quanto concerne le eventuali dispute in relazione al presente Contratto, avranno giurisdizione non esclusiva, rispettivamente, i tribunali

della contea di Santa Clara, California, quando si applicano le leggi della California, il tribunale distrettuale di Tokyo, Giappone, quando si applicano le leggi giapponesi, e le corti competenti di Londra, Inghilterra, quando si applicano le leggi inglesi. Al presente contratto non si applicano le norme sui conflitti di legge che determinano la legge applicabile ovvero la Convenzione delle Nazioni Unite sui Contratti di Vendita Internazionale di Beni, la cui applicazione viene qui espressamente esclusa. 13. Disposizioni generali. Qualora una qualsiasi clausola o parte del presente Contratto dovesse risultare nulla o inapplicabile, ciò non pregiudicherà la validità delle altre clausole o parti, che resteranno pienamente valide e applicabili. Il presente Contratto non pregiudica i diritti previsti da leggi a tutela dei consumatori. Il presente Contratto può essere modificato solo con documento scritto firmato da un rappresentante autorizzato di Adobe. Gli aggiornamenti possono essere concessi in licenza da Adobe sulla base di termini aggiuntivi ovvero diversi. Il presente documento rappresenta l’accordo finale fra Adobe e l’utente in relazione al Software e sostituisce ogni e qualsiasi precedente dichiarazione, trattativa, impegno, comunicazione o annuncio riguardanti il Software. 14. Avvertenza per gli utenti appartenenti al Governo degli Stati Uniti d’America. Per gli utenti finali appartenenti al Governo degli Stati Uniti, Adobe accetta di ottemperare a tutte le leggi vigenti in materia di pari opportunità incluse, se applicabili, le disposizioni contenute nell’Executive Order 11246, consolidato, Art. 402 del Vietnam Era Veterans Readjustment Assistance Act (legge sull’assistenza ed il reinserimento dei veterani del Vietnam) del 1974 (38 USC 4212), ed Art. 503 del Rehabilitation Act (legge sulla riabilitazione) del 1973, consolidato, e le disposizioni contenute in 41 CFR Parti da 60-1 a 60-60, 60-250, e 60-741. Le norme e le disposizioni citate nella clausola che precede sono incorporate per riferimento nel presente contratto. 15. Conformità alla Licenza d’uso. L’utente si impegna, nel caso in cui si tratti di un’azienda o di un’organizzazione, a documentare e a certificare entro 30 giorni dalla richiesta di Adobe o di un suo rappresentante autorizzato, che l’Utilizzo del Software al momento della richiesta avviene in conformità a una valida licenza d’uso rilasciata da Adobe. 16. Disposizioni ed Eccezioni Specifiche. 16.1 Limitazione di responsabilità applicabile agli utenti residenti in Germania e Austria. 16.1.1 Se l’utente ha acquistato il Software in Germania o Austria e risiede solitamente in uno di questi paesi, l’Art. 10 non si applica; invece, in base a quanto stabilito nell’Art. 16.1.2 la responsabilità di Adobe, determinata da norme imperative di legge rispetto ai danni, sarà limitata nel modo seguente: (i) Adobe sarà responsabile solo per un ammontare prevedibile al momento della stipulazione del contratto di licenza per i danni causati da minima negligenza nell’adempimento di un’obbligazione contrattuale materiale (ii) Adobe non sarà responsabile per danni causati da minima nell’adempimento di un’obbligazione contrattuale non materiale. 16.1.2 La summenzionata limitazione di responsabilità non si applica alle responsabilità determinate da norme imperative di legge, in particolare a quelle previste dalla legge tedesca sulla responsabilità per i prodotti, alle responsabilità derivanti dalla concessione di garanzie specifiche e alle responsabilità per lesioni personali colpose. 16.1.3 L’utente è tenuto a prendere ogni ragionevole precauzione per prevenire e limitare i danni, in particolare effettuando copie di backup del Software e dei dati residenti sul proprio computer in conformità alle disposizioni del presente contratto.

Per qualunque domanda relativa al Contratto o per ogni informazione, utilizzare l’indirizzo ed i contatti forniti con il prodotto o tramite Internet al sito www.adobe.com/it per contattare la filiale Adobe responsabile per la giurisdizione in questione.

Adobe, AIR, Authorware, Flash, Reader e Shockwave sono marchi registrati ovvero marchi di Adobe Systems Incorporated negli Stati Uniti e/o in altri Paesi.

Reader_Player_AIR_WWEULA-it_IT-20080204_1313

 

ADOBE SYSTEMS INCORPORATED（アドビ システムズ社） 保証の排除およびソフトウェア使用許諾契約書。 本文書には、保証情報（第I部）およびADOBEソフトウェアの使用に適用されるライセンス契約（第II部 ）が含まれます。 第I部、保証の排除。 本ソフトウェアおよび他の情報は、そのままの状態で、かつ瑕疵を問わない条件で提供されます。アド ビ システムズ社とそのサプライヤおよび認証機関は、本ソフトウェア、認証機関のサービスまたは他の第 三者の提供物を使用することにより得られる性能または結果を保証せず、また保証できません。適用法 により保証、条件、表明、または条項が除外もしくは制限できない場合を除き、アドビ システムズ社およびそのサプライヤは、性能、結果、第三者の権利の非侵害性、商品性、整合性、満足 できる品質、または特定目的への適合性を含むがこれらに限定されないその他のすべての事柄について 、明示であると黙示であるとを問わず、また制定法、普通法、慣習法、慣行その他いかなる法的根拠に 基づくとを問わず、保証、条件、表明または条項付けを一切行わないものとします。 第II部、ソフトウェア使用許諾契約書。 ADOBEソフトウェアの全部または一部を使用、複製または頒布した場合、特に以下の制限を含む本契約 上のすべての条件を受諾したものと見なされます。第2条で規定する使用、第4条で規定する譲渡可能性 、第6条で規定する接続およびプライバシー、第9条で規定する保証、第10条および第16条で規定する責 任。本契約は、ユーザに対するもので、本ソフトウェアを取得し、かつ自らの利益のために本ソフトウ ェアを使用する法人に対し執行可能です。同意されない場合は、本ソフトウェアを使用しないでくださ い。 アドビ システムズ社は、本契約の条項に従ってのみ本ソフトウェアを使用することをお客様に許諾します。本 ソフトウェアに含まれている第三者のマテリアルの使用は、別の使用許諾契約書、そのマテリアルに近 接する「READ ME」ファイルまたはhttp://www.adobe.com/go/thirdparty_jpにおいてご覧いただける「サードパーティ製ソ フトウェア通知および／または追加条件」に記載された他の条件に従う場合があります。 1. 定義。 「Adobe」とは、本契約書の12（a）条が適用される場合は、合衆国デラウェア州法人Adobe Systems Incorporated（アドビ システムズ社）345 Park Avenue, San Jose, California 95110を指し、その他の場合は、アイルランドの法律に準拠して設立されたAdobe Systems Software Ireland Limited（Unit 3100, Lake Drive, City West Campus, Saggert D24, Republic of Ireland）並びにその関連会社およびアドビ システムズ社のライセンシーを指すものとします。「コンピュータ」とは、デジタルまたは類似の形式 の情報を受け取り、それを一連の命令に基づいて処理し、特定の結果を出力する1つの仮想のまたは物理 的な個人用電子機器を指します。「本ソフトウェア」とは、（a）本契約書が添付された、ファイル（電 子的にまたは物理メディアで提供されたもの）、ディスク、その他の媒体に含まれている内容のすべて を意味するものとし、以下のものを含みます。（i）アドビ システムズ社または第三者のコンピュータ情報またはソフトウェア（Adobe Reader®(以下「Adobe Reader」といいます)、Adobe® AIR™（以下「Adobe AIR」)、Adobe Flash® Player、Shockwave®

PlayerおよびAuthorware® Player（以下、Adobe AIRとFlash、ShockwaveおよびAuthorware playersを総称して「Adobe Runtimes」といいます）を含みます。（ii）関連する説明書または説明用のファイル（以下「マニュアル 」といいます）、（iii）フォント、および（b）アドビ システムズ社が提供するソフトウェアのアップグレード、変更されたバージョン、アップデート、追加 ファイル、およびコピー（以下総称して「アップデート」といいます）を指すものとします。「使用す る」とは、アクセス、インストール、ダウンロード、コピーなどの操作を行い、その他本ソフトウェア の機能を利用することを指します。 2. ソフトウェアのライセンス。 お客様がアドビ システムズ社または正規ライセンシーから本ソフトウェアを購入したものであり、かつ、第3条に規定す る制限を含む、本契約の条件にお客様が従うことを条件として、アドビ システムズ社はお客様に対し、下記のとおりマニュアルに記載されている用途に本ソフトウェアを使用 する非排他的なライセンスを許諾します。 2.1 一般的な使用。互換コンピュータにソフトウェアのコピーを1部インストールし使用できます。本ソフト ウェアの使用に関する重大な制限は第3条を参照してください。 2.2 サーバでの使用。本契約は、コンピュータファイルサーバへの本ソフトウェアのインストールおよびそ こでの使用を認めません。コンピュータファイルサーバでのソフトウェアの使用については、Adobe Readerではhttp://www.adobe.com/go/acrobat_distribute_jp、Adobe Runtimeではhttp://www.adobe.com/go/licensing_jpを参照してください。 2.3 配布。本契約は、本ソフトウェアのサブライセンスまたは配布の権利を付与しません。物理的なメディ アから、または内部ネットワークを介して、本ソフトウェアを配布する方法については、Adobe Readerではhttp://www.adobe.com/go/acrobat_distribute_jp、Adobe Runtimeではhttp://www.adobe.com/go/licensing_jpを参照してください。 2.4 バックアップコピー。本ソフトウェアのバックアップコピーは、インストールまたは使用しないことを 条件に、1部のみ作成できます。第4条に記載された本ソフトウェアに関するすべての権利を譲渡しない 場合は、バックアップコピーに関する権利を譲渡することはできません。 3. 義務および制限。 3.1 Adobe Runtime制限事項。お客様はAdobe Runtimeを非ＰＣ製品上で、または他の、組み込み式もしくはデバイス用のオペレーティングシステム上 で使用することはできません。疑義を避けるため、例えば、お客様は(a)モバイル製品、セットトップボ ックス（ＳＴＢ）、携帯端末、電話、Webパッドデバイス、タブレットおよびWindows XPタブレットエディションで動いているのではないタブレットＰＣ、ゲームコンソール、テレビ、ＤＶ Ｄプレイヤー、メディアセンター（Windows XPメディアセンターエディションとその後継バージョンを除く）、電子計算機またはその他電子機器、 インターネット機器またはその他インターネット周辺機器、ＰＤＡ、医療機器、ＡＴＭ、通信機器、ゲ ーム機、家庭用自動制御システム、キオスク、遠隔操作機器またはその他消費者用技術機器、(b)オペレ ーター携帯、ケーブル、衛星、またはテレビシステムまたは(c)その他クローズドデバイス上において、

Adobe Runtimeを使用することはできません。このようなシステム上でのAdobe Runtimeの使用許諾に関しては、http://www.adobe.com/go/licensing_jpを参照してください。 3.2 Adobe Reader制限事項。Adobe Readerは、PDFファイルの表示、配布および共有を目的としてアドビ システムズ社がライセンスを付与し、配布します。 3.2.1 転換の制限事項。お客様はPDFファイルを他のファイル形式に変換（例：PDFファイルをJPEG、SVGま たはTIFFファイルに変換）するときに本ソフトウェアを使用したり、または本ソフトウェアに依存する ような他のソフトウェア、プラグイン、機能拡張と本ソフトウェアを統合させたり、またはこれととも に使用することはできません。 3.2.2 プラグインの制限事項。お客様は、Adobe Readerを、Adobe Integration Key License Agreementに準拠せずに開発されたプラグインソフトウェアと統合したり、またはこれとともに使用する ことはできません。 3.2.3 無効な機能。Adobe Readerには、表示されないまたはグレーで表示され使用できない機能（以下、「無効な機能」）が含ま れている場合があります。無効な機能は、アドビ システムズ社からのみ取得可能な対応する実現技術を使用して作成したPDF文書を開いたときにのみ使 用可能になります。お客様は、当該実現技術によらずに無効な機能にアクセスしたり、アクセスを試み たり、無効な機能に類似の機能をAdobe Readerを使用して作成したり、その他の方法で当該機能の起動を制御する技術を回避できません。無効 な機能に関する詳細は、http://www.adobe.com/go/readerextensions_jpを参照してください。 3.3 表示。お客様が作成する本ソフトウェアのすべてのコピーには、本ソフトウェア上または本ソフトウェ ア内に付された著作権表示およびその他の財産権表示と同一の表示が付されていなければなりません。 3.4 変更およびリバースエンジニアリングの禁止。お客様は本ソフトウェアを修正、改変、翻訳したり、本 ソフトウェアの二次的著作物を作成したりすることはできません。また、法律上逆コンパイルが明示的 に許容されている場合を除き、お客様はリバースエンジニアリング、逆コンパイル、逆アセンブルを行 ってはならず、またその他の方法で本ソフトウェアのソースコードの解読を試みることはできません。 4. 譲渡。 本契約に明示的に許容されている場合を除き、本ソフトウェアに関するお客様の権利をレンタル、リー ス、サブライセンス、割り当て、または譲渡することや、本ソフトウェアの全部または一部を他のユー ザのコンピュータにコピーすることを許諾することはできません。ただし、以下の条件が満たされてい る場合、本ソフトウェアを使用する権利のすべてを他の個人または法人に譲渡することができます。（a ）（i）本契約、（ii）本ソフトウェア、および本ソフトウェアに同梱または内蔵されている他のソフト ウェアまたはハードウェア（すべてのコピー、アップデート、および旧バージョンのすべてのコピーを 含むものとします）をすべて当該個人または法人に譲渡すること。（b）一切のコピー（バックアップお よびコンピュータに格納されたコピーを含むものとします）をお客様が保持しないこと。（C）本契約の 条件、およびユーザが本ソフトウェアの有効なライセンスを入手する際に服した他のすべての条件を譲 受人が受諾したこと。上記にかかわらず、本ソフトウェアの教育用コピー、プレリリースコピー、また は非売品コピーを譲渡することはできません。 5. 知的財産権、権利の留保。

本ソフトウェア、およびお客様が作成したすべての正当なコピーについては、アドビ システムズ社およびそのサプライヤが、知的財産権を有しています。本ソフトウェアの構造、編成およ びコードは、アドビ システムズ社およびそのサプライヤが保有する重大な営業秘密および秘密情報です。本ソフトウェアは 、米国とその他の国の著作権法および国際条約の条項等の（ただしこれらに限定されない）法律によっ て保護されています。本契約に明示されている場合を除き、本契約によってお客様に本ソフトウェアに 関して何らの知的財産権が付与されるものではなく、またアドビ システムズ社およびそのサプライヤは、明示的に付与されたものを除くすべての権利を留保します。 6. 接続およびプライバシー。 6.1 PDFファイルの使用。本ソフトウェアを使用して、アドビPDFサービス用の広告の登録により広告の表示 を許可されたPDF文書を開くと、ご使用のコンピュータは、アドビ システムズ社、広告主、または他の第三者によって運営されるWebサイトに接続する場合があります。 この場合、ご使用のインターネットプロトコル（IP）アドレスが送信されます。当該サイトをホストす る当事者は、開かれたファイル内またはその付近に表示される広告または他の電子的なコンテンツを送 信する技術を使用する場合があります。Webサイトの運営者はまた、JavaScript、Webビーコン（アクシ ョンタグまたはシングルピクセルgifとも呼ばれる）および他のテクノロジーを使用して、広告の有効性 の向上や測定および宣伝内容の個別化を行う場合があります。お客様とアドビ システムズ社のWebサイトの間の通信は、http://www.adobe.com/go/privacy_jpのアドビ システムズ社オンライン個人情報保護方針によって管理されます。アドビ システムズ社は第三者が使用する機能にアクセスしたり、当該機能を管理できない場合があり、第三者 のWebサイトの情報利用は、Adobeオンライン個人情報保護方針の範囲外です。 6.2 アップデート。自動ダウンロードが可能なアップデートがないかを確認し、ソフトウェアが正常にイン ストールされたことをアドビ システムズ社に通知するため、お客様のコンピュータをインターネットに自動的に接続する場合がある ことを認め、これに同意するものとします。この場合、個人を特定する情報はアドビ システムズ社に送信されません。お客様とアドビ システムズ社のWebサイトの間の通信は、http://www.adobe.com/go/privacy_jpのアドビ システムズ社オンライン個人情報保護方針によって管理されます。デフォルトのアップデート設定の変 更に関する情報は、マニュアルを参照してください。 6.3 設定マネージャ。Flash Playerは、ユーザの設定をローカル共有オブジェクトとしてお客様のコンピュータに保存する場合があり ます。これらの設定は、ユーザに必須のものではありませんが、Flash Playerにおいてユーザが一定の設定をすることを可能とするものです。ローカル共有オブジェクトに関す る詳細は、http://www.adobe.com/go/flashplayer_security_jp、設定マネージャに関する詳細は、http://www.a dobe.com/go/settingsmanager_jpをご参照下さい。 7. 第三者提供物。 本ソフトウェアは、第三者のWebサイト、ソフトウェア、アプリケーション、およびリッチインターネ ットアプリケーションを含むデータサービス（以下、「第三者提供物」）へのアクセスおよび連携を可 能にする場合があります。お客様による第三者提供物（ここから利用できる商品、サービスまたは情報 も含む）へのアクセスと使用は、各提供物の条項に準拠します。第三者提供物はアドビ システムズ社が所有または提供するものではありません。

8. 電子証明書。 8.1 使用。Adobe AIRは、第三者が作成したAdobe AIRアプリケーションの発行者を識別するために、電子証明書を使用します。Adobe Readerは、PDF文書内に署名し、その署名を有効にするため、および保証されたPDF文書を有効にするた めに、電子証明書を使用します。お客様のコンピュータは、電子証明書の確認時にインターネットに接 続する場合があります。電子証明書は、Adobe認証文書サービス（CDS）ベンダーなど、http://www.adob e.com/go/partners_cds_jpに示された第三者の認証機関（以下「認証機関」）によって発行されます。また は、自身で署名することもできます。 8.2 条件。電子証明書の購入、使用および電子証明書に対する信頼は、お客様および認証機関の責任による ものとします。保証された文書、デジタル署名、または認証機関サービスに信頼する前に、たとえば、 加入者同意書、使用者同意書、証明書の方針、業務ステートメントなど、認証機関がサービスを提供す る際に該当する条件を検討する必要があります。アドビ システムズ社のCDSベンダーに関しては、http://www.adobe.com/go/partners_cds_jpのリンクを参照してく ださい。 8.3 承認。お客様は、以下の内容に同意するものとします。(a)デジタル証明書が検証時に取り消され、実際 には無効であるデジタル署名または証明書が有効であるように見える場合があること、(b)文書の署名者 、該当する証明機関、またはその他の第三者による作為または不作為が、デジタル証明書の安全性また は整合性を危うくする可能性があること、(c)証明書は、証明機関が提供するものではない自己署名証明 書である場合があること。証明書を信頼するかどうかを決定するのは、お客様単独の責任です。別途、 書面による保証が認証機関によってお客様に提供される場合を除き、お客様自身の責任で電子証明書を 使用します。 8.4 第三者受益者。お客様は、お客様の信頼する証明機関が、本契約に関しては第三者受益者であり、当該 機関がアドビ システムズ社である場合と同様に、自己の名においてかかる契約を実施する権利を有することに同意す るものとします。 8.5 免責。お客様は、以下の(a)、(b)、(c)、(d)、または(e)を含むがこれらに限定されない任意の当該機関のサ ービスの使用または依存から発生、またはこれらに関連するすべての責任、損失、行為、損害、請求（ すべての合理的な額の費用、支出、弁護士費用を含む）からアドビ システムズ社および該当する認証機関（その契約条項で明示的に記載されているものを除く）を防禦す るものとします。(a)期限切れまたは取り消された証明書への依存、(b)証明書の不適切な検証、(c)該当す る条項、本契約、または該当する法律によって許可された以外の証明書の使用、(d)発行者サービスまた は証明書に依存するにあたって合理的な判断を下さなかったこと、(e)当該サービスに関連する条項で要 求された義務を果たさなかったこと。 9. 無保証。 本ソフトウェアは、そのままの状態で、かつ瑕疵を問わない条件で提供されています。アドビ システムズ社とそのサプライヤおよび認証機関は、本ソフトウェア、認証機関のサービスまたは他の第 三者の提供物を使用することにより得られる性能または結果を保証せず、また保証できません。ただし 、ユーザの所在地の法律上排除または制限しえない国の保証または表明については、この限りではあり ません。第9条と第10条の規定は、いかなる理由においても本契約の満了後も効力を有しますが、本契約 の満了後における本ソフトウェアの使用を継続する権利を示唆または付与するものではありません。

10. 責任の制限。 アドビ システムズ社、そのサプライヤ、または認証機関は、いかなる場合においても、損害、費用、派生損害 、間接損害、付随的損害、特別損害、または利益の喪失につき、ユーザに対して賠償する責を負わず、 懲罰的損害賠償も行わないものとします。当該損害の発生の可能性につきアドビ システムズ社が認識していた場合においても同様とします。上記の制限および排除は、お客様の所在地 の法律上認められる限度で適用されるものとします。本契約に起因または関連してアドビ システムズ社、そのサプライヤおよび認証機関が負う責任の総額は、本ソフトウェアについてお客様が 支払った金額を上限とします。ただ、アドビ システムズ社の過失または不法行為（詐欺）により生じた死亡または傷害につき、アドビ システムズ社がお客様に対して負う責任は、本契約のいかなる規定によっても制限されません。アドビ システムズ社がサプライヤおよび認証機関に代わって行為するのは、本契約に定められた義務、保証、 責任の排除または制限を目的とする場合に限られます。他の状況または目的でサプライヤのために行為 することはありません。詳細については、本契約書の末尾に国別の規定がある場合は該当部分をご覧い ただくか、アドビ システムズ社のカスタマサポート部門までお問い合わせください。 11. 輸出規制。 本ソフトウェアを合衆国輸出管理法もしくは他の輸出関連法規（以下総称して「輸出法」といいます） で禁じられた国に出荷、譲渡、輸出しないこと、また禁じられた方法で使用しないことに同意していた だきます。さらに、本ソフトウェアが輸出法で輸出統制品目に指定されている場合、ユーザには、イラ ン、シリア、スーダン、キューバ、および北朝鮮など、合衆国政府が輸出を禁止している国の国民では なく、かつ、それらの国に居住していないこと、また、ユーザが本ソフトウェアを受領することを輸出 法で禁止されていないことを表明および保証していただきます。本ソフトウェアを使用する一切の権利 は、本契約の条件に違反するとただちに失われます。 12. 準拠法。 本契約の準拠法は、プログラムのライセンスを購入した場所により以下のとおり決定されるものとしま す。（a）合衆国、カナダ、またはメキシコで購入した場合はカリフォルニア州の実体法。（b）表意文 字（例:漢字）または構造上表意文字を基礎としもしくはこれに類似する文字（例:ハングル、かな）が公 用語の筆記に使用されている日本、中国、韓国、または東南アジアの他の国で購入した場合は日本の実 体法。（C）上記以外の法域で購入した場合は英国の実体法。カリフォルニア州法が適用される場合はカ リフォルニア州サンタクララ郡の各裁判所、日本法が適用される場合は日本の東京地方裁判所、英国法 が適用される場合は英国ロンドンの管轄裁判所が、本契約に関連する紛争につき非専属的な裁判管轄権 を有します。いかなる法域の抵触法の原則も「国際物品売買契約に関する国連条約」も本契約には適用 され、これらの適用は明示的に排除されます。 13. 一般条項。 本契約の一部が無効であり強制力を有しないものとされた場合においても、その他の部分の有効性は影 響を受けず、その条件に従って強制力を維持します。本契約は、顧客として取引する当事者の法的権利 を損なうものではありません。本契約は、権限を有するアドビ システムズ社の役員が署名した文書による場合のみ変更できます。アップデートは、追加のまたは異な る条項とともにアドビ システムズ社によってライセンスされる可能性があります。本契約はアドビ システムズ社およびお客様の本ソフトウェアに関する完全な合意であり、本ソフトウェアに関する本契 約締結以前の表明、交渉、了解、通信連絡、広告のすべてに優先します。

14. 合衆国政府がエンドユーザである場合。 アドビ システムズ社は、エンドユーザである合衆国政府のため、すべての機会均等法（執行命令11246の規定、 1974年Vietnam Era Veterans Readjustment Assistance Act （38USC4212）402条および1973年Rehabilitation Act 503条、ならびに41 CFR Parts 60-1ないし60-60、60-250および60741の規制を含みます）を遵守することに同意します。積極的是正措置の条項および前述の法令に定めら れた規制は、本契約の一部を構成するものとします。 15. ライセンスの遵守。 企業であるユーザがアドビ システムズ社またはアドビ システムズ社が授権した代理人から要求された場合、当該時点においてすべてのソフトウェアがアドビ システムズ社から与えられた有効なライセンスに従って使用されていることを、30日以内に文書により 証明することに同意します。 16. 固有の規定および例外。 16.1 ドイツおよびオーストリアに居住するユーザに適用される責任の制限。 16.1.1 ドイツまたはオーストリアで本ソフトウェアを取得し、これらの国に通常居住している場合、第10条は 適用されません。16.1.2条の規定に従い、損害に対するアドビ システムズ社の法的な責任は、以下のように限定されます。(i)重大な契約上の義務の軽微な過失による 不履行を原因とする損害に関しては、ライセンス契約を結んだ時点で一般的に予測可能であった損害額 を上限としてアドビ システムズ社は責任を負うものとします。(ii)重大でない契約上の義務の軽微な過失による不履行を原因 とする損害に関しては、アドビ システムズ社は責任を負いません。 16.1.2 前述の限定責任は、強制的な法的責任、特にドイツ製造物責任法に定められた責任、特定の保証を引き 受けたことに対する責任、過失により発生した人身傷害に対する責任には適用されません。 16.1.3 お客様は、損害を回避および軽減するため、あらゆる合理的な手段を講じること、特に、本契約の条項 に従って本ソフトウェアおよびお客様のコンピュータデータのバックアップコピーを作成することを要 求されます。

本契約に関してご質問がある場合、または、当社からの情報提供を希望される場合は、この製品に添付 されている連絡先またはWebサイトwww.adobe.com/jpをご確認のうえ、最寄りの当社営業所までお問い合 わせください。 Adobe、AIR、Authorware、Flash、ReaderおよびShockwave、は合衆国およびその他の国におけるアドビ システムズ社の商標または登録商標です。

Reader_Player_AIR_WWEULA-ja_JP-20080204_1313

 

ADOBE SYSTEMS INCORPORATED 보증 부인 및 소프트웨어 사용권 계약서. 본 문서에는 보증에 관한 정보(제1부) 및 ADOBE 소프트웨어의 사용을 규제하는 사용권 계약서(제2부)가 포함되어 있습니다. 제1부. 보증 부인. 소프트웨어 및 기타 정보는 “있는 그대로” 모든 결함이 있는 상태로 제공됩니다. ADOBE 및 그 공급업체, 인증 기관은 소프트웨어, 인증 기관 서비스 또는 기타 제 3자 공여를 사용으로 얻어지는 결과 또는 성능을 보증하지 않으며, 보증할 수 없습니다. 사용자의 관할 준거법에 의하여 제한되거나 배제될 수 없는 경우에 어떠한 보증, 약정, 표현, 또는 조건을 제외하고, ADOBE 와 공급업자, 인증 기관은 제3자의 권리, 시장성, 통합, 만족스러운 품질, 또는 특정 목적에 대한 적합성을 침해하지 않는다는 것을 포함한 모든 문제에 대하여 어떠한 보증, 약정, 표현, 또는 조건(법령, 보통법, 관습, 관례 또는 기타에 의하여 명시적으로나 묵시적으로)을 내세우지 않습니다. 제2부. 소프트웨어 사용권 계약서. 사용자는 ADOBE 소프트웨어의 전부 또는 일부를 사용, 복사 또는 배포함에 있어 다음의 특별 조항을 포함한 이 계약서의 모든 조건에 동의해야 합니다. 제2조의 사용 제한, 제4조의 양도, 제6조의 연결성 및 사생활 보호, 제9조의 보증 조항 및 제10조 및 16조의 책임 조항이 제한 사항입니다. 본 조항을 수용함으로써, 이 계약서는 이 소프트웨어를 취득하여 사용하는 사용자와 모든 단체에 대하여 효력이 있습니다. 사용자가 이러한 내용에 동의하지 않으면 소프트웨어를 사용할 수 없습니다. ADOBE는 사용자가 이 계약서의 조건에 따라 이 소프트웨어를 사용하도록 허락합니다. 이 소프트웨어에 포함된 제3자의 자료에 대한 사용은 일반적으로 별도의 사용권 계약서로서 해당 자료에 있는 "README" 파일 또는 http://www.adobe.com/go/thirdparty_kr에 있는 "제 3자 소프트웨어 통지사항 및 추가 조건"에 명시된 조건에 따를 수 있습니다. 1. 정의. "Adobe"라고 함은 이 계약서의 12(a) 조항이 적용되면 345 Park Avenue, San Jose, California 95110, U.S.A 에 본점을 둔 델라웨어주 회사인 Adobe Systems Incorporated를 뜻하며, 기타의 경우에는 Adobe Systems Incorporated의 계열 회사이며, 그 회사로부터 사용권을 부여 받은 Unit 3100, Lake Drive, City West Campus, Saggart D24, Republic of Ireland에 본점을 둔 아일랜드 회사 Adobe Systems Software Ireland Limited를 뜻합니다. "컴퓨터"라고 함은 디지털 형식 또는 유사한 형식의 정보를 받아들이고, 일련의 지시 명령에 따라 특정한 결과를 도출하기 위하여 해당 정보를 조작하는 가상 또는 물리적 전자 장치를 뜻합니다. "소프트웨어"라고 함은 (a) 파일 (전자식 다운로드, 물리적 매체로 전달됨), 디스크, CD-ROM 또는 이 계약서와 같이 제공된 다른 매체의 내용, 즉 (i) Adobe Reader® ("Adobe Reader"), Adobe® AIR™ ("Adobe AIR"), Adobe Flash® Player, Shockwave® Player 및 Authorware® Player(Adobe AIR 및 Flash, Shockwave 및 Authorware 플레이어를 총칭하여 "Adobe Runtimes"라 합니다) 등 Adobe 또는 제 3자의 컴퓨터 자료 또는 소프트웨어, (ii) 파일 또는 관련된 설명 인쇄물 ("설명서") 및 (iii) 글꼴 등을 포함하나, 이에 한정되지 않으며, (b) Adobe로부터 사용자에게 사용 허락된 업그레이드 사항, 수정 버전, 업데이트 사항, 추가 요소 및 위의 내용의 사본(통칭하여 "업데이트"라고 합니다)을 말합니다. "사용"이라고 함은 소프트웨어를 액세스, 설치, 다운로드, 복사하거나 그 이외 소프트웨어의 이점을 활용함을 뜻합니다. 2. 소프트웨어 사용권.

사용자가 소프트웨어를 Adobe 또는 그 허가사용권자로부터 취득하였으며 그리고 제3조의 제한 등 이 계약서의 조건에 동의하는 경우에는, Adobe는 설명서에 표시된 방식으로 그 목적을 위하여 소프트웨어의 비독점적 사용권을 다음과 같이 부여합니다. 2.1 일반적 사용. 소프트웨어의 사본 하나를 호환되는 컴퓨터에 설치하여 사용할 수 있습니다. 소프트웨어의 사용에 관한 중요한 제한사항에 대해서는 제3조를 참조하십시오. 2.2 서버 사용. 본 계약서에서는 컴퓨터 파일 서버에 본 소프트웨어를 설치 또는 사용하도록 허락하지 않고 있습니다. 컴퓨터 파일 서버에서 소프트웨어 사용에 대한 내용은 http://www.adobe.com/go/acrobat_distribute_kr에서 Adobe Reader에 관한 정보를 참조하시거나 또는 http://www.adobe.com/go/licensing_kr에서 Adobe Runtimes에 관한 정보를 참조하십시오. 2.3 배포. 이 사용권에서는 소프트웨어의 재사용권설정 또는 배포권을 부여하지 않습니다. 유형 매체 또는 내부 네트워크, 귀사의 제품 또는 서비스를 통해 소프트웨어를 배포할 권리 획득에 대한 정보는 http://www.adobe.com/go/acrobat_distribute_kr에서 Adobe Reader에 관한 정보를 참조하시거나 http://www.adobe.com/go/licensing_kr에서 Adobe Runtimes에 관한 정보를 참조하십시오. 2.4 사본 백업. 사용자는 백업을 목적으로 소프트웨어 사본을 만들 수 있으나, 이 백업 사본은 컴퓨터에 설치 또는 사용될 수 없습니다. 사용자가 제4조에 규정된 소프트웨어에 관한 모든 권한을 양도하지 않는 한 백업용 사본에 관한 권한을 양도할 수 없습니다. 3. 의무 및 제한 사항. 3.1 Adobe Runtime 제한 사항. 사용자는 Adobe Runtime을 PC 기기가 아닌 기기상에서 사용해서는 안되며 또한 운영시스템의 임베디드 또는 기기 버전과 함께 사용해서도 안됩니다. 의문의 여지를 없애기 위해 예를 들면, 사용자는 Adobe Runtime을 (a) 휴대기기, 셋톱박스(STB), 휴대용단말기, 전화, 웹패드, 타블렛 및 Windows XP Tablet PC Edition 및 그 후속 에디션을 작동할 수 없는 타블렛 PC, 게임 콘솔, 텔레비전, DVD 플레이어, 미디어 센터(Windows Media Center Edition 및 그 후속 에디션은 제외), 전자 빌보드 기타 디지털 사이너지, 인터넷 어플라이언스 또는 기타 인터넷 접속 기기, PDA, 의료기기, ATM, 텔레마틱 기기, 게임머신, 홈오토메이션시스템, 키오스크, 리모콘 기타 모든 소비자 전자 제품, (b) 오퍼레이터 기반 모바일, 케이블, 새털라이트 또는 텔레비전 시스템, 또는 (c) 여타 폐쇄 시스템 기기상에서는 사용해서는 안됩니다. 해당 시스템에 사용하기 위해 Adobe Runtimes 사용권에 관한 정보를 보시려면 http://www.adobe.com/go/licensing_kr를 방문하십시오. 3.2 Adobe Reader 제한사항. Adobe Reader는 PDF 파일의 보기, 배포 및 공급을 위하여 Adobe로부터 사용권이 허락되고 배포됩니다. 3.2.1 변환 제한 사항. 사용자는 PDF 파일을 다른 파일 포맷으로 변환할 때(예컨대, PDF 파일의 TIFF, JPEG 또는 SVG 파일로의 변환) Adobe Reader를 사용하거나 그에 의존하는 여타 소프트웨어, 플러그인 또는 인핸스먼트와 Adobe Reader를 통합하거나 함께 사용할 수 없습니다. 3.2.2 플러그인 제한 사항. 사용자는 Adobe 통합 키 라이센스 계약(Adobe Integration Key License Agreement)에 따라 개발되지 아니한 플러그인 소프트웨어와는 Adobe Reader를 통합하거나 함께 사용할 수 없습니다. 3.2.3 사용 불가능한 기능. Adobe Reader에는 숨어 있거나 사용 불가능 하거나 또는 "음영 처리된"("사용 불가능한 기능") 기능이 포함되어 있을 수 있습니다. 사용 불가능한 기능은 Adobe에서만 사용 가능한 기능부여 기술을 사용하여 작성된 PDF 문서를 열 때만 활성화됩니다. 사용자는 이렇게 사용 가능한 기술부여 기술을 사용하여 사용 불가능한 기능에 액세스하거나 액세스 시도를 하지 않으며, 실질적으로 사용 불가능한 기능 또는 이런 기능의 활성 제어를 우회하는 기타 기술과 실질적으로 비슷한 기능을 만드는 데 Adobe Reader를 사용하지 않습니다. 사용 불가능한 기능에 대한 자세한 정보는 http://www.adobe.com/go/readerextensions_kr를 참조하십시오.

3.3 고지사항. 이 소프트웨어를 복사할 수 없습니다. 사용자가 작성한 이 소프트웨어의 모든 사본에는 이 소프트웨어에 나타난 것과 동일한 저작권 및 소유권 통지를 명시하여야 합니다. 3.4 수정 또는 역 엔지니어링 금지. 사용자는 소프트웨어를 수정, 변경 또는 번역하거나 소프트웨어에 기초한 파생물을 만들어서는 안됩니다. 해당 법률에 의하여 명시적으로 역 엔지니어링 또는 역 컴파일이 허용된 범위를 제외하고는, 소프트웨어의 역추적, 역컴파일, 분해 또는 소스 코드를 알아내기 위한 기타 시도를 하지 않아야 합니다. 4. 양도. 이 계약서에 명시적으로 허용된 경우를 제외한 어떤 경우에도 사용자의 소프트웨어 권한을 대여, 임대, 재사용권 설정, 양도 또는 이전할 수 없으며, 사용자의 컴퓨터에 복사하도록 이 소프트웨어의 일부 또는 전부에 대한 권한을 부여할 수 없습니다. 그러나 다음의 조건에 의하여 합법적으로 소프트웨어 사용의 모든 권리를 다른 사람 또는 법적 실체에게 양도할 수 있습니다. (a) (i) 이 계약서, (ii)소프트웨어 및 사본, 업데이트 사항, 이전 버전을 포함하여 소프트웨어에 포함되거나 사전 설치된 기타 모든 소프트웨어도 다른 사람 또는 실체에게 양도해야 합니다. (b) 사용자가 백업용 또는 컴퓨터에 저장된 사본을 보유하지 않으며 (c) 수령인이 이 계약서의 조건 및 소프트웨어 사용권 구입에 따른 기타 모든 조건을 수용합니다. 그러나 위의 내용 이외에 소프트웨어에 대한 교육, 시험판 또는 전매 금지 사본은 양도하지 아니하여도 무방합니다. 5. 지적 재산권, 권리의 유보. 이 소프트웨어 및 사용자가 작성한 인가된 모든 사본은 Adobe Systems Incorporated와 공급업자의 지적 자산입니다. 소프트웨어의 구조, 조직 및 코드는 귀중한 영업 기밀이며, Adobe Systems Incorporated와 공급업자의 비밀 정보입니다. 이 소프트웨어는 미국 및 기타 국가의 저작권법 등의 법률과 국제조약규정에 의해 보호됩니다. 여기에 명시된 것을 제외하고, 이 계약서는 사용자에게 이 소프트웨어에 대한 지적 재산권을 부여하지 않으며, 명시적으로 부여되지 않은 모든 권한은 Adobe 및 해당 공급업자가 보유합니다. 6. 연결성 및 사생활 보호. 6.1 PDF 파일 사용. Ads for Adobe PDF 서비스의 등록을 통해 광고를 표시할 수 있도록 만들어진 PDF 파일을 소프트웨어로 여는 경우, 사용자의 컴퓨터는 Adobe, 광고주 또는 제3자에 의해 운영되는 웹사이트로 연결될 수 있습니다. 이 경우, IP(Internet Protocol) 주소가 전송됩니다. 사이트를 호스팅하는 회사는 열려있는 파일 안 또는 근처에서 열리는 광고 또는 기타 전자식 컨텐트를 전송(또는 “공급”)하는 기술을 사용할 수 있습니다. 웹사이트 운영자는 광고 효과를 향상 및 측정하고 광고 내용을 개별화하기 위해 JavaScript, 웹 표지(액션 태그 또는 단일 픽셀 GIF라고도 합니다) 및 기타 기술을 사용할 수도 있습니다. Adobe와의 통신은http://www.adobe.com/go/privacy_kr에 나와 있는 Adobe 온라인 사생활 보호 정책의 적용을 받습니다. Adobe에서는 제3자가 사용할 수 있는 기능에 대해 접근 또는 제어를 하지 못할 수도 있으며, 제3자의 웹사이트에 나와 있는 정보는 Adobe 온라인 사생활 보호 정책의 적용을 받지 않습니다. 6.2 업데이트. 사용자는 소프트웨어로 인해 컴퓨터가 현재 자동 다운로드가 가능한 업데이트를 확인하고 Adobe에 소프트웨어가 성공적으로 설치되었다는 사실을 알리기 위해 자동으로 인터넷에 연결할 수 있다는 사실을 인지하고 이에 동의합니다. 이 경우, 개인 식별 정보가 아닌 정보만 Adobe로 전송됩니다. Adobe와의 통신은 http://www.adobe.com/go/privacy_kr에 나와 있는 Adobe 온라인 사생활 보호 정책의 적용을 받습니다. 기본 업데이트 설정 변경에 관한 정보는 설명서를 참조하십시오. 6.3 셋팅 매니저. Flash Player의 사용으로 인해 특정 사용자 셋팅이 로칼 공유 대상(local shared object)으로 사용자의 컴퓨터상에 보관될 수 있습니다. 이 셋팅은 사용자와 관련되지 않으나, 사용자로 하여금 Flash Player 내에 특정 셋팅을 구성할 수 있도록 해줍니다. 로칼 공유 대상(local shared object)에 대한 보다 자세한 정보는 http://www.adobe.com/go/flashplayer_security_kr에서 찾을 수 있으며 셋팅 매니저에 대한 보다 자세한 정보는 http://www.adobe.com/go/settingsmanager_kr에서 찾을 수 있습니다.

7. 제3자 공여. 이 소프트웨어는 풍부한 인터넷 어플리케이션("제 3자 공여")을 포함한 데이터 서비스, 소프트웨어 어플리케이션, 제 3자 웹사이트로 액세스 및 상호 작용을 하도록 허용할 수도 있습니다. 제3자 사이트에서 이용 가능한 상품, 서비스 또는 정보를 포함하여 제3자 사이트의 액세스 및 사용은 해당 공여의 조건에 따릅니다. 제3자 공여는 Adobe가 소유하거나 제공하지 않습니다. 8. 디지털 인증. 8.1 사용. Adobe AIR는 사용자가 제 3자에 의해 만들어진 Adobe AIR 어플리케이션의 퍼블리셔를 확인하는데 도움을 주기 위해 디지털 인증을 사용합니다. Adobe Reader는 인증 받은 PDF 문서를 확인하고, PDF 문서 내에서 서명 및 유효한 서명을 하는 데 디지털 인증을 사용합니다. 디지털 인증을 확인할 때 사용자의 컴퓨터는 인터넷에 연결될 수 있습니다. 디지털 인증은 Adobe CDS(Certified Document Service) 공급자 등 http://www.adobe.com/go/partners_cds_kr("인증 기관")에 나열되어 있는 제 3의 인증 기관에서 발행하거나 또는 자가 서명을 활용할 수도 있습니다. 8.2 약관. 디지털 인증을 구매, 사용 및 신뢰하는 것은 사용자 및 인증 기관의 책임입니다. 인증된 문서, 디지털 서명 또는 인증 기관 서비스를 신뢰하기 전에 사용자는 예를 들어, 가입자 계약서, 해당 업체 계약서, 인증 정책 및 실행 확인서를 포함하여 해당 인증 기관에서 제공하는 서비스의 해당 조건을 재검토해야 합니다. Adobe의 CDS 공급자에 관한 정보는 http://www.adobe.com/go/partners_cds_kr를 참조하십시오. 8.3 확인. 사용자는 (a) 디지털 인증은 검증 시 취소되어 실제로 유효하지 않지만 디지털 서명을 하거나 유효한 것으로 나타날 수 있으며, (b) 문서서명자, 해당 인증 기관 또는 제3자에 의한 조치 또는 생략으로 인하여 문서의 보안 또는 무결성이 떨어질 수 있고, (c) 인증 기관이 제공하지 않고 자가 서명을 하여 인증할 수도 있다는 것에 동의합니다. 인증을 신뢰할 것인지 여부를 결정하는 것은 전적으로 사용자의 책임입니다. 인증 기관에서 제공한 별도의 서면 보증서가 없이 디지털 인증만을 사용하면 위험이 따릅니다. 8.4 제3수익자. 사용자는 자신이 신뢰하는 인증 기관이 본 계약서의 제3자 수익자이며 Adobe와 같이 본 계약서에 회사의 이름을 올릴 권리가 있다는 데 동의합니다. 8.5 배상. (해당 조건에서 명시된 경우를 제외하고) 사용자는 (a) 기간 만료되거나 취소된 인증서의 신뢰, (b) 부적절한 인증서의 검증, (c) 해당 발행인 확인서, 이 계약서 또는 해당 조건의 허용 한도를 벗어난 인증서의 사용, (d) 인증 또는 서비스 발행 기관을 신뢰하는 상황에서의 정당한 판결 집행 불능, 또는 (e) 본 서비스와 관련된 조건에서 요구되는 의무 불이행을 포함하여, 이에 한정하지 않고, 인증 기관의 이용 또는 그에 대한 신뢰와 관련하여 발생되는 모든 책임, 손실, 소송, 손상 또는 청구(모든 합당한 지출 비용 및 변호사 수수료를 포함합니다)에 대하여 Adobe와 해당 인증 기관이 피해를 입지 않도록 조치할 것에 동의합니다. 9. 품질보증의 부존재. 소프트웨어는 “있는 그대로” 모든 결함이 있는 상태로 제공됩니다. Adobe 및 그 공급업체, 인증 기관은 소프트웨어, 인증 기관 서비스 또는 기타 제 3자 공여를 사용으로 얻어지는 결과 또는 성능을 보증하지 않으며, 보증할 수 없습니다. 사용자의 관할 준거법에 의하여 제한되거나 배제될 수 없는 경우에 어떠한 보증, 약정, 표현, 또는 조건을 제외하고, Adobe 와 공급업자, 인증 기관은 제3자의 권리, 시장성, 통합, 만족스러운 품질, 또는 특정 목적에 대한 적합성을 침해하지 않는다는 것을 포함한 모든 문제에 대하여 어떠한 보증, 약정, 표현, 또는 조건(법령, 보통법, 관습, 관례 또는 기타에 의하여 명시적으로나 묵시적으로)을 내세우지 않습니다. 제9조 및 제10조의 규정은 어떠한 경우에도 불구하고 이 계약의 소멸시까지 유효하지만, 이 조항은 이 계약의 소멸 이후에도 이 소프트웨어의 지속적인 사용권을 의미하거나 부여하지는 않습니다. 10. 책임의 제한.

어떤 경우에도 Adobe, 그 공급업자, 또는 인증 기관은 모든 파생적, 부수적, 직접, 간접, 특별, 징벌적 또는 그 모든 손해에 대하여 책임을 지지 않으며, 이는 Adobe가 그와 같은 손해의 가능성을 사전에 알고 있던 경우에도 마찬가지입니다. 앞서 언급한 제한 사항은 사용자의 관할지의 관련 법률이 허용하는 최대 범위 내에서 적용됩니다. Adobe, 공급업자 및 인증 기관의 책임은 이 계약서에 따라 계약상 또는 불법 행위에 관계없이 어떠한 제한도 없이 지급된 소프트웨어에 한정됩니다. 이 계약서에서는 Adobe의 과실이나 사기 행위로 인해 사망이나 부상이 발생한 경우 Adobe의 책임을 제한하지 않습니다. Adobe는 다른 목적이나 의도 없이 이 계약서에 언급된 대로 공급업자 및 인증 기관을 대신하여 의무, 보증, 책임을 배제 및/또는 제한합니다. 더 자세한 정보는 이 계약서 뒷부분에 있는 관할지별 정보를 참조하거나 Adobe 고객 지원부로 문의하십시오. 11. 수출 제한. 사용자는 이 소프트웨어 제품을 미합중국의 수출 관리법, 수출 관련 법률, 제한 및 규정(이하에서 "수출법"이라고 합니다)이 지정한 수출 제한 대상 국가에 수출하거나 어떤 방법으로도 사용할 수 없습니다. 또한 이 소프트웨어가 수출법에 의하여 수출 제한 품목으로 선정될 경우에, 사용자는 수출 제한 국가(이란, 시리아, 수단, 쿠바, 북한 등)의 시민이 아니며 해당 국가 내에 거주하지 않으며, 이 소프트웨어를 수령함에 있어 수출법에 의하여 금지되지 않음을 입증하여야 합니다. 이 사용권 조항에 동의하지 않을 경우에 소프트웨어의 사용에 대한 모든 권리가 상실됩니다. 12. 준거법. 이 계약서는 다음 실체법에 의하여 규율되고 해석됩니다. (a) 이 소프트웨어 사용권을 미합중국, 캐나다 또는 멕시코에서 취득한 경우에는 캘리포니아 주, (b) 일본, 중국, 대한민국 또는 동남 아시아 국가와 같이 표의 문자(예: 한지, 간지 또는 한자)를 공식 언어로 사용하는 국가 또는 표의 문자와 유사한 구조의 언어(예: 한글, 가나어)를 사용하는 국가에서 취득한 경우에는 일본, (c) 그 외의 지역에서 취득한 경우에는 영국 법률에 의합니다. 이 계약서는 관할 지역의 국제 사법 또는 국제 물품 매매계약에 관한 UN 협약의 적용을 받지 않습니다. 13. 일반 규정. 이 계약서의 일부에 그 효력이 없거나 집행력이 없는 경우에도 계약서의 적법성에는 영향을 미치지 않으며, 이 계약서의 조항에 따라 유효성과 집행력이 유지됩니다. 이 계약서는 사용자의 법적 권리를 침해하지 않습니다. 이 계약서는 Adobe 공식 대리인의 자필 서명이 있어야만 수정될 수 있습니다. 업데이트는 Adobe가 추가적인 또는 다른 조건으로 사용자에게 사용 허락할 수 있습니다. 이 계약서는 소프트웨어와 관련하여 Adobe와 사용자 사이에 체결된 완전한 계약이며, 소프트웨어와 관련한 다른 진술, 논의, 약정, 교신 또는 광고에 우선합니다. 14. 미합중국 최종 사용자에 대한 고지. 미합중국 사용자에 대하여, Adobe는 적절한 경우에, 미 대통령 시행령 제11246조, 개정 시행령인 Vietnam Era Veterans Readjustment Assistance Act of 1974 의 제402조 (38 USC 4212), Rehabilitation Act of 1973의 제503조, 개정 시행령인 41 CFR 의60-1에서 60-60, 60-250 및 60-741에 규정된 모든 적용 가능한 평등 기회 법에 따를 것에 동의합니다. 앞서 언급된 차별 금지 조치 및 규정은 이 계약의 일부로 봅니다. 15. 사용권 요건. 회사 또는 조직의 경우 Adobe 또는 Adobe 공인 대리점의 요청에 동의해야 하며, 요청을 받은 시점에 Adobe로부터 허가 받은 유효한 사용권에 따라 Adobe 소프트웨어를 사용하고 있다는 것을 30일 이내에 문서로 명시하여 증명해야 합니다.

16. 특별 조항 및 예외사항. 16.1 독일 및 오스트리아 지역 사용자에 대한 책임의 제한. 16.1.1 이 소프트웨어를 독일 또는 오스트리아에서 구매하였고, 해당 국가에 주로 거주하는 경우에는 제10조가 적용되지 않습니다. 그 대신에 제 16.1.2조의 조항에 따라 손상에 대한 Adobe의 법적 책임은 다음과 같이 제한됩니다: (i) Adobe는 본질적인 계약상 의무를 사소한 부주의로 위반하여 발생하는 손해와 관련하여, 사용권 계약 체결 당시 일반적으로 예측 가능한 손해에 한해 책임을 지고, (ii) Adobe는 사소한 계약상 의무를 사소한 부주의로 위반하여 발생하는 손해에 대해서는 책임을 지지 않습니다. 16.1.2 앞에서 언급한 책임의 제한은 강행적인 법적 책임 특히, 독일 제조물책임법(German Product Liability Act)상의 책임, 특정한 보상을 지게 하는 책임 또는 인적 피해를 야기하는 과실에 대한 책임에는 적용되지 않습니다. 16.1.3 사용자는 손해를 피하거나 줄일 수 있도록 모든 합리적인 조치를 취하여야 하고, 특히 이 계약서의 조항에 따라 이 소프트웨어 및 사용자의 컴퓨터 데이터의 백업 사본을 작성하여야 합니다.

이 계약서에 대해 문의 사항이 있거나 기타 정보가 필요한 경우에는 이 제품에 동봉된 주소 및 연락처 정보를 참조하여 또는 www.adobe.com/kr을 통하여 가까운 Adobe 지역 사무소에 연락하십시오. Adobe, AIR, Authorware, Flash, Reader 및 Shockwave는 미국 및/또는 기타 여러 나라에서 Adobe Systems Incorporated의 상표 또는 등록 상표입니다.

Reader_Player_AIR_WWEULA-ko_KR-20080204_1313

 

ADOBE SYSTEMS INCORPORATED Garantijas atruna un programmatūras licences līgums. ŠAJĀ DOKUMENTĀ IR IEKĻAUTA GARANTIJAS INFORMĀCIJA (I DAĻA) UN LICENCES LĪGUMS, KAS NOSAKA ADOBE PROGRAMMATŪRAS IZMANTOŠANU (II DAĻA). I DAĻA. GARANTIJAS ATRUNA. PROGRAMMATŪRA UN CITA INFORMĀCIJA JUMS TIEK PIEGĀDĀTA TĀDA, „KĀDA TĀ IR” - AR VISIEM TĀS TRŪKUMIEM. ADOBE UN TĀS PIEGĀDĀTĀJI, KĀ ARĪ SERTIFIKĀCIJAS IESTĀDES NEGARANTĒ UN NEVAR GARANTĒT DARBĪBU VAI REZULTĀTUS, KO JŪS VARAT IEGŪT, LIETOJOT PROGRAMMATŪRU, SERTIFIKĀCIJAS IESTĀDES PAKALPOJUMUS VAI CITUS TREŠO PERSONU PIEDĀVĀJUMUS. IZŅEMOT JEBKĀDAS GARANTIJAS, NOSACĪJUMA, APLIECINĀJUMA VAI NOTEIKUMA APMĒRĀ, CIKTĀL TAM NEVAR PIEMĒROT IZŅĒMUMU VAI IEROBEŽOJUMU SASKAŅĀ AR PIEMĒROJAMO LIKUMDOŠANU, ADOBE, TĀS PIEGĀDĀTĀJI UN SERTIFIKĀCIJAS IESTĀDES NEPIEDĀVĀ NEKĀDAS GARANTIJAS, NOSACĪJUMUS, APLIECINĀJUMUS VAI NOTEIKUMUS (TIEŠUS VAI IZRIETOŠUS SASKAŅĀ AR LIKUMU, VISPĀRĒJĀM TIESĪBĀM, PARAŽĀM, LIETOŠANU VAI CITĀDI) ATTIECĪBĀ UZ JEBKURU JAUTĀJUMU, IESKAITOT, BET NEAPROBEŽOJOTIES AR JEBKĀDU TREŠO PERSONU TIESĪBU NEAIZSKARŠANU, PIEPRASĪJUMU, INTEGRĒŠANU, APMIERINOŠU KVALITĀTI VAI PIEMĒROTĪBU JEBKURAM ĪPAŠAM NOLŪKAM. II DAĻA. PROGRAMMATŪRAS LICENCES LĪGUMS. LIETOJOT, KOPĒJOT VAI IZPLATOT VISU VAI IKVIENU DAĻU NO ADOBE PROGRAMATŪRAS, JŪS PIEKRĪTAT VISIEM ŠĪ LĪGUMA NOTEIKUMIEM UN NOSACĪJUMIEM, TAI SKAITĀ, IT ĪPAŠI NOTEIKUMIEM PAR: 2. PUNKTĀ MINĒTO LIETOŠANU; 4. PUNKTĀ NODOŠANU; 6. PUNKTĀ SAVIENOJAMĪBU UN PRIVĀTUMU; 9. PUNKTĀ GARANTIJU; 10. UN 16. PUNKTĀ ATBILDĪBU. JŪS PIEKRĪTAT, KA ŠIS LĪGUMS IR IZPILDĀMS PRET JUMS UN JEBKURU JURIDISKO PERSONU, KAS IEGĀDĀJUSIES PROGRAMMATŪRU UN, KURAS UZDEVUMĀ TĀ TIEK LIETOTA. JA JŪS NEPIEKRĪTAT, NELIETOJIET ŠO PROGRAMMATŪRU. ADOBE ĻAUJ LIETOT ŠO PROGRAMMATŪRU TIKAI SASKAŅĀ AR ŠĪ LĪGUMA NOTEIKUMIEM. DAŽU TREŠO PERSONU MATERIĀLU LIETOŠANA, KAS IEKĻAUTI PROGRAMMATŪRĀ, VAR BŪT PAKĻAUTA CITIEM NOTEIKUMIEM UN NOSACĪJUMIEM, KAS PARASTI ATRODAMI ATSEVIŠĶĀ LICENCES LĪGUMĀ, „READ ME” DATNĒ, KURA ATRODAS LĪDZĀS ŠĀDIEM MATERIĀLIEM VAI „TREŠO PERSONU PROGRAMMATŪRAS INFORMĀCIJA UN/VAI PAPILDU NOTEIKUMI UN NOSACĪJUMI”, KAS ATRODAMI http://www.adobe.com/go/thirdparty_lv. 1. Definīcijas. „Adobe” nozīmē Adobe Systems Incorporated, Delavēras štata korporāciju, 345 Park Avenue, Sanhosē, Kalifornijā 95110, ja piemērojams šī Līguma 12 (a). punkts; citādi tas apzīmē Adobe Systems Software Ireland Limited, Unit 3100, Lake Drive, City West Campus, Saggart D24, Īrijas Republika, sabiedrība, kas darbojas saskaņā ar Īrijas likumdošanu un Adobe Systems Incorporated filiāli un licenci. „Dators” nozīmē virtuālu vai fizisku personālo elektronisko ierīci, kas pieņem informāciju ciparu vai līdzīgā formā un apstrādā to, lai iegūtu noteiktu rezultātu, balstoties uz komandu secību. „Programmatūra"” nozīmē a) visu datņu saturu (kas iegūtas vai nu elektroniski, vai no fiziskas datu vides) diska (-iem) vai citas datu vides, kas tiek nodrošināta saskaņā ar šo Līgumu un kas var iekļaut i) Adobe vai trešās personas datoru informāciju vai programmatūru, ieskaitot Adobe Reader® („Adobe Reader”), Adobe® AIR™ („Adobe AIR”), Adobe Flash® Player, Shockwave® Player un Authorware® Player (Adobe AIR un Flash, Shockwave un Authorware atskaņotāji kopā saukti „Adobe Runtimes”); ii) saistītajiem skaidrojošajiem rakstveida materiāliem vai datnēm („Dokumentāciju”); un iii) fontiem; un b) iepriekš minētās programmatūras jauninājumiem, modificētām versijām, atjauninājumiem, papildinājumiem un kopijām, ko jums jebkurā laikā ir

piešķīrusi Adobe (kopā saukti „Atjauninājumi”). „Lietošana” nozīmē piekļuvi, instalēšanu, lejupielādēšanu, kopēšanu vai cita veida labumu gūšanu no programmatūras funkciju izmantošanas. 2. Programmatūras licence. Ja Jūs esat iegādājies Programmatūru no Adobe vai kāda no tās pilnvarotajiem licences turētājiem un, kamēr Jūs ievērojat šī līguma noteikumus, ieskaitot 3. punktā noteiktos ierobežojumus, Adobe piešķir Jums neierobežotu licenci lietot Programmatūru Dokumentācijā aprakstītajā veidā un mērķiem, kā norādīts turpmāk tekstā: 2.1 Vispārējā lietošana. Jūs varat instalēt un lietot vienu Programmatūras kopiju uz jūsu savietojamā Datora. Skatīt 3. punktā norādītos svarīgos Programmatūras lietošanas ierobežojumus. 2.2 Servera lietošana. Šis līgums neļauj jums instalēt vai lietot programmatūru datora datņu serverim. Lai iegūtu informāciju par programmatūras izmantošanu datora datņu serverī, apmeklējiet http://www.adobe.com/go/acrobat_distribute_lv informācijai par Adobe Reader vai arī http://www.adobe.com/go/licensing_lv informācijai par Adobe Runtimes. 2.3 Izplatīšana. Šī licence jums nepiešķir tiesības izsniegt licenci citai personai vai izplatīt šo Programmatūru. Lai iegūtu informāciju par tiesībām izplatīt Programmatūru fiziskā datu vidē vai iekšējā tīklā, vai arī kopā ar jūsu produktu vai pakalpojumu, apmeklējiet http://www.adobe.com/go/acrobat_distribute_lv informācijai par Adobe Reader vai arī http://www.adobe.com/go/licensing_lv informācija par Adobe Runtimes. 2.4 Dublējumkopija. Jūs drīkstat sagatavot vienu Programmatūras dublējumkopiju ar nosacījumu, ka Jūsu dublējumkopija netiek instalēta vai lietota. Jūs nedrīkstat nodot tiesības uz dublējumkopiju, ja vien Jūs nenododat visas tiesības uz Programmatūru saskaņā ar 4. punkta nosacījumiem. 3. Saistības un ierobežojumi. 3.1 Adobe Runtime ierobežojumi. Jūs nedrīkstat lietot jebkuru Adobe Runtime atskaņotāju jebkurā ierīcē, kas nav personālais dators, vai kopā ar jebkādu operētājsistēmas iegulto vai ierīces versiju. Lai novērstu šaubas, un vienīgi kā piemērs jānorāda, ka Jūs nedrīkstat lietot Adobe Runtime jebkādās a) mobilās ierīcēs, televizora pierīcēs (STB), rokas ierīcēs, telefonos, tīmekļa paliktņos, planšetēs un planšetdatoros (izņemot ar Windows XP Media Center Edition un tās pēcteču operētājsistēmām), spēļu konsolēs, televizoros, DVD atskaņotājos, mediju centros (izņemot ar Windows XP Media Center Edition un tās pēcteču operētājsistēmām), elektroniskajos ziņojumu dēļos un citos ciparu virziena rādītājos, Interneta ierīcēs vai citās ierīcēs ar Interneta pieslēgumu, personālajos ciparasistentos (PDA), medicīniskās ierīcēs, bankomātos, telemātiskās ierīcēs, spēļu automātos, mājas automatizācijas sistēmās, kioskos, tālvadības ierīcēs vai jebkurā citā patērētāju elektroniskajā ierīcē, (b) mobilajās, kabeļu, satelīta vai televīzijas sistēmās vai (c) citās slēgtās sistēmas ierīcēs. Lai iegūtu informāciju par Adobe Runtimes licencēšanu izmantošanai šādās sistēmās, apmeklējiet http://www.adobe.com/go/licensing_lv. 3.2 Adobe Reader ierobežojumi. Adobe licencē un izplata Adobe Reader PDF datņu skatīšanai, izplatīšanai un koplietošanai. 3.2.1 Konversijas ierobežojumi. Jūs nedrīkstat integrēt vai lietot Adobe Reader kopā ar jebkuru citu programmatūru, spraudni vai paplašinājumu, kas izmanto vai balstās uz Adobe Reader, konvertējot vai pārvēršot PDF datnes jebkuros citos datņu formātos (piem., PDF datni par TIFF, JPEG vai SVG datni). 3.2.2 Spraudņu ierobežojumi. Jūs nedrīkstat integrēt vai lietot Adobe Reader kopā ar jebkādu spraudņa programmatūru, kas nav izveidota saskaņā ar Adobe integrācijas atslēgas licences līgumu. 3.2.3 Atspējotās iespējas. Adobe Reader var saturēt iespējas un funkcijas, kas ir slēptas vai parādās atspējotas jeb „pelēkas” („Atspējotās iespējas”). Atspējotās iespējas aktivējas tikai, atverot PDF dokumentu, kas izveidots, lietojot atbilstošu iespējošanas tehnoloģiju, kas pieejama tikai no Adobe. Jūs nedrīkstat piekļūt vai mēģināt piekļūt jebkādām atspējotajām iespējām citādā veidā, kā tikai lietojot šādas iespējošanas tehnoloģijas, kā arī jūs nedrīkstat izmantot Adobe Reader, lai izveidotu iespēju, kas ir būtībā līdzīga kādai no atspējotajām iespējām vai citādi apiet tehnoloģiju, kas kontrolē ikvienas šīs iespējas aktivēšanu. Lai iegūtu papildu informāciju par atspējotām iespējām, apmeklējiet http://www.adobe.com/go/readerextensions_lv.

3.3 Paziņojumi. Jebkurai Jūsu sagatavotajai Programmatūras kopijai jāsatur tās pašas autortiesību pazīmes un citi paziņojumi par īpašumtiesībām, kādi ir uz Programmatūras vai Programmatūrā. 3.4 Aizliegta modificēšana un reversā inženierija. Jūs nedrīkstat uz Programmatūras bāzes modificēt, pielāgot, tulkot vai radīt atvasinātus darbus. Jūs nedrīkstat veikt reverso inženieriju, dekompilēt, demontēt vai citādi mēģināt noskaidrot Programmatūras pirmkodu, izņemot tādā apmērā, ciktāl piemērojamais likums jums skaidri atļauj veikt reverso inženieriju vai dekompilāciju. 4. Nodošana tālāk. Jūs nedrīkstat izīrēt, iznomāt, nodot licenci trešajām personām, cedēt vai nodot savas tiesības uz Programmatūru vai atļaut kopēt visu Programmatūru vai tās daļu uz cita lietotāja Datora, izņemot šajā Līgumā īpaši atļautos gadījumus. Tomēr Jūs varat nodot visas savas tiesības lietot Programmatūru citai fiziskai vai juridiskai personai ar nosacījumu, ka: a) jūs nododat arī i) šo Līgumu, un ii) šai fiziskajai vai juridiskajai personai Programmatūru un visas citas programmatūras vai aparatūras, kas ir sasaistītas vai iepriekš instalētas kopā ar Programmatūru, ieskaitot visas kopijas, Atjauninājumus un iepriekšējās versijas, b) jūs nesaglabājat nekādas kopijas, ieskaitot dublējumkopijas un Datorā saglabātās kopijas, un c) saņēmēja puse pieņem šī Līguma noteikumus un nosacījumus, saskaņā ar kuriem jūs ieguvāt derīgu Programmatūras licenci. Neņemot vērā iepriekš minēto, Jūs nedrīkstat nodot akadēmiskās, pirmsizlaiduma vai tālāk pārdošanai aizliegtās Programmatūras kopijas. 5. Intelektuālā īpašuma tiesības, tiesību rezervēšana. Programmatūra un jebkuras likumīgās kopijas, ko Jūs sagatavojat, ir Adobe Systems Incorporated un tās piegādātāju intelektuālais īpašums. Programmatūras struktūra, organizācija un kods ir Adobe Systems Incorporated un tās piegādātāju vērtīgi komercnoslēpumi un konfidenciāla informācija. Programmatūru aizsargā likumi, ieskaitot, bet neaprobežojoties ar Savienoto Valstu un citu valstu autortiesību likumiem un starptautisko līgumu nosacījumiem. Ja vien tas nav skaidri šeit norādīts, šis līgums nepiešķir jums nekādas intelektuālā īpašuma tiesības uz Programmatūru, un visas tiesības, kas nav skaidri noteiktas, patur Adobe un tās piegādātāji. 6. Savienojamība un privātums. 6.1 PDF datņu izmantošana. Kad Jūs izmantojat programmatūru, lai atvērtu PDF datni, kurai ir iespējota reklāmu attēlošana, reģistrējoties pakalpojumam „Reklāmas Adobe PDF dokumentiem”, Jūsu dators var izveidot savienojumu ar tīmekļa vietni, ko pārvalda Adobe, reklāmdevējs vai cita trešā persona. Šajā brīdī tiek nosūtīta jūsu interneta protokola (IP) adrese. Tīmekļa vietnes mitinātājs var izmantot tehnoloģiju, lai nosūtītu (vai „piedāvātu”) reklāmas vai citu elektronisku saturu, kas redzams atvērtajā failā vai līdzās. Tīmekļa vietnes operators var arī izmantot JavaScript, tīmekļa bāksignālus (zināmi arī kā darbības tagi vai viena pikseļa GIF faili) un citas tehnoloģijas, lai palielinātu vai mērītu reklāmu efektivitāti un personalizētu reklāmu saturu. Jūsu sakarus ar Adobe tīmekļa vietnēm nosaka Adobe tiešsaistes privātuma politika, kas ir atrodama tīmekļa vietnē: http://www.adobe.com/go/privacy_lv. Adobe var nebūt piekļuves vai tā nevar kontrolēt iespējas, ko var lietot trešās personas un Adobe tiešsaistes privātuma politika neattiecas uz trešo personu tīmekļa vietņu informācijas praktiskiem lietojumiem. 6.2 Atjaunināšana. Jūs atzīstat un piekrītat, ka Programmatūra var jūsu Datoram likt automātiski izveidot savienojumu ar Internetu, lai pārbaudītu atjauninājumus, kas ir pieejami automātiskai lejupielādei jūsu Datorā un ļaut Adobe uzzināt, ka Programmatūra ir veiksmīgi uzinstalēta. Šajā brīdī Adobe tiek nosūtīta tikai vispārīga identifikācijas informācija. Jūsu sakarus ar Adobe tīmekļa vietnēm nosaka Adobe tiešsaistes privātuma politika, kas atrodama: http://www.adobe.com/go/privacy_lv. Lūdzu, izlasiet Dokumentāciju, lai iegūtu informāciju par atjaunināšanas noklusējuma iestatījumiem. 6.3 Uzstādījumu pārvaldnieks (Settings Manager). Flash atskaņotājs jūsu Datorā var saglabāt noteiktus lietotāja uzstādījumus kā vietējo koplietojuma objektu. Šie uzstādījumi nav saistīti ar Jums, bet ļauj Jums konfigurēt noteiktus uzstādījumus Flash atskaņotājā. Sīkāku informāciju par vietējiem koplietojuma objektiem Jūs atradīsiet http://www.adobe.com/go/flashplayer_security_lv, un sīkāku informāciju par Uzstādījumu pārvaldnieku http://www.adobe.com/go/settingsmanager_lv.

7. Trešo personu piedāvājumi. Programmatūra var Jums ļaut piekļūt un savstarpēji sadarboties ar trešo personu tīmekļa vietnēm, programmatūras lietojumprogrammām un datu pakalpojumiem, tostarp Rich Internet lietojumprogrammām („Trešo personu piedāvājumi”). Jūsu piekļuvi kādiem Trešo pušu piedāvājumiem, tostarp jebkādām precēm, pakalpojumiem vai informācijai, nosaka noteikumi un nosacījumi attiecībā uz šādiem piedāvājumiem. Trešo personu piedāvājumi nepieder Adobe un tā tos nenodrošina. 8. Ciparsertifikāti. 8.1 Pielietojums. Adobe AIR izmanto ciparsertifikātus, lai jums palīdzētu identificēt Adobe AIR lietojumprogrammu, ko izveidojušas trešās personas, publicētāju. Adobe Reader izmanto ciparsertifikātus, lai parakstītu un validētu parakstus PDF dokumentos, un validētu sertificētus PDF dokumentus. Ciparsertifikāta validācijas laikā jūsu dators var izveidot savienojumu ar Internetu. Ciparsertifikātus izsniedz trešo pušu sertifikācijas iestādes, tostarp Adobe Certified Document Services (CDS) tirgotāji, kas ir uzskaitīti http://www.adobe.com/go/partners_cds_lv („Certificate Authorities”) vai tie var būt pašu parakstīti. 8.2 Noteikumi un nosacījumi Ciparsertifikātu iegāde, izmantošana un paļaušanās uz tiem ir jūsu un sertifikācijas iestādes atbildība. Pirms paļaujaties uz jebkādu sertificētu dokumentu, ciparparakstu vai sertifikācijas iestādes pakalpojumiem, pārskatiet piemērojamos noteikumus un nosacījumus, saskaņā ar kuriem attiecīgā sertifikācijas iestāde sniedz pakalpojumus, ieskaitot, piemēram, jebkurus abonēšanas līgumus, pušu paļaušanās līgumus, sertifikātu izdošanas un lietošanas noteikumus. Lai iegūtu informāciju par Adobe CDS tirgotājiem, apskatiet saites šajā lapā: http://www.adobe.com/go/partners_cds_lv. 8.3 Apstiprinājums. Jūs piekrītat, ka a) ciparsertifikāts var būt atsaukts pirms pārbaudes brīža, liekot ciparparakstam vai sertifikātam izskatīties derīgam, kaut gan patiesībā tas ir nederīgs, b) ciparsertifikāta drošība vai integritāte var tikt apdraudēta dokumenta parakstītāja, attiecīgās sertifikācijas iestādes vai jebkuras citas trešās personas darbības vai nolaidības dēļ un c) sertifikāts var būt paša parakstīts sertifikāts, ko nav izsniegusi sertifikācijas iestāde. TIKAI JŪS ESAT ATBILDĪGI PAR LĒMUMU PAĻAUTIES VAI NEPAĻAUTIES UZ SERTIFIKĀTU. JA VIEN SERTIFIKĀCIJAS IESTĀDE JUMS NAV IZSNIEGUSI ATSEVIŠĶU RAKSTISKU GARANTIJU, JŪS LIETOJAT CIPARSERTIFIKĀTUS, UZŅEMOTIES RISKU TIKAI UZ SEVI. 8.4 Trešās puses labuma guvēji. Jūs piekrītat, ka katra sertifikācijas iestāde, kurai uzticaties, ir šī līguma trešās puses labuma guvējs un tai jābūt tiesībām īstenot šo līgumu savā vārdā, it kā tas būtu Adobe. 8.5 Kompensācija. Jūs piekrītat pasargāt Adobe un jebkuru attiecīgo Sertifikācijas iestādi (izņemot gadījumus, kas skaidri atrunāti noteikumos un nosacījumos) no ikvienas un visām saistībām, zaudējumiem, prasībām, kaitējumiem vai prasījumiem (ieskaitot visus pamatotos izdevumus, maksas un advokāta atlīdzības), kas izriet vai ir saistīti ar jebkāda šādas iestādes pakalpojuma lietošanu un paļaušanos uz to, ieskaitot, bez ierobežojumiem a) paļaušanos uz sertifikātu, kura derīguma termiņš ir beidzies vai kurš ir atcelts; b) neatbilstošu sertifikāta pārbaudi; c) sertifikāta lietošanu citādi, nekā tas atļauts jebkuros piemērojamos noteikumos un nosacījumos, šajā līgumā vai attiecīgajā likumdošanā; d) nespēja saprātīgi novērtēt apstākļus, paļaujoties uz izsniedzēja pakalpojumiem vai sertifikātiem; vai e) nespēja izpildīt kādu no pienākumiem, kā tas paredzēts noteikumos un nosacījumos, kas saistīti ar šiem pakalpojumiem. 9. Atteikšanās no garantijas. Šī programmatūra Jums tiek piegādāta tāda, „KĀDA TĀ IR” - ar visiem tās TRŪKUMIEM. ADOBE UN TĀS PIEGĀDĀTĀJI, KĀ ARĪ SERTIFIKĀCIJAS IESTĀDES NEGARANTĒ UN NEVAR GARANTĒT DARBĪBU VAI REZULTĀTUS, KO JŪS VARAT IEGŪT, LIETOJOT PROGRAMMATŪRU, SERTIFIKĀCIJAS IESTĀDES PAKALPOJUMUS VAI CITUS TREŠO PERSONU PIEDĀVĀJUMUS. IZŅEMOT JEBKĀDAS GARANTIJAS, NOSACĪJUMA, APLIECINĀJUMA VAI NOTEIKUMA APMĒRĀ, CIKTĀL TAM NEVAR PIEMĒROT IZŅĒMUMU VAI IEROBEŽOJUMU SASKAŅĀ AR PIEMĒROJAMO LIKUMDOŠANU, ADOBE, TĀS PIEGĀDĀTĀJI UN SERTIFIKĀCIJAS IESTĀDES NEPIEDĀVĀ NEKĀDAS GARANTIJAS, NOSACĪJUMUS, APLIECINĀJUMUS VAI NOTEIKUMUS (TIEŠUS VAI IZRIETOŠUS SASKAŅĀ AR LIKUMU, VISPĀRĒJĀM TIESĪBĀM, PARAŽĀM, LIETOŠANU VAI CITĀDI) ATTIECĪBĀ UZ JEBKURU JAUTĀJUMU, IESKAITOT, BET NEAPROBEŽOJOTIES AR JEBKĀDU TREŠO PERSONU TIESĪBU

NEAIZSKARŠANU, PIEPRASĪJUMU, INTEGRĒŠANU, APMIERINOŠU KVALITĀTI VAI PIEMĒROTĪBU JEBKURAM ĪPAŠAM NOLŪKAM. 9. un 10. punkta nosacījumi paliek spēkā arī pēc šī Līguma izbeigšanās jebkādu iemeslu dēļ, bet no tā neizriet un nerodas nekādas turpmākas tiesības lietot Programmatūru pēc Līguma izbeigšanās. 10. Atbildības ierobežojums. ADOBE, TĀS PIEGĀDĀTĀJI VAI SERTIFIKĀCIJAS IESTĀDES NEKĀDĀ GADĪJUMĀ NEBŪS ATBILDĪGI PAR JEBKĀDIEM BOJĀJUMIEM, PRASĪBĀM VAI IZDEVUMIEM, TOSTARP JEBKĀDIEM IZRIETOŠIEM, NETIEŠIEM, NEJAUŠIEM BOJĀJUMIEM VAI PAR JEBKĀDU ZAUDĒTU PEĻŅU VAI ZAUDĒTIEM IETAUPĪJUMIEM, PAT TAD, JA ADOBE PĀRSTĀVIS IR BIJIS INFORMĒTS PAR ŠĀDU ZAUDĒJUMU, KAITĒJUMU VAI PRASĪJUMU IESPĒJAMĪBU. IEPRIEKŠ MINĒTIE IEROBEŽOJUMI UN IZŅĒMUMI IR PIEMĒROJAMI TIKTĀL, CIKTĀL TO ATĻAUJ JŪSU JURISDIKCIJAS PIEMĒROJAMĀ LIKUMDOŠANA. ADOBE UN PIEGĀDĀTĀJU, UN SERTIFIKĀCIJAS IESTĀŽU KOPĒJĀ ATBILDĪBA SASKAŅĀ VAI SAISTĪBĀ AR ŠO LĪGUMU IR IEROBEŽOTA AR SUMMU, KAS SAMAKSĀTA PAR PROGRAMMATŪRU, JA TĀDA IR. Šī līguma saturs nekādā veidā neierobežo Adobe atbildību pret Jums nāves vai miesas bojājumu gadījumā, kas iestājušies Adobe nolaidības vai krāpšanas rezultātā. Adobe rīkojas savu piegādātāju un sertifikācijas iestāžu vārdā ar nolūku atsaukt, nepieļaut un/vai ierobežot pienākumus, garantijas un atbildību saskaņā ar šo Līgumu, bet nekādā citādā ziņā vai citam nolūkam. Sīkākai informācijai lūdzam skatīt īpašo informāciju attiecībā uz jurisdikcijām šī Līguma beigās, ja tāda ir, vai sazināties ar Adobe klientu apkalpošanas nodaļu. 11. Eksporta noteikumi. Jūs piekrītat, ka Programmatūra netiks nosūtīta, nodota vai eksportēta uz citu valsti vai lietota jebkādā veidā, ko aizliedz Savienoto Valstu Eksporta Pārvaldes likums vai jebkuri citi eksporta likumi, ierobežojumi vai noteikumi (kopā saukti „Eksporta likumi”). Turklāt, ja Programmatūra tiek identificēta kā eksporta kontrolei pakļauta vienība, saskaņā ar Eksporta likumiem, Jums ir jāapliecina un jāgarantē, ka neesat tādas valsts pilsonis vai kā citādi neatrodaties valstī, kurai noteikts embargo (ieskaitot, bet neaprobežojoties ar Irānu, Sīriju, Sudānu, Kubu un Ziemeļkoreju), un ka jums nav nekādi citādi aizliegumi saņemt Programmatūru saskaņā ar Eksporta likumiem. Visas tiesības izmantot Programmatūru tiek piešķirtas ar nosacījumu, ka šīs tiesības tiek zaudētas, ja Jūs neievērojat šī līguma noteikumus. 12. Vadošā likumdošana. Šo Līgumu regulē un tas ir sastādīts saskaņā ar spēkā esošām materiālajām tiesībām: a) Kalifornijas štata, ja Programmatūras licence tiek pirkta, Jums atrodoties Savienotajās Valstīs, Kanādā vai Meksikā; vai b) Japānas, ja Programmatūras licence tiek pirkta, Jums atrodoties Japānā, Ķīnā, Korejā vai citā Dienvidaustrumāzijas valstī, kur visas valsts valodas tiek rakstītas vai nu ideogrāfiskajā rakstā (piem., hanzi (ķīniešu zīmes), kanji (ķīniešu izcelsmes logotipiskās zīmes japāņu valodā) vai hanja (ķīniešu zīmes korejiešu valodā)) un/vai citā rakstā, kas balstās uz struktūras ziņā tādu pašu vai ideogrāfiskajam rakstam līdzīgu struktūru, piemēram, hangul (senais korejiešu raksts) vai kana (japāņu sillabiskās zīmes); vai c) Anglijas, ja Programmatūras licence tiek pirkta, Jums neatrodoties kādā no iepriekš minētajām jurisdikcijām. Kalifornijas štata Santaklāras apgabala tiesas Kalifornijas likumdošanas piemērošanas gadījumā, Tokijas apgabala tiesas Japānas likumdošanas piemērošanas gadījumā vai Londonas tiesas Anglijā pēc piekritības Anglijas likumdošanai piemērošanas gadījumā izskata visus strīdus saistībā ar šo līgumu vispārējā jurisdikcijā. Šo līgumu neregulē jebkuras jurisdikcijas kolīziju tiesību normas vai ANO Konvencija par līgumiem attiecībā uz preču starptautisko tirdzniecību, kuras pielietošana ir skaidri izslēgta. 13. Vispārējie noteikumi. Ja jebkura šī Līguma daļa izrādās spēkā neesoša vai nepiemērojama, tā neietekmē šī Līguma spēkā esamību kopumā, kurš paliek spēkā un piemērojams, saskaņā ar tā noteikumiem. Šis Līgums nemazina nevienas puses ar likumu noteiktās tiesības, kura ir iesaistīta kā patērētājs. Šo līgumu var izmainīt tikai ar rakstisku dokumentu, ko parakstījusi Adobe pilnvarota amatpersona. Adobe drīkst licencēt Jums atjauninājumus ar papildu vai citādiem

nosacījumiem. Šis ir pilnīgs līgums starp Adobe un Jums attiecībā uz Programmatūru, un tas aizstāj jebkurus iepriekšējus apliecinājumus, apspriedes, apņemšanās, paziņojumus vai reklāmu attiecībā uz Programmatūru. 14. Paziņojums ASV valdības Gala lietotājiem. Attiecībā uz ASV Valdības Gala lietotājiem Adobe piekrīt ievērot visus piemērojamos likumus par vienādām iespējām, ieskaitot, ja piemērojams, Pārvaldes lēmumu Nr. 11246, ar tā grozījumiem, 1974. gada likuma „Par palīdzību Vjetnamas kara veterānu adaptācijā” (38 USC 4212) 402. pantu un 1973. gada Reabilitācijas likuma 503. pantu ar tā grozījumiem, un noteikumiem 41 CFR no 60-1 līdz 60-60, 60-250 un 60-741 pantos. Pants par pozitīvo diskrimināciju un iepriekš minētie noteikumi tiks iekļauti šajā līgumā ar atsauci. 15. Atbilstība licencēm. Ja Jūs esat uzņēmums vai organizācija, Jūs piekrītat, ka pēc Adobe vai tās pilnvarota pārstāvja pieprasījuma Jūs trīsdesmit (30) dienu laikā pilnībā dokumentēsiet un apliecināsiet, ka visas Adobe programmatūras vai tās daļas lietošana pieprasījuma brīdī atbilst Jūsu spēkā esošajai licencei no Adobe. 16. Īpaši nosacījumi un izņēmumi. 16.1 Atbildības ierobežojumi lietotājiem, kas dzīvo Vācijā un Austrijā. 16.1.1 Ja Jūs esat iegādājies Programmatūru Vācijā vai Austrijā, un jūs parasti dzīvojat šajā valstī, tad 10. punkts uz jums neattiecas. Tā vietā, saskaņā ar 16.1.2. punkta noteikumiem, Adobe ar likumu uzliktā atbildība par bojājumiem tiek ierobežota sekojoši: i) Adobe ir atbildīga tikai par tādu kaitējumu apjomu, kas parasti ir paredzams, noslēdzot licences līgumu, attiecībā uz kaitējumu, ko izraisījis neliels būtisku līguma saistību pārkāpumu nolaidības rezultātā un ii) Adobe nav atbildīgs par kaitējumu, kas nodarīts neliela nebūtisku līguma saistību pārkāpumu rezultātā. 16.1.2 Iepriekš minētais atbildības ierobežojums neattiecas uz nevienu obligātu ar likumu noteiktu saistību, jo īpaši atbildību, ko nosaka Vācijas likums „Par produkta nekaitīgumu”, atbildību par īpašu garantiju uzņemšanos vai atbildību par apzināti izraisītiem personas miesas bojājumiem. 16.1.3 Jums ir jāveic visi pieņemamie pasākumi, lai izvairītos no kaitējuma vai to samazinātu, jo īpaši, veidojot Programmatūras un jūsu datora datu dublējumkopijas, saskaņā ar šī līguma noteikumiem.

Ja jums ir kādi jautājumi attiecībā uz šo Līgumu, vai arī, ja Jūs vēlaties pieprasīt jebkādu informāciju no Adobe, lūdzu, izmatojiet adresi un kontaktinformāciju, kas pievienota šim produktam, vai caur tīmekli www.adobe.com/lv, lai sazinātos ar Adobe biroju, kas darbojas Jūsu jurisdikcijā. Adobe, AIR, Authorware, Flash, Reader un Shockwave ir vai nu reģistrētas preču zīmes, vai Adobe Systems Incorporated preču zīmes Savienotajās Valstīs un/vai citās valstīs.

Reader_Player_AIR_WWEULA-lv_LV-20080204_1313

 

„ADOBE SYSTEMS INCORPORATED“ Garantinių įsipareigojimų apribojimas ir programinės įrangos naudojimo licencija. ŠĮ DOKUMENTĄ SUDARO INFORMACIJA APIE GARANTIJOS TAIKYMĄ (I DALIS) IR LICENCIJOS SUTARTIS, KURIOJE NUSTATOMAS PROGRAMINĖS ĮRANGOS „ADOBE“ NAUDOJIMAS (II DALIS). I DALIS. GARANTINIŲ ĮSIPAREIGOJIMŲ APRIBOJIMAS. PROGRAMINĖ ĮRANGA IR KITA INFORMACIJA JUMS PRISTATOMA TOKIA, KOKIA FAKTIŠKAI YRA, SU VISAIS JOS TRŪKUMAIS. „ADOBE“, JOS TIEKĖJAI IR SERTIFIKAVIMO AGENTŪROS NEGARANTUOJA IR NEGALI GARANTUOTI UŽ VEIKIMĄ AR REZULTATUS, KURIUOS GALITE GAUTI NAUDODAMI PROGRAMINĘ ĮRANGĄ, SERTIFIKAVIMO AGENTŪROS PASLAUGAS AR KITŲ TREČIŲJŲ ŠALIŲ PASIŪLYMUS. „ADOBE“, JOS TIEKĖJAI IR SERTIFIKAVIMO AGENTŪROS NETEIKIA JOKIŲ GARANTIJŲ, SĄLYGŲ, PAREIŠKIMŲ IR NENUSTATO TERMINŲ (NESVARBU, AR TIESIOGINIŲ AR NUMANOMŲ, AR PAGAL ĮSTATYMUS, TEISĖS PRINCIPUS, TRADICIJAS, VARTOSENĄ AR KITKĄ), DĖL KOKIŲ BEBŪTŲ DALYKŲ, ĮSKAITANT, BE APRIBOJIMŲ, DRAUDIMĄ PAŽEISTI TREČIŲJŲ ASMENŲ TEISES, PERKAMUMĄ, NUOSEKLUMĄ, PATENKINAMĄ KOKYBĘ AR TINKAMUMĄ KURIAM NORS KONKREČIAM TIKSLUI. II DALIS. PROGRAMINĖS ĮRANGOS NAUDOJIMO LICENCIJA. NAUDODAMI, KOPIJUODAMI AR PLATINDAMI VISĄ PROGRAMINĘ ĮRANGĄ „ADOBE“ (PROGRAMINĖ ĮRANGA) AR JOS DALĮ, JŪS ĮSIPAREIGOJATE LAIKYTIS VISŲ ŠIOS SUTARTIES SĄLYGŲ, YPAČ ŠIŲ JOJE NUSTATYTŲ NUOSTATŲ: 2 DALYJE DĖL NAUDOJIMO; 4 DALYJE DĖL PERLEIDIMO; 6 DALYJE DĖL PRISIJUNGIMO IR PRIVATUMO; 9 DALYJE DĖL GARANTIJOS; 10 IR 16 DALYSE DĖL ATSAKOMYBĖS. JŪS SUTINKATE, KAD ŠI SUTARTIS YRA ĮGYVENDINAMA JŪSŲ IR KITO JURIDINIO ASMENS, GAVUSIO PROGRAMINĘ ĮRANGĄ IR KIENO VARDU JI NAUDOJAMA, ATŽVILGIU. JEIGU NESUTINKATE SU ŠIOS SUTARTIES SĄLYGOMIS, JŪS NEGALITE NAUDOTI PROGRAMINĖS ĮRANGOS. „ADOBE“ LEIDŽIA JUMS NAUDOTI ŠIĄ PROGRAMINĘ ĮRANGĄ IŠIMTINAI PAGAL ŠIOS SUTARTIES SĄLYGAS. NAUDOJANTIS TREČIŲJŲ ASMENŲ MEDŽIAGA IR PASLAUGOMIS, TEIKIAMOMIS KARTU SU PROGRAMINE ĮRANGA, GALI BŪTI TAIKOMOS KITOKIOS NEGU PAPRASTAI BŪNA ATSKIROJE LICENCIJOS SUTARTYJE SĄLYGOS, SU KURIOMIS GALIMA SUSIPAŽINTI PRIE TOS MEDŽIAGOS PRIDĖTAME „READ ME“ FAILE ARBA „PASTABOSE DĖL TREČIŲJŲ ASMENŲ PROGRAMINĖS ĮRANGOS“ IR / ARBA „PAPILDOMOSE SĄLYGOSE“, KURIAS GALIMA RASTI INTERNETO TINKLALAPYJE http://www.adobe.com/go/thirdparty_lt. 1. Apibrėžimai. „Adobe“ reiškia „Adobe Systems Incorporated“, Delavero bendrovę, kurios adresas yra 345 Park Avenue, San Jose, California 95110, jeigu taikomas šios Sutarties 12 dalies (a) punktas; kitais atvejais tai yra „Adobe Systems Software Ireland Limited“, kurios adresas yra Unit 3100, Lake Drive, City West Campus, Saggart D24, Airijos Respublika, t. y., Airijos įstatymų nustatyta tvarka įsteigta bendrovė, kuri yra „Adobe Systems Incorporated“ filialas ir licencijos turėtoja. Kompiuteris reiškia virtualųjį ar fizinį asmeninį prietaisą, kuris priima skaitmeninės ar panašios formos informaciją, ir pagal nustatytų instrukcijų seką atlieka su ja operacijas, kad gautų konkretų rezultatą. Programinė įranga reiškia: (a) visą failų turinį (nesvarbu, ar pristatytą elektroniniu būdu, ar gautą iš fizinių laikmenų), arba diskus ar kitas laikmenas, prie kurių pridedama ši Sutartis; tai gali būti: (i) „Adobe“ arba trečiojo asmens kompiuterinę informaciją arba programinę įrangą, įskaitant „Adobe Reader“® (Adobe Reader), „Adobe® AIR“™ (Adobe AIR), grotuvus „Adobe Flash®“, „Shockwave®“ ir „Authorware®“ (toliau „Flash“, „Shockwave“ ir „Authorware“ grotuvai vadinami „Web Players“ (Web Players)); (ii) atitinkamą rašytinę aiškinamąją medžiagą arba failus (Dokumentacija); (iii) šriftus; ir (b) Programinės įrangos patobulinimus, modifikuotas versijas, atnaujinimus, papildymus ir kopijas, (jeigu jų būtų), kuriuos jums pagal licenciją suteikia „Adobe“ (toliau visi kartu

- Patobulinimai). Naudojimas reiškia prieigą, instaliavimą, perkėlimą į atmintį, atgaminimą, kopijavimą ar kitokį pasinaudojimą Programinės įrangos funkcinėmis galimybėmis. 2. Programinės įrangos licencija. Jeigu Programinę įrangą įsigijote iš „Adobe“ arba vieno iš jos įgaliotų licenciatų ir laikotės šios sutarties sąlygų bei 3 dalyje nustatytų apribojimų, „Adobe“ suteikia jums Programinės įrangos naudojimo neišimtinę licenciją Dokumentacijoje nurodytiems, toliau aptartiems, tikslams. 2.1 Bendras naudojimas. Galite instaliuoti ir naudoti vieną Programinės įrangos kopiją į savo Kompiuterį. Skaitykite 3 dalyje apie svarbius apribojimus, taikomus Programinės įrangos naudojimui. 2.2 Naudojimas serveryje. Ši sutartis nesuteikia jums teisės instaliuoti ar naudoti programinės įrangos į savo kompiuterio failų serverį. Norėdami sužinoti, kaip naudoti Programinę įrangą per kompiuterio failų serverį, skaitykite http://www.adobe.com/go/acrobat_distribute_lt dėl informacijos apie „Adobe Reader“ arba http://www.adobe.com/go/licensing_lt dėl informacijos apie „Adobe Runtimes“. 2.3 Platinimas. Ši licencija nesuteikia jums teisės suteikti sublicencijos į programinę įrangą ar jos platinti. Norėdami sužinoti, kaip gauti teisę platinti Programinę įrangą materialiose laikmenose, per vidaus tinklą ar su jūsų produktais ar paslaugomis, skaitykite http://www.adobe.com/go/acrobat_distribute_lt dėl informacijos apie „Adobe Reader“ arba http://www.adobe.com/go/licensing_lt dėl informacijos apie „Adobe Runtimes“. 2.4 Atsarginė kopija. Jūs turite teisę pasidaryti vieną atsarginę Programinės įrangos kopiją su sąlyga, kad ji nebus instaliuota ar naudojama. Jūs neturite teisės perduoti teisių į atsarginę kopiją, išskyrus atvejus, kai perleidžiate visas teises į Programinę įrangą 4 dalyje nustatyta tvarka. 3. Įsipareigojimai ir apribojimai. 3.1 „Adobe Runtime“ taikomi apribojimai. Neturite teisės naudoti „Adobe Runtime“ su įranga, kuri nėra personalinio kompiuterio tipo produktas ir su bet kokiais kurios operacinės sistemos priedėliais ar įrangos versijomis. Aiškumo dėlei ir kaip pavyzdį galima paminėti, kad „Adobe Runtime“ negalima naudoti (a) su jokia mobilia įranga, imtuvu-dekoderiu (set top box (STB)), delniniu kompiuteriu, telefonu, internetu ir kita konvergencine įranga (web pad), delniniu ir „tablet“ tipo kompiuteriu (tablet ir Tablet PC) (išskyrus kompiuterius su „Windows XP Tablet PC Editon“ ir vėlesnėmis versijomis), žaidimų konsole (game console), televizoriumi, skaitmeninių diskų (DVD) grotuvu, universaliu centru (media center) (išskyrus centrus su „Windows XP Media Center Editon“ ir vėlesnes versijas), elektronine skelbimo ar kitokių nuorodų lenta, interneto ar kitokia prie interneto prijungta įranga, asmeniniu elektroniniu pagalbininku (PDA), medicinos įranga, bankomatu, telematikos įranga, žaidimų automatu, namų automatine sistema, kiosku, nuotolinio valdymo pultu ar kitu elektroniniu plataus vartojimo prietaisu, (b) su per operatorių veikiančia mobilia, kabeline, palydovine ar televizijos sistema, arba (c) su kita uždarų sistemų įranga. Informacijos apie licencijas naudoti „Adobe Runtimes“ su šiomis sistemomis rasite http://www.adobe.com/go/licensing_lt. 3.2 „Adobe Reader“ taikomi apribojimai. Apžiūrėti, platinti ir bendrai naudoti PDF failus „Adobe Reader“ licencijas suteikia ir platina „Adobe“. 3.2.1 Įsipareigojimai ir apribojimai. Neturite teisės integruoti „Adobe Reader“ į kitokią programinę įrangą, naudoti su kita programine įranga, priedėliais (plug-in) arba išplėtimo įranga, kuri naudoja ar remiasi „Adobe Reader“, konvertuodama ar transformuodama PDF failus į kitą formatą (pvz., PDF failą į TIFF, JPEG arba SVG failą). 3.2.2 Priedėlių apribojimai. Neturite teisės integruoti ar naudoti „Adobe Reader“ su bet kuriais programinės įrangos priedėliais, sukurtais ne pagal „Adobe“ licencijos sutartį (Adobe Integration Key License Agreement). 3.2.3 Išjungtos funkcijos. „Adobe Reader“ gali turėti ypatybes ar funkcines galimybes, kurios yra paslėptos ar gali atrodyti išjungtos arba neveikiančios („Išjungtos funkcijos”). Išjungtos funkcijos aktyvuosis tik atidarius PDF dokumentą, sukurtą naudojantis aktyvavimo atitinkama technologija, kurią galima gauti tik iš „Adobe“. Jūs neturite teisės ieškoti ar bandyti rasti neaktyvuotų funkcijų, išskyrus naudojantis šiomis aktyvavimo technologijomis, ar pasikliauti „Adobe Reader“, tikintis, kad ji sukurs iš esmės į neaktyvuotą funkciją panašią funkciją arba kitaip apeiti

leidimus, valdančius šių funkcijų aktyvavimą. Daugiau informacijos apie neaktyvuotas funkcijas skaitykite http://www.adobe.com/go/readerextensions_lt. 3.3 Pastabos. Visos leistinos padarytos Programinės įrangos kopijos turi būti su tuo pačiu autoriaus teisės ženklu ir kitais nuosavybę patvirtinančiais įrašais Programinėje įrangoje. 3.4 Draudimas modifikuoti ar atlikti reversinę inžineriją. Programinę įrangą draudžiama modifikuoti, adaptuoti, versti, taip pat draudžiama jos pagrindu kurti išvestines programas. Neturite teisės atlikti Programinės įrangos reversinės inžinerijos, jos dekompiliuoti, išskaidyti arba bandyti kitais būdais atskleisti jos išeities kodo, išskyrus tiek, kiek pagal galiojančius įstatymus aiškiai leidžiama ją iškompiliuoti suderinamumo tikslais. 4. Perleidimas. Programinę įrangą draudžiama nuomoti, parduoti, suteikti jai sublicenciją, suteikti ar perduoti savo teises į ją arba leisti kitam asmeniui nusikopijuoti visą Programinę įrangą arba kurią nors jos dalį į kitą Kompiuterį, išskyrus tai, kas aiškiai leidžiama pagal šią Sutartį. Tačiau jūs turite teisę perduoti visas savo teises nuolat naudotis Programine įranga kitam fiziniam ar juridiniam asmeniui su sąlyga, kad: (a) jūs taip pat perduosite (i) šią sutartį ir (ii) Programinę įrangą kartu su kita susieta programine ar kompiuterine įranga, kuri įeina į Programinės įrangos paketą arba yra iš anksto instaliuota, įskaitant visas kopijas, patobulinimus ir ankstesnes versijas; (b) nepasiliksite sau jokių kopijų, ar Kompiuteryje saugomų atsarginių variantų ar kopijų; ir (c) gaunančioji šalis sutiks su šios sutarties sąlygomis bei kitomis sąlygomis ir terminais, pagal kuriuos jūs gavote galiojančią licenciją į Programinę įrangą. Nepaisant to, kas išvardyta, jūs neturite teisės perleisti mokyti skirtos, išankstinės (pre-release) arba neskirtos parduoti Programinės įrangos. 5. Intelektinės nuosavybės teisės, teisių išlaikymas. Programinė įranga ir visos teisėtai daromos jos kopijos yra „Adobe Systems Incorporated“ ir jos tiekėjų intelektinė nuosavybė. Programinės įrangos sudėtis, sandara ir kodas sudaro „Adobe Systems Incorporated“ vertingas komercines paslaptis ir jos tiekėjų konfidencialią informaciją. Programinę įrangą saugo įstatymai, įskaitant, be apribojimų, Jungtinių Amerikos Valstijų ir kitų šalių įstatymus dėl autorių teisių apsaugos, bei tarptautinių sutarčių nuostatos. Išskyrus tai, kas aiškiai nustatyta Sutartyje, šia Sutartimi nėra suteikiamos jokios intelektinės nuosavybės teisės į Programinę įrangą, o visos teisės, kurių suteikimas nėra aiškiai nurodytas, priklauso „Adobe“ ir jos tiekėjams. 6. Prisijungimas ir privatumas. 6.1 PDF failų naudojimas. Kai naudojate programinę įrangą PDF failui, kurio registracijos „Adobe PDF paslaugos reklama“ metu leidote rodyti reklamą, atidaryti, jūsų kompiuteris gali prisijungti prie „Adobe“, reklamuotojo ar trečiojo asmens valdomo tinklapio. Tada išsiunčiamas jūsų tarptinklinio protokolo (IP) adresas. Tinklapį talpinanti šalis gali šia technologija pasinaudoti reklamai ar kitokiai atidarytame faile ar greta jo esančiai elektroninei medžiagai siųsti (arba siųsti). Tinklapio operatorius taip pat gali naudoti „JavaScript“, tinklapio indikatorius (taip pat žinomus kaip operacijų žymes ar vieno pikselio gif failus) ir kitas technologijas padidinti ir išmatuoti reklamos efektyvumą bei reklamos turinį pritaikyti asmeniniams poreikiams. Bendrauti su „Adobe“ tinklapiais taikomos „Adobe“ privatumo elektroninėje erdvėje taisyklės, su kuriomis galima susipažinti internete adresu http://www.adobe.com/go/privacy_lt. „Adobe“ neturi teisės naudotis ar valdyti trečiųjų asmenų naudojamų funkcijų, o trečiųjų asmenų tinklapiuose taikomai informacijos naudojimo tvarkai „Adobe“ privatumo elektroninėje erdvėje taisyklės netaikomos. 6.2 Tobulinimas. Jūs pripažįstate ir įsipareigojate netrukdyti savo kompiuteriui dėl programinės įrangos automatiškai prisijungti prie interneto ir ieškoti galimų atnaujinimų automatiškai parsisiųsti ir įkrauti į jūs kompiuterio atmintį bei pranešti „Adobe“, kad programinė įranga instaliuota sėkmingai. Tokiu atveju „Adobe“ perduodama tik asmens tapatybės nustatyti neleidžianti informacija. Bendrautii su „Adobe“ tinklapiais taikomos „Adobe“ privatumo elektroninėje erdvėje taisyklės, su kuriomis galima susipažinti internete adresu http://www.adobe.com/go/privacy_lt. Daugiau informacijos apie numatytų atnaujinimo pasirinkčių keitimą ieškokite Dokumentuose.

6.3 Pasirinkčių valdymas (Settings Manager). Dėl „Flash Player“ tam tikros vartotojų parinktys jūsų Kompiuteryje gali kauptis kaip lokalus bendrai naudojamas objektas. Šios nuostatos nėra susijusios su jumis, bet leidžia jums konfigūruoti „Flash Player“ parinktis. Daugiau informacijos apie lokalius bendrai naudojamus objektus savo kompiuteryje galite rasti internete adresu http://www.adobe.com/go/flashplayer_security_lt, ir daugiau informacijos apie pasirinkčių valdymą - adresu http://www.adobe.com/go/settingsmanager_lt. 7. Trečiųjų šalių pasiūlymai. Programinė įranga gali suteikti jums prieigą ir galimybę bendrai naudotis trečiųjų asmenų tinklapiais, programinės įrangos programomis ir duomenų paslaugomis, įskaitant plačių galimybių interneto tinklapiais (Trečiųjų asmenų pasiūlymai). Jūsų prieiga ir naudojimasis Trečiųjų asmenų pasiūlymais, įskaitant prekes, paslaugas ar informaciją, yra reglamentuojama šiems pasiūlymams nurodytomis sąlygomis. Trečiųjų asmenų pasiūlymai „Adobe“ nepriklauso ir „Adobe“ jų neteikia. 8. Skaitmeniniai sertifikatai. 8.1 Naudojimas. „Adobe AIR“ naudoja skaitmeninius sertifikatus tam, kad padėtų jums nustatyti trečiųjų šalių sukurtų programų „Adobe AIR“ leidėjo tapatybę. „Adobe Reader“ atveju naudojami skaitmeniniai sertifikatai PDF dokumentams pasirašyti ir parašui tvirtinti bei patvirtintus PDF dokumentus tvirtinti. Jūsų kompiuteris gali prisijungti prie interneto skaitmeninio sertifikavimo tvirtinimo metu. Skaitmeninį pažymėjimą išduoda trečiojo asmens sertifikavimo agentūra, įskaitant „Adobe“ sertifikuotų dokumentų paslaugų (CDS) pardavėjų sąrašą, apie kurį galite sužinoti internete adresu http://www.adobe.com/go/partners_cds_lt (“Certificate Authorities”) arba galite sudaryti savarankiškai. 8.2 Sąlygos. Jūs ir sertifikavimo agentūra atsakote už skaitmeninio sertifikato pirkimą, naudojimą ir pasikliovimą juo. Prieš pasinaudodami kuriuo nors sertifikuotu dokumentu, skaitmeninėmis paslaugomis ar sertifikavimo agentūros paslaugomis, turėtumėte susipažinti su taikytinomis sąlygomis, kuriomis atitinkama sertifikavimo agentūra teikia paslaugas, tai pat abonento sutartimi, sutartimis su laiduojančia šalimi (relying party agreements), sertifikatų taisyklėmis (certificate policies) ir praktikos sąlygomis (practice statements). Nuorodų dėl informacijos apie „Adobe“ CDS pardavėjus ieškokite adresu http://www.adobe.com/go/partners_cds_lt. 8.3 Pripažinimas. Jūs sutinkate, kad (a) skaitmeninis sertifikatas prieš tvirtinant galėjo būti panaikintas, o skaitmeninis parašas ar sertifikatas atrodys galiojantis, nors iš tiesų bus negaliojantis; (b) skaitmeninio sertifikato apsauga ar tikrumas gali būti pažeisti dokumentą pasirašančio asmens, atitinkamos sertifikavimo agentūros ar kurio nors trečiojo asmens veiksmais ar neveikimu, ir (c) sertifikatą galite sudaryti savarankiškai, kai jis nėra išduotas sertifikavimo agentūros. JŪS IŠIMTINAI ATSAKOTE UŽ SPRENDIMĄ PASIKLIAUTI SERTIFIKATU. IŠSKYRUS ATVEJUS, KAI SERTIFIKAVIMO AGENTŪRA JUMS SUTEIKIA ATSKIRĄ RAŠYTINĘ GARANTIJĄ, SKAITMENINIO SERTIFIKATO NAUDOJIMO RIZIKA TENKA TIK JUMS. 8.4 Trečioji šalis - naudos gavėja. Jūs sutinkate, kad sertifikavimo agentūra, kuria pasikliaujate, yra šios sutarties trečioji šalis - naudos gavėja, turinti teisę reikalauti vykdyti šią sutartį savo vardu tokiu pat būdu kaip ir „Adobe“. 8.5 Žalos atlyginimas. Jūs sutinkate, kad „Adobe“ ir visos sertifikavimo agentūros (išskyrus kaip aiškiai numatyta sertifikavimo agentūros sąlygose) neprisiima jokios atsakomybės dėl jokių prievolių, nuostolių, veiksmų, žalos ar reikalavimų (įskaitant visas protingas išlaidas, sąnaudas ir teisininkų honorarus), kurie atsiranda ar susiję su šios agentūros paslaugų naudojimu ar pasitikėjimu jomis, įskaitant, be apribojimų (a) naudojimąsi baigusiu galioti arba panaikintu sertifikatu; (b) neteisingą sertifikato patvirtinimą; (c) sertifikato naudojimą kitokiu būdu, negu leidžiama pagal sąlygų, šios Sutarties ir galiojančių įstatymų nuostatas; (d) nesugebėjimą pagal aplinkybes priimti protingą sprendimą Paslaugų teikėjo paslaugų ar sertifikatų atžvilgiu; arba (e) kurių nors, taikytinose su paslaugomis susijusiose sąlygose nustatytų, įsipareigojimų nevykdymo. 9. Be garantijos. Programinė įranga jums pristatoma TOKIA, KOKIA FAKTIŠKAI yra, su VISAIS JOS TRŪKUMAIS. „ADOBE“, JOS TIEKĖJAI IR SERTIFIKAVIMO AGENTŪROS NEGARANTUOJA IR NEGALI GARANTUOTI UŽ VEIKIMĄ AR REZULTATUS, KURIUOS GALITE GAUTI NAUDODAMI PROGRAMINĘ ĮRANGĄ,

SERTIFIKAVIMO AGENTŪROS PASLAUGAS AR KITŲ TREČIŲJŲ ŠALIŲ PASIŪLYMUS. „ADOBE“, JOS TIEKĖJAI IR SERTIFIKAVIMO AGENTŪROS NETEIKIA JOKIŲ GARANTIJŲ, SĄLYGŲ, PAREIŠKIMŲ IR NENUSTATO TERMINŲ (NESVARBU, AR TIESIOGINIŲ AR NUMANOMŲ, AR PAGAL ĮSTATYMUS, TEISĖS PRINCIPUS, TRADICIJAS, VARTOSENĄ AR KITKĄ), DĖL KOKIŲ BEBŪTŲ DALYKŲ, ĮSKAITANT, BE APRIBOJIMŲ, DRAUDIMĄ PAŽEISTI TREČIŲJŲ ASMENŲ TEISES, PERKAMUMĄ, NUOSEKLUMĄ, PATENKINAMĄ KOKYBĘ AR TINKAMUMĄ KURIAM NORS KONKREČIAM TIKSLUI. 9 ir 10 dalių nuostatos galioja ir po to, kai ši sutartis pasibaigs, nesvarbu, ar ji bus nutraukta, ar kitu būdu neteks galios, tačiau tai nereiškia, kad po sutarties nutraukimo toliau galios arba atsiras teisė naudotis Programine įranga. 10. Atsakomybės apribojimas. „ADOBE“, JOS TIEKĖJAI AR SERTIFIKAVIMO AGENTŪROS NEBUS ATSAKINGI JUMS UŽ JOKIUS REIKALAVIMUS ATLYGINTI ŽALĄ, PRETENZIJAS AR IŠLAIDAS, ĮSKAITANT ŠALUTINĘ, NETIESIOGINĘ AR ATSITIKTINĘ ŽALĄ, NEGAUTĄ PELNĄ, PAJAMAS AR PRARASTAS SANTAUPAS, NET JEIGU „ADOBE“ ATSTOVAS BUVO ĮSPĖTAS APIE TOKIĄ NUOSTOLIŲ, ŽALOS AR REIKALAVIMŲ GALIMYBĘ. MINĖTI APRIBOJIMAI IR IŠIMTYS YRA TAIKOMI JŪSŲ JURISDIKCIJOS GALIOJANČIŲ ĮSTATYMŲ LEISTINA APIMTIMI. VISA „ADOBE“, JOS TIEKĖJŲ IR SERTIFIKAVIMO INSTITUCIJŲ ATSAKOMYBĖ PAGAL ŠIĄ SUTARTĮ AR RYŠIUM SU JA YRA NE DIDESNĖ UŽ SUMĄ, SUMOKĖTĄ UŽ PROGRAMINĘ ĮRANGĄ (JEIGU BUVO SUMOKĖTA). Niekas šioje Sutartyje neriboja „Adobe“ atsakomybės jums dėl asmens mirties ar sužalojimo, įvykusio dėl „Adobe“ nerūpestingumo ar apgaulės. „Adobe“ atstovauja savo tiekėjams ir sertifikavimo agentūroms tik atsakomybės, į kurią neįeina ir / arba ribota apimtimi įeina įsipareigojimai, garantijos ir atsakomybė, apribojimo atvejais, numatytais šioje sutartyje, bet jokiu būdu ne kitais tikslais. Daugiau konkrečiai jurisdikcijai taikytinos informacijos rasite sutarties pabaigoje (jeigu ji ten pateikiama), arba kreipkitės į „Adobe“ Pagalbos klientams skyrių. 11. Eksporto taisyklės. Jūs įsipareigojate neišsiųsti, neperleisti ir neišvežti į jokią kitą šalį Programinės įrangos ir nenaudoti jos tokiu būdu, kuris draudžiamas pagal Jungtinių Valstijų eksporto administravimo įstatymą (United States Export Administration Act) ar kitus eksportui taikomus įstatymus, apribojimus ir taisykles (Eksporto įstatymai). Be to, jeigu pagal Eksporto įstatymus Programinė įranga laikoma preke, kurios eksportui taikoma kontrolė, jūs pareiškiate ir garantuojate, kad nesate iš valstybės, kuriai taikomas embargas ar kitokie apribojimai (įskaitant, be apribojimų, Iraną, Siriją, Sudaną, Kubą ir Šiaurės Korėją) ir kad pagal Eksporto įstatymus jums nėra kitaip draudžiama gauti Programinės įrangos. Visos Programinės įrangos naudojimo teisės yra suteikiamos su sąlyga, kad jos bus atimtos, jeigu nesilaikysite šios Sutarties sąlygų. 12. Taikoma teisė. Ši sutartis reglamentuojama ir aiškinama pagal materialinės teisės įstatymus, galiojančius: (a) Kalifornijos valstijoje, jeigu Programinės įrangos licenciją pirkote būdami Jungtinėse Amerikos Valstijose, Kanadoje ar Meksikoje, arba (b) Japonijoje, jeigu Programinės įrangos licenciją pirkote būdami Japonijoje, Kinijoje, Korėjoje arba kitoje Pietryčių Azijos šalyje, kur visų oficialių kalbų rašmenys yra arba ideografiniai (pvz., hanzi, kandži, arba handža), arba / ir panašūs pagal savo sandarą, pvz., hangul arba kana; arba (c) Anglijoje, jeigu Programinės įrangos licenciją įsigijote būdami kurioje nors, pirmiau nepaminėtoje jurisdikcijoje. Atitinkami Kalifornijos valstijos Santa Klara apygardos teismai, kai taikoma Kalifornijos teisė, Tokijo apygardos teismas Japonijoje, kai taikoma Japonijos teisė, ir kompetentingi Londono (Anglija) teismai kai taikoma Anglijos teisė, turi neišimtinę jurisdikciją nagrinėti visus su šia sutartimi susijusius ginčus. Šiai Sutarčiai netaikomos jokios kitos tarptautinės privatinės teisės taisyklės dėl jurisdikcijos ir Jungtinių Tautų konvencija dėl tarptautinio prekių pirkimo-pardavimo sutarčių, kurią taikyti aiškiai atsisakoma. 13. Bendrosios nuostatos. Jeigu kuri nors šios sutarties dalis pasirodytų esanti negaliojanti arba neįgyvendinama, tai neturės įtakos likusiai sutarties daliai, kuri liks galiojanti ir įgyvendinama pagal jos sąlygas. Ši sutartis neapribos nė vienos Sutarties šalies,

kuri veikia kaip vartotoja, įstatymų nustatytų teisių. Ši sutartis gali būti keičiama tik rašytiniu dokumentu, kurį pasirašo įgaliotas „Adobe“ pareigūnas. „Adobe“ gali suteikti jums licenciją į atnaujinimus pagal papildomas arba skirtingas sąlygas. Ši Sutartis sudaro visą „Adobe“ ir jūsų susitarimą dėl Programinės įrangos ir pakeičia visus ankstesnius, su Programine įranga susijusius, pareiškimus, aptarimus, supratimus, bendravimus ar reklamą. 14. Pastaba JAV vyriausybiniams galutiniams vartotojams. JAV vyriausybinių galutinių vartotojų atžvilgiu „Adobe“ įsipareigoja laikytis visų taikytinų lygių galimybių įstatymų, įskaitant, jeigu reikia, Vykdomojo įsako (Executive Order) 11246, su visais jo pakeitimais, 1974 m. Įstatymo dėl pagalbos Vietnamo karo veteranams (Vietnam Era Veterans Readjustment Assistance Act) 402 dalies (38 USC 4212), ir 1973 Reabilitacijos įstatymo (Rehabilitation Act) 503 dalies, su visais pakeitimais, nuostatų bei 41 CFR nuo 60-1 iki 60-60 dalies, 60-250, ir 60-741 dalių taisyklių. Šioje Sutartyje bus pateikiamos nuorodos į lygių galimybių priimant į darbą straipsnį (affirmative action clause) ir į reikalavimus, minėtus prieš šį sakinį esančiame sakinyje. 15. Laikymasis licencijų sąlygų. Jeigu esate verslo įmonė, bendrovė ar organizacija, jūs įsipareigojate, „Adobe“ arba jos įgaliotam atstovui pareikalavus, per trisdešimt (30) dienų parengti ir patvirtinti visus dokumentus apie tai, kad pareikalavimo metu bet kuri ir visa „Adobe“ Programinė įranga buvo naudojama pagal „Adobe“ jums išduotą galiojančią licenciją. 16. Specifinės sąlygos ir išimtys. 16.1 Ribotos apimties garantija Vokietijos ir Austrijos vartotojams. 16.1.1 Jeigu Programinę įrangą įsigijote Vokietijoje arba Austrijoje, kur paprastai gyvenate, tuomet 10 dalis jums netaikoma; vietoje to, remiantis 16 dalies 1.2 punkto nuostatomis, įstatymų nustatyta „Adobe“ atsakomybė už žalą ribojama: (i) „Adobe“ atsakomybė už žalą gali būti ne didesnė už žalos dydį, kuris sudarant licenciją paprastai numatomas kaip žala, padaryta dėl esminio sutartinio įsipareigojimo nevykdymo, kurio priežastis nedidelis nerūpestingumas, ir (ii) „Adobe“ nebus atsakinga už žalą, padarytą dėl neesminio sutartinio įsipareigojimo nevykdymo, kurio priežastis nedidelis nerūpestingumas. 16.1.2 Minėtas atsakomybės apribojimas netaikomas įstatymų nustatytai privalomai atsakomybei, ypač tai, kuri nustatyta Vokietijos civilinės atsakomybės dėl produkto padarytos žalos įstatyme (German Product Liability Act), atsakomybei už specifinės garantijos suteikimą, arba atsakomybei už asmens sužalojimą nusikalstamais veiksmais. 16.1.3 Jūs privalote imtis visų protingų priemonių, kad išvengtumėte arba sumažintumėte žalą, ypač, kaip numatyta šioje Sutartyje, pasidaryti Programinės įrangos ir savo kompiuteriuose saugomų duomenų atsargines kopijas.

Jeigu turite klausimų dėl šios sutarties arba norite paprašyti informacijos iš „Adobe“, prašom naudotis adresu ir kontaktine informacija, kuri pridėta prie šio produkto, arba susisiekti su jus aptarnaujančiu „Adobe“ skyriumi internetu: www.adobe.com/lt. „Adobe”, „AIR“, „Authorware“, „Flash“, „Reader“, ir „Shockwave“ yra registruoti prekės ženklai, arba Jungtinėse Amerikos Valstijose ir / arba kitose valstybėse esančios įmonės „Adobe Systems Incorporated“ prekių ženklai.

Reader_Player_AIR_WWEULA-lt_LT-20080204_1313

 

ADOBE SYSTEMS INCORPORATED Ansvarsfraskrivelse for garanti og programvarelisens. DETTE DOKUMENTET OMFATTER GARANTIINFORMASJON (DEL I) OG EN LISENSAVTALE SOM GJELDER FOR BRUKEN AV ADOBES PROGRAMVARE (DEL II). DEL I. ANSVARSFRASKRIVELSE FOR GARANTI. PROGRAMVAREN OG ANNEN INFORMASJON ER LEVERT TIL DEG ”UTEN FORBEDRINGER ELLER ENDRINGER” OG MED ALLE MANGLER. ADOBE OG DETS LEVERANDØRER OG SERTIFIKATAUTORITETER VIL IKKE OG KAN IKKE GARANTERE PRESTASJONEN ELLER RESULTATER DU KAN OPPNÅ VED BRUK AV PROGRAMVAREN, TJENESTER FRA SERTIFIKATAUTORITETER ELLER ANDRE TREDJEPARTSTILBUD. UNNTATT TIL DEN UTSTREKNING EN GARANTI, TILSTAND, REPRESENTASJON ELLER TERM IKKE KAN ELLER IKKE VIL BLI UTELUKKET ELLER BEGRENSET AV LOVEN GJELDENDE TIL DEG I DIN JURISDIKSJON, FORETAR ADOBE OG DETS LEVERANDØRER OG SERTIFIKATAUTORITETER INGEN GARANTIER, TILSTANDER, REPRESENTASJONER ELLER TERMER (UTTRYKTE ELLER PÅSTÅTTE HVORVIDT VED VEDTEKT, VANLIG LOV, BRUK ELLER PÅ ANDRE MÅTER) NÅR DET GJELDER NOEN ANLIGGENDER INKLUDERT UTEN BEGRENSNING UKRENKELIGHET AV TREDJEPARTSRETTIGHETER, SALGBARHET, INTEGRERING, TILFREDSSTILLENDE KVALITET, ELLER SKIKKETHET FOR EN SPESIELL HENSIKT. DEL II. AVTALE OM PROGRAMVARELISENS. VED Å BRUKE, KOPIERE ELLER DISTRIBUERE ALT ELLER DELER AV PROGRAMVAREN FRA ADOBE, AKSEPTERER DU ALLE VILKÅR OG BETINGELSER I DENNE AVTALEN, SPESIELT INKLUDERT BESTEMMELSENE OM: BRUK, SOM FINNES I AVSNITT 2, OVERFØRBARHET I AVSNITT 4, TILKOBLINGSMULIGHETER OG PERSONVERN I AVSNITT 6, GARANTI I AVSNITT 9 OG ERSTATNINGSANSVAR I AVSNITTENE 10 OG 16. NÅR DU HAR AKSEPTERT AVTALEN, ER DEN TVANGSKRAFTIG OVERFOR DEG OG ENHVER JURIDISK PERSON SOM MOTTAR PROGRAMVAREN OG PÅ HVIS VEGNE DEN BRUKES. HVIS DU IKKE SIER DEG ENIG I ELLER ER INNFORSTÅTT MED DETTE, MÅ DU IKKE TA I BRUK ELLER BRUKE DENNE PROGRAMVAREN. ADOBE GIR DEG BARE TILLATELSE TIL Å BRUKE PROGRAMVAREN I SAMSVAR MED VILKÅRENE I DENNE AVTALEN. BRUK AV MATERIALE FRA TREDJEPART SOM INNGÅR I PROGRAMVAREN, KAN VÆRE UNDERLAGT ANDRE VILKÅR OG BETINGELSER SOM VANLIGVIS FINNES I EN SEPARAT LISENSAVTALE, I EN «READ ME» (LES MEG)-FIL I NÆRHETEN AV SLIKT MATERIALE ELLER I «TREDJEPARTS PROGRAMVAREUNDERRETTELSER OG/ELLER TILLEGGSBETINGELSER OG VILKÅR» LOKALISERT PÅ http://www.adobe.com/go/thirdparty_no. 1. Definisjoner. «Adobe» betyr Adobe Systems Incorporated, et Delaware-selskap, 345 Park Avenue, San Jose, California 95110, i de tilfeller hvor underdel 12(a) i denne avtalen gjelder. Ellers betyr det Adobe Systems Software Ireland Limited, Unit 3100, Lake Drive, City West Campus, Saggart D24, Republic of Ireland, et selskap som er organisert i henhold til irsk lovgivning og er et affiliert selskap og lisensholder for Adobe Systems Incorporated. «Datamaskin» betyr datamaskinutstyr som kan bruke informasjon i digital form eller lignende og endrer den til et spesifikt resultat basert på en instruksjonssekvens. «Programvare» betyr (a) alt innholdet i filene (gjort tilgjengelig enten ved elektronisk nedlastning, på et fysisk medium eller ved en hvilken som helst annen form for distribusjon), disketten(e), CDROM-en(e) eller annet medium denne avtalen ble levert på, inkludert, men ikke begrenset til (i) datainformasjon eller programvare fra Adobe eller fra tredjepart, herunder Adobe Reader® («Adobe Reader»), Adobe® AIR™ («Adobe AIR»), Adobe Flash® Player, Shockwave® Player og Authorware® Player (Flash, Shockwave og Authorware-spillerne omtales samlet som «Adobe Runtime»); (ii) relatert, forklarende skriftlig materiale eller filer

(«Dokumentasjon») og (iii) skrifter eller fonter og (b) oppgraderinger, endrede versjoner, tillegg og oppdateringer for det som er nevnt ovenfor, som er stilt til rådighet av Adobe (samlet kalt «Oppdateringer»). «Bruk» betyr å få tilgang til, installere, laste ned, kopiere eller på annen måte dra nytte av Programvarens funksjonalitet. 2. Programvarelisens. Hvis du mottok Programvaren fra Adobe eller en av deres autoriserte lisenstakere, og under forutsetning av at du opptrer i samsvar med vilkårene i denne avtalen, herunder begrensningene i avsnitt 3, gir Adobe deg en ikkeeksklusiv lisens til å bruke Programvaren til formål som beskrevet i Dokumentasjonen nedenfor: 2.1 Generell bruk. Du kan installere og bruke én kopi av Programvaren på en kompatibel datamaskin. Se avsnitt 3 for viktige begrensninger i bruken av Programvaren. 2.2 Server-bruk. Denne avtalen gir deg ikke tillatelse til å installere eller å bruke Programvaren på en datamaskin som fungerer som filserver. Hvis du vil ha opplysninger om bruk av programvaren på en filserver, finner du opplysninger om Adobe Reader på http://www.adobe.com/go/acrobat_distribute_no, eller på http://www.adobe.com/go/licensing_no om Adobe Runtime. 2.3 Distribusjon. Denne lisensen gir deg ikke rett til å viderelisensiere eller distribuere Programvaren. Hvis du vil ha opplysninger om hvordan du kan få rett til å distribuere Programvaren på fysiske medier eller via et internt nettverk, eller sammen med produktet eller tjenestene dine, kan du finne opplysninger om Adobe Reader på http://www.adobe.com/go/acrobat_distribute_no, eller på http://www.adobe.com/go/licensing_no om Adobe Runtime. 2.4 Sikkerhetskopi. Du kan ta én sikkerhetskopi av Programvaren, så sant sikkerhetskopien ikke er installert eller i bruk på noen annen datamaskin. Du kan ikke overføre rettighetene til en sikkerhetskopi, med mindre du overfører alle rettighetene i Programvaren som angitt i avsnitt 4. 3. Forpliktelser og begrensninger. 3.1 Begrensninger for Adobe Runtime. Du kan ikke bruke en Adobe Runtime på en ikke-PC-innretning eller med en skjult eller innlagt versjon («embedded or device version») av noe som helst operativsystem. For å unngå tvil, og kun som eksempler, kan du ikke bruke en Web-spiller på en (a) mobil innretning, set top boxes (STB), håndholdte enheter, telefoner, «web pads», «tablet» og «Tablet-PC-er» som ikke benytter Windows XP Tablet PC Edition, spillkonsoller, TV-er, DVD-spillere, mediesentre (unntatt Windows XP Media Center Edition og dets etterfølgere), elektroniske oppslagstavler eller digital tegnangiver («digital signage»), Internett-hjelpemiddel («Internet appliances») eller andre innretninger tilknyttet Internett, PDA-er, medisinske innretninger, minibanker, telematiske («telematic») innretninger, spillmaskiner, hjemmeautomasjonssystemer, kiosker, fjernstyringsenheter eller andre elektroniske artikler rettet mot forbruker, (b) operatørbaserte mobil-, kabel-, satellitt- eller tv-systemer eller (c) andre innretninger for lukkede systemer. Hvis du vil ha opplysninger om lisensiering av Adobe Runtime for bruk i slike systemer, kan du se på http://www.adobe.com/go/licensing_no. 3.2 Begrensninger for Adobe Reader. Adobe Reader er lisensiert og distribuert av Adobe for visning, distribusjon og deling av PDF-filer. 3.2.1 Konverteringsbegrensninger. Du er ikke autorisert til å integrere eller bruke Adobe Reader med noen annen programvare, plug-in eller forbedring som bruker eller er avhengig av Adobe Reader ved konvertering eller endring av PDF-filer til et annet filformat (f.eks. en PDF-fil til TIFF-, JPEG- eller SVG-fil.) 3.2.2 Begrensning på plug-in. Du er ikke autorisert til å integrere eller bruke Adobe Reader sammen med noen slags plug-in-programvare som ikke er utviklet i samsvar med Adobe Integration Key Licencce Agreement. 3.2.3 Deaktiverte funksjoner. Adobe Reader kan inneholde funksjoner eller funksjonalitet som er skjult eller vises som deaktivert eller «grået ut» (de «deaktiverte funksjonene»). Disse deaktiverte funksjonene kan bare aktiveres ved åpning av et PDF-dokument som er blitt opprettet ved bruk av aktiveringsteknologi som bare er tilgjengelig fra Adobe. Du skal ikke ha tilgang til, eller prøve å få tilgang til noen som helst deaktiverte funksjoner annet enn ved bruk av slike aktiveringsteknologier, og du skal heller ikke stole på at Adobe Reader vil opprette en funksjon som i

hovedtrekk er tilsvarende hvilken som helst deaktivert funksjon, eller på annen måte omgå teknologien som styrer aktivering av slike funksjoner. Hvis du vil ha flere opplysninger om deaktiverte funksjoner, kan du se på http://www.adobe.com/go/readerextensions_no. 3.3 Erklæringer. Alle kopier du lager av Programvaren må inneholde de samme erklæringene om opphavsrett og eierskap som finnes i den opprinnelige Programvaren. 3.4 Ingen endring eller «Reverse Engineering». Du kan ikke modifisere, tilpasse, oversette eller lage avledede produkter basert på Programvaren. Du har ikke tillatelse til å ta fra hverandre («reverse engineer»), dekompilere, demontere eller på annen måte prøve å finne kildekoden til Programvaren, unntatt i den utstrekning du måtte ha uttrykt tillatelse til å ta fra hverandre eller demontere koden under gjeldende lov. 4. Overføring. Du kan ikke leie, lease, viderelisensiere, tildele eller overføre rettighetene dine til Programvaren, eller autorisere hele eller deler av Programvaren for kopiering til andre brukeres datamaskiner, med unntak av det som det er gitt uttrykkelig tillatelse til i denne Avtalen. Du kan imidlertid overføre alle rettighetene dine til å bruke Programvaren til en annen person eller juridisk enhet, under forutsetning av at: (a) du også overfører (i) denne Avtalen, og (ii) Programvaren og all annen programvare eller maskinvare som følger med, er «bundled» med, eller er forhåndsinstallert med Programvaren, herunder alle kopier, oppdateringer og tidligere versjoner, til slik person eller enhet, (b) du ikke beholder noen kopier, heller ikke sikkerhetskopier eller kopier lagret på en datamaskin, og (c) mottakeren godtar vilkårene og betingelsene i denne avtalen og alle andre vilkår og betingelser som gjaldt da du kjøpte en lisens til Programvaren. Uten hensyn til det foregående, kan du ikke overføre utdanningskopier, forhåndsversjoner, eller kopier av Programvaren som ikke er ment for videresalg. 5. Eierskap til åndsverk, forbeholdelse av rettigheter. Programvaren og autoriserte kopier du lager, er en åndsverksrettighet som tilhører og er eid av Adobe Systems Incorporated og deres leverandører. Strukturen, organiseringen og koden til Programvaren er verdifulle forretningshemmeligheter og konfidensiell informasjon som tilhører Adobe Systems Incorporated og deres leverandører. Programvaren er beskyttet ved lov, inkludert uten begrensninger opphavsretts- og copyrightlovgivningen i USA og andre land, og ved internasjonale traktater. Med unntak av det som uttrykkelig er angitt ovenfor, gir ikke denne avtalen deg noen åndsverksrettigheter eller opphavsrett til Programvaren. Alle rettigheter som ikke uttrykkelig er overført til deg, er forbeholdt Adobe og deres leverandører. 6. Tilkoblingsmuligheter og personvern. 6.1 Bruk av PDF filer. Når du bruker programvaren for å åpne en PDF fil som har blitt aktivert for å vise annonser gjennom registrering med Ads for Adobe PDF service, kan din datamaskin koples til en webside drevet av Adobe, en annonsør, eller annen tredjepart. Din Internett protokoll (IP) adresse er sendt når dette skjer. Parten som er vert for siden kan bruke teknologi for å sende (eller "tjene") annonserings eller annet elektronisk innhold som vises i eller nære den åpnede filen. Websideoperatøren kan også bruke JavaScript, webmerker (også kjent som virkeetiketter eller enkel-piksel gif) og andre teknologier for å øke og måle effektiviteten av annonsene og for å personifisere annonseinnholdet. Your communication with Adobe websites is governed by the Adobe Online Privacy Policy found at http://www.adobe.com/go/privacy_no. Adobe kan muligens ikke ha tilgang til eller kontroll over egenskaper som en tredjepart bruker, og informasjonspraksisene av tredjeparts websider er ikke dekket av Adobe Online personvernpolise. 6.2 Oppdatering. Du erkjenner og samtykker i at Programvaren kan gjøre at datamaskinen din automatisk kobles til Internett for å sjekke om det finnes oppdateringer tilgjengelig for automatisk nedlasting til datamaskinen din, og å la Adobe få rapport om hvorvidt Programvaren er vellykket installert. Når dette skjer, overføres det bare opplysninger til Adobe som ikke kan identifisere deg personlig. Kommunikasjonen din med Adobe er underlagt Adobes online personvernpolicy, som kan finnes på http://www.adobe.com/go/privacy_no. Vi ber deg se i dokumentasjonen for opplysningene om hvordan du kan endre standard oppdateringsinnstillinger.

6.3 Innstillings-manager. Flash Player kan gjøre at visse brukerinnstillinger blir lagret på datamaskinen din som et lokalt, delt objekt. Disse innstillingene knyttes eller assosieres ikke til eller med deg, men gjør at du kan konfigurere visse innstillinger i Flash Player. Du kan finne flere opplysninger om lokalt delte objekter på: http://www.adobe.com/go/flashplayer_security_no og mer informasjon om innstillings-manager på http://www.adobe.com/go/settingsmanager_no. 7. Tilbud fra tredjepart Programvaren kan gi deg tilgang og lov til å samhandle med tredjepartsnettsteder, programapplikasjoner og datatjenester, inkludert rike Internett-applikasjoner («tilbud fra tredjepart»). Tilgangen til, og bruken av ev. tredjepartstilbud, inkludert ev. varer, tjenester eller informasjon, er underlagt de vilkår og betingelser som gjelder for slike tilbud. Tredjepartstilbud eies eller ytes ikke av Adobe. 8. Digitale sertifikater. 8.1 Bruk. Adobe AIR bruker digitale sertifikater for å hjelpe deg å identifisere den som har publisert Adobe AIRapplikasjoner som er opprettet av tredjeparter. Adobe Reader bruker digitale sertifikater til å signere og validere signaturer i PDF-dokumenter, og til å validere sertifiserte PDF-dokumenter. Datamaskinen din kan kobles til Internett når et digitalt sertifikat skal valideres. Digitale sertifikater utstedes av tredjeparts sertifikatmyndigheter, inkludert Adobe Certified Document Services (CDS), leverandører som er oppført på http://www.adobe.com/go/partners_cds_no («sertifikatmyndigheter»), eller kan være egensignert. 8.2 Vilkår og betingelser. Ansvaret for kjøp, bruk og tillit til digitale sertifikater hviler på deg og sertifikatmyndigheten. Før du stoler på et sertifisert dokument, digital signatur eller tjenestene fra en sertifikatmyndighet, bør du gjennomgå de gjeldende vilkår og betingelser som den aktuelle sertifikatmyndigheten tilbyr tjenestene sine under, for eksempel ev. abonnentavtaler, partsavtaler de er avhengig av, sertifikatpolicyer og erklæringer om arbeidsmetoder. Se lenkene på http://www.adobe.com/go/partners_cds_no for opplysninger om Adobes CDS-leverandører. 8.3 Bekreftelse. Du sier deg enig i at (a) et digitalt sertifikat kan være tilbakekalt før eller når det verifiseres, noe som gjør at den digitale signaturen kan fremstå som gyldig når den faktisk ikke er det, (b) sikkerheten eller integriteten av et digitalt sertifikat kan være kompromittert på grunn av en handling eller utelatelse av den som signerer dokumentet, den gjeldende sertifikatmyndigheten eller hvilken som helst annen tredjepart, og (c) et sertifikat kan være et egensignert sertifikat som ikke er levert av en sertifikatmyndighet. DU ER SOM ENESTE PERSON ANSVARLIG FOR Å VURDERE OM DU VIL STOLE PÅ ET SERTIFIKAT. HVIS DET IKKE FORELIGGER EN SKRIFTLIG GARANTI TIL DEG FRA EN SERTIFIKATMYNDIGHET, BRUKER DU DIGITALE SERTIFIKATER FOR EGEN RISIKO. 8.4 Begunstigelse av tredjepart. Du sier deg enig i at en hvilken som helst sertifikatmyndighet du stoler på er en begunstiget tredjepart i denne avtalen, og skal ha rett til å håndheve avtalen i eget navn som om de var Adobe. 8.5 Skadesløshet. Du aksepterer å holde Adobe og eventuelle, aktuelle sertifikatmyndigheter (med unntak for det som er uttrykkelig angitt i deres vilkår og betingelser) fri for ethvert ansvar, tap, handlinger, skader eller krav (inkludert alle rimelige utgifter, kostnader og advokatsalærer) som oppstår pga eller er knyttet til eventuell bruk eller opptreden pga tillitt til en hvilken som helst tjeneste fra en sertifikatmyndighet, herunder, men ikke begrenset til (a) tillit til et utgått eller tilbaketrukket sertifikat; (b) ukorrekt verifisering av et sertifikat; (c) bruk av et sertifikat utover det som omfattes av gjeldende vilkår og betingelser, denne Avtalen eller gjeldende lov; (d) mangel på utøvelse av rimelig skjønn under omstendighetene ved tiltro til utstedertjenestene eller (e) unnlatelse av å oppfylle forpliktelsene som kreves i vilkår og betingelser for tjenestene. 9. Ingen garanti. Programvaren er levert til deg «UTEN FORBEDRINGER ELLER ENDRINGER» og med ALLE MANGLER. ADOBE OG DETS LEVERANDØRER OG SERTIFIKATAUTORITETER VIL IKKE OG KAN IKKE GARANTERE PRESTASJONEN ELLER RESULTATER DU KAN OPPNÅ VED BRUK AV PROGRAMVAREN, TJENESTER FRA SERTIFIKATAUTORITETER ELLER ANDRE

TREDJEPARTSTILBUD. UNNTATT TIL DEN UTSTREKNING EN GARANTI, TILSTAND, REPRESENTASJON ELLER TERM IKKE KAN ELLER IKKE VIL BLI UTELUKKET ELLER BEGRENSET AV LOVEN GJELDENDE TIL DEG I DIN JURISDIKSJON, FORETAR ADOBE OG DETS LEVERANDØRER OG SERTIFIKATAUTORITETER INGEN GARANTIER, TILSTANDER, REPRESENTASJONER ELLER TERMER (UTTRYKTE ELLER PÅSTÅTTE HVORVIDT VED VEDTEKT, VANLIG LOV, BRUK ELLER PÅ ANDRE MÅTER) NÅR DET GJELDER NOEN ANLIGGENDER INKLUDERT UTEN BEGRENSNING UKRENKELIGHET AV TREDJEPARTSRETTIGHETER, SALGBARHET, INTEGRERING, TILFREDSSTILLENDE KVALITET, ELLER SKIKKETHET FOR EN SPESIELL HENSIKT. Bestemmelsene av Avsnitt 9 og Avsnitt 10 skal overleve oppsigelsen av denne avtalen, hvorledes enn forårsaket, men dette skal ikke implisere eller skape noen fortsatt rettighet til å bruke programvaren etter oppsigelsen av denne avtalen. 10. Ansvarsbegrensning. IKKE I NOE TILFELLE ELLER UNDER NOEN OMSTENDIGHET SKAL ADOBE ELLER DERES TILKNYTTEDE LEVERANDØRER VÆRE ANSVARLIG OVERFOR DEG FOR EVENTUELLE TAP, KRAV ELLER KOSTNADER I NOEN SOM HELST FORM ELLER FOR EVENTUELLE FØLGETAP, INDIREKTE TAP, AVLEDETE TAP, PØNALE KRAV, ELLER SPESIELLE SKADER, ELLER FOR TAPTE PROFITTER ELLER TAPTE KOSTNADSBESPARELSER, IKKE ENGANG I TILFELLE EN REPRESENTANT FOR ADOBE ELLER EN LEVERANDØR ER BLITT INFORMERT OM MULIGHETEN FOR ET SLIKT TAP ELLER EN SLIK SKADE, KRAV ELLER KOSTNADER. DE FOREGÅENDE BEGRENSNINGER OG EKSKLUSJONER GJELDER SÅ LANGT DET IKKE ER I STRID MED GJELDENDE INTERNASJONAL PRESEPTORISK LOV I DIN JURISDIKSJON. ADOBES SAMLEDE ANSVAR OG DERES LEVERANDØRERS OG SERTIFIKATMYNDIGHETERS ANSVAR UNDER ELLER I FORBINDELSE MED DENNE AVTALEN SKAL VÆRE BEGRENSET TIL DET BELØPET SOM ER BETALT FOR PROGRAMVAREN, OM NOE. Ingenting i denne Avtalen begrenser Adobes ansvar overfor deg ved død eller personlig skade som et resultat av Adobes uaktsomhet eller for skadegjørende handling forvoldt ved bedrageri (svindel). Adobe handler på vegne av deres leverandører når det gjelder fraskrivelse, utelukkelse og/eller begrensning av forpliktelser, garantier og ansvar som angitt i denne Avtalen, men ikke i andre tilfeller og ikke for noen andre formål. Hvis du vil ha ytterligere informasjon, kan du se den eventuelle jurisdiksjonsspesifikke informasjonen til slutt i denne Avtalen, eller kontakte Adobes kundestøtteavdeling. 11. Eksportregler. Du sier deg enig i, og er innforstått med at Programvaren ikke vil bli sendt ut, overført eller eksportert til noe land eller brukt på noen måte som er forbudt i henhold til den amerikanske eksportadministrasjonsloven, «the United States Export Administration Act», eller noen andre eksportlover, begrensninger eller regler (samlet kalt «Eksportlovene»). Hvis Programvaren i tillegg finnes på listen over eksportkontrollerte varer i henhold til Eksportlovene, garanterer du, og er ansvarlig for at du ikke er statsborger, eller på andre måter befinner deg i, en nasjon det er sanksjoner mot (inkludert, uten begrensning Iran, Irak, Syria, Sudan, Libya, Cuba og Nord-Korea), og at du ikke på andre måter er forhindret fra å motta Programvaren i henhold til Eksportlovene. Alle rettigheter til å bruke Programvaren gis på betingelse av at slike rettigheter forspilles hvis du ikke oppfyller vilkårene i denne avtalen. 12. Gjeldende lov. Denne Avtalen vil være underlagt og følge gjeldende lover i: (a) staten California, i de tilfeller hvor lisens til Programvaren ble kjøpt i USA, Canada eller Mexico, eller (b) Japan, i de tilfeller hvor lisens til Programvaren ble kjøpt i Japan, Kina, Korea eller i andre land i Sørøst-Asia der alle offisielle språk skrives enten med ideografiske tegn (f.eks. hanzi, kanji eller hanja), og/eller med andre tegn basert på eller lignende i struktur på ideografiske tegn, for eksempel hangul eller kana, eller (c) England, i de tilfeller hvor lisens til Programvaren ble kjøpt i andre jurisdiksjoner enn dem som er beskrevet ovenfor. De respektive domstoler i Santa Clara County, California når lovene i California gjelder, Tokyo District Court i Japan når lovene i Japan gjelder, og gjeldende domstoler i London, England, når lovene i England gjelder, skal hver for seg ha ikke-eksklusiv jurisdiksjon over alle disputter i forbindelse med denne Avtalen. Denne avtalen vil ikke være underlagt regler forbundet med konflikter ved lovvalg i

noen jurisdiksjon eller De Forente Nasjoners konvensjon om internasjonalt salg av varer, hvis anvendelse er uttrykkelig unntatt. 13. Generelle bestemmelser. Hvis noen del av denne Avtalen blir kjent ugyldig og ikke kan håndheves, påvirker ikke dette gyldigheten av denne Avtalen for øvrig, og den skal fortsatt være gyldig og gjennomføres i samsvar med bestemmelsene i den. Denne Avtalen skal ikke få virkning til skade eller forringelse i forhold til lovbestemte rettigheter en part har som handler som forbruker. Denne avtalen kan bare endres skriftlig med signatur fra en autorisert funksjonær hos Adobe. Oppdateringer kan lisensieres til deg av Adobe med tilleggsvilkår eller andre vilkår. Dette er den fullstendige avtalen mellom Adobe og deg i forbindelse med Programvaren, og den erstatter enhver tidligere ytring, utsagn, diskusjon, forpliktelse, kommunikasjon, markedsføring, eller reklamevirksomhet relatert til Programvaren. 14. Meddelelse til amerikanske myndigheter som sluttbrukere. For amerikanske myndigheter som sluttbrukere sier Adobe seg enig i og innforstått med å følge alle gjeldende likestillingslover, inkludert, om anvendelig, bestemmelsene i Executive Order 11246, som endret, del 402 i Vietnam Era Veterans Readjustment Assistance Act fra 1974 (38 USC 4212) og del 503 i Rehabilitation Act fra 1973, som endret, og bestemmelsene i 41 CFR del 60-1 til 60-60, 60-250 og 60-741. «The affirmative action clause» (Bekreftelseshandlingsregelen) og bestemmelsene inneholdt i foregående setning skal bygges inn ved referanse i denne Avtalen. 15. Overensstemmelse med lisenser. Hvis du er en bedrift eller organisasjon, sier du deg enig i og innforstått med at du på forespørsel fra Adobe eller Adobes autoriserte representant innen tretti (30) dager fullstendig vil dokumentere og bekrefte at bruk av noen eller all Programvare ved forespørselens tidspunkt er i overensstemmelse med dine gyldige lisenser fra Adobe. 16. Spesifikke bestemmelser og unntak. 16.1 Ansvarsbegrensning for brukere som bor i Tyskland eller Østerrike. 16.1.1 Hvis du anskaffet Programvaren i Tyskland eller Østerrike, og du vanligvis bor i ett av disse landene, kommer ikke punkt 10 til anvendelse. I stedet, og underlagt bestemmelsene i punkt 16.1.2, skal Adobes lovbestemte ansvar for skader være begrenset som følger: (i) Adobe skal bare være ansvarlig opp til skadeomfanget som er påregnelig ved tidspunktet for inngåelse av kjøpsavtalen med hensyn til et begrenset brudd på kontraktsforpliktelsene og (ii) Adobe skal ikke være ansvarlig for skader forårsaket av et uaktsomt brudd på en ikkevesentlig kontraktsforpliktelse. 16.1.2 Begrensningen av ansvar nevnt ovenfor gjelder ikke preseptorisk lovpålagt ansvar, spesielt ansvar under German Product Liability Act og ansvar for å ha påtatt særlig spesifikk garanti eller skyldansvar ved personskader. 16.1.3 Du er pålagt å foreta alle rimelige forholdsregler for å unngå og redusere skader. Du er spesielt pålagt å sikkerhetskopiere Programvaren og dataene på datamaskinen din i henhold til bestemmelsene i denne avtalen.

Hvis du har spørsmål i forbindelse med denne Avtalen, eller hvis du vil be om ytterligere informasjon fra Adobe, kan du bruke adressen og kontaktinformasjonen som fulgte med dette produktet eller via Internett på www.adobe.com/no, til å kontakte det Adobe-kontoret som dekker din jurisdiksjon. Adobe, AIR, Authorwave, Flash, Reader og Shockwave er enten registrerte varemerker eller varemerke for Adobe Systems Incorporated i USA og/eller andre land.

Reader_Player_AIR_WWEULA-nb_NO-20080204_1313

 

ADOBE SYSTEMS INCORPORATED Wyłączenie Gwarancji i Umowa Licencji na Oprogramowanie. NINIEJSZY DOKUMENT ZAWIERA INFORMACJE NA TEMAT GWARANCJI (CZĘŚĆ I) ORAZ UMOWĘ LICENCJI OKREŚLAJĄCĄ WARUNKI UŻYTKOWANIA OPROGRAMOWANIA ADOBE (CZĘŚĆ II). CZĘŚĆ I. WYŁĄCZENIE GWARANCJI. OPROGRAMOWANIE I POZOSTAŁE INFORMACJE SĄ DOSTARCZANE UŻYTKOWNIKOWI W STANIE, W JAKIM SIĘ ZNAJDUJĄ, WRAZ ZE WSZELKIMI USTERKAMI. ADOBE I JEJ DOSTAWCY ORAZ ORGANY CERTYFIKACYJNE NIE MOGĄ GWARANTOWAĆ I NIE GWARANTUJĄ WYDAJNOŚCI ANI WYNIKÓW UZYSKIWANYCH PRZY UŻYCIU OPROGRAMOWANIA, USŁUG ORGANÓW CERTYFIKACYJNYCH ANI INNYCH OFERT PODMIOTÓW TRZECICH. Z ZASTRZEŻENIEM WSZELKICH GWARANCJI I RĘKOJMI, WARUNKÓW ORAZ OŚWIADCZEŃ, KTÓRE NIE MOGĄ ZOSTAĆ WYŁĄCZONE ANI OGRANICZONE NA MOCY PRZEPISÓW PRAWA MAJĄCYCH ZASTOSOWANIE DO UŻYTKOWNIKA W JEGO JURYSDYKCJI, ADOBE, JEJ DOSTAWCY I ORGANY CERTYFIKACYJNE NIE UDZIELAJĄ ŻADNYCH GWARANCJI, RĘKOJMI, WARUNKÓW ANI OŚWIADCZEŃ (WYRAŹNYCH ANI DOROZUMIANYCH, CZY TO NA PODSTAWIE PRAWA STANOWIONEGO, PRAWA ZWYCZAJOWEGO, PRZYJĘTEJ PRAKTYKI, ZASTOSOWANIA CZY NA INNEJ PODSTAWIE) W ODNIESIENIU DO ŻADNEJ KWESTII, W TYM GWARANCJI NIENARUSZANIA PRAW OSÓB TRZECICH, CECH HANDLOWYCH, GWARANCJI DOTYCZĄCEJ INTEGRACJI, JAKOŚCI LUB PRZYDATNOŚCI DO OKREŚLONEGO CELU. CZĘŚĆ II. UMOWA LICENCJI NA OPROGRAMOWANIE. UŻYCIE, KOPIOWANIE LUB ROZPOWSZECHNIANIE PRZEZ UŻYTKOWNIKA OPROGRAMOWANIA ADOBE W CAŁOŚCI LUB W CZĘŚCIACH OZNACZA ZGODĘ NA WSZYSTKIE WARUNKI I POSTANOWIENIA NINIEJSZEJ UMOWY, W TYM W SZCZEGÓLNOŚCI POSTANOWIENIA DOTYCZĄCE: KORZYSTANIA - ZAWARTE W PUNKCIE 2; PRZENOSZENIA PRAW - W PUNKCIE 4; POŁĄCZEŃ I PRYWATNOŚCI - W PUNKCIE 6; GWARANCJI - W PUNKCIE 9; ORAZ ODPOWIEDZIALNOŚCI - W PUNKTACH 10 I 16. PRAWA I OBOWIĄZKI WYNIKAJĄCE Z NINIEJSZEJ UMOWY MOGĄ BYĆ DOCHODZONE WOBEC UŻYTKOWNIKA I JAKIEJKOLWIEK OSOBY PRAWNEJ, KTÓRA UZYSKAŁA OPROGRAMOWANIE i, W IMIENIU KTÓREJ JEST ONO UŻYWANE. W PRZYPADKU NIEPRZYJĘCIA WARUNKÓW NINIEJSZEJ UMOWY NALEŻY ZAPRZESTAĆ KORZYSTANIA Z NINIEJSZEGO OPROGRAMOWANIA. Adobe udziela użytkownikowi zgody na Korzystanie z Oprogramowania wyłącznie na warunkach niniejszej Umowy. Korzystanie z materiałów osób trzecich zawartych w Oprogramowaniu może podlegać innym warunkom typowym dla umów licencyjnych, zawartym w pliku „Read Me” dołączonym do takich materiałów lub w „Informacjach o Oprogramowaniu Osób Trzecich i/lub Dodatkowych Warunkach i Postanowieniach” dostępnych na stronie http://www.adobe.com/go/thirdparty_pl. 1. Definicje. „Adobe” oznacza Adobe Systems Incorporated, spółkę stanu Delaware, z siedzibą pod adresem 345 Park Avenue, San Jose, California 95110 - jeżeli zastosowanie ma pkt 12(a) niniejszej umowy; w przeciwnym wypadku „Adobe” oznacza Adobe Systems Software Ireland Limited, z siedzibą pod adresem: Unit 3100, Lake Drive, City West Campus, Saggart D24, Irlandia, spółkę prawa irlandzkiego oraz podmiot powiązany i licencjobiorca Adobe Systems Incorporated „Komputer” oznacza wirtualne lub fizyczne osobiste urządzenie elektroniczne przyjmujące informacje w postaci cyfrowej lub podobnej do cyfrowej, a następnie przetwarzające takie informacje w określonym celu na podstawie sekwencji poleceń. „Oprogramowanie” oznacza (a) całość zawartości plików (dostarczonych drogą elektroniczną lub na nośniku materialnym), dysku (dysków) lub innych nośników, do których dołączona jest niniejsza umowa, w tym m.in. (i) informacje lub oprogramowanie komputerowe Adobe lub osób trzecich, w tym Adobe Reader® („Adobe Reader”), Adobe® AIR™ („Adobe AIR”), Adobe Flash® Player, Shockwave® Player i

Authorware® Player (łącznie Adobe AIR oraz odtwarzacze Flash, Shockwave i Authorware jako „moduły wykonawcze Adobe”); (ii) odnośne pisemne materiały lub pliki objaśniające („dokumentacja”); i (iii) kroje czcionki; oraz (b) uaktualnienia, wersje zmodyfikowane lub rozszerzone, dodatki oraz ich kopie, które Adobe udostępniła Użytkownikowi (łącznie „aktualizacje”). „Korzystanie” oznacza uzyskiwanie dostępu, instalowanie, pobieranie, kopiowanie i odnoszenie innych korzyści z używania funkcjonalności oprogramowania. 2. Licencja na oprogramowanie. Pod warunkiem uzyskania przez użytkownika oprogramowania od Adobe lub jednego z upoważnionych licencjobiorców tej spółki oraz pod warunkiem przestrzegania przez użytkownika warunków niniejszej umowy, w tym zastrzeżeń zawartych w pkt 3, Adobe udziela użytkownikowi poniższej niewyłącznej licencji na korzystanie z oprogramowania w sposób i w celach opisanych w dokumentacji: 2.1 Zastosowanie do celów ogólnych. Użytkownik może zainstalować jedną kopię oprogramowania na kompatybilnym komputerze i z niej korzystać. W punkcie 3 wskazano ważne ograniczenia w korzystaniu z oprogramowania. 2.2 Zastosowanie serwera. Niniejsza umowa nie zezwala użytkownikowi na zainstalowanie lub używanie oprogramowania na komputerowym serwerze plików. Informacje o korzystaniu z programu Adobe Reader na komputerowym serwerze plików znajdują się pod adresem http://www.adobe.com/go/acrobat_distribute_pl; informacje o korzystaniu z modułów wykonawczych Adobe na serwerze plików znajdują się pod adresem http://www.adobe.com/go/licensing_pl. 2.3 Rozpowszechnianie. Niniejsza licencja nie uprawnia użytkownika do sublicencjonowania lub rozpowszechniania oprogramowania. Informacje na temat uzyskiwania prawa do rozpowszechniania oprogramowania na nośnikach materialnych, w sieci wewnętrznej lub razem z produktem bądź usługą użytkownika znajdują się pod adresem http://www.adobe.com/go/acrobat_distribute_pl (informacje dotyczące programu Adobe Reader) oraz http://www.adobe.com/go/licensing_pl (informacje dotyczące modułów wykonawczych Adobe). 2.4 Kopia zapasowa. Użytkownik może stworzyć jedną kopię zapasową oprogramowania, pod warunkiem, że nie będzie ona zainstalowana ani użytkowana. Użytkownik może przenieść prawa do kopii zapasowej wyłącznie pod warunkiem przeniesienia wszelkich praw do oprogramowania zgodnie z pkt 4. 3. Obowiązki i ograniczenia. 3.1 Zastrzeżenia w zakresie modułów wykonawczych Adobe. Użytkownikowi nie wolno korzystać z jakiegokolwiek modułu wykonawczego Adobe przy pomocy urządzeń niebędących komputerem PC oraz przy pomocy systemów operacyjnych wbudowanych bądź ich wersji służących do obsługi urządzeń. Dla uniknięcia wątpliwości i wyłącznie jako przykład, stwierdza się, że użytkownik nie może korzystać z modułów wykonawczych Adobe przy pomocy (a) urządzeń przenośnych, przystawek do telewizora (STB), urządzeń podręcznych, aparatów telefonicznych, urządzeń typu web pad, rysownic oraz komputerów typu Tablet PC (niepracujących w systemie Windows XP Tablet PC Edition oraz kolejnych edycjach), konsoli do gier, odbiorników telewizyjnych, odtwarzaczy DVD, urządzeń typu media center (z wyłączeniem Windows XP Media Center Edition oraz kolejnych edycji), billboardów elektronicznych oraz innych tablic świetlnych, urządzeń internetowych i podłączanych do Internetu, palmtopów, sprzętu medycznego, bankomatów, urządzeń telematycznych, maszyn do gry, systemów automatycznego zarządzania instalacjami domowymi, kiosków, urządzeń do zdalnego sterowania lub innego elektronicznego sprzętu powszechnego użytku, (b) obsługiwanych przez operatora systemów przenośnych, przewodowych, satelitarnych i telewizyjnych lub (c) innych urządzeń pracujących w ramach zamkniętych systemów. Informacje na temat modułów wykonawczych Adobe przeznaczonych do użytku w takich systemach są dostępne pod adresem http://www.adobe.com/go/licensing_pl. 3.2 Zastrzeżenia w zakresie oprogramowania Adobe Reader. Adobe udziela licencji na oprogramowanie Adobe Reader i udostępnia je w celu przeglądania, dystrybucji i wspólnego korzystania z plików PDF. 3.2.1 Ograniczenia konwersji. Użytkownik nie może integrować oprogramowania Adobe Reader ani z niego korzystać wraz z jakimkolwiek innym oprogramowaniem, wtyczką programową (plug-in) lub udoskonaleniem,

które korzysta z oprogramowania Adobe Reader, w celu konwersji lub przekształcaniu plików PDF na inne formaty (np. plik PDF na pliki w formacie TIFF, JPEG lub SVG). 3.2.2 Ograniczenia dotyczące wtyczek programowych. Użytkownik nie może integrować ani korzystać z oprogramowania Adobe Reader z jakąkolwiek wtyczką programową nie opracowaną zgodnie z Główną Umową Licencyjną Integracji Adobe. 3.2.3 Wyłączone cechy. Aplikacja Adobe Reader może zawierać cechy lub funkcje ukryte lub widoczne jako wyłączone lub „wyszarzone” („wyłączone cechy”). Wyłączone cechy zostają uruchomione tylko w chwili otwarcia dokumentu w formacie PDF, który został sporządzony z wykorzystaniem uaktywniającej te cechy i funkcje technologii dostępnej wyłącznie w Adobe. Użytkownik nie będzie uzyskiwał dostępu ani próbował uzyskać dostępu do wyłączonych cech w sposób inny niż poprzez użycie technologii uaktywniających, ani nie będzie używał programu Adobe Reader do utworzenia cechy w istotnym zakresie podobnej do jakiejkolwiek wyłączonej cechy, ani nie będzie w żaden inny sposób omijał technologii sterującej aktywacją takich cech. Więcej informacji na temat wyłączonych cech można znaleźć pod adresem http://www.adobe.com/go/readerextensions_pl. 3.3 Informacja o prawach autorskich. Każda kopia sporządzona przez użytkownika oprogramowania musi zawierać te same informacje o prawach autorskich i inne zastrzeżenia umieszczone na lub w oprogramowaniu. 3.4 Zakaz modyfikowania i inżynierii wstecznej. Użytkownik nie może modyfikować, dostosowywać, tłumaczyć oprogramowania ani tworzyć na jego podstawie utworów zależnych. Zabrania się przeprowadzania procesów z zakresu inżynierii wstecznej, dekompilacji, deasemblacji lub stosowania innych metod odkrywania kodu źródłowego oprogramowania, z wyjątkiem dekompilacji lub inżynierii wstecznej dozwolonej obowiązującymi przepisami prawa. 4. Przeniesienie praw. Z wyjątkiem wypadków wyraźnie dozwolonych na mocy niniejszej umowy, użytkownik nie ma prawa wypożyczać, udostępniać w ramach najmu lub sublicencji, dokonywać cesji ani przeniesienia praw do oprogramowania, ani też zezwalać na kopiowanie oprogramowania, w całości ani w części, do pamięci komputera innego użytkownika. Użytkownik może jednak przenieść całość praw do korzystania z oprogramowania na inną osobę lub podmiot prawny, pod warunkiem, że: (a) użytkownik dokona również przeniesienia na taką osobę lub podmiot prawny (i) niniejszej umowy oraz (ii) oprogramowania i wszelkich innych programów lub sprzętu wchodzącego wraz z oprogramowaniem w skład jednego pakietu bądź instalowanych wraz z oprogramowaniem, w tym wszelkich ich kopii, aktualizacji i wcześniejszych wersji (b) użytkownik nie zachowa żadnych kopii, w tym kopii zapasowych i kopii przechowywanych w pamięci komputera oraz (c) osoba, na którą prawa są przenoszone, przyjmie warunki niniejszej umowy oraz wszelkie inne warunki, na jakich użytkownik uzyskał zgodnie z prawem licencję na oprogramowanie. Niezależnie od powyższych postanowień, użytkownik nie ma prawa przenosić praw do kopii udostępnianych w celach szkoleniowych, wersji zapoznawczych oraz kopii oprogramowania nieprzeznaczonych do sprzedaży. 5. Własność intelektualna, zastrzeżenie praw. Ochrona praw autorskich. oprogramowanie oraz wszelkie wykonane przez użytkownika kopie oprogramowania stanowią własność intelektualną Adobe Systems Incorporated i jej dostawców. Struktura, organizacja oraz kod oprogramowania stanowią wartościową tajemnicę handlową i informacje poufne Adobe Systems Incorporated i jej dostawców. Oprogramowanie jest chronione na mocy przepisów prawa, w tym przepisów Stanów Zjednoczonych i innych krajów, dotyczących praw autorskich, oraz na mocy postanowień międzynarodowych umów. O ile niniejsza Umowa nie stanowi wyraźnie inaczej, nie będzie ona służyła jako podstawa przyznania Użytkownikowi jakichkolwiek praw własności intelektualnej do oprogramowania, a wszystkie prawa, które nie zostały jednoznacznie udzielone drugiej stronie, pozostają własnością spółki Adobe i jej dostawców. 6. Połączenia i prywatność. 6.1 Korzystanie z plików PDF. Użycie oprogramowania do otwarcia pliku PDF, w którym poprzez stosowną rejestrację włączona jest funkcja wyświetlania reklam za pośrednictwem usługi Ads for Adobe PDF, może

spowodować połączenie komputera użytkownika z witryną internetową prowadzoną przez Adobe, reklamodawcę lub inny podmiot trzeci. W takiej sytuacji wysyłany jest adres IP (Internet Protocol) komputera użytkownika. Podmiot prowadzący witrynę może za pomocą odpowiednich rozwiązań technicznych wysyłać (lub „serwować”) reklamy lub inne treści elektroniczne, które pojawią się w otwartym pliku lub obok niego. Operator witryny może też używać skryptów w języku JavaScript, sygnalizatorów internetowych (nazywanych także znacznikami akcji lub jednopikselowymi plikami GIF) lub innych technik do zwiększania i pomiaru skuteczności reklamy oraz do personalizacji treści reklam. Komunikacja użytkownika z witrynami internetowymi Adobe odbywa się na zasadach określonych w Zasadach Adobe w Zakresie Ochrony Prywatności w Internecie dostępnych pod adresem http://www.adobe.com/go/privacy_pl. Adobe nie zawsze ma dostęp do funkcji witryn prowadzonych przez podmioty trzecie lub kontrolę nad takimi funkcjami, a praktyki postępowania z informacjami w witrynach podmiotów trzecich nie podlegają Zasadom Adobe w Zakresie Ochrony Prywatności w Internecie. 6.2 Aktualizacja. Użytkownik przyjmuje do wiadomości fakt, że oprogramowanie może spowodować automatyczne nawiązywanie przez komputer użytkownika połączenia z Internetem w celu sprawdzania dostępności aktualizacji do zautomatyzowanego pobrania do komputera oraz że może informować Adobe o pomyślnym zainstalowaniu oprogramowania. Użytkownik niniejszym wyraża na to zgodę. W sytuacjach opisanych w niniejszym punkcie do spółki Adobe przesyłane są wyłącznie informacje, które nie umożliwiają identyfikacji tożsamości. Komunikacja użytkownika z witrynami internetowymi Adobe odbywa się na zasadach określonych w Zasadach Adobe w Zakresie Ochrony Prywatności w Internecie dostępnych pod adresem http://www.adobe.com/go/privacy_pl. Dokumentacja zawiera informacje na temat zmiany domyślnych ustawień aktualizacji. 6.3 Menedżer ustawień. Odtwarzacz Flash Player może powodować zapamiętanie niektórych ustawień użytkownika na komputerze użytkownika w postaci lokalnego obiektu udostępnionego. Ustawienia te nie są związane bezpośrednio z użytkownikiem, ale umożliwiają użytkownikowi konfigurowanie pewnych ustawień w ramach odtwarzacza Flash. Bliższe informacje na temat lokalnych obiektów dzielonych są dostępne pod adresem http://www.adobe.com/go/flashplayer_security_pl, natomiast o menedżerze ustawień można przeczytać więcej pod adresem http://www.adobe.com/go/settingsmanager_pl. 7. Oferty podmiotów trzecich. Oprogramowanie może umożliwiać dostęp do witryn internetowych, aplikacji programowych i usług danych, w tym rozbudowanych aplikacji internetowych, prowadzonych bądź opracowanych przez podmioty trzecie oraz współdziałanie z takimi witrynami, aplikacjami i usługami („oferty podmiotów trzecich”). Dostęp i korzystanie przez użytkownika z ofert podmiotów trzecich, w tym z towarów, usług lub informacji, odbywa się na warunkach i zgodnie z postanowieniami takich ofert. Oferty podmiotów trzecich nie są własnością Adobe i nie są przez nią udostępniane. 8. Certyfikaty cyfrowe. 8.1 Korzystanie. W Adobe AIR stosowane są certyfikaty cyfrowe ułatwiające identyfikację wydawcy aplikacji Adobe AIR utworzonych przez podmioty trzecie. W programie Adobe Reader stosowane są certyfikaty cyfrowe służące do podpisywania dokumentów PDF i sprawdzania ważności podpisów w takich dokumentach oraz do sprawdzania ważności certyfikowanych dokumentów PDF. Podczas sprawdzania ważności certyfikatu cyfrowego komputer użytkownika może nawiązać połączenie z Internetem. Certyfikaty cyfrowe są wystawiane przez niezależne organy certyfikacyjne, w tym dostawców Adobe Certified Document Services (CDS) wymienionych pod adresem http://www.adobe.com/go/partners_cds_pl („organy certyfikacyjne”), lub mogą być certyfikatami samopodpisanymi. 8.2 Warunki i postanowienia. Za nabywanie i wykorzystywanie certyfikatów cyfrowych oraz za uznawanie ich wiarygodności odpowiada użytkownik oraz organ certyfikacyjny. Przed uznaniem wiarygodności jakiegokolwiek certyfikowanego dokumentu, podpisu cyfrowego lub usługi organu c należy zapoznać się z warunkami, na jakich odpowiedni organ certyfikacyjny świadczy usługi, w tym na przykład z umowami subskrypcyjnymi, umowami z podmiotami polegającymi na certyfikatach, zasadami wydawania certyfikatów i oświadczeniami na temat praktyk postępowania. Informacje na temat dostawców Adobe CDS znajdują się pod adresem http://www.adobe.com/go/partners_cds_pl.

8.3 Potwierdzenie. Użytkownik przyjmuje do wiadomości, że (a) certyfikat cyfrowy może zostać unieważniony zanim zostanie zweryfikowany, przez co podpis cyfrowy lub certyfikat zostanie uznany za ważny, mimo że jest nieważny; (b) możliwe jest naruszenie bezpieczeństwa lub integralności certyfikatu cyfrowego wskutek działania lub zaniechania podmiotu podpisującego dokument, odpowiedniego organu c lub innego podmiotu trzeciego; i (c) certyfikat może być certyfikatem samopodpisanym, niewystawionym przez żaden organ certyfikacyjny. ODPOWIEDZIALNOŚĆ ZA DECYZJĘ O UZNANIU WIARYGODNOŚCI CERTYFIKATU SPOCZYWA WYŁĄCZNIE NA UŻYTKOWNIKU. O ILE ORGAN CERTYFIKACYJNY NIE UDZIELIŁ UŻYTKOWNIKOWI ODRĘBNEJ PISEMNEJ GWARANCJI, UŻYTKOWNIK KORZYSTA Z CERTYFIKATÓW CYFROWYCH NA WŁASNE WYŁĄCZNE RYZYKO. 8.4 Beneficjenci będący osobami trzecimi. Użytkownik zgadza się na to, że organy certyfikacyjne, na których polega, będąc podmiotami trzecimi, są jednocześnie beneficjantami niniejszej umowy i mają prawo do jej egzekwowania we własnym imieniu tak samo, jak spółka Adobe. 8.5 Zwolnienie z odpowiedzialności. Użytkownik zobowiązuje się zwolnić Adobe i wszystkie właściwe organy certyfikacyjne (o ile warunki współpracy z nimi nie stanowi inaczej) z odpowiedzialności odszkodowawczej w przypadku powstania jakichkolwiek zobowiązań, strat, pozwów, szkód lub roszczeń (w tym wszystkich uzasadnionych wydatków kosztów i honorariów dla prawników) w związku z korzystaniem z usług takich organów lub poleganiem na takich usługach, w tym (a) poleganiem na certyfikatach po upływie daty ich ważności lub na certyfikatach, które zostały unieważnione; (b) niewłaściwej weryfikacji certyfikatu; (c) korzystaniem z certyfikatu w sposób zabroniony w odpowiednich warunkach współpracy, niniejszej umowie lub na podstawie obowiązujących przepisów prawa; (d) niewłaściwym osądem co do wiarygodności usług lub certyfikatów wystawcy; lub (e) niewykonaniem zobowiązań wynikających z warunków świadczenia usług. 9. Brak gwarancji. Oprogramowanie jest dostarczane użytkownikowi w stanie, w jakim się znajduje, ze WSZELKIMI USTERKAMI. ADOBE I JEJ DOSTAWCY ORAZ ORGANY CERTYFIKACYJNE NIE MOGĄ GWARANTOWAĆ I NIE GWARANTUJĄ WYDAJNOŚCI ANI WYNIKÓW UZYSKIWANYCH PRZY UŻYCIU OPROGRAMOWANIA, USŁUG ORGANÓW CERTYFIKACYJNYCH ANI INNYCH OFERT PODMIOTÓW TRZECICH. Z ZASTRZEŻENIEM WSZELKICH GWARANCJI I RĘKOJMI, WARUNKÓW ORAZ OŚWIADCZEŃ, KTÓRE NIE MOGĄ ZOSTAĆ WYŁĄCZONE ANI OGRANICZONE NA MOCY PRZEPISÓW PRAWA MAJĄCYCH ZASTOSOWANIE DO UŻYTKOWNIKA W JEGO JURYSDYKCJI, ADOBE, JEJ DOSTAWCY I ORGANY CERTYFIKACYJNE NIE UDZIELAJĄ ŻADNYCH GWARANCJI, RĘKOJMI, WARUNKÓW ANI OŚWIADCZEŃ (WYRAŹNYCH ANI DOROZUMIANYCH, CZY TO NA PODSTAWIE PRAWA STANOWIONEGO, PRAWA ZWYCZAJOWEGO, PRZYJĘTEJ PRAKTYKI, ZASTOSOWANIA CZY NA INNEJ PODSTAWIE) W ODNIESIENIU DO ŻADNEJ KWESTII, W TYM GWARANCJI NIENARUSZANIA PRAW OSÓB TRZECICH, CECH HANDLOWYCH, GWARANCJI DOTYCZĄCEJ INTEGRACJI, JAKOŚCI LUB PRZYDATNOŚCI DO OKREŚLONEGO CELU. Postanowienia pkt. 9 i 10 pozostają w mocy po rozwiązaniu niniejszej umowy, niezależnie od jego przyczyny, co jednak nie będzie skutkować udzieleniem, ani sugerować udzielenia prawa do dalszego korzystania z oprogramowania po rozwiązaniu niniejszej umowy. 10. Ograniczenie odpowiedzialności. W ŻADNYM WYPADKU ADOBE, JEJ DOSTAWCY ANI ORGANY CERTYFIKACYJNE NIE BĘDĄ WOBEC UŻYTKOWNIKA PONOSIĆ ODPOWIEDZIALNOŚCI ZA JAKIEKOLWIEK STRATY, ROSZCZENIA LUB KOSZTY, ANI TEŻ ZA ŻADNE WYNIKOWE, POŚREDNIE LUB WYPADKOWE SZKODY, UTRACONE ZYSKI LUB OSZCZĘDNOŚCI, NAWET JEŻELI PRZEDSTAWICIEL ADOBE ZOSTAŁ POINFORMOWANY O MOŻLIWOŚCI WYSTĄPIENIA TAKICH STRAT, SZKÓD LUB ROSZCZEŃ. POWYŻSZE WYŁĄCZENIA I OGRANICZENIA MAJĄ ZASTOSOWANIE W ZAKRESIE, W JAKIM SĄ DOZWOLONE PRZEPISAMI PRAWA OBOWIĄZUJĄCYMI W JURYSDYKCJI UŻYTKOWNIKA. ŁĄCZNA ODPOWIEDZIALNOŚĆ ADOBE, JEJ DOSTAWCÓW I ORGANY CERTYFIKACYJNE Z TYTUŁU NINIEJSZEJ UMOWY LUB W ZWIĄZKU Z NIĄ JEST OGRANICZONA DO EWENTUALNEJ KWOTY ZAPŁACONEJ ZA OPROGRAMOWANIE. Postanowienia niniejszej umowy nie ograniczają odpowiedzialności Adobe wobec użytkownika w przypadku śmierci lub uszkodzenia ciała spowodowanego niedbalstwem Adobe, w przypadku czynu niedozwolonego lub oszustwa. Adobe działa w imieniu swoich dostawców i organów certyfikacyjnych dla celów

wyłączenia i/lub ograniczenia zobowiązań, gwarancji i odpowiedzialności ustanowionych na mocy niniejszej umowy, i nie występuje jako ich przedstawiciel dla jakichkolwiek innych celów lub w jakimkolwiek innym zakresie. W celu uzyskania dokładniejszych informacji na ten temat, należy zapoznać się z ewentualnymi informacjami o poszczególnych jurysdykcjach zawartymi w ostatniej części niniejszej umowy lub skontaktować się z Działem Obsługi Klienta Adobe. 11. Zasady dotyczące eksportu. Użytkownik zobowiązuje się, że oprogramowanie nie będzie transportowane, przekazywane ani eksportowane do żadnego kraju objętego zakazem eksportu na mocy amerykańskiej ustawy o kontroli eksportowej (Export Administration Act) lub innych dotyczących eksportu przepisów, ograniczeń czy regulacji (łącznie zwanych „przepisami eksportowymi”), ani nie będzie wykorzystywane w żaden sposób zakazany na mocy przepisów eksportowych. Na wypadek gdyby oprogramowanie zostało uznane za przedmiot kontroli eksportowej na mocy przepisów eksportowych, użytkownik oświadcza i gwarantuje, że nie jest obywatelem kraju objętego embargiem (w tym m. in. Iranu, Syrii, Sudanu, Kuby ani Korei Północnej) i nie jest mieszkańcem oraz nie ma siedziby w takim kraju, ani też nie jest z innego tytułu objęty na mocy przepisów eksportowych zakazem odbioru oprogramowania. Wszelkie prawa do korzystania z oprogramowania są przyznawane z zastrzeżeniem, że prawa te ulegną przepadkowi, jeżeli użytkownik nie będzie przestrzegał warunków niniejszej umowy. 12. Prawo właściwe. Niniejsza umowa podlega przepisom prawa materialnego obowiązującym w wymienionych poniżej stanach/krajach i zgodnie z nimi będzie interpretowana: (a) w stanie Kalifornia - jeżeli licencję na oprogramowanie uzyskuje użytkownik w Stanach Zjednoczonych, Kanadzie lub Meksyku; lub (b) w Japonii - jeżeli licencję na oprogramowanie uzyskuje użytkownik w Japonii, Chinach, Korei lub innym kraju w Azji Południowo-Wschodniej, gdzie wszystkie urzędowe języki posługują się znakami ideograficznymi (np. Hanzi, Kanji lub Hanja) i/lub innym kodem opartym na strukturze podobnej do kodu ideograficznego, takim jak Hangul lub Kana; lub (c) w Anglii jeżeli licencję na oprogramowanie uzyskuje użytkownik w innej jurysdykcji niż wskazane powyżej. Niewyłączną jurysdykcję na potrzeby rozstrzygania wszelkich sporów dotyczących niniejszej umowy mają odpowiednie sądy w Santa Clara County (Kalifornia) - w wypadku, gdy zastosowanie ma prawo stanu Kalifornia, Sąd Okręgowy Tokio w Japonii - w wypadku, gdy zastosowanie ma prawo japońskie, oraz właściwe sądy w Londynie - w wypadku, gdy zastosowanie ma prawo angielskie. Niniejsza umowa nie podlega przepisom prawa kolizyjnego obowiązującym w jakiejkolwiek jurysdykcji ani przepisom Konwencji Narodów Zjednoczonych o Umowach Międzynarodowej Sprzedaży Towarów, których zastosowanie niniejszym ulega wyłączeniu. 13. Postanowienia ogólne. Uznanie jakiejkolwiek części niniejszej umowy za nieważną lub niewykonalną nie będzie miało wpływu na ważność pozostałych postanowień umowy, które pozostaną ważne i wykonalne zgodnie z jej warunkami. Niniejsza umowa nie ogranicza ustawowych praw przysługujących jakiejkolwiek osobie występującej jako konsument. Wszelkie zmiany do niniejszej umowy wymagają formy pisemnej i podpisu upoważnionego pracownika Adobe. Licencje na aktualizacje mogą być udzielane użytkownikowi przez Adobe na innych lub dodatkowych warunkach. Niniejsza umowa stanowi całość porozumienia pomiędzy Adobe a użytkownikiem w odniesieniu do oprogramowania i zastępuje wszelkie wcześniejsze oświadczenia, rozmowy, zobowiązania i informacje oraz materiały reklamowe dotyczące oprogramowania. 14. Informacja dla użytkowników końcowych podlegających rządowi Stanów Zjednoczonych (U.S. Government End Users). W odniesieniu do użytkowników końcowych podlegających rządowi Stanów Zjednoczonych Adobe zobowiązuje się przestrzegać wszystkich odnośnych przepisów prawa dotyczących równych szans, w tym - jeżeli mają zastosowanie - przepisów Zarządzenia nr 11246 (Executive Order 11246), z późn. zm., Sekcji 402 ustawy z 1974 r. o rehabilitacji społecznej weteranów wojny w Wietnamie (Vietnam Era Veterans Readjustment Assistance Act, 38 USC 4212) i Sekcji 503 ustawy z 1973 r. o rehabilitacji (Rehabilitation Act 1973), z późn. zm., oraz Części 60-1 do

60-60, 60-250 oraz 60-741 regulacji 41 CFR. Klauzula o działaniach wspierających upośledzone warstwy społeczne (affirmative action clause) oraz regulacje wskazane w poprzednim zdaniu zostają włączone przez odniesienie do niniejszej umowy. 15. Przestrzeganie warunków licencji. Użytkownicy prowadzący działalność gospodarczą oraz organizacje zgadzają się, że na prośbę skierowaną przez Adobe lub upoważnionego przedstawiciela Adobe, w ciągu trzydziestu (30) dni w pełni udokumentują i zaświadczą fakt, że w dniu daty wystosowania takiej prośby użytkowali oprogramowanie zgodnie z obowiązującymi licencjami Adobe. 16. Postanowienia szczególne i wyjątki. 16.1 Ograniczona odpowiedzialność w stosunku do użytkowników mających siedzibę lub miejsce zamieszkania w Niemczech lub w Austrii. 16.1.1 W stosunku do użytkowników, którzy uzyskali oprogramowanie w Niemczech lub w Austrii i którzy zazwyczaj mają swą siedzibę lub miejsce zamieszkania w tych krajach, pkt 10 nie ma zastosowania, natomiast, z zastrzeżeniem postanowień pkt 16.1.2, ustawowa odpowiedzialność odszkodowawcza Adobe jest ograniczona w następujący sposób: (i) Adobe będzie ponosić odpowiedzialność jedynie do wysokości odszkodowania, które typowo można przewidzieć w chwili zawierania umowy licencyjnej, w zakresie szkód spowodowanych wynikającym z drobnego zaniedbania naruszeniem istotnego zobowiązania umownego; oraz (ii) Adobe nie będzie ponosić odpowiedzialności za szkody spowodowane wynikającym z drobnego zaniedbania naruszeniem mało istotnego zobowiązania umownego. 16.1.2 Powyższe ograniczenie odpowiedzialności nie dotyczy obowiązkowej odpowiedzialności ustawowej, w szczególności wynikającej z niemieckiej ustawy o odpowiedzialności za produkt, z przyjęcia na siebie określonego zobowiązania gwarancyjnego lub też odpowiedzialności za zawinione spowodowanie uszkodzenia ciała. 16.1.3 Użytkownik winien podejmować wszelkie zasadne środki w celu uniknięcia, a w przypadku ich wystąpienie, obniżenia szkód, w szczególności wykonywać kopie zapasowe oprogramowania i danych komputerowych z zastrzeżeniem postanowień niniejszej umowy.

Wszelkie pytania związane z niniejszą umową lub prośby o dodatkowe informacje należy kierować na adres www.adobe.com/pl i zgodnie z informacjami kontaktowymi załączonymi do niniejszego produktu, odsyłającymi użytkownika do placówki Adobe obsługującej dany region lub elektronicznie za pośrednictwem witryny. Adobe, AIR, Authorware, Flash, Reader oraz Shockwave to zarejestrowane znaki towarowe lub znaki towarowe Adobe Systems Incorporated w Stanach Zjednoczonych i/lub innych krajach.

Reader_Player_AIR_WWEULA-pl_PL-20080204_1313

 

ADOBE SYSTEMS INCORPORATED Declaraţia de excludere a garanţiei şi Contractul de licenţă software. ACEST DOCUMENT INCLUDE INFORMAŢII PRIVIND GARANŢIA (PARTEA I) ŞI UN CONTRACT DE LICENŢĂ CARE GUVERNEAZĂ UTILIZAREA SOFTWARE-ULUI ADOBE (PARTEA A II-A). PARTEA I. DECLARAŢIA DE EXCLUDERE A GARANŢIEI. SOFTWARE-UL ŞI ALTE INFORMAŢII VI SE LIVREAZĂ „CA ATARE” ŞI CU TOATE DEFECTELE. ADOBE ŞI FURNIZORII SĂI ŞI AUTORITĂŢILE DE CERTIFICARE NU GARANTEAZĂ ŞI NU POT SĂ GARANTEZE ÎN PRIVINŢA FUNCŢIONĂRII SAU A REZULTATELOR PE CARE LE PUTEŢI OBŢINE PRIN UTILIZAREA SOFTWARE-ULUI, A SERVICIILOR AUTORITĂŢILOR DE CERTIFICARE SAU A ALTOR OFERTE ALE TERŢELOR PĂRŢI. EXCEPTÂND ORICE GARANŢIE, CONDIŢIE, REPREZENTARE SAU TERMEN, ÎN MĂSURA ÎN CARE ACESTEA NU POT FI EXCLUSE SAU LIMITATE PRIN LEGISLAŢIA CARE VĂ ESTE APLICABILĂ ÎN JURISDICŢIA DVS., ADOBE ŞI FURNIZORII SĂI ŞI AUTORITĂŢILE DE CERTIFICARE NU FORMULEAZĂ CONDIŢII DE GARANŢIE, REPREZENTĂRI SAU TERMENE (EXPRESE SAU IMPLICITE, FIE PRIN STATUT, DREPT COMUN, DREPT CUTUMIAR, UZANŢĂ SAU PRIN ALTĂ MODALITATE), ÎN PRIVINŢA NICIUNUI ALT ASPECT, INCLUSIV ŞI FĂRĂ LIMITARE LA ÎNCĂLCAREA DREPTURILOR TERŢELOR PĂRŢI, VANDABILITATE, INTEGRARE, CALITATEA SATISFĂCĂTOARE SAU CARACTERUL ADECVAT PENTRU ANUMITE SCOPURI. PARTEA A II-A CONTRACTUL DE LICENŢĂ SOFTWARE. UTILIZÂND, COPIIND SAU DISTRIBUIND ACEST SOFTWARE ADOBE SAU ORICE SEGMENT AL SĂU, ACCEPTAŢI INTEGRAL TERMENII ŞI CONDIŢIILE PREZENTULUI CONTRACT, INCLUZÂND ÎN MOD SPECIAL PREVEDERILE CU PRIVIRE LA: UTILIZAREA DESCRISĂ ÎN SECŢIUNEA 2; TRANSFERABILITATE DIN SECŢIUNEA 4; CONECTIVITATE ŞI CONFIDENŢIALITATE DIN SECŢIUNEA 6; GARANŢIE DIN SECŢIUNEA 9 ŞI RĂSPUNDERE DIN SECŢIUNILE 10 ŞI 16. DUPĂ ACCEPTARE, ACEST CONTRACT POATE FI INVOCAT ÎMPOTRIVA DVS. ŞI A ORICĂREI ENTITĂŢI CARE A OBŢINUT SOFTWARE-UL ŞI ÎN FAVOAREA CĂREIA ESTE FOLOSIT ACESTA. ÎN CAZUL ÎN CARE NU SUNTEŢI DE ACORD, NU FOLOSIŢI ACEST SOFTWARE. ADOBE VĂ PERMITE SĂ UTILIZAŢI SOFTWARE-UL NUMAI ÎN CONFORMITATE CU TERMENII ACESTUI CONTRACT. UTILIZAREA MATERIALELOR UNEI TERŢE PĂRŢI INCLUSE ÎN SOFTWARE POATE FI SUPUSĂ ALTOR TERMENI ŞI CONDIŢII CARE SE GĂSESC DE OBICEI ÎNTR-UN CONTRACT DE LICENŢĂ SEPARAT, UN FIŞIER „A SE CONSULTA URMĂTOARELE” LOCALIZAT ÎN APROPIEREA UNOR ASTFEL DE MATERIALE SAU ÎN „ÎNŞTIINŢĂRI PRIVIND SOFTWARE-UL APARŢINÂND TERŢELOR PĂRŢI ŞI/SAU TERMENI ŞI CONDIŢII SUPLIMENTARE”, DISPONIBILE LA http://www.adobe.com/go/thirdparty_ro. 1. Definiţii. „Adobe” înseamnă Adobe Systems Incorporated, o companie din Delaware, 345 Park Avenue, San Jose, California 95110, dacă se aplică subsecţiunea 12 (a) a prezentului contract; altfel, acest nume desemnează Adobe Systems Software Ireland Limited, Unit 3100, Lake Drive, City West Campus, Saggart D24, Republica Irlanda, o companie organizată conform legislaţiei din Irlanda, afiliată şi licenţiată a Adobe Systems Incorporated. „Computer” desemnează un dispozitiv electronic personal, virtual sau fizic, care acceptă informaţii în format digital sau similar şi le manipulează pentru un rezultat specific bazat pe o secvenţă de instrucţiuni. „Software” înseamnă (a) toate conţinuturile fişierelor (furnizate fie prin descărcare electronică, fie pe suport fizic) sau discuri sau alte suporturi care sunt prevăzute în prezentul contract, care pot include (i) informaţii despre calculator sau software aparţinând companiei Adobe sau altor terţe părţi, inclusiv Adobe Reader® (“Adobe Reader”), Adobe® AIR™ (“Adobe AIR”), Adobe Flash® Player, Shockwave® Player şi Authorware® Player (împreună, playerele Adobe AIR şi Flash, Shockwave şi Authorware, reprezintă „Adobe Runtimes”); (ii) fişiere sau materiale scrise explicative similare

(„Documentaţie”); (iii) fonturi; şi (b) upgrade-uri, versiuni modificate, actualizări, completări şi copii ale celor de mai sus, oricare ar fi momentul în care vă sunt furnizate acestea de către Adobe (denumite in mod colectiv ,,Actualizări”). „A utiliza” înseamnă a accesa, instala, descărca, copia sau a beneficia în alt mod în urma utilizării funcţionalităţii software-ului. 2. Licenţa de Software. În cazul în care aţi obţinut Software-ul de la Adobe sau de la unul dintre licenţiaţii săi autorizaţi şi cu condiţia respectării de către dvs. a termenilor prezentului contract, inclusiv a restricţiilor prevăzute în Secţiunea 3, Adobe vă acordă o licenţă neexclusivă de utilizare a Software-ului în maniera şi pentru scopurile descrise în Documentaţie după cum urmează: 2.1 Utilizare generală. Puteţi să instalaţi şi să utilizaţi o copie a Software-ului pe Calculatorul dvs. compatibil. Vedeţi Secţiunea 3 pentru restricţii importante privind utilizarea software-ului. 2.2 Utilizarea Server-ului. Acest contract nu vă permite să instalaţi sau să utilizaţi software-ul pe un server de fişiere de computer. Pentru informaţii privind utilizarea de software pe un server de fişiere, consultaţi http://www.adobe.com/go/acrobat_distribute_ro pentru informaţii despre Adobe Reader; sau http://www.adobe.com/go/licensing_ro pentru informaţii despre Adobe Runtimes. 2.3 Distribuirea. Această licenţă nu vă acordă dreptul de a sublicenţia sau distribui Software-ul. Pentru informaţii privind obţinerea dreptului de distribuire a Software-ului în formă de suport fizic printr-o reţea internă sau cu ajutorul produselor sau serviciilor dvs., consultaţi http://www.adobe.com/go/acrobat_distribute_ro pentru informaţii despre Adobe Reader; sau http://www.adobe.com/go/licensing_ro pentru informaţii despre Adobe Runtimes. 2.4 Copia de siguranţă. Puteţi realiza o copie de siguranţă a Software-ului, cu condiţia ca această copie de rezervă să nu fie instalată sau utilizată. Nu este permis transferul drepturilor asupra unei copii de siguranţă decât în cazul în care transferaţi toate drepturile asupra Software-ului, aşa cum se precizează în cadrul Secţiunii 4. 3. Obligaţii şi restricţii. 3.1 Restricţii Adobe Runtime. Nu veţi utiliza produsele Adobe Runtime pe niciun alt dispozitiv în afara PC-ului sau împreună cu orice versiune încorporată sau de dispozitiv a oricărui sistem de operare. Pentru evitarea nesiguranţei şi exclusiv cu titlu de exemplu, nu aveţi dreptul de a utiliza un Adobe Runtime pe niciun fel de (a) dispozitive mobile, set top box (STB), dispozitive portabile, telefoane, pad-uri Web, tablet-uri şi Tablet PC-uri (care nu rulează Windows XP Tablet PC Edition şi versiunile ulterioare), console de jocuri, televizoare, playere DVD, dispozitive media center (cu excepţia Windows XP Media Center Edition şi versiunile ulterioare), panouri electronice sau alte semnale digitale, aplicaţii Internet sau alte dispozitive conectate la Internet, PDA-uri, dispozitive medicale, ATMuri, dispozitive telematice, maşini de jocuri, sisteme de automatizare a locuinţei, dispozitive tip „chioşc”, dispozitive tip telecomandă, sau orice alt tip de dispozitiv electronic pentru consumatori, (b) sisteme mobile pe bază de operator, cablu, satelit, sistem de televiziune sau (c) orice alte dispozitive în sistem închis. Pentru informaţii privind licenţierea Adobe Runtimes în vederea utilizării pe astfel de sisteme, vizitaţi http://www.adobe.com/go/licensing_ro. 3.2 Restricţii Adobe Reader. Adobe Reader este licenţiat şi distribuit de Adobe pentru vizualizarea, distribuirea şi partajarea fişierelor PDF. 3.2.1 Restricţii privind conversia. Nu aveţi dreptul să integraţi sau să utilizaţi Adobe Reader cu niciun alt software, plug-in sau îmbunătăţire care utilizează sau se bazează pe Adobe Reader pentru conversia sau transformarea fişierelor PDF în alte formate (de ex., un fişier PDF într-un fişier TIFF, JPEG sau SVG). 3.2.2 Restricţii privind plug-in-urile. Nu aveţi dreptul să integraţi sau să utilizaţi Adobe Reader cu niciun software plug-in care nu a fost dezvoltat în conformitate cu Contractul de Licenţă Adobe Integration Key. 3.2.3 Caracteristici dezactivate. Adobe Reader poate conţine caracteristici sau funcţionalităţi care sunt ascunse sau par dezactivate sau „afişate cu gri” („Caracteristicile dezactivate”). Aceste Caracteristici Dezactivate se vor activa doar la deschiderea unui document PDF care a fost creat utilizând tehnologia de activare disponibilă numai de la Adobe. Nu sunteţi autorizat să accesaţi sau să încercaţi să accesaţi nicio Caracteristică Dezactivată altfel decât prin

utilizarea unor astfel de tehnologii de activare şi nici să vă bazaţi pe Adobe Reader pentru a crea o caracteristică substanţial similară oricărei Caracteristici Dezactivate sau să împiedicaţi într-un alt mod tehnologia care controlează activarea unei astfel de caracteristici. Pentru mai multe informaţii privind caracteristicile dezactivate, consultaţi http://www.adobe.com/go/readerextensions_ro. 3.3 Înştiinţări. Orice copie a Software-ului pe care o realizaţi trebuie să conţină aceleaşi înştiinţări privind dreptul de autor şi celelalte drepturi de proprietate care apar pe sau în conţinutul Software-ului. 3.4 Lipsa modificărilor sau ingineria reversibilă. Nu aveţi dreptul de a modifica, adapta, traduce sau crea opere derivate pe baza Software-ului. Nu veţi apela la ingineria reversibilă, la decompilare sau dezasamblare şi nu veţi încerca să descoperiţi în alt mod codul sursă al Software-ului, cu excepţia şi în măsura în care vi se permite în mod expres să apelaţi la ingineria reversibilă sau la decompilare conform legislaţiei aplicabile. 4. Transferul. Nu aveţi dreptul să închiriaţi, să oferiţi în leasing, să sublicenţiaţi, să cedaţi sau să transferaţi drepturile dvs. asupra Software-ului sau să autorizaţi Software-ului sau a oricărui segment al acestuia pe Computerul unui alt utilizator, cu excepţia cazurilor în care acest lucru se permite în mod expres prin acest contract. Cu toate acestea, aveţi dreptul să vă transferaţi toate drepturile de utilizare a Software-ului unei alte persoane fizice sau juridice, cu condiţia: (a) să transferaţi, de asemenea, (i) prezentul contract şi (ii) Software-ul şi orice alt software sau hardware inclus sau preinstalat cu Software-ul, incluzând toate copiile, actualizările şi versiunile anterioare, către astfel de persoane fizice sau juridice; (b) să nu reţineţi copii, inclusiv copii de rezervă sau copii stocate într-un Computer; şi (c) să se accepte de către partea căreia i se transferă drepturile termenii şi condiţiile acestui contract şi orice alţi termeni şi condiţii pe baza cărora aţi achiziţionat o licenţă validă pentru Software. Fără a contrazice cele de mai sus, nu aveţi voie să transferaţi informaţii, variante pre-lansare sau să re-vindeţi versiuni ale Software-ului. 5. Dreptul de proprietate intelectuală, Rezervarea drepturilor. Software-ul şi orice copii autorizate pe care le executaţi reprezintă proprietate intelectuală a companiei Adobe Systems Incorporated şi a furnizorilor săi. Structura, organizarea şi codul de Software reprezintă secrete comerciale valoroase şi informaţii confidenţiale ale Adobe Systems Incorporated şi ale furnizorilor săi. Software-ul este protejat prin lege, inclusiv si fără limitare, prin legile privind dreptul de autor din Statele Unite şi alte ţări şi prin prevederile tratatelor internaţionale. În afara cazurilor stipulate în mod expres în cele de faţă, prezentul contract nu vă garantează niciun fel de drept de proprietate intelectuală asupra Software-ului şi toate drepturile care nu sunt garantate în mod expres sunt rezervate de către Adobe şi furnizorii săi. 6. Conectivitate şi confidenţialitate. 6.1 Utilizarea fişierelor PDF. Când utilizaţi Software-ul pentru a deschide un fişier PDF care a fost abilitat să afişeze publicitate prin înregistrarea la serviciul Ads for Adobe PDF, computerul se poate conecta la un site Web operat de Adobe, de un agent de publicitate sau de o terţă parte. Când se întâmplă acest lucru, se trimite adresa dvs. de Internet protocol (IP). Partea care găzduieşte site-ul poate să utilizeze tehnologie pentru a trimite (sau „servi”) publicitate sau alt conţinut electronic care apare în fişierul deschis sau în apropierea acestuia. Operatorul site-ului de Web poate, de asemenea, să utilizeze JavaScript, repere Web (cunoscute şi ca etichete active sau gif-uri de un pixel) şi alte tehnologii menite să sporească şi să măsoare eficacitatea anunţurilor şi să personalizeze conţinutul publicităţii. Comunicarea dvs. cu site-urile Web ale Adobe este guvernată de Politica de confidenţialitate online Adobe care poate fi găsită la http://www.adobe.com/go/privacy_ro. Este posibil ca Adobe să nu aibă acces la sau control asupra caracteristicilor pe care o terţă parte le poate folosi, iar practicile privind informaţiile aparţinând site-urilor de Web ale terţelor părţi nu sunt acoperite prin Politica de confidenţialitate online Adobe. 6.2 Actualizarea. Recunoaşteţi şi sunteţi de acord că Software-ul poate cauza conectarea automată a Calculatorului dvs. la Internet pentru a verifica actualizările disponibile în vederea descărcării automate pe Calculatorul dvs. şi pentru a înştiinţa Adobe despre faptul că Software-ul este instalat cu succes. Când se întâmplă aceasta, numai informaţiile de identificare non-personală sunt transmise către Adobe. Comunicarea dvs. cu site-urile de Web Adobe este guvernată de Politica de confidenţialitate online Adobe pe care o puteţi găsi la

http://www.adobe.com/go/privacy_ro. Consultaţi Documentaţia pentru informaţii privind modificarea setărilor de actualizare implicite. 6.3 Manager de setări. Flash Player poate face ca anumite setări de utilizator să fie salvate pe Computerul dvs. ca obiect local partajat. Aceste setări nu sunt asociate cu dvs., dar vă dau posibilitatea de a configura anumite setări în cadrul Flash Player-ului. Mai multe informaţii privind obiectele locale partajate puteţi găsi la http://www.adobe.com/go/flashplayer_security_ro, iar mai multe informaţii despre Managerul de setări la http://www.adobe.com/go/settingsmanager_ro. 7. Ofertele terţelor părţi. Software-ul vă poate permite să accesaţi şi să interoperaţi cu site-uri de Web ale terţelor părţi, aplicaţii software şi servicii de date, inclusiv aplicaţii de Internet cu conţinut bogat („Ofertele terţelor părţi”). Accesul dvs. la şi utilizarea oricărei Oferte a terţelor părţi, inclusiv orice bunuri, servicii sau informaţii, sunt guvernate prin termenii şi condiţiile aferente ofertelor respective. Ofertele Terţelor părţi nu constituie proprietatea Adobe şi nu sunt furnizate de Adobe. 8. Certificate digitale. 8.1 Utilizare. Adobe AIR utilizează certificate digitale pentru a vă ajuta să identificaţi editorul aplicaţiilor Adobe AIR create de terţe părţi. Adobe Reader utilizează certificate digitale pentru a semna şi valida semnăturile din interiorul documentelor PDF şi pentru a valida documentele PDF certificate. Computerul dvs. se poate conecta la Internet în momentul validării unui certificat digital. Certificatele digitale sunt eliberate de autorităţi de certificare terţe părţi, inclusiv furnizori ai Serviciilor pentru documente certificate Adobe (CDS) afişaţi la http://www.adobe.com/go/partners_cds_ro („Autorităţi de certificare”) sau pot fi semnate în nume propriu. 8.2 Termeni şi condiţii. Achiziţionarea, utilizarea şi bazarea pe certificatele digitale este responsabilitatea dvs. şi a unei Autorităţi de certificare. Înainte de a vă baza pe orice document certificat, semnătură digitală sau servicii ale Autorităţilor de certificare, trebuie să examinaţi termenii şi condiţiile aplicabile conform cărora Autorităţile de certificare relevante furnizează servicii, inclusiv, de exemplu, contracte de subscriere, contracte fiabile între părţi, poliţe de certificare şi declaraţii de practică. Vedeţi link-urile de la http://www.adobe.com/go/partners_cds_ro pentru informaţii despre furnizorii CDS de la Adobe. 8.3 Confirmarea. Sunteţi de acord că (a) un certificate digital ar fi putut fi revocat anterior momentului verificării, făcând ca semnătura digitală sau certificatul să pară valid, când de fapt nu este, (b) securitatea sau integritatea unui certificat digital poate fi compromisă din cauza unui act sau omisiune comisă de semnatarul documentului, Autoritatea de certificare aplicabilă sau de orice altă terţă parte şi (c) un certificat poate să fie un certificat semnat în nume propriu care nu este furnizat de o Autoritate de certificare. DVS. SUNTEŢI UNICUL RESPONSABIL ÎN PRIVINŢA DECIZIEI DE A VĂ BAZA SAU NU PE UN CERTIFICAT. VEŢI UTILIZA CERTIFICATELE DIGITALE PE UNICA ŞI PROPRIA DVS. RĂSPUNDERE, EXCEPTÂND SITUAŢIA ÎN CARE O GARANŢIE SEPARATĂ SCRISĂ VĂ ESTE OFERITĂ DE O AUTORITATE DE CERTIFICARE. 8.4 Beneficiari terţi. Sunteţi de acord că orice Autoritate de certificare pe care vă bazaţi constituie un beneficiar terţă parte a acestui contract şi are dreptul să pună în aplicare prevederile acestui contract în nume personal ca şi cum ar fi Adobe. 8.5 Despăgubirea. Sunteţi de acord să despăgubiţi Adobe şi orice Autoritate de certificare aplicabilă (cu excepţia cazurilor prevăzute în mod expres în termenii şi condiţiile acesteia) în privinţa oricăror răspunderi, pierderi, acţiuni, prejudicii sau pretenţii (incluzând toate cheltuielile rezonabile, costurile şi onorariile avocaţilor) care decurg din respectivele sau sunt legate de utilizarea sau se bazează pe orice serviciu al unei astfel de autorităţi, incluzând, fără limitare, (a) faptul de a vă fi bazat pe un certificat expirat sau revocat; (b) verificarea necorespunzătoare a certificatului; (c) utilizarea unui certificat într-un alt mod decât cel permis în termenii şi condiţiile aplicabile, acest contract sau legislaţia aplicabilă; (d) eşecul în a exercita un raţionament rezonabil cerut de situaţia în care vă bazaţi pe serviciile emitentului sau pe certificate sau (e) imposibilitatea de a îndeplini obligaţiile prevăzute în termenii şi condiţiile legate de servicii. 9. Neacordarea de garanţii.

Software-ul vi se livrează „CA ATARE” şi cu TOATE DEFECTELE. ADOBE ŞI FURNIZORII SĂI ŞI AUTORITĂŢILE DE CERTIFICARE NU GARANTEAZĂ ŞI NU POT SĂ GARANTEZE ÎN PRIVINŢA FUNCŢIONĂRII SAU A REZULTATELOR PE CARE LE PUTEŢI OBŢINE PRIN UTILIZAREA SOFTWAREULUI, A SERVICIILOR AUTORITĂŢILOR DE CERTIFICARE SAU A ALTOR OFERTE ALE TERŢELOR PĂRŢI. EXCEPTÂND ORICE GARANŢIE, CONDIŢIE, REPREZENTARE SAU TERMEN, ÎN MĂSURA ÎN CARE ACESTEA NU POT FI EXCLUSE SAU LIMITATE PRIN LEGISLAŢIA CARE VĂ ESTE APLICABILĂ ÎN JURISDICŢIA DVS., ADOBE ŞI FURNIZORII SĂI ŞI AUTORITĂŢILE DE CERTIFICARE NU FORMULEAZĂ CONDIŢII DE GARANŢIE, REPREZENTĂRI SAU TERMENE (EXPRESE SAU IMPLICITE, FIE PRIN STATUT, DREPT COMUN, DREPT CUTUMIAR, UZANŢĂ SAU PRIN ALTĂ MODALITATE), ÎN PRIVINŢA NICIUNUI ALT ASPECT, INCLUSIV ŞI FĂRĂ LIMITARE LA ÎNCĂLCAREA DREPTURILOR TERŢELOR PĂRŢI, VANDABILITATE, INTEGRARE, CALITATEA SATISFĂCĂTOARE SAU CARACTERUL ADECVAT PENTRU ANUMITE SCOPURI. Prevederile Secţiunii 9 şi ale Secţiunii 10 vor rămâne valabile şi după rezilierea, indiferent de cauză, a prezentului contract, dar aceasta nu va implica sau crea vreo continuare a dreptului de utilizare a Software-ului după rezilierea prezentului contract. 10. Limitarea răspunderii. INDIFERENT DE ÎMPREJURĂRI, ADOBE, FURNIZORII SĂI SAU AUTORITĂŢILE DE CERTIFICARE NU VOR FI RĂSPUNZĂTOARE FAŢĂ DE DVS. PENTRU DAUNE, PRETENŢII SAU COSTURI DE ORICE FEL INCLUSIV ORICE DAUNE SUBSECVENTE, INDIRECTE, ACCIDENTALE, PROFITURI SAU ECONOMII PIERDUTE, CHIAR DACĂ UN REPREZENTANT ADOBE A FOST ANUNŢAT ÎN PRIVINŢA POSIBILITĂŢII INTERVENIRII UNOR ASTFEL DE PIERDERI, DAUNE SAU PRETENŢII. ACEASTĂ LIMITARE SE VA APLICA ÎN MĂSURA PERMISĂ DE LEGISLAŢIA APLICABILĂ ÎN JURISDICŢIA DVS. RĂSPUNDEREA TOTALĂ A ADOBE, A FURNIZORILOR SĂI ŞI A AUTORITĂŢILOR DE CERTIFICARE CONFORM ŞI ÎN LEGĂTURĂ CU ACEST CONTRACT SE VA LIMITA LA SUMA PLĂTITĂ PENTRU SOFTWARE, DACĂ ESTE CAZUL. Nimic din prezentul contract nu limitează răspunderea Adobe faţă de dvs. în caz de deces sau rănire rezultate prin neglijenţa Adobe sau în caz de fraudă. Adobe acţionează în numele furnizorilor săi şi a Autorităţilor de certificare în scopul de a exclude, eliminând şi/sau limitând obligaţiile, garanţiile sau răspunderea, aşa cum sunt prevăzute în prezentul contract, însă exclusiv în acest scop şi doar în această privinţă. Pentru informaţii suplimentare, consultaţi informaţiile juridice specifice jurisdicţiei de la sfârşitul prezentului contract, dacă este cazul, sau contactaţi Departamentul de asistenţă pentru clienţi Adobe. 11. Reguli de Export. Sunteţi de acord ca Software-ul să nu fie transportat, transferat sau exportat în nicio altă ţară şi să nu fie utilizat întro manieră interzisă prin Actul Statelor Unite pentru Administraţia Exportului sau prin alte legi, restricţii sau regulamente de export (denumite generic „Legile de export”). În plus, dacă Software-ul este identificat ca fiind element de export sub control conform Legislaţiei de export, trebuie să declaraţi şi să garantaţi că nu sunteţi cetăţean al unei naţiuni aflate sub embargo sau că nu vă aflaţi într-o astfel de zonă (inclusiv, printre altele, Iran, Siria, Sudan, Cuba şi Coreea de Nord) şi că nu vă aflaţi în vreun alt regim de prohibiţie pentru recepţionarea Software-ului, conform Legilor de export. Toate drepturile de Utilizare a Software-ului sunt acordate cu condiţia ca la aceste drepturi să se renunţe în cazul în care nu se respectă termenii prezentului Contract. 12. Lege Aplicabilă. Prezentul contract se supune, în ce priveşte guvernarea şi interpretarea, legislaţiei fundamentale în vigoare: (a) în statul California, dacă licenţa de utilizare a Software-ului este obţinută când vă aflaţi în Statele Unite, Canada sau Mexic; sau (b) în Japonia, dacă licenţa de utilizare a Software-ului este obţinută când vă aflaţi în Japonia, China, Coreea sau alt stat din Asia de Sud-Est în care limba oficială este redată în scris ideografic (de ex., hanzi, kanji, sau hanja) şi/sau în orice altă scriere bazată pe sau de structură similară celei ideografice, precum hangul sau kana; sau (c) în Anglia, dacă licenţa de utilizare a Software-ului este achiziţionată când vă aflaţi într-o orice altă jurisdicţie care nu a fost menţionată mai sus. Respectivele tribunale din Santa Clara County, California, când se aplică legislaţia din California, Tribunalul districtual Tokyo din Japonia, când se aplică legislaţia din Japonia şi tribunalele competente din Anglia, când se aplică legislaţia din Anglia, vor avea competenţă juridică neexclusivă asupra litigiilor legate de prezentul contract. Prezentul Contract nu va fi guvernat de regulile privind conflictul de legi ale

niciunei jurisdicţii sau de Convenţia Naţiunilor Unite asupra Contractelor de Vânzare Internaţională a Mărfurilor, a căror aplicare este exclusă în mod expres. 13. Prevederi Generale. Dacă se constată că vreuna dintre părţile prezentului contract este nulă şi inaplicabilă, acest fapt nu va afecta validitatea restului prezentului contract, care va rămâne valid şi aplicabil conform termenilor săi. Prezentul contract nu va prejudicia drepturile prevăzute in statut ale niciunei părţi care reprezintă consumatorul. Acest contract poate fi modificat numai printr-un document scris semnat de un funcţionar autorizat al Adobe. Actualizările vă pot fi licenţiate de către Adobe cu termeni suplimentari sau diferiţi. Cele de faţă reprezintă întregul contract dintre Adobe şi Dvs. şi anulează orice declaraţii, discuţii, responsabilităţi, comunicări sau reclame legate de Software. 14. Înştiinţarea către Utilizatorii Finali din Guvernul S.U.A. În cazul Utilizatorilor finali din Guvernul S.U.A., Adobe consimte să respecte toate legile aplicabile în privinţa egalităţii de şanse incluzând, dacă este cazul, prevederile Ordinului executiv 11246, amendat, Secţiunea 402 a Actului din 1974 pentru Ajutorarea readaptării veteranilor din perioada Vietnam (38 USC 4212) şi Secţiunea 503 a Actului de Reabilitare din 1973, amendat, şi regulamentele din 41 CFR Părţile 60-1 prin 60-60, 60-250 şi 60-741. Clauza de acţiune afirmativă şi regulamentele prevăzute în propoziţia precedentă vor fi incluse ca referinţe la prezentul Contract. 15. Respectarea Licenţelor. Dacă reprezentaţi o organizaţie sau o afacere, sunteţi de acord ca la cererea Adobe sau a reprezentantului autorizat al Adobe, în termen de treizeci (30) de zile să demonstraţi şi să certificaţi în întregime că la momentul solicitării Software-ul este utilizat în totalitate sau parţial conform licenţelor valide din partea Adobe. 16. Prevederi şi Excepţii Specifice. 16.1 Garanţia Limitată Acordată Utilizatorilor Care Domiciliază în Germania sau Austria. 16.1.1 Dacă aţi obţinut Software-ul în Germania sau Austria şi sunteţi stabiliţi în ţara respectivă, Secţiunea 10 nu se aplică. În schimb, supusă prevederilor din Secţiunea 16.1.2, răspunderea statutară a Adobe pentru daune se va limita după cum urmează: (i) Adobe va fi răspunzător numai până la pragul sumei care se prevede la momentul constituirii contractului de achiziţionare în privinţa daunelor cauzate de o uşoară încălcare din neglijenţă a unei obligaţii contractuale de ordin material şi (ii) Adobe nu va fi responsabil pentru daunele cauzate de o încălcare superficială, din neglijenţă, a unei obligaţii contractuale care nu este de ordin material. 16.1.2 Mai sus menţionata limitare de răspundere nu se va aplica niciunei răspunderi obligatorii statutare, în particular, răspunderii conform Actului German privind Răspunderea asupra Produsului, răspunderea pentru asumarea unei garanţii specifice sau a unei răspunderi pentru daune personale cauzate din culpă. 16.1.3 Vi se cere să luaţi toate măsurile rezonabile pentru a evita şi reduce daunele, în special să realizaţi copii de rezervă ale Software-ului şi ale datelor computerului Dvs. supuse prevederilor prezentului contract.

Dacă aveţi întrebări în privinţa prezentului contract sau dacă doriţi să solicitaţi informaţii de la Adobe, utilizaţi adresa şi informaţiile de contact furnizate cu acest produs sau pe web la www.adobe.com/ro pentru a contacta biroul Adobe care deserveşte jurisdicţia dvs. Adobe, AIR, Authorware, Flash, Reader şi Shockwave reprezintă mărci înregistrate sau mărci ale Adobe Systems Incorporated din Statele Unite şi / sau alte ţări.

Reader_Player_AIR_WWEULA-ro_RO-20080204_1313

 

ADOBE SYSTEMS INCORPORATED Отказ от гарантий и лицензионный договор на программное обеспечение. ЭТОТ ДОКУМЕНТ ВКЛЮЧАЕТ В СЕБЯ СВЕДЕНИЯ О ГАРАНТИИ (ЧАСТЬ I) И ЛИЦЕНЗИОННОМ ДОГОВОРЕ, РЕГУЛИРУЮЩИХ ИСПОЛЬЗОВАНИЕ ПРОГРАММНОГО ОБЕСПЕЧЕНИЯ ADOBE (ЧАСТЬ II). ЧАСТЬ I. ОТКАЗ ОТ ГАРАНТИЙ. ПРОГРАММНОЕ ОБЕСПЕЧЕНИЕ И ДРУГИЕ ДАННЫЕ ПРЕДОСТАВЛЯЮТСЯ ВАМ НА ПРИНЦИПЕ «КАК ЕСТЬ» СО ВСЕМИ ДЕФЕКТАМИ. КОМПАНИЯ ADOBE И ЕЕ ПОСТАВЩИКИ НЕ ГАРАНТИРУЮТ И НЕ МОГУТ ГАРАНТИРОВАТЬ РАБОЧИЕ ХАРАКТЕРИСТИКИ И РЕЗУЛЬТАТЫ, КОТОРЫЕ МОГУТ БЫТЬ ПОЛУЧЕНЫ ВАМИ ПРИ ИСПОЛЬЗОВАНИИ ПРОГРАММНОГО ОБЕСПЕЧЕНИЯ, УСЛУГ ЦЕНТРА СЕРТИФИКАЦИИ ИЛИ ПРЕДЛОЖЕНИЙ ТРЕТЬИХ ЛИЦ. ЗА ИСКЛЮЧЕНИЕМ ГАРАНТИЙ, УСЛОВИЙ ИЛИ ЗАЯВЛЕНИЙ И ПОЛОЖЕНИЙ, КОТОРЫЕ НЕ МОГУТ БЫТЬ В ТОМ ИЛИ ИНОМ ОБЪЕМЕ ИСКЛЮЧЕНЫ ИЛИ ОГРАНИЧЕНЫ ПО СООТВЕТСТВУЮЩЕМУ ЗАКОНОДАТЕЛЬСТВУ, РАСПРОСТРАНЯЮЩЕМУСЯ НА ВАС В ПРЕДЕЛАХ ВАШЕЙ ЮРИСДИКЦИИ, КОМПАНИЯ ADOBE, ЕЕ ПОСТАВЩИКИ И ЦЕНТРЫ СЕРТИФИКАЦИИ НЕ ДАЮТ НИКАКИХ ГАРАНТИЙ, НЕ УСТАНАВЛИВАЮТ УСЛОВИЙ, НЕ ДЕЛАЮТ НИКАКИХ ЗАЯВЛЕНИЙ, НИ ПРЯМО ВЫРАЖЕННЫХ, НИ ПОДРАЗУМЕВАЕМЫХ, ПО ЗАКОНУ, ОБЩЕМУ ПРАВУ, ОБЫЧАЮ, ПРАКТИКЕ ИЛИ ИНЫМ ОБРАЗОМ В ОТНОШЕНИИ КАКИХ БЫ ТО НИ БЫЛО ВОПРОСОВ, ВКЛЮЧАЯ, НО НЕ ОГРАНИЧИВАЯСЬ ТОЛЬКО ЭТИМ, НЕНАРУШЕНИЕ ПРАВ ТРЕТЬЕГО ЛИЦА, ПРИГОДНОСТЬ ДЛЯ ПРОДАЖИ, ВКЛЮЧЕНИЕ МАТЕРИАЛОВ, УДОВЛЕТВОРИТЕЛЬНОЕ КАЧЕСТВО ИЛИ ПРИГОДНОСТЬ ДЛЯ ЛЮБОЙ КОНКРЕТНОЙ ЦЕЛИ. ЧАСТЬ II. ЛИЦЕНЗИОННЫЙ ДОГОВОР НА ПРОГРАММНОЕ ОБЕСПЕЧЕНИЕ. ПОЛНОСТЬЮ ИЛИ ЧАСТИЧНО ИСПОЛЬЗУЯ, КОПИРУЯ ИЛИ РАСПРОСТРАНЯЯ ПРОГРАММНОЕ ОБЕСПЕЧЕНИЕ ADOBE, ВЫ ПРИНИМАЕТЕ ВСЕ УСЛОВИЯ НАСТОЯЩЕГО ДОГОВОРА, ВКЛЮЧАЯ, В ЧАСТНОСТИ, ПОЛОЖЕНИЯ В ОТНОШЕНИИ: ИСПОЛЬЗОВАНИЯ (РАЗДЕЛ 2); ВОЗМОЖНОСТИ ПЕРЕДАЧИ (РАЗДЕЛ 4); ПОДКЛЮЧЕНИЯ И КОНФИДЕНЦИАЛЬНОСТИ (РАЗДЕЛ 6); ГАРАНТИИ (РАЗДЕЛ 9) И ОТВЕТСТВЕННОСТИ (РАЗДЕЛЫ 10 И 16). ПОСЛЕ ПРИНЯТИЯ НАСТОЯЩИЙ ДОГОВОР ИМЕЕТ ИСКОВУЮ СИЛУ ПО ОТНОШЕНИЮ К ВАМ И ЛЮБОМУ ЮРИДИЧЕСКОМУ ЛИЦУ, КОТОРОЕ ПРИОБРЕЛО ДАННОЕ ПРОГРАММНОЕ ОБЕСПЕЧЕНИЕ И ОТ ИМЕНИ КОТОРОГО ОСУЩЕСТВЛЯЕТСЯ ЕГО ИСПОЛЬЗОВАНИЕ. В СЛУЧАЕ НЕСОГЛАСИЯ С УСЛОВИЯМИ ДОГОВОРА ИСПОЛЬЗОВАТЬ ПРОГРАММНОЕ ОБЕСПЕЧЕНИЕ НЕ СЛЕДУЕТ. КОМПАНИЯ ADOBE РАЗРЕШАЕТ ВАМ ИСПОЛЬЗОВАТЬ ПРОГРАММНОЕ ОБЕСПЕЧЕНИЕ ТОЛЬКО НА УСЛОВИЯХ НАСТОЯЩЕГО ДОГОВОРА. ИСПОЛЬЗОВАНИЕ ВКЛЮЧЕННЫХ В ПРОГРАММНОЕ ОБЕСПЕЧЕНИЕ МАТЕРИАЛОВ ТРЕТЬИХ ЛИЦ МОЖЕТ РЕГУЛИРОВАТЬСЯ ИНЫМИ УСЛОВИЯМИ, КОТОРЫЕ, КАК ПРАВИЛО, МОЖНО НАЙТИ В ОТДЕЛЬНОМ ЛИЦЕНЗИОННОМ СОГЛАШЕНИИ, ФАЙЛЕ «READ ME», РАЗМЕЩЕННОМ РЯДОМ С ТАКИМИ МАТЕРИАЛАМИ ИЛИ В «СООБЩЕНИЯХ О ВНЕШНЕМ ПРОГРАММНОМ ОБЕСПЕЧЕНИИ И/ИЛИ В ДОПОЛНИТЕЛЬНЫХ УСЛОВИЯХ», КОТОРЫЕ ДОСТУПНЫ НА САЙТЕ http://www.adobe.com/go/thirdparty_ru. 1. Определения. Применительно к положениям подраздела 12 (a) настоящего договора «Adobe» означает Adobe Systems Incorporated, корпорацию, созданную по законодательству штата Делавэр, расположенную по адресу: 345 Park Avenue, San Jose, California 95110; в остальных случаях - Adobe Systems Software Ireland Limited, компанию, расположенную по адресу: Unit 3100, Lake Drive, City West Campus, Saggart D24, Republic of Ireland, созданную в соответствии с законодательством Ирландской Республики и являющуюся аффилированным лицом и лицензиатом компании Adobe Systems Incorporated. «Компьютер» означает

виртуальное или физическое персональное электронное устройство, принимающее информацию в цифровой или аналогичной форме и манипулирующее данной информацией на основе последовательности команд для достижения конкретных результатов. «Программное обеспечение» означает (a) все содержание файлов (предоставленное электронным способом или на материальных носителях), диска (дисков) и иных носителей, с которыми поставляется настоящий договор, включая (i) компьютерную информацию и программное обеспечение компании Adobe или третьих лиц, включая Adobe Reader® («Adobe Reader»), Adobe® AIR™ («Adobe AIR»), Adobe Flash® Player, Shockwave® Player и Authorware® Player (совместно Adobe AIR и Flash, Shockwave и Authorware player именуются как «Adobe Runtimes»); (ii) сопроводительные письменные пояснительные материалы или файлы («Документация»); а также (iii) шрифты; и (b) усовершенствованные, модифицированные и обновленные версии, дополнения, а также копии вышеуказанного, переданные Вам компанией Adobe (совместно «Обновления»). «Использование» означает получение доступа, установку, загрузку, копирование и иное извлечение выгоды из применения функциональных возможностей Программного обеспечения. 2. Лицензия на Программное обеспечение. Если Вы приобрели Программное обеспечение от компании Adobe или одного из ее авторизированных обладателей лицензии и при условии соблюдения Вами условий настоящего договора, включая ограничения, указанные в Разделе 3, Adobe предоставляет Вам неисключительную лицензию на использование Программного обеспечения в целях, изложенных в Документации, как изложено ниже: 2.1 Общее использование. Вы вправе устанавливать и использовать одну копию Программного обеспечения на Вашем совместимом Компьютере. Для получения сведений о важных ограничениях по использованию Программного обеспечения см. Раздел 3. 2.2 Использование на сервере. Настоящий договор не разрешает Вам устанавливать или использовать Программное обеспечение на сервере компьютерных файлов. Сведения об использовании Программного обеспечения на сервере компьютерных файлов см. на сайте http://www.adobe.com/go/acrobat_distribute_ru сведения об Adobe Reader http://www.adobe.com/go/licensing_ru - сведения об Adobe Runtimes. 2.3 Распространение. Лицензия не предоставляет Вам право на сублицензирование или распространение Программного обеспечения. Сведения о получении права на распространение Программного обеспечения на материальных носителях, через внутреннюю сеть либо с Вашей продукцией или услугами см. на сайте http://www.adobe.com/go/acrobat_distribute_ru - сведения об Adobe Reader http://www.adobe.com/go/licensing_ru - сведения об Adobe Runtimes. 2.4 Резервная копия. Вам предоставляется право создать одну резервную копию Программного обеспечения, при условии, что эта резервная копия не будет устанавливаться или использоваться. Передача прав на резервную копию допускается только в случае передачи Вами всех прав на Программное обеспечение в соответствии с положениями Раздела 4. 3. Обязательства и ограничения. 3.1 Ограничения Adobe Runtime. Вы не вправе использовать любой Adobe Runtime на любом устройстве, не связанном с использованием персонального компьютера (PC), или с любой вмонтированной версией или версией устройства любой операционной системы. Во избежание сомнений и только в качестве примера, Вы не вправе использовать Adobe Runtime на/в любом (а) мобильном устройстве, телевизионной приставке, карманном компьютере, телефоне, сетевом клавиатурном приборе, электронном блокноте и планшетном персональном компьютере (за исключением Windows XP Tablet PC Edition и его последующих версий), пульте-приставке для видеоигр, телевизоре, DVD-плеере, медийном центре (за исключением Windows XP Media Center Edition и его последующих версий), электронной доске объявлений или иной цифровой вывеске, устройстве для доступа к Интернет или ином связанном с Интернет устройством, электронном секретаре (PDA), медицинском оборудовании, банкомате, телемеханическом устройстве, игровом автомате, домашней автоматизированной системе, интерактивных терминалах, устройстве дистанционного управления или любом ином устройстве потребительской электроники, (b) мобильной, кабельной, спутниковой или телевизионной системе, работающей с компаниями-операторами, или (с) другом закрытом

системном устройстве. Сведения о лицензировании Adobe Runtimes для использования в таких системах см. на сайте http://www.adobe.com/go/licensing_ru. 3.2 Ограничения Adobe Reader. Компания Adobe лицензирует и распространяет Adobe Reader для целей просмотра, распространения и совместного пользования PDF-файлами. 3.2.1 Ограничения конвертации. Вы не вправе объединять или использовать Adobe Reader с любым иным программным обеспечением, модулем (plug-in) или расширением функциональных возможностей программных средств, которые используют или зависимы от Adobe Reader, при конвертации или трансформации файлов формата PDF в иной файловый формат (например, файл формата PDF в файлы формата TIFF, JPEG или SVG). 3.2.2 Ограничения в отношении модулей. Вы не вправе объединять или использовать Adobe Reader с любым модульным (plug-in) программным обеспечением, которое не было разработано в соответствии с Лицензионным Договором Интегрирования Ключей компании Adobe. 3.2.3 Заблокированные функции. Adobe Reader может содержать функции и функциональные средства, которые скрыты или заблокированы либо «затенены» («Заблокированные функции»). Заблокированные функции активируются при открытии определенного документа формата PDF, созданного с использованием соответствующей технологии, которую можно получить только в компании Adobe. Вы не вправе получать или пытаться получить доступ к любым Заблокированным функциям, за исключением использования подобных обеспечивающих технологий, Вы также не вправе рассчитывать на то, что в Adobe Reader можно создать функцию, в значительной степени сходную с Заблокированной функцией, или иным образом обходить технологию, которая регулирует активацию подобных функций. Дополнительные сведения о Заблокированных функциях см. на сайте http://www.adobe.com/go/readerextensions_ru. 3.3 Уведомления. Любая копия Программного обеспечения, произведенная Вами, должна содержать те же уведомления об авторских правах и праве собственности, которые имеются на Программном обеспечении. 3.4 Запрет на модификацию или переконструирование. Вы не вправе изменять, настраивать, переводить или создавать производные продукты, основанные на Программном обеспечении. Вы не можете переконструировать, декомпилировать, дизассемблировать или иным образом пытаться определить исходный код Программного обеспечения, за исключением случаев, когда декомпиляция или переконструирование могут быть в явно выраженной форме разрешены действующим законодательством. 4. Передача. За исключением случаев, прямо предусмотренных в тексте настоящего договора, Вы не вправе сдавать в аренду, сублицензировать, уступать или передавать свои права на Программное обеспечение, разрешать копирование всего или любой части Программного обеспечения на Компьютер другого пользователя. При этом Вы можете передавать другому физическому или юридическому лицу в полном объеме свои права на использование Программного обеспечения при условии, что: (а) Вы передаете этому физическому или юридическому лицу также (i) настоящий договор и (ii) Программное обеспечение и все иные программные или аппаратные средства, сгруппированные или предварительно установленные вместе с Программным обеспечением, включая все копии, обновления и предшествующие версии; (b) Вы не оставляете себе копий, в том числе резервных и хранящихся на Компьютере; и (с) получающая сторона принимает условия и положения настоящего договора, а также все условия и положения, на которых Вами законно приобретена действительная лицензия на Программное обеспечение. Несмотря на вышесказанное, передача обучающих, предварительных (опубликованных до выпуска в продажу), а также не подлежащих перепродаже копий Программного обеспечения не допускается. 5. Права интеллектуальной собственности, сохранение прав. Программное обеспечение, равно как и все сделанные Вами разрешенные копии такового, составляют объекты интеллектуальной собственности компании Adobe Systems Incorporated и ее поставщиков. Структура, построение и системная программа Программного обеспечения являются конфиденциальной информацией и представляют собой коммерческую тайну корпорации Adobe Systems Incorporated и ее

поставщиков. Программное обеспечение защищено законодательством, включая, без ограничения только этим, законодательство об авторских правах Соединенных Штатов Америки и других государств, а также положениями международных договоров. Кроме как в случаях, в явной форме предусмотренных настоящим Договором, Вам не предоставляется каких-либо прав интеллектуальной собственности в отношении Программного обеспечения, и все права, за исключением предоставленных в явно выраженной форме, резервируются компанией Adobe и ее поставщиками. 6. Подключение и конфиденциальность. 6.1 Использование файлов PDF. При использовании Программного обеспечения для открытия файла PDF, в котором путем подписки на рекламу через службу Adobe PDF разрешена реклама, Ваш компьютер может подключиться к web-сайту, управляемому Adobe, рекламодателем или другими третьими лицами. При этом отправляется Ваш IP-адрес (Internet Protocol). Лицо, отвечающее за хостинг сайта, может использовать технологию для отправки (или «предоставления») рекламного либо другого электронного содержания, которое появится в открытом файле или будет прилагаться к нему. Кроме того, оператор web-сайта может использовать JavaScript, web-маячки (также известные как теги действия или однопиксельные изображения GIF) и другие технологии для повышения и оценки эффективности рекламы, а также индивидуализации рекламного содержания. Обмен данными с web-сайтами Adobe регулируется политикой онлайновой конфиденциальности Adobe, которая доступна на сайте http://www.adobe.com/go/privacy_ru. Adobe не имеет доступа к функциям, которые используются третьими лицами, и не контролирует их, а политика web-сайтов третьих лиц в отношении информации не регулируется политикой онлайновой конфиденциальности Adobe. 6.2 Обновление. Вы признаете и соглашаетесь, что Программное обеспечение может вызвать автоматическое подключение Вашего компьютера к Интернету для проверки обновлений, которые доступны для автоматической загрузки на Ваш Компьютер, а также сообщение Adobe об успешной установке Программного обеспечения. При этом в Adobe передается только информация, которая не может быть идентифицирована с личностью пользователя. Обмен данными с web-сайтами Adobe регулируется политикой онлайновой конфиденциальности Adobe, которая доступна на сайте http://www.adobe.com/go/privacy_ru. Сведения об изменении установленных по умолчанию параметров обновления см. в Документации. 6.3 Менеджер параметров настройки. Использование Flash Player может привести к сохранению некоторых параметров настройки пользователя на Вашем Компьютере как локальных совместно используемых объектов. Такие параметры настройки не ассоциируются с Вами, а позволяют конфигурировать некоторые параметры настройки во Flash Player. Вы можете получить более подробную информацию о локальных совместно используемых объектах на сайте http://www.adobe.com/go/flashplayer_security_ru и о Менеджере параметров настройки на сайте http://www.adobe.com/go/settingsmanager_ru. 7. Предложения третьих лиц. Программное обеспечение может предоставлять Вам возможность открытия и использования предоставляемых третьими лицами web-сайтов, прикладного Программного обеспечения и служб данных, включая комплексные прикладные интернет-программы («Предложения третьих лиц»). Доступ к любым Предложениям третьих лиц и их использование, включая любые товары, услуги или информацию, регулируется условиями и положениями в отношении таких предложений. Компания Adobe не владеет Предложениями третьих лиц и не предоставляет их. 8. Цифровые сертификаты. 8.1 Использование. Adobe AIR использует цифровые сертификаты, которые помогут Вам определить издателя прикладных программ Adobe AIR, созданных третьими лицами. Adobe Reader использует цифровые сертификаты для подписи и удостоверения подписей в документах PDF, а также для удостоверения сертифицированных документов PDF. Во время удостоверения цифрового сертификата Ваш компьютер может подключиться к Интернету. Цифровые сертификаты выдаются Центрами сертификации третьих лиц, включая поставщиков услуг по сертификации документов Adobe (CDS), перечень которых

приводится на http://www.adobe.com/go/partners_cds_ru («Центры сертификации»), или могут снабжаться функцией автоматической подписи. 8.2 Условия и положения. Вы вместе с Центром сертификации несете ответственность за покупку, использование цифровых сертификатов и доверие им. Прежде чем доверять сертифицированному документу, цифровой подписи или услугам Центра сертификации, изучите соответствующие условия и положения, в соответствии с которыми соответствующий Центр сертификации предоставляет услуги, в том числе, например, любые соглашения с подписчиками и сторонами-получателями Сертифицированных документов, положения о политике и практике в области сертификации документов. Для получения сведений о поставщиках CDS Adobe см. ссылки на http://www.adobe.com/go/partners_cds_ru. 8.3 Признание. Вы признаете, что (a) до момента верификации цифровой сертификат может быть отозван, вследствие чего цифровая подпись или сертификат будут выглядеть как якобы действительные, не являясь таковыми; что (b) безопасность и целостность цифрового сертификата может подвергаться риску вследствие действия или упущения лица, подписавшего документ, соответствующего Центра сертификации или любого иного третьего лица; и что (c) сертификат может снабжаться функцией автоматической подписи и не выдаваться Центром сертификации. ВЫ НЕСЕТЕ ВСЮ ОТВЕТСТВЕННОСТЬ ЗА РЕШЕНИЕ, СЛЕДУЕТ ЛИ ДОВЕРЯТЬ СЕРТИФИКАТУ. ПОКА ЦЕНТР СЕРТИФИКАЦИИ НЕ ПРЕДОСТАВИТ ОТДЕЛЬНУЮ ПИСЬМЕННУЮ ГАРАНТИЮ, ВЫ НЕСЕТЕ ВСЮ ОТВЕТСТВЕННОСТЬ ЗА ИСПОЛЬЗОВАНИЕ ЦИФРОВЫХ СЕРТИФИКАТОВ. 8.4 Третьи лица - выгодоприобретатели. Вы соглашаетесь, что любой Центр сертификации, которому Вы доверяете, является третьим лицом - выгодоприобретателем настоящего договора и будет иметь право на принудительное осуществление этого договора от своего имени, как если бы он являлся компанией Adobe. 8.5 Возмещение ущерба. Вы соглашаетесь оградить от ответственности компанию Adobe и любой соответствующий Центр сертификации (кроме как в случаях, в явно выраженной форме оговоренных условиями и положениями) в связи с любыми обязательствами, убытками, исками, требованиями возмещения или претензиями (включая все разумные расходы, издержки и суммы вознаграждения юридическим консультантам), возникающими из использования или в результате зависимости от услуг данного центра, включая, но не ограничиваясь лишь этим, (a) использование истекшего или отозванного сертификата, (b) ненадлежащую верификацию сертификата, (c) использование сертификата в порядке ином, нежели разрешенный соответствующими условиями и положениями, настоящим договором или действующим законодательством, (d) непринятие в сложившихся обстоятельствах разумного решения в отношении использования услуг провайдера или сертификатов; либо (e) неисполнение любого обязательства из числа обязательств, предписанных условиями и положениями, имеющими отношение к услугам. 9. Отсутствие гарантий. Программное обеспечение предоставляется Вам на принципе «КАК ЕСТЬ» со ВСЕМИ ДЕФЕКТАМИ. КОМПАНИЯ ADOBE И ЕЕ ПОСТАВЩИКИ НЕ ГАРАНТИРУЮТ И НЕ МОГУТ ГАРАНТИРОВАТЬ РАБОЧИЕ ХАРАКТЕРИСТИКИ И РЕЗУЛЬТАТЫ, КОТОРЫЕ МОГУТ БЫТЬ ПОЛУЧЕНЫ ВАМИ ПРИ ИСПОЛЬЗОВАНИИ ПРОГРАММНОГО ОБЕСПЕЧЕНИЯ, УСЛУГ ЦЕНТРА СЕРТИФИКАЦИИ ИЛИ ПРЕДЛОЖЕНИЙ ТРЕТЬИХ ЛИЦ. ЗА ИСКЛЮЧЕНИЕМ ГАРАНТИЙ, УСЛОВИЙ ИЛИ ЗАЯВЛЕНИЙ И ПОЛОЖЕНИЙ, КОТОРЫЕ НЕ МОГУТ БЫТЬ В ТОМ ИЛИ ИНОМ ОБЪЕМЕ ИСКЛЮЧЕНЫ ИЛИ ОГРАНИЧЕНЫ ПО СООТВЕТСТВУЮЩЕМУ ЗАКОНОДАТЕЛЬСТВУ, РАСПРОСТРАНЯЮЩЕМУСЯ НА ВАС В ПРЕДЕЛАХ ВАШЕЙ ЮРИСДИКЦИИ, КОМПАНИЯ ADOBE, ЕЕ ПОСТАВЩИКИ И ЦЕНТРЫ СЕРТИФИКАЦИИ НЕ ДАЮТ НИКАКИХ ГАРАНТИЙ, НЕ УСТАНАВЛИВАЮТ УСЛОВИЙ, НЕ ДЕЛАЮТ НИКАКИХ ЗАЯВЛЕНИЙ, НИ ПРЯМО ВЫРАЖЕННЫХ, НИ ПОДРАЗУМЕВАЕМЫХ, ПО ЗАКОНУ, ОБЩЕМУ ПРАВУ, ОБЫЧАЮ, ПРАКТИКЕ ИЛИ ИНЫМ ОБРАЗОМ В ОТНОШЕНИИ КАКИХ БЫ ТО НИ БЫЛО ВОПРОСОВ, ВКЛЮЧАЯ, НО НЕ ОГРАНИЧИВАЯСЬ ТОЛЬКО ЭТИМ, НЕНАРУШЕНИЕ ПРАВ ТРЕТЬЕГО ЛИЦА, ПРИГОДНОСТЬ ДЛЯ ПРОДАЖИ, ВКЛЮЧЕНИЕ МАТЕРИАЛОВ, УДОВЛЕТВОРИТЕЛЬНОЕ КАЧЕСТВО ИЛИ ПРИГОДНОСТЬ ДЛЯ ЛЮБОЙ КОНКРЕТНОЙ ЦЕЛИ. Положения Разделов 9 и 10 сохраняют свою юридическую силу после окончания действия настоящего договора, независимо от причин прекращения договора. Вышесказанное, однако, не подразумевает и не

влечет какого бы то ни было продолжения права на использование Программного обеспечения после прекращения действия настоящего договора. 10. Ограничение ответственности. НИ КОМПАНИЯ ADOBE, НИ ЕЕ ПОСТАВЩИКИ, НИ ЦЕНТРЫ СЕРТИФИКАЦИИ НИ ПРИ КАКИХ ОБСТОЯТЕЛЬСТВАХ НЕ НЕСУТ ОТВЕТСТВЕННОСТИ ПЕРЕД ВАМИ ЗА КАКОЙ БЫ ТО НИ БЫЛО УЩЕРБ, ПРЕТЕНЗИИ ИЛИ РАСХОДЫ, ВКЛЮЧАЯ ОСОБЫЕ, ВЫТЕКАЮЩИЕ, СОПУТСТВУЮЩИЕ И КОСВЕННЫЕ УБЫТКИ, ИЛИ ЗА УПУЩЕННУЮ ВЫГОДУ ИЛИ УТРАЧЕННЫЕ НАКОПЛЕНИЯ, ИЛИ, В ТОМ ЧИСЛЕ, В СЛУЧАЯХ, КОГДА ПРЕДСТАВИТЕЛЮ КОМПАНИИ ADOBE БЫЛО СООБЩЕНО О ВОЗМОЖНОСТИ ТАКИХ УБЫТКОВ, УЩЕРБА ИЛИ ПРЕТЕНЗИЙ. ПЕРЕЧИСЛЕННЫЕ ВЫШЕ ОГРАНИЧЕНИЯ И ИСКЛЮЧЕНИЯ ДЕЙСТВУЮТ В ТОЙ МЕРЕ, В КАКОЙ ЭТО РАЗРЕШЕНО ПРИМЕНИМЫМ ЗАКОНОДАТЕЛЬСТВОМ В ПРЕДЕЛАХ ВАШЕЙ ЮРИСДИКЦИИ. ОБЩИЙ РАЗМЕР ОТВЕТСТВЕННОСТИ ADOBE, ЕЕ ПОСТАВЩИКОВ ИЛИ ЦЕНТРОВ СЕРТИФИКАЦИИ В СВЯЗИ С ОТВЕТСТВЕННОСТЬЮ, ВОЗНИКАЮЩЕЙ ИЗ НАСТОЯЩЕГО ДОГОВОРА ИЛИ В СВЯЗИ С НИМ, ОГРАНИЧИВАЕТСЯ СУММОЙ, УПЛАЧЕННОЙ ВАМИ ЗА ПРОГРАММНОЕ ОБЕСПЕЧЕНИЕ (ЕСЛИ ТАКОВАЯ ВНОСИЛАСЬ). Ни одно из положений настоящего договора не ограничивает ответственности Adobe перед Вами в случае причинения вреда жизни или здоровью физических лиц в результате халатности со стороны Adobe либо в результате гражданского правонарушения в виде намеренного введения в заблуждение (обман). Компания Adobe действует за своих поставщиков и Центры сертификации единственно для целей отказа, исключения и/или ограничения обязательств, гарантий и ответственности, предусмотренных настоящим договором, и ни для каких иных целей. Более подробные сведения по конкретным юрисдикциям (если это применимо) можно получить, изучив заключительную часть текста настоящего договора или обратившись в Отдел обслуживания клиентов компании Adobe. 11. Правила экспорта. Вы выражаете согласие с тем, что Программное обеспечение не будет отправляться, передаваться или экспортироваться в любое государство, равно как и не будет использоваться каким бы то ни было образом вопреки запрету, налагаемому Законом США «Об управлении экспортом», и вопреки иным законам, ограничениям или нормам, регулирующим экспорт (далее совместно: «Законодательство об экспорте»). Кроме того, в случае, если Программное обеспечение будет признано в соответствии с Законодательством об экспорте предметом экспортного контроля, Вы заявляете и гарантируете, что не являетесь гражданином и не находитесь по иным основаниям в пределах государства, в отношении которого действует экспортное эмбарго (включая, без ограничения только этими государствами, Иран, Сирию, Судан, Кубу и Северную Корею), и что Законодательство об экспорте не запрещает Вам получить Программное обеспечение. Все права на использование Программного обеспечения предоставляются Вам на условии, что такие права будут утрачены, если Вы не исполняете условия настоящего договора. 12. Регулирующее законодательство. Настоящий договор регулируется и подлежит толкованию в соответствии с материальным правом: (a) штата Калифорния, если лицензия на Программное обеспечение получена в момент Вашего пребывания в США, Канаде или Мексике; либо (b) Японии, если лицензия на Программное обеспечение приобретена в момент Вашего пребывания в Японии, Китае, Корее или другой стране Юго-Восточной Азии, где все официальные языки либо имеют идеографическое письмо (например, Hanzi, Kanji или Hanja) и (или) где система письма основана на идеографии или аналогична по структуре системе идеографического письма, например, Hangul или Kana; либо (c) Англии, если лицензия на Программное обеспечение получена в момент Вашего пребывания в любой из стран, не упомянутых выше. Неисключительной юрисдикцией в отношении всех споров по настоящему договору обладают соответствующие суды: округа Санта-Клара, шт. Калифорния, в случае применения законодательства штата Калифорния; Окружной суд Токио (Япония), в случае применения законодательства Японии; компетентные суды Лондона (Великобритания), в случае применения законодательства Англии. К настоящему договору не применяются положения коллизионного права любой страны, а равно и положения Конвенции ООН о договорах международной купли-продажи товаров, применение которых особо исключается.

13. Общие положения. Признание какой-либо части настоящего договора ничтожной и не имеющей законной силы не влияет на действительность остальных положений настоящего договора, которые продолжают оставаться юридически действительными и иметь законную силу в соответствии с условиями договора. Настоящий договор не ущемляет законных прав какой бы то ни было стороны, выступающей в качестве потребителя. Настоящий договор может быть изменен только письменно за подписью уполномоченного представителя компании Adobe. Компания Adobe может выдавать лицензии на Обновления с дополнительными или новыми условиями. Настоящий текст представляет собой полное соглашение между компанией Adobe и Вами в отношении Программного обеспечения и отменяет все ранее сделанные заявления, проведенные обсуждения, принятые обязательства, корреспонденцию и рекламные акции, относящиеся к Программному обеспечению. 14. К сведению конечных пользователей в госучреждениях США. В отношении конечных пользователей в государственных учреждениях США компания Adobe соглашается соблюдать требования всех законов о равных возможностях (по мере применимости) и положения указа Президента США № 11246 (с изменениями), Раздела 402 Закона о помощи ветеранам периода вьетнамской войны в приспособлении к современным условиям, 1974 г. (38 USC 4212), и Раздела 503 Закона о восстановлении в правах, 1973 г. (с изменениями), и постановлений, содержащихся в 41 CFR, части 60-1 по 60-60 включительно, 60-250 и 60-741. Оговорка о правовой защите интересов исторически ущемлённых групп, упомянутая в предыдущем предложении, включается в настоящий договор. 15. Выполнение требований лицензий. В случае, если Вы являетесь индивидуальным предпринимателем или юридическим лицом, Вы соглашаетесь с тем, что, по запросу компании Adobe или ее полномочных представителей, Вы обязаны в течение тридцати (30) дней в полном объеме документально подтвердить, что по состоянию на момент получения запроса использование любого и всего Программного обеспечения осуществляется в соответствии с выданной Вам компанией Adobe действующей лицензией. 16. Особые положения и исключения. 16.1 Ограничение ответственности перед пользователями, проживающими в Германии и Австрии. 16.1.1 В случае приобретения Вами Программного обеспечения в Германии или Австрии и при условии Вашего постоянного проживания в этих странах, положения Раздела 10 на Вас не распространяются. Вместо этого, исходя из положений Раздела 16.1.2, правовая ответственность компании Adobe за причиненный ущерб ограничивается следующим образом: (i) компания Adobe несет ответственность только в размере суммы ущерба, обычно предсказуемого на момент заключения лицензионного договора, причиненного нарушением по небрежности существенного договорного обязательства, и (ii) компания Adobe не несет ответственности за ущерб, причиненный нарушением по небрежности не являющегося существенным договорного обязательства. 16.1.2 Приведенное выше ограничение ответственности не распространяется на любые виды обязательной по закону ответственности, в частности, ответственности по Закону Германии «Об ответственности за продукцию», ответственность за принятие особых гарантийных обязательств или ответственность за виновное причинение телесных повреждений. 16.1.3 Вы должны предпринять разумные усилия в целях исключения или уменьшения ущерба, в частности, путем создания резервных копий Программного обеспечения и данных, хранящихся в Вашем компьютере (с учетом положений настоящего договора).

При возникновении вопросов по настоящему договору или при необходимости получить дополнительные сведения от компании Adobe просим использовать адрес и контактную информацию, приложенные к данному продукту или доступные на сайте www.adobe.com/ru, направлять запросы по месту расположения представительства компании Adobe на территории Вашей юрисдикции Adobe, AIR, Authorware, Flash, Reader и Shockwave являются либо зарегистрированными товарными знаками, либо товарными знаками корпорации Adobe Systems Incorporated в Соединенных Штатах Америки и/или других странах.

Reader_Player_AIR_WWEULA-ru_RU-20080204_1313

 

ADOBE SYSTEMS INCORPORATED Vylúčenie nárokov zo záruky a softvérová licenčná zmluva. TENTO DOKUMENT OBSAHUJE INFORMÁCIE O ZÁRUKE (ČASŤ I) A LICENČNÚ ZMLUVU, KTOROU SA SPRAVUJE POUŽÍVANIE SOFTVÉRU ADOBE (ČASŤ II). ČASŤ I. VYLÚČENIE NÁROKOV ZO ZÁRUKY. TENTO SOFTVÉR A OSTATNÉ INFORMÁCIE SÚ VÁM DODANÉ TAK „AKO SÚ“ SO VŠETKÝMI VADAMI. SPOLOČNOSŤ ADOBE, JEJ DODÁVATELIA A CERTIFIKAČNÉ ORGÁNY NERUČIA A NEMÔŽU RUČIŤ ZA VÝKONNOSŤ ALEBO VÝSLEDKY, KTORÉ MÔŽETE DOSIAHNUŤ POUŽITÍM SOFTVÉRU, SLUŽIEB CERTIFIKAČNÉHO ORGÁNU ALEBO PONUKAMI TRETÍCH OSÔB. S VÝNIMKOU ZÁRUKY, PODMIENKY, VYHLÁSENIA ALEBO USTANOVENIA V ROZSAHU, V KTOROM HO NEMOŽNO VYLÚČIŤ ALEBO OBMEDZIŤ PODĽA PRÁVNEHO PORIADKU PLATNÉHO VO VAŠEJ KRAJINE, SPOLOČNOSŤ ADOBE, CERTIFIKAČNÉ ORGÁNY A JEJ DODÁVATELIA VYLUČUJÚ VŠETKY ĎALŠIE ZÁRUKY, PODMIENKY, VYHLÁSENIA ALEBO USTANOVENIA (VÝSLOVNE VYJADRENÉ ALEBO IMPLICTNE VYPLÝVAJÚCE) ČI UŽ ZO ZÁKONOV, COMMON LAW, OBYČAJOV ALEBO ZO ZVYKOVÉHO PRÁVA V AKEJKOĽVEK ZÁLEŽITOSTI, VRÁTANE, NIE VŠAK VÝLUČNE, VO VZŤAHU K NEPORUŠOVANIU PRÁV TRETÍCH OSÔB, OBCHODOVATEĽNOSTI, INTEGRÁCII, USPOKOJIVEJ KVALITY ALEBO VHODNOSTI NA AKÝKOĽVEK ŠPECIFICKÝ ÚČEL. ČASŤ II. SOFTVÉROVÁ LICENČNÁ ZMLUVA. POUŽITÍM, KOPÍROVANÍM ALEBO ŠÍRENÍM TOHTO SOFTVÉRU ADOBE ALEBO JEHO ČASTI SÚHLASÍTE SO VŠETKÝMI PODMIENKAMI TEJTO ZMLUVY, NAJMÄ VRÁTANE S OBMEDZENIAMI POUŽITIA UVEDENÝMI V ČLÁNKU 2, PREVODITEĽNOSŤOU V ČLÁNKU 4, MOŽNOSŤAMI PRIPOJENIA A OCHRANOU SÚKROMIA V ČLÁNKU 6, ZÁRUKOU V ČLÁNKU 9 A ZODPOVEDNOSŤOU V ČLÁNKOCH 10 A 16. TÁTO ZMLUVA S VAŠIM SÚHLASOM JE VYNÚTITEĽNÁ VOČI VÁM A KAŽDEJ OSOBE, KTORÁ NADOBUDLA SOFTVÉR A V MENE KTOREJ JE POUŽÍVANÝ. AK S VYŠŠIE UVEDENÝM NESÚHLASÍTE, TAK SOFTVÉR NEPOUŽÍVAJTE. ADOBE VÁM TÝMTO UDEĽUJE SÚHLAS NA POUŽÍVANIE SOFTVÉRU, AVŠAK IBA V SÚLADE S USTANOVENIAMI TEJTO ZMLUVY. VYUŽITIE MATERIÁLOV PATRIACICH TRETÍM OSOBÁM, KTORÉ SÚ SÚČASŤOU SOFTVÉRU, MÔŽE BYŤ PREDMETOM USTANOVENÍ A PODMIENOK, KTORÉ SÚ SPRAVIDLA SÚČASŤOU SAMOSTATNEJ LICENČNEJ ZMLUVY, „READ ME“ („PREČÍTAJ MA“) SÚBORU UMIESTNENÉHO PRI TAKÝCHTO MATERIÁLOCH ALEBO V „UPOZORNENIACH K SOFTVÉRU TRETÍCH OSÔB A/ALEBO V DODATOČNÝCH USTANOVENIACH A PODMIENKACH“ NACHÁDZAJÚCICH SA NA STRÁNKE http://www.adobe.com/go/thirdparty_sk. 1. Definície. „Adobe“ je Adobe Systems Incorporated, spoločnosť zriadená podľa práva štátu Delaware, so sídlom 345 Park Avenue, San Jose, California 95110, ak sa aplikuje článok 12 (a) tejto zmluvy; inak sa týmto pojmom rozumie Adobe Systems Software Ireland Limited, Unit 3100, Lake Drive, City West Campus, Saggart D24, Írska republika, spoločnosť zriadená podľa práva Írskej republiky a dcérska spoločnosť a držiteľ licencie Adobe Systems Incorporated. „Počítačom“ sa rozumie virtuálne alebo fyzické elektronické zariadenie, ktoré prijíma informácie v digitálnej alebo podobnej forme a spracúva ich za účelom dosiahnutia osobitného výsledku založeného na slede inštrukcií. „Softvérom“ sa rozumie (a) úplný obsah súborov (dodaných elektronicky alebo na hmotnom médiu), disku(-ov), alebo iných médií, s ktorými bola táto zmluva poskytnutá, najmä (i) počítačové informácie a softvér Adobe, vrátane Adobe Reader® („Adobe Reader“), Adobe® AIR™ („Adobe AIR“), Adobe Flash® Player, Shockwave® Player a Authorware® Player (Adobe AIR a prehrávače Flash, Shockwave a Authorware sa ďalej spoločne označujú len ako „Adobe Runtimes“); (ii) súvisiace, vysvetľujúce, písomné materiály alebo súbory („Dokumentácia“); a (iii) fonty; a (b) zlepšenia (upgrady), upravené verzie, aktualizácie, doplnky a kópie

uvedeného, ktoré Vám boli poskytnuté spoločnosťou Adobe (spoločne ďalej označené len ako „Aktualizácie“). „Použitím“ sa rozumie prístup, inštalácia, stiahnutie, kopírovanie alebo iné získanie úžitku z funkčných vlastností Softvéru. 2. Licencia k Softvéru. Ak ste obdŕžali Softvér od spoločnosti Adobe alebo od jedného z oprávnených držiteľov jej licencie a v súlade s ustanoveniami tejto zmluvy vrátane obmedzení uvedených v článku 3, Adobe Vám udeľuje nevýhradnú licenciu na použitie Softvéru na účely uvedené v Dokumentácii tak, ako je uvedené ďalej: 2.1 Obvyklé použitie. Môžete nainštalovať a používať jednu kópiu Programu na Vašom kompatibilnom Počítači. Pozri dôležité obmedzenia používania Softvéru uvedené v článku 3. 2.2 Použitie na serveri. Táto zmluva Vám nepovoľuje nainštalovať alebo používať softvér na súborovom serveri. Informácie o použití softvéru na súborovom serveri nájdete na http://www.adobe.com/go/acrobat_distribute_sk, pokiaľ ide o Adobe Reader alebo na http://www.adobe.com/go/licensing_sk vo vzťahu k Adobe Runtimes. 2.3 Distribúcia. Táto licencia Vám neudeľuje právo poskytovať ďalšie licencie alebo rozširovať Softvér. Za účelom informovania sa o získaní práva na rozširovanie Softvéru na hmotných médiách alebo cez vnútornú sieť alebo s Vaším produktom alebo službou, prosím, navštívte http://www.adobe.com/go/acrobat_distribute_sk, pokiaľ ide o Adobe Reader alebo http://www.adobe.com/go/licensing_sk vo vzťahu k Adobe Runtimes. 2.4 Záložná kópia. Ste oprávnený vyrobiť jednu záložnú kópiu Softvéru za predpokladu, že Vaša záložná kópia nie je nainštalovaná alebo použitá. Nesmiete previesť práva k záložnej kópii bez toho, aby ste previedli všetky práva k Softvéru, tak ako je uvedené v Článku 4. 3. Povinnosti a obmedzenia. 3.1 Obmedzenia k Adobe Runtime. Nesmiete Používať Adobe Runtime na akomkoľvek zariadení, ktoré nie je PC, alebo na zariadení s „embedded“ alebo „device“ verziou akéhokoľvek operačného systému. Za účelom predchádzania pochybnostiam a iba ako príklad, Adome Runtime nesmiete použiť na žiadnom (a) mobilnom zariadení, zariadení na dekódovanie televízneho signálu (set top box, STB), handhelde, telefóne, web pade, tabletovom zariadení a tabletovom PC (ktoré nepoužíva Windows XP Tablet PC Edition a jeho nástupcov), hracej konzole, televízore, DVD prehrávači, počítači uspôsobenom primárne na prehrávanie médií, t.j. media center (s výnimkou Windows XP Media Center Edition a jeho nástupcov), elektronickom billboarde alebo inom digitálnom značení, internetovom spotrebiči alebo inom s internetom prepojenom zariadení, PDA, zdravotníckom spotrebiči, bankomate, telematickom zariadení, hracom zariadení, domácom automatizujúcom systéme, kiosku, diaľkovom ovládači alebo akomkoľvek inom spotrebiteľskom elektronickom zariadení, (b) na mobilných, káblových, satelitných alebo televíznych systémoch umiestnených u operátorov alebo (c) na iných uzavretých systémových zariadeniach. Pre informácie o získaní licencie k Adobe Runtimes na použitie v takýchto systémoch, prosím, navštívte http://www.adobe.com/go/licensing_sk. 3.2 Obmedzenia k Adobe Reader. Adobe Reader je predmetom licencie spoločnosti Adobe a je rozširovaný spoločnosťou Adobe za účelom prezerania, rozširovania a zdieľania PDF súborov. 3.2.1 Obmedzenia ku konverziám. Nebudete integrovať alebo používať Adobe Reader s akýmkoľvek iným softvérom, plug-inom alebo rozšírením, ktoré využíva alebo je založené na Adobe Reader pri konvertovaní alebo transformovaní PDF súborov do iných formátov (napr. PDF súbor do súboru TIFF, JPEG alebo SVG). 3.2.2 Obmedzenia k plug-in. Nebudete integrovať alebo používať Adobe Reader s iným plug-in softvérom, ktorý nebol vyvinutý v súlade s Základnou licenčnou zmluvou spoločnosti Adobe o integrácií („Adobe Integration Key License Agreement“). 3.2.3 Vypnuté funkcie. Adobe Reader môže obsahovať funkcie alebo funkčné vlastnosti, ktoré sú skryté alebo sa objavia ako vypnuté alebo sú vyznačené v šedej farbe („Vypnuté funkcie“). Vypnuté funkcie sa aktivujú iba v prípade otvorenia PDF dokumentu, ktorý bol vytvorený pomocou odblokovávacej technológie, ktorá je dostupná iba od spoločnosti Adobe. Nebudete pristupovať alebo sa pokúšať pristupovať k žiadnym Vypnutým funkciám, inak ako

prostredníctvom takýchto odblokovávacích technológií, a ani sa nebudete pokúšať vytvoriť prostredníctvom Adobe Reader funkciu výrazne podobnú niektorej Vypnutej funkcii alebo inak obísť technológiu, ktorá riadi aktiváciu takejto funkcie. Ďalšie informácie o vypnutých funkciách si prosím pozrite na http://www.adobe.com/go/readerextensions_sk. 3.3 Upozornenie. Každá kópia Softvéru, ktorú vyhotovíte, musí obsahovať rovnaké upozornenie o autorských právach a iné informácie o vlastníctve, tak ako sa objavia na alebo v Softvéri. 3.4 Zákaz zmien a reverzného inžinierstva. Nesmiete Softvér meniť, prispôsobovať, prekladať alebo vytvárať na jeho základe odvodené diela. Nesmiete používať reverzné inžinierstvo, dekompilovať, rozoberať alebo sa inak pokúšať o objavenie zdrojového kódu Softvéru s výnimkou reverzného inžinierstva a dekompilácie v rozsahu výslovne povolenom príslušným zákonom. 4. Prevod. Nesmiete Softvér prenajímať, uzatvárať k nemu lízingové zmluvy, udeľovať sublicencie, postúpiť alebo previesť Vaše práva k nemu, alebo poskytnúť oprávnenie na kopírovanie celého Softvéru alebo ktorejkoľvek jeho časti do Počítača iného užívateľa s výnimkami výslovne uvedenými v tejto zmluve. Môžete však trvale previesť všetky Vaše práva týkajúce sa používania Softvéru na ďalšiu fyzickú alebo právnickú osobu za predpokladu, že (a) tiež prevediete na takúto fyzickú alebo právnickú osobu (i) túto zmluvu, (ii) Softvér a všetok ostatný softvér alebo hardvér zbalený alebo predinštalovaný so Softvérom, vrátane všetkých kópií, aktualizácií a predošlých verzií; (b) nebudete uchovávať žiadne kópie, vrátane záloh a kópií uložených v Počítači; a (c) nadobúdateľ pristúpi k ustanoveniam a podmienkam tejto zmluvy a akýmkoľvek iným ustanoveniam a podmienkam, na základe ktorých ste Vy nadobudli platnú licenciu k Softvéru. Napriek vyššie uvedenému, nesmiete previesť výučbové kópie Softvéru, kópie Softvéru vydané pred uvedením produktu na trh alebo kópie, ktoré nie sú určené na ďalší predaj. 5. Duševné vlastníctvo, výhrada práv. Softvér a všetky oprávnené kópie, ktoré vytvoríte, sú duševným vlastníctvom spoločnosti Adobe Systems Incorporated a jej dodávateľov. Štruktúra, organizácia a kód Softvéru predstavujú hodnotné obchodné tajomstvo a utajované informácie spoločnosti Adobe Systems Incorporated a jej dodávateľov. Softvér je chránený zákonom, vrátane, avšak nie výlučne, zákonmi na ochranu autorského práva Spojených štátov a ďalších krajín a ustanoveniami medzinárodných zmlúv. Ak nie je v tejto zmluve výslovne uvedené inak, táto zmluva Vám neposkytuje žiadne práva duševného vlastníctva k tomuto Softvéru a všetky práva, ktoré nie sú výslovne udelené, patria výhradne spoločnosti Adobe a jej dodávateľom. 6. Možnosti pripojenia a ochrana súkromia. 6.1 Používanie PDF súborov. Ak používate softvér na otváranie PDF súboru, ktorý umožňuje zobrazovanie reklám prostredníctvom registrácie v službe Ads for Adobe PDF (Reklamy pre Adobe PDF), váš počítač sa môže pripájať na webovú stránku obsluhovaná spoločnosťou Adobe, zadávateľom reklamy alebo treťou stranou. Pritom sa odosiela Vaša adresa internetového protokolu (IP). Subjekt hosťujúci na stránke môže využívať technológiu na posielanie (alebo doručovanie) reklamného alebo iného elektronického obsahu, ktorý sa zobrazí v otvorenom súbore alebo vedľa neho. Prevádzkovateľ webovej stránky môže tiež použiť JavaScript, webové majáky (web beacons) (tiež známe ako značky akcií (action tags) alebo obrázky obsahujúce jeden pixel (single pixel gifs)) a iné technológie na zvýšenie a meranie účinnosti reklamy a prispôsobenie reklamného obsahu. Vaša komunikácia s webovými stránkami Adobe sa riadi Politikou online ochrany súkromia spoločnosti Adobe uvedenou na stránke http://www.adobe.com/go/privacy_sk. Spoločnosť Adobe nemusí mať prístup alebo kontrolu nad funkciami, ktoré tretia osoba môže využívať a informačné postupy webových stránok tretích osôb nie sú predmetom Politiky online ochrany súkromia spoločnosti Adobe. 6.2 Aktualizácia. Uznávate a súhlasíte s tým, že Softvér môže automaticky pripojiť Váš Počítač na Internet, aby overil možnosti aktualizácií, ktoré sú k dispozícii na automatické stiahnutie do Vášho Počítača a oznámiť spoločnosti Adobe, že Softvér je úspešne nainštalovaný. Pritom sa spoločnosti Adobe prenášajú iba identifikačné informácie neosobného charakteru. Vaša komunikácia s webovými stránkami Adobe sa riadi Politikou online

ochrany súkromia spoločnosti Adobe uvedenou na stránke http://www.adobe.com/go/privacy_sk. Prosím, hľadajte informácie o zmenách štandardného nastavenia aktualizácií v Dokumentácii. 6.3 Settings Manager. Prehrávač Flash Player umožní uložiť určité užívateľské nastavenia ako lokálne zdieľaný objekt na Vašom Počítači. Tieto nastavenia nie sú s Vami spojené, ale umožnia Vám konfigurovať niektoré nastavenia v rámci prehrávača Flash Player. Viac informácii o lokálne zdieľaných objektoch môžete nájsť na stránke http://www.adobe.com/go/flashplayer_security_sk a viac informácii o Settings Manager na stránke http://www.adobe.com/go/settingsmanager_sk. 7. Ponuky tretích osôb. Softvér Vám môže umožňovať prístup a prepojenie s webovým stránkami tretích osôb, softvérovými aplikáciami a dátovými službami vrátane internetových aplikácií („Ponuky tretích osôb“). Váš prístup k Ponukám tretích osôb a ich využívanie, vrátane akýchkoľvek tovarov, služieb alebo informácii, sa spravuje ustanoveniami a podmienkami týkajúcimi sa týchto ponúk. Ponuky tretích osôb nevlastní ani neposkytuje spoločnosť Adobe. 8. Digitálne certifikáty. 8.1 Použitie. Softvér Adobe AIR používa digitálne certifikáty, aby Vám pomohol identifikovať vydavateľa aplikácií Adobe AIR vytvorených tretími osobami. Adobe Reader využíva digitálne certifikáty na podpisovanie a overovanie podpisov v dokumentoch PDF a overovanie certifikovaných dokumentov PDF. Váš Počítač sa môže počas overovania digitálneho certifikátu pripojiť na Internet. Digitálne certifikáty vydávajú tretie osoby ako certifikačné orgány, vrátane poskytovateľov služieb certifikovaných dokumentov Adobe (CDS - Adobe Certified Document Services) uvedených na adrese http://www.adobe.com/go/partners_cds_sk („Certifikačné orgány”) alebo môžu byť podpísané vlastným podpisom. 8.2 Podmienky. Kúpa, použitie a spoľahlivosť digitálnych certifikátov je vzťahom medzi Vami a Certifikačným orgánom. Predtým než sa spoľahnete na certifikovaný dokument, digitálny podpis alebo služby Certifikačného orgánu, mali by ste sa oboznámiť s platnými podmienkami, podľa ktorých príslušný Certifikačný orgán poskytuje služby, vrátane napríklad predplatiteľských zmlúv, dohôd o používaní certifikátov, certifikačných politík a podmienok poskytovania. Pre informácie o poskytovateľoch CDS Adobe pozrite odkazy na http://www.adobe.com/go/partners_cds_sk. 8.3 Súhlas. Súhlasíte s tým, že (a) certifikát môže byť v čase overovania už odvolaný, čo spôsobí, že digitálny podpis alebo certifikát sa zdá byť platný, hoci v skutočnosti nie je, (b) bezpečnosť alebo celistvosť digitálneho certifikátu mohla byť narušená z dôvodu nejakého komisívneho alebo omisívneho konania osoby, ktorá dokument podpísala, príslušného Certifikačného orgánu alebo inej tretej osoby a (c) certifikát môže byť certifikátom s vlastným podpisom, ktorý neposkytol Certifikačný orgán. VY STE VÝLUČNE ZODPOVEDNÝ ZA ROZHODNUTIE, ČI SA SPOLIEHAŤ NA CERTIFIKÁT ALEBO NIE. POKIAĽ VÁM CERTIFIKAČNÝ ORGÁN NEPOSKYTNE SAMOSTATNÚ PÍSOMNÚ ZÁRUKU, POUŽÍVATE DIGITÁLNE CERTIFIKÁTY VÝHRADNE NA VLASTNÉ NEBEZPEČENSTVO. 8.4 Oprávnená tretia osoba. Súhlasíte s tým, že akýkoľvek Certifikačný orgán, na ktorý sa spoliehate, je oprávnenou treťou osobou a bude mať právo vynútiť si dodržanie tejto zmluvy vo svojom mene tak, ako keby bol spoločnosťou Adobe. 8.5 Náhrada škody. Súhlasíte s tým, že spoločnosť Adobe ani žiadny Certifikačný orgán (s výnimkou, ak je to výslovne uvedené v jeho podmienkach) nebudete viniť z akejkoľvek zodpovednosti, strát, konaní, škôd, alebo náhrad (vrátane akýchkoľvek rozumných výdavkov, nákladov a odmien advokátov), ktoré vznikli alebo súvisia s použitím alebo spoľahnutím sa na akékoľvek služby tohto orgánu, najmä za (a) spoľahlivosť prepadnutého alebo odvolaného certifikátu; (b) nesprávne overenie certifikátu, (c) použitie certifikátu inak, ako je dovolené príslušnými podmienkami, touto zmluvou alebo platnými zákonmi, (d) nesprávne posúdenie okolností, od ktorých závisí spoľahnutie sa na služby alebo certifikáty ich poskytovateľa alebo (e) nesplnenie akejkoľvek povinnosti, ktorú ukladajú príslušné podmienky vzťahujúce sa na služby. 9. ŽIADNA ZÁRUKA.

Tento softvér je Vám dodaný tak „AKO JE“ a so VŠETKÝMI VADAMI. Spoločnosť Adobe, jej dodávatelia a certifikačné orgány neručia a nemôžu ručiť za výkonnosť alebo výsledky, ktoré môžete dosiahnuť použitím softvéru, služieb certifikačného orgánu alebo ponukami tretích osôb. S VÝNIMKOU ZÁRUKY, PODMIENKY, VYHLÁSENIA ALEBO USTANOVENIA V ROZSAHU, V KTOROM HO NEMOŽNO VYLÚČIŤ ALEBO OBMEDZIŤ PODĽA PRÁVNEHO PORIADKU PLATNÉHO VO VAŠEJ KRAJINE, SPOLOČNOSŤ ADOBE, certifikačné orgány a JEJ DODÁVATELIA VYLUČUJÚ VŠETKY ĎALŠIE ZÁRUKY, PODMIENKY, VYHLÁSENIA ALEBO USTANOVENIA (VÝSLOVNE VYJADRENÉ ALEBO IMPLICTNE VYPLÝVAJÚCE) ČI UŽ ZO ZÁKONOV, COMMON LAW, OBYČAJOV ALEBO ZO ZVYKOVÉHO PRÁVA V AKEJKOĽVEK ZÁLEŽITOSTI, VRÁTANE, NIE VŠAK VÝLUČNE, VO VZŤAHU K NEPORUŠOVANIU PRÁV TRETÍCH OSÔB, OBCHODOVATEĽNOSTI, INTEGRÁCII, USPOKOJIVEJ KVALITY ALEBO VHODNOSTI NA AKÝKOĽVEK ŠPECIFICKÝ ÚČEL. Ustanovenia článkov 9 a 10 zostanú v platnosti aj po ukončení doby platnosti tejto zmluvy bez ohľadu na to, z akého dôvodu zanikla, avšak z tohto ustanovenia nevyplýva, ani toto ustanovenie nevytvára žiadne trvalé právo používať Softvér po ukončení doby platnosti zmluvy. 10. Obmedzenie zodpovednosti. SPOLOČNOSŤ ADOBE A JEJ DODÁVATELIA ALEBO CERTIFIKAČNÉ ORGÁNY V ŽIADNOM PRÍPADE NEZDOPOVEDAJÚ ZA AKÉKOĽVEK ŠKODY, NÁROKY ALEBO VÝDAVKY AKÉHOKOĽVEK DRUHU VRÁTANE AKÝCHKOĽVEK NÁSLEDNÝCH, NEPRIAMYCH ALEBO NÁHODNÝCH ŠKÔD ALEBO AKÉHOKOĽVEK UŠLÉHO ZISKU ALEBO AKÝCHKOĽVEK STRÁT NA ÚSPORÁCH, AJ KEĎ ZÁSTUPCA SPOLOČNOSTI ADOBE BOL UPOZORNENÝ NA MOŽNOSŤ TAKEJTO STRATY, ŠKODY ALEBO NÁROKOV. PREDCHÁDZAJÚCE OBMEDZENIA A VÝNIMKY SA POUŽIJÚ V ROZSAHU PRÍPUSTNOM PODĽA PLATNÉHO PRÁVNEHO PORIADKU VAŠEJ KRAJINY. CELKOVÁ ZODPOVEDNOSŤ SPOLOČNOSTI ADOBE, JEJ DODÁVATEĽOV A CERTIFIKAČNÝCH ORGÁNOV PODĽA TEJTO ZMLUVY ALEBO V SÚVISLOSTI S TOUTO ZMLUVOU, JE OBMEDZENÁ NA SUMU, ZAPLATENÚ ZA SOFTVÉR, AK VÔBEC JE. Nič, čo je uvedené v tejto zmluve, neobmedzuje zodpovednosť spoločnosti Adobe voči Vám pre prípad smrti alebo zranenia vyplývajúceho z nedbanlivosti spoločnosti Adobe alebo z deliktu podvodného konania (podvod). Spoločnosť Adobe koná v mene svojich dodávateľov a Certifikačných orgánov za účelom odopretia, vylúčenia a obmedzenia záväzkov, záruk a zodpovednosti, poskytnutých touto zmluvou, ale nekoná v ich mene v žiadnom inom ohľade ani za žiadnym iným účelom. Pre ďalšie informácie si, prosím, pozrite osobitné ustanovenia na konci tejto zmluvy týkajúce sa platných právnych poriadkov jednotlivých krajín, ak sa také v zmluve nachádzajú, alebo kontaktujte Oddelenie pre služby zákazníkom spoločnosti Adobe. 11. Pravidlá pre vývoz. Súhlasíte s tým, že nebudete tento Softvér prepravovať, prenášať alebo vyvážať do žiadnej krajiny alebo používať spôsobom zakázaným v United States Export Administration Act alebo v iných zákonoch, obmedzeniach alebo predpisoch týkajúcich sa vývozu (spoločne len „Exportné zákony“). Navyše, ak je podľa Exportných zákonov tento Softvér identifikovaný ako druh tovaru kontrolovaný pri vývoze, týmto vyhlasujete a zaručujete sa, že nie ste občanom alebo inak nesídlite v krajine, na ktorú sa vzťahuje embargo (zahrňujúc najmä, nie však výlučne, Irán, Sýriu, Sudán, Kubu a Severnú Kóreu), a že Vám Exportné zákony iným spôsobom nezakazujú tento Softvér prijať. Všetky práva Používať Softvér sú udelené za podmienky, že ak porušíte ustanovenia tejto zmluvy, ste týchto práv pozbavený. 12. Rozhodné právo. Táto zmluva sa spravuje a vykladá v súlade s platným hmotným právom účinným: (a) v štáte Kalifornia, ak je licencia k tomuto Softvéru nadobudnutá na území Spojených štátov, Kanady alebo Mexika; alebo (b) v Japonsku, ak je licencia k tomuto Softvéru nadobudnutá na území Japonska, Číny, Kórey, alebo inej krajiny Juhovýchodnej Ázie, kde sú všetky úradné jazyky písané buď ideografickým písmom (napr. hanzi, kanji alebo hanja) a/alebo iným písmom, ktoré je založené na ideografickom písme alebo má podobnú štruktúru, ako je hangul alebo kana; alebo (c) v Anglicku, ak je licencia k tomuto Softvéru nadobudnutá na území, ktoré patrí pod akúkoľvek inú jurisdikciu ako uvedenú vyššie. Príslušné súdy v Santa Clara County v Kalifornii, ak sa aplikuje právo štátu Kalifornia, okresný súd (District Court) v Tokiu v Japonsku, ak sa aplikuje japonské právo a príslušné súdy v Londýne v Anglicku, ak sa aplikuje anglické právo, majú nevýlučnú súdnu právomoc k všetkým sporom súvisiacim s touto zmluvou. Táto

zmluva sa nespravuje kolíznymi normami žiadnej jurisdikcie ani Viedenským dohovorom OSN o medzinárodnej kúpe tovaru, aplikácia ktorého je týmto výslovne vylúčená. 13. Všeobecné ustanovenia. Ak ktorékoľvek ustanovenie tejto zmluvy bude vyhlásené za neplatné alebo nevynútiteľné, nemá to vplyv na platnosť ostatných ustanovení tejto zmluvy, ktoré zostanú aj naďalej platné a budú vynútiteľné v súlade so svojimi podmienkami. Táto zmluva neobmedzuje zákonné práva akejkoľvek osoby v postavení spotrebiteľa. Táto zmluva sa môže meniť iba v písomnej forme podpísanej oprávneným zástupcom spoločnosti Adobe. Licenciu k aktualizáciám Vám spoločnosť Adobe môže poskytnúť podľa ďalších alebo iných podmienok. Toto je úplná dohoda medzi Vami a spoločnosťou Adobe vzťahujúca sa k Softvéru a nahrádza všetky predchádzajúce vyhlásenia, rokovania, prísľuby, prejavy a reklamu súvisiacu so Softvérom. 14. Upozornenie pre koncových užívateľov z vládnych inštitúcii USA. Ak sa jedná o koncových užívateľov z vládnych inštitúcií USA, spoločnosť Adobe súhlasí s tým, že splní ustanovenia všetkých aplikovateľných zákonov o rovnosti príležitostí vrátane, ak je to odôvodnené, ustanovenia Executive Order 11246 v znení zmien, § 402 Zákona o podpore prispôsobenia pre veteránov z vietnamskej éry („Vietnam Era Veterans Readjustment Assistance Act“) z roku 1974 (38 USC 4212) a § 503 Zákona o rehabilitácii („Rehabilitation Act“) z roku 1973 v znení zmien a úpravy uvedenej v 41 CFR časť 60-1 až 60-60, 60-250 a 60-741. Doložka o pozitívnej diskriminácií, ako aj úprava zahrnutá v predošlej vete bude zapracovaná vo forme odkazu v tejto zmluve. 15. Súlad s licenciou. Ak ste podnikateľ alebo organizácia, súhlasíte s tým, že na požiadanie od spoločnosti Adobe alebo jej oprávneného zástupcu do tridsiatich (30) dní plne zdokumentujete a preukážete, že používanie Softvéru spoločnosti Adobe v okamihu žiadosti je v súlade s platnými licenciami udelenými spoločnosťou Adobe. 16. Osobitné ustanovenia a výnimky. 16.1 Obmedzenie zodpovednosti pre užívateľov sídliacich v Nemecku a v Rakúsku. 16.1.1 Ak ste Softvér nadobudli v Nemecku alebo Rakúsku a zvyčajne sídlite v niektorej z týchto krajín, potom sa neaplikuje článok 10. Namiesto toho v súlade s článkom 16.1.2 bude zákonná zodpovednosť za škodu spoločnosti Adobe obmedzená nasledovne: (i) spoločnosť Adobe zodpovedá za škody len do výšky škôd rozumne predvídateľnej v čase uzavretia kúpnej zmluvy vo vzťahu k škodám spôsobeným mierne nedbanlivostným porušením podstatných zmluvných povinností a (ii) spoločnosť Adobe nezodpovedá za škody spôsobené mierne nedbanlivostným porušením nepodstatných zmluvných povinností. 16.1.2 Vyššie uvedené obmedzenia zodpovednosti sa nevzťahujú na akúkoľvek povinnú zákonnú zodpovednosť, najmä na zodpovednosť podľa nemeckého zákona o zodpovednosti výrobcu za výrobok („German Product Liability Act“), zodpovednosť za prevzatie osobitnej záruky alebo zodpovednosť za úmyselné poškodenie zdravia. 16.1.3 Ste povinný vykonať všetky rozumné opatrenia smerujúce k tomu, aby ste predišli vzniku škody a k ich prípadnému zníženiu najmä tým, že vytvoríte záložné kópie Softvéru a svojich počítačových dát v súlade s ustanoveniami tejto zmluvy.

Ak máte ďalšie otázky týkajúce sa tejto zmluvy alebo ak si želáte získať akékoľvek iné informácie od spoločnosti Adobe, prosím, kontaktuje pobočku Adobe pre Vašu krajinu pomocou adresy a kontaktných informácií uvedených v produkte alebo získaných cez webovú stránku www.adobe.com/sk.

Adobe, AIR, Authorware, Flash, Reader a Shockwave sú buď registrované ochranné známky alebo ochranné známky spoločnosti Adobe Systems Incorporated v Spojených štátoch a/alebo v iných krajinách.

Reader_Player_AIR_WWEULA-sk_SK-20080204_1313

 

ADOBE SYSTEMS INCORPORATED Zavrnitev jamstva in licenčna pogodba za programsko opremo. V TA DOKUMENT SO VKLJUČENE INFORMACIJE O JAMSTVU (I. DEL) IN LICENČNA POGODBA, KI UREJA UPORABO PROGRAMSKE OPREME DRUŽBE ADOBE (II. DEL). I. DEL - ZAVRNITEV JAMSTVA. PROGRAMSKA OPREMA IN DRUGE INFORMACIJE SO NA VOLJO V TAKI OBLIKI, »KOT SO«, IN Z VSEMI NAPAKAMI. DRUŽBA ADOBE IN NJENI DOBAVITELJI TER OVERITELJI POTRDIL NE ODGOVARJAJO IN NE MOREJO ODGOVARJATI ZA DELOVANJE ALI REZULTATE, KI JIH LAHKO DOBITE Z UPORABO PROGRAMSKE OPREME, STORITEV OVERITELJA POTRDIL ALI DRUGIH PONUDB TRETJIH OSEB. RAZEN V OBSEGU, V KAKRŠNEM V OKVIRU ZAKONODAJE, KI VELJA ZA VAS V VAŠI PRISTOJNOSTI, NOBENO JAMSTVO, POGOJ, ZAGOTOVILO ALI DOLOČILO NE SME ALI NE MORE BITI IZKLJUČENO ALI OMEJENO, DRUŽBA ADOBE IN NJENI DOBAVITELJI TER OVERITELJI POTRDIL NE DAJEJO NOBENIH JAMSTEV, POGOJEV, ZAGOTOVIL ALI DOLOČIL (IZRECNIH ALI NAZNAČENIH, BODISI NA PODLAGI ZAKONA, SODNE PRAKSE, OBČEGA PRAVA, OBIČAJEV, UZANC ALI DRUGIH PREDPISOV) GLEDE KAKRŠNIH KOLI ZADEV, VKLJUČNO Z - IN BREZ OMEJITVE NA - NEKRŠITEV PRAVIC INTELEKTUALNE LASTNINE TRETJIH OSEB, PRIMERNOST ZA PRODAJO, INTEGRACIJO, ZADOVOLJIVO KAKOVOST ALI PRIMERNOST ZA KATERI KOLI DOLOČEN NAMEN. II. DEL - LICENČNA POGODBA ZA PROGRAMSKO OPREMO. Z UPORABO, KOPIRANJEM ALI DISTRIBUIRANJEM CELOTNE PROGRAMSKE OPREME DRUŽBE ADOBE ALI KATEREGA KOLI NJENEGA DELA, SPREJEMATE VSE POGOJE IN DOLOČILA TE POGODBE, VKLJUČNO IN ŠE POSEBEJ S PREDPISI GLEDE: UPORABE, OBRAVNAVANE V POGLAVJU 2, PRENOSLJIVOSTI, OBRAVNAVANE V POGLAVJU 4, POVEZLJIVOSTI IN ZASEBNOSTI, OBRAVNAVANIH V POGLAVJU 6, JAMSTVA, OBRAVNAVANEGA V POGLAVJU 9, IN ODŠKODNINSKE ODGOVORNOSTI, OBRAVNAVANE V POGLAVJIH 10 IN 16. S SPREJEMANJEM TE POGODBE JE TA POGODBA IZVRŠLJIVA NASPROTI VAM IN VSAKI PRAVNI OSEBI, KI JE PRIDOBILA TO PROGRAMSKO OPREMO IN V IMENU KATERE SE UPORABLJA. ČE POGOJEV IN DOLOČIL NE SPREJEMATE, PROGRAMSKE OPREME NE UPORABLJAJTE. DRUŽBA ADOBE DOVOLJUJE, DA TO PROGRAMSKO OPREMO UPORABLJATE SAMO V SKLADU S POGOJI TE POGODBE. ZA UPORABO GRADIVA NEKATERIH TRETJIH OSEB, KI JE VKLJUČENO V PROGRAMSKO OPREMO, LAHKO VELJAJO DRUGI POGOJI IN DOLOČILA, KI SO OBIČAJNO NAVEDENI V LOČENI LICENČNI POGODBI, DATOTEKI »READ ME« (BERI ME), KI SE NAHAJA OB TEH GRADIVIH, ALI »OBVESTILIH GLEDE PROGRAMSKE OPREME TRETJIH OSEB IN/ALI DODATNIH POGOJIH IN DOLOČILIH«, KI SO NA VOLJO NA SPLETNEM MESTU http://www.adobe.com/go/thirdparty_si. 1. Definicije. »Adobe« pomeni družbo Adobe Systems Incorporated, družbo iz zvezne države Delaware, ki ima sedež na naslovu 345 Park Avenue, San Jose, California 95110, če velja podpoglavje 12 (a) te pogodbe; sicer pa pomeni družbo Adobe Systems Software Ireland Limited, Unit 3100, Lake Drive, City West Campus, Saggart D24, Republika Irska, družbo, ki je organizirana po zakonih Irske in je lastniško povezano podjetje ter pridobitelj licence družbe Adobe Systems Incorporated. »Računalnik« pomeni navidezno ali fizično osebno elektronsko napravo, ki sprejema informacije v digitalni ali podobni obliki in jih obdela za doseganje določenega rezultata na podlagi zaporedja navodil. »Programska oprema« pomeni (a) celotno vsebino datotek (pridobljenih po elektronski poti ali na fizičnem nosilcu podatkov) ali disk(-e) ali druge nosilce podatkov, ki jim je ta pogodba priložena, med katere lahko sodijo (i) podatki o računalnikih ali programska oprema družbe Adobe ali tretje osebe, vključno s programi Adobe Reader®

(»Adobe Reader«), Adobe® AIR™ (»Adobe AIR«), Adobe Flash® Player, Shockwave® Player in Authorware® Player (Adobe AIR in predvajalniki Flash, Shockwave in Authorware se s skupnim imenom imenujejo »Adobe Runtimes«); (ii) sorodno pisno gradivo in datoteke s pojasnili (»dokumentacija«) in (iii) pisave ter (b) nadgradnje, spremenjene različice, posodobitve, dodatke za in kopije zgoraj omenjenih programov, ki vam jih kadar koli zagotovi družba Adobe (zbirno imenovane »posodobitve«). »Uporaba« pomeni dostopanje, nameščanje, prenašanje, kopiranje ali na drugačen način pridobivanje ugodnosti z uporabo funkcionalnosti programske opreme. 2. Licenca za programsko opremo. Če ste to programsko opremo dobili od družbe Adobe ali enega od njenih pooblaščenih pridobiteljev licence in pod pogojem, da ravnate v skladu s pogoji te pogodbe, vključno z omejitvami v poglavju 3, vam družba Adobe podeljuje neizključno licenco za uporabo programske opreme na način in za namene, opisane v dokumentaciji, kot sledi: 2.1 Splošna uporaba. V svoj združljivi računalnik lahko namestite in v njem uporabljate en izvod programske opreme. Pomembne omejitve glede uporabe programske opreme so navedene v poglavju 3. 2.2 Uporaba v strežniku. Ta pogodba ne dovoljuje namestitve ali uporabe programske opreme v računalniškem datotečnem strežniku. Za informacije o uporabi programske opreme v računalniškem datotečnem strežniku obiščite spletno mesto http://www.adobe.com/go/acrobat_distribute_si, kjer so na voljo informacije o programu Adobe Reader, ali spletno mesto http://www.adobe.com/go/licensing_si, kjer so na voljo informacije o programih Adobe Runtimes. 2.3 Distribucija. Ta licenca ne podeljuje pravice za podlicenciranje ali distribucijo programske opreme. Za informacije o tem, kako pridobiti pravico za distribucijo programske opreme na fizičnem nosilcu podatkov, prek notranjega omrežja ali s svojim izdelkom ali storitvijo, obiščite spletno mesto http://www.adobe.com/go/acrobat_distribute_si, kjer so na voljo informacije o programu Adobe Reader, ali spletno mesto http://www.adobe.com/go/licensing_si, kjer so na voljo informacije o programih Adobe Runtimes. 2.4 Varnostna kopija. Izdelate lahko eno varnostno kopijo programske opreme, pod pogojem, da varnostne kopije ne namestite ali uporabljate. Pravice do varnostne kopije ne smete prenesti, razen če prenesete vse pravice na programski opremi, kot je to določeno v poglavju 4. 3. Obveznosti in omejitve. 3.1 Omejitve glede programov Adobe Runtime. Nobenega programa Adobe Runtime ne smete uporabljati v nobeni napravi, ki ni osebni računalnik, ali s katero koli vgrajeno napravo ali različico naprave katerega koli operacijskega sistema. V izogib dvomu in samo za ponazoritev, programa Adobe Runtime ne smete uporabljati v kateri koli (a) mobilni napravi, TV-komunikatorju, dlančniku, telefonu, spletni beležki, tabličnem računalniku in tabličnem osebnem računalniku (razen v tistih, v katerih je nameščen operacijski sistem Windows XP Tablet PC Edition in njegove novejše različice), igralni konzoli, TV-sprejemniku, predvajalniku DVD-jev, središču za predstavnost (razen v operacijskih sistemih Windows XP Media Center Edition in njegovih novejših različicah), na elektronskem plakatu ali v drugih digitalnih označbah, internetnem pripomočku ali drugih napravah, ki imajo vzpostavljeno povezavo z internetom, digitalnem osebnem pomočniku, medicinski napravi, bankomatu, telematski napravi, igralnem avtomatu, gospodinjskem avtomatskem sistemu, kiosku, napravi za daljinsko upravljanje ali v kateri koli drugi elektronski napravi za široko potrošnjo, (b) mobilnem, kabelskem, satelitskem ali televizijskem sistemu, ki temelji na operaterju, ali (c) drugih napravah zaprtega sistema. Za informacije o licenciranju programov Adobe Runtimes za uporabo v takih sistemih obiščite spletno mesto http://www.adobe.com/go/licensing_si. 3.2 Omejitve Adobe Reader. Družba Adobe licencira in distribuira program Adobe Reader za ogled, distribucijo in skupno rabo datotek PDF. 3.2.1 Omejitve glede pretvorbe. Programa Adobe Reader ne smete integrirati ali uporabljati s katero koli drugo programsko opremo, vtičnikom ali izboljšavo, ki pri pretvorbi ali preoblikovanju datotek PDF v druge oblike zapisa datotek (npr. datoteke PDF v datoteko TIFF, JPEG ali SVG) uporablja Adobe Reader ali je od njega odvisna. 3.2.2 Omejitve glede vtičnika. Programa Adobe Reader ne smete integrirati ali uporabljati z nobenim vtičnikom za programsko opremo, ki ni razvit v skladu z licenčno pogodbo družbe Adobe za ključ za integracijo.

3.2.3 Onemogočene funkcije. V program Adobe Reader so lahko vključene funkcije in funkcionalnosti, ki so skrite ali onemogočene oziroma »zatemnjene« (»onemogočene funkcije«). Onemogočene funkcije dokumenta bodo aktivirane le, kadar odprete dokument PDF, ki ste ga ustvarili s tehnologijo za omogočanje, ki je na voljo le pri družbi Adobe. Do onemogočenih funkcij ne smete dostopati ali poskušati dostopati drugače kot z uporabo takih tehnologij za omogočanje. Poleg tega s programom Adobe Reader ne smete ustvariti funkcije, ki je znatno podobna kateri koli onemogočeni funkciji, ali se drugače izogniti tehnologiji, ki nadzoruje aktiviranje katere koli take funkcije. Za več informacij o onemogočenih funkcijah, obiščite spletno mesto http://www.adobe.com/go/readerextensions_si. 3.3 Obvestila. Vse kopije te programske opreme, ki jih naredite, morajo vsebovati enaka obvestila o avtorskih in drugih lastninskih pravicah, ki so prikazana na ali v programski opremi. 3.4 Brez spreminjanja ali obratnega inženirstva. Programske opreme ne smete spremeniti, prilagoditi, prevesti ali ustvariti izpeljanih del na osnovi programske opreme. Na programski opremi ne smete izvajati obratnega inženirstva, povratnega prevajanja, obratnega zbiranja ali na drugačen način poskušati odkriti njene izvorne kode, razen v obsegu, kot je obratno inženirstvo ali povratno prevajanje programske opreme v okviru upoštevne zakonodaje izrecno dovoljeno. 4. Prenos. Pravic za programsko opremo ne smete dati v najem ali zakup, jih podlicencirati, dodeliti ali prenesti ali odobriti kopiranja celotne programske opreme ali katerega koli njenega dela v računalnik drugega uporabnika, razen če je to v tej pogodbi morda izrecno dovoljeno. Prenesete lahko le svoje pravice do uporabe te programske opreme na drugo fizično ali pravno osebo, vendar le pod pogojem, da: (a) tej fizični ali pravni osebi prenesete tudi (i) to pogodbo in (ii) to programsko opremo in vso drugo programsko ali strojno opremo, združeno ali vnaprej nameščeno s to programsko opremo, vključno z vsemi kopijami, posodobitvami in prejšnjimi različicami; (b) sami ne obdržite nobenega izvoda, vključno z varnostnimi kopijami in kopijami, shranjenimi v računalniku; in (c) stranka, ki prejema pravice, sprejme pogoje in določila te pogodbe in vse druge pogoje in določila, na podlagi katerih ste pridobili veljavno licenco za programsko opremo. Ne glede na zgoraj navedeno pa ne smete prenesti kopij te programske opreme za izobraževanje, njenih predizdajnih kopij ali kopij, ki niso namenjene nadaljnji prodaji. 5. Lastništvo pravic intelektualne lastnine, pridržanje pravic. Programska oprema in vse pooblaščene kopije, ki jih naredite, so intelektualna lastnina družbe Adobe Systems Incorporated in njenih dobaviteljev. Zgradba, organizacija in koda za to programsko opremo so dragocene trgovske skrivnosti in zaupne informacije družbe Adobe Systems Incorporated in njenih dobaviteljev. Programska oprema je zaščitena z zakoni, vključno z - in brez omejitve na - zakone o avtorskih pravicah Združenih držav Amerike in drugih držav, ter določili mednarodnih pogodb. Če ni izrecno drugače navedeno v tej pogodbi, vam ta pogodba ne podeljuje nobenih pravic intelektualne lastnine do te programske opreme. Družba Adobe in njeni dobavitelji si pridržujejo vse pravice, ki niso izrecno podeljene. 6. Povezljivost in zasebnost. 6.1 Uporaba datotek PDF. Kadar v programski opremi odprete datoteko PDF, v kateri je omogočeno prikazovanje oglasov prek registracije s storitvijo Ads for Adobe PDF, lahko vaš računalnik vzpostavi povezavo s spletnim mestom, ki ga upravlja družba Adobe, oglaševalec ali tretja oseba. Pri tem se pošlje naslov vašega internetnega protokola (naslov IP). Stranka, ki je gostitelj mesta, lahko s tehnologijo pošilja (ali »prikazuje«) oglaševalno ali drugo elektronsko vsebino, ki je prikazana v odprti datoteki ali ob njej. Upravitelj spletnega mesta lahko s skriptom JavaScript, spletnimi svetilniki (ki so znani tudi kot oznake za dejanja ali GIF-i z eno slikovno piko) in drugimi tehnologijami poveča ter izmeri učinkovitost oglasov in prilagodi oglaševalno vsebino. Vašo komunikacijo s spletnimi mesti družbe Adobe ureja Pravilnik družbe Adobe glede zasebnosti v spletu, ki je na voljo na spletnem mestu http://www.adobe.com/go/privacy_si. Družba Adobe morda nima dostopa do funkcij, ki jih tretja oseba morda uporablja, ali jih nadzoruje, načela ravnanja s podatki na spletnih mestih tretjih oseb pa niso zajeta v Pravilnik družbe Adobe glede zasebnosti v spletu.

6.2 Posodabljanje. Soglašate in potrjujete, da računalnik lahko zaradi programske opreme samodejno vzpostavi povezavo z internetom in preveri, ali so na voljo posodobitve za samodejni prenos v računalnik in da družbo Adobe obvesti o uspešni namestitvi programske opreme. V tem primeru so družbi Adobe poslani samo podatki, ki ne omogočajo identifikacije posameznika. Vašo komunikacijo s spletnimi mesti družbe Adobe ureja Pravilnik družbe Adobe glede zasebnosti v spletu, ki je na voljo na spletnem mestu http://www.adobe.com/go/privacy_si. Informacije o spreminjanju privzetih nastavitev za posodabljanje poiščite v dokumentaciji. 6.3 Upravitelj nastavitev. Flash Player lahko povzroči, da bodo nekatere uporabniške nastavitve shranjene v računalniku kot lokalni predmet v skupni rabi. Te nastavitve niso povezane z vami, vendar vam omogočijo, da oblikujete določene nastavitve v okviru programa Flash Player. Več informacij o predmetih v skupni rabi najdete na http://www.adobe.com/go/flashplayer_security_si in več informacij glede upravitelja nastavitev na http://www.adobe.com/go/settingsmanager_si. 7. Ponudbe tretjih oseb. Programska oprema morda omogoča dostop do spletnih mest, programov in podatkovnih storitev tretjih oseb, vključno z zmogljivimi internetnimi programi (»ponudbe tretjih oseb«), in vzajemno delovanje z njimi. Vaš dostop do in uporabo katere koli ponudbe tretje osebe, vključno z vsemi izdelki, storitvami ali informacijami, urejajo pogoji in določila, ki veljajo za take ponudbe. Ponudbe tretjih oseb niso v lasti družbe Adobe in jih družba Adobe ne zagotavlja. 8. Digitalna potrdila. 8.1 Uporaba. Adobe AIR uporablja digitalna potrdila, s katerimi lahko prepoznate založnika programov Adobe AIR, ki so jih ustvarile tretje osebe. Adobe Reader z digitalnimi potrdili podpisuje in preverja veljavnost podpisov v dokumentih PDF ter preverja veljavnost overjenih dokumentov PDF. V času preverjanja veljavnosti digitalnega potrdila lahko vaš računalnik vzpostavi povezavo z internetom. Digitalna potrdila izdajajo overitelji potrdil tretjih oseb, vključno z dobavitelji storitev CDS (Adobe Certified Document Services), ki so navedeni na spletnem mestu http://www.adobe.com/go/partners_cds_si (»overitelji potrdil«), potrdila pa so lahko tudi samopodpisana. 8.2 Pogoji in določila. Nakup in uporaba digitalnih potrdil ter zanašanje na njih je vaša odgovornost in odgovornost overitelja potrdil. Preden zaupate kateremu koli overjenemu dokumentu, digitalnemu podpisu ali storitvam overitelja potrdil, preglejte upoštevne pogoje in določila, v okviru katerih ustrezni overitelj potrdil ponuja storitve, vključno z na primer vsemi morebitnimi naročniškimi pogodbami, pogodbami, na katere se sklicuje oseba, pravilniki glede potrdil in izjavami o praksi. Za informacije o dobaviteljih storitev CDS družbe Adobe glejte povezave na spletnem mestu http://www.adobe.com/go/partners_cds_si. 8.3 Soglasje. Soglašate, da je (a) bilo morda digitalno potrdilo ukinjeno, preden je bila preverjena njegova veljavnost, pri čemer je digitalni podpis ali potrdilo videti veljavno, čeprav dejansko ni; (b) varnost ali celovitost digitalnega potrdila lahko ogrožena zaradi dejanja ali opustitve dejanja podpisnika dokumenta, upoštevnega overitelja potrdil ali katere koli druge osebe in (c) potrdilo lahko samopodpisano potrdilo, ki ga ne zagotavlja overitelj potrdil. ZA ODLOČANJE O TEM, ALI ŽELITE POTRDILU ZAUPATI ALI NE, STE ODGOVORNI SAMI. ČE OVERITELJ POTRDIL NE ZAGOTOVI LOČENEGA PISNEGA JAMSTVA, UPORABLJATE POTRDILA NA LASTNO ODGOVORNOST. 8.4 Tretji upravičenci. Soglašate, da je kateri koli overitelj potrdil, ki mu zaupate, tretji upravičenec te pogodbe in da ima pravice za uveljavljanje te pogodbe v svojem imenu, kot če bi bil družba Adobe. 8.5 Odškodnina. Soglašate, da boste družbo Adobe in vse upoštevne overitelje potrdil (razen kot je izrecno navedeno v njihovih pogojih in določilih) odvezali od kakršnih koli in vseh obveznosti, izgub, tožb, odškodninskih in drugih zahtevkov (vključno z vsemi razumnimi izdatki, stroški in odvetniškimi stroški), ki izhajajo iz ali so povezani s kakršno koli uporabo ali zanašanjem na katero koli storitev takega overitelja, vključno z - in brez omejitve na - (a) zanašanje na poteklo ali ukinjeno potrdilo; (b) nepravilno preverjanje veljavnosti potrdila; (c) uporabo drugega potrdila in ne tistega, ki ga dovoljujejo kateri koli upoštevni pogoji in določila, ta pogodba ali upoštevna zakonodaja; (d) nerazumno presojo pri zanašanju na storitve ali potrdila izdajatelja glede na dejanske okoliščine; ali (e) opustitev katere koli od obveznosti, ki so določene v pogojih in določilih, povezanih s storitvami.

9. Brez jamstva. Programska oprema je na voljo v taki obliki, »KOT JE«, in z VSEMI NAPAKAMI. DRUŽBA ADOBE IN NJENI DOBAVITELJI TER OVERITELJI POTRDIL NE ODGOVARJAJO IN NE MOREJO ODGOVARJATI ZA DELOVANJE ALI REZULTATE, KI JIH LAHKO DOBITE Z UPORABO PROGRAMSKE OPREME, STORITEV OVERITELJA POTRDIL ALI DRUGIH PONUDB TRETJIH OSEB. RAZEN V OBSEGU, V KAKRŠNEM V OKVIRU ZAKONODAJE, KI VELJA ZA VAS V VAŠI PRISTOJNOSTI, NOBENO JAMSTVO, POGOJ, ZAGOTOVILO ALI DOLOČILO NE SME ALI NE MORE BITI IZKLJUČENO ALI OMEJENO, DRUŽBA ADOBE IN NJENI DOBAVITELJI TER OVERITELJI POTRDIL NE DAJEJO NOBENIH JAMSTEV, POGOJEV, ZAGOTOVIL ALI DOLOČIL (IZRECNIH ALI NAZNAČENIH, BODISI NA PODLAGI ZAKONA, SODNE PRAKSE, OBČEGA PRAVA, OBIČAJEV, UZANC ALI DRUGIH PREDPISOV) GLEDE KAKRŠNIH KOLI ZADEV, VKLJUČNO Z - IN BREZ OMEJITVE NA - NEKRŠITEV PRAVIC INTELEKTUALNE LASTNINE TRETJIH OSEB, PRIMERNOST ZA PRODAJO, INTEGRACIJO, ZADOVOLJIVO KAKOVOST ALI PRIMERNOST ZA KATERI KOLI DOLOČEN NAMEN. Določila poglavij 9 in 10 veljajo tudi po preklicu ali prenehanju te pogodbe, ne glede na vzrok za to, vendar to ne ustvarja (posredno ali neposredno) nobene nadaljnje pravice do uporabe te programske opreme po preklicu ali prenehanju te pogodbe. 10. Omejitev odgovornosti. V NOBENEM PRIMERU DRUŽBA ADOBE, NJENI DOBAVITELJI ALI OVERITELJI POTRDIL NISO ODGOVORNI ZA KAKRŠNO KOLI ŠKODO, ZAHTEVKE ALI STROŠKE KAKRŠNE KOLI VRSTE, VKLJUČNO S KAKRŠNO KOLI POSLEDIČNO, POSREDNO ALI DOSOJENO ODŠKODNINO ALI KAKRŠNO KOLI IZGUBO DOBIČKA ALI PRIHRANKOV, TUDI ČE JE BIL ZASTOPNIK DRUŽBE ADOBE OPOZORJEN NA MOŽNOST NASTANKA TAKŠNE IZGUBE, ODŠKODNINE ALI ZAHTEVKOV. TE OMEJITVE IN IZKLJUČITVE VELJAJO V TOLIKŠNI MERI, KOT TO DOVOLJUJE UPOŠTEVNO PRAVO V VAŠI JURISDIKCIJI. SKUPNA ODGOVORNOST DRUŽBE ADOBE IN NJENIH DOBAVITELJEV TER OVERITELJEV POTRDIL PO TEJ POGODBI ALI V ZVEZI S TO POGODBO JE OMEJENA LE NA MOREBITNI ZNESEK, KI JE BIL PLAČAN ZA TO PROGRAMSKO OPREMO. Nobeno od določil iz te pogodbe ne omejuje odgovornosti družbe Adobe do vas v primeru smrti ali osebne poškodbe, ki nastane kot posledica malomarnosti družbe Adobe ali zaradi kaznivega dejanja goljufije oziroma zaradi prevare. Družba Adobe nastopa v imenu svojih dobaviteljev in overiteljev potrdil za namen zavrnitve, izključitve in omejitve obveznosti, garancij in odgovornosti, vendar v nobenem drugem smislu in za noben drug namen. Za dodatne informacije si preberite morebitne specifične podatke za posamezno jurisdikcijo, ki so navedeni na koncu te pogodbe, ali pa se obrnite na oddelek za pomoč strankam družbe Adobe. 11. Izvozna pravila. Soglašate, da se ta programska oprema ne bo poslala, prenesla ali izvozila v nobeno državo ali uporabljena na kakršen koli način, ki ga prepovedujejo izvozni zakon Združenih držav Amerike (United States Export Administration Act) ali kateri koli drugi izvozni zakoni, omejitve ali predpisi (zbirno imenovani »izvozni zakoni«). Poleg tega nam v primeru, da je ta programska oprema po izvoznih zakonih opredeljena kot artikel, ki je podvržen kontroli izvoza, jamčite in garantirate, da niste državljan države oz. da se tudi sicer ne nahajate v državi embarga (vključno z - in brez omejitev - Iranom, Sirijo, Sudanom, Kubo in Severno Korejo) in da za vas ne velja prepoved prejema te programske opreme po izvoznih zakonih. Vse pravice do uporabe te programske opreme so vam podeljene le pod pogojem, da spoštujete določila te pogodbe - v nasprotnem primeru boste te pravice izgubili. 12. Veljavno pravo. Ta pogodba je sestavljena in se tolmači v skladu z veljavnim materialnim pravom naslednjih držav: (a) Kalifornije, če dobite licenco za to programsko opremo, ko se nahajate v Združenih državah Amerike, Kanadi ali Mehiki; ali (b) Japonske, če dobite licenco za to programsko opremo, ko se nahajate na Japonskem , Kitajskem, v Koreji ali v kateri drugi državi jugovzhodne Azije, v kateri se vsi uradni jeziki pišejo bodisi v obliki idiogramov (npr. hanzi, kanji ali hanja) in/ali v obliki druge pisave, ki temelji na idiogramih ali je po zgradbi podobna idiogramom, npr. hangul ali kana; ali (c) Anglije, če kupite licenco za to programsko opremo, ko se nahajate v kateri koli drugi jurisdikciji, ki ni navedena zgoraj. Pristojna sodišča v Okrožju Santa Clara, Kalifornija, v primeru veljavnosti kalifornijskega prava,

Okrožno sodišče v Tokiju na Japonskem v primeru veljavnosti japonskega prava in pristojna sodišča v Angliji, v primeru veljavnosti angleškega prava, imajo neizključno jurisdikcijo za vse spore v zvezi s to pogodbo. Za to pogodbo ne veljajo kolizijska pravila katere koli jurisdikcije ali Konvencije Združenih narodov o pogodbah za mednarodno prodajo blaga, katerih veljavnost je izrecno izključena. 13. Splošna določila. Če se kateri koli del te pogodbe izkaže za ničnega oz. neveljavnega ali neizvršljivega, to ne vpliva na veljavnost preostalega dela te pogodbe, ki ostane v veljavi in izvršljiv v skladu z njegovimi določili. Ta pogodba ne prejudicira zakonskih pravic katere koli stranke, ki je potrošnik. Ta pogodba se lahko spremeni le v obliki pisnega dokumenta, ki ga podpiše pooblaščeni zastopnik družbe Adobe. Za nadgradnje vam lahko družba Adobe izda podlicenco z dodatnimi ali drugačnimi določili. Ta pogodba predstavlja celoten sporazum med družbo Adobe in vami v zvezi s to programsko opremo in nadomešča vsa morebitna predhodna zagotovila, dogovore, zaveze, sporočila ali oglaševanje v zvezi s to programsko opremo. 14. Opozorilo za končne uporabnike v vladi Združenih držav Amerike. Za končne uporabnike v vladi Združenih držav Amerike družba Adobe soglaša, da bo ravnala v skladu z vsemi veljavnimi zakoni enakih možnosti, vključno (glede na primer) z določili Izvršnega odloka 11246 z dopolnitvami, poglavje 402 Zakona o pomoči veteranom vietnamske vojne pri ponovni vključitvi v družbo iz leta 1974 (38 USC 4212) in poglavje 503 Zakona o rehabilitaciji iz leta 1973 z dopolnitvami ter predpis 41 CFR, deli od 60-1 do 60-60, 60-250 in 60-741. Klavzula pozitivne akcije (»affirmative action clause«) in predpisi, našteti v prejšnjem stavku, so vključeni v to pogodbo prek reference. 15. Upoštevanje licenc. Če ste družba, podjetje ali organizacija, soglašate, da boste na zahtevo družbe Adobe ali njenega pooblaščenega zastopnika v roku tridesetih (30) dni v celoti dokumentirali in potrdili, da je uporaba katere koli oz. vse programske opreme družbe Adobe v času zahteve v skladu z vašimi veljavnimi licencami, prejetimi od družbe Adobe. 16. Specifična določila in izjeme. 16.1 Omejitev odgovornosti za uporabnike s prebivališčem v Nemčiji ali Avstriji. 16.1.1 Če ste to programsko opremo pridobili v Nemčiji ali Avstriji in običajno živite v kateri od obeh držav, potem za vas ne velja poglavje 10. Namesto tega je v skladu z določili poglavja 16.1.2 zakonska odškodninska odgovornost družbe Adobe za škodo omejena kot sledi: (i) družba Adobe odgovarja le do zneska odškodnine, ki jo je običajno mogoče predvideti ob sklenitvi licenčne pogodbe v zvezi s škodo, ki nastane zaradi kršitve bistvene pogodbene obveznosti zaradi majhne malomarnosti in (ii) družba Adobe ne odgovarja za škodo, ki nastane zaradi kršitve nebistvene pogodbene obveznosti zaradi majhne malomarnosti. 16.1.2 Omenjena omejitev odškodninske odgovornosti ne velja za nobeno obvezno zakonsko obveznost oz. odgovornost, še posebej ne za odgovornost po nemškem zakonu o odškodninski odgovornosti za izdelke, odgovornost za prevzemanje določene garancije ali krivdno odgovornost za povzročene osebne poškodbe. 16.1.3 Izvesti morate vse razumne in smiselne ukrepe, da preprečite in zmanjšate škodo, predvsem tako, da si - na način in v obsegu, kot to določila v tej pogodbi dovoljujejo - izdelate varnostne kopije te programske opreme in podatkov v svojem računalniku.

V primeru kakršnih koli vprašanj v zvezi s to pogodbo ali če želite od družbe Adobe zahtevati kakršno koli informacijo , se obrnite na poslovalnico Adobe v okviru vaše jurisdikcije tako, da uporabite naslov in kontaktne informacije, podane v tem izdelku, ali preko spleta na http://www.adobe.com/si.

Adobe, Authorware, Flash, Reader in Shockwave so bodisi registrirane blagovne znamke ali pa blagovne znamke družbe Adobe Systems Incorporated v Združenih državah Amerike in/ali v drugih državah.

Reader_Player_AIR_WWEULA-sl_SI-20080204_1313

 

ADOBE SYSTEMS INCORPORATED Renuncia a la garantía y contrato de licencia de software. ESTE DOCUMENTO INCLUYE INFORMACIÓN SOBRE LA GARANTÍA (PARTE I) Y UN CONTRATO DE LICENCIA QUE RIGE EL USO DEL SOFTWARE DE ADOBE (PARTE II). PARTE I. RENUNCIA A LA GARANTÍA. El Software y otra información se entregan “TAL CUAL” Y EN EL ESTADO EN QUE SE ENCUENTRAN. ADOBE Y SUS PROVEEDORES Y ENTIDADES DE CERTIFICACIÓN NO GARANTIZAN NI PUEDEN GARANTIZAR EL FUNCIONAMIENTO O LOS RESULTADOS QUE USTED PUDIERA OBTENER AL UTILIZAR EL SOFTWARE, LOS SERVICIOS DE LAS ENTIDADES DE CERTIFICACIÓN O CUALQUIER OTRA OFERTA DE TERCEROS. EXCEPTO EN LA MEDIDA EN QUE CUALQUIER GARANTÍA, CONDICIÓN, REPRESENTACIÓN O TÉRMINO NO PUEDAN O PUDIERAN SER EXCLUIDOS O LIMITADOS POR LA LEGISLACIÓN APLICABLE EN SU JURISDICCIÓN, ADOBE Y SUS PROVEEDORES Y ENTIDADES DE CERTIFICACIÓN NO OTORGAN GARANTÍAS, CONDICIONES, REPRESENTACIONES O TÉRMINOS (EXPRESOS O IMPLÍCITOS, YA SEA POR ESTATUTO, JURISPRUDENCIA, COSTUMBRE, USO O DE CUALQUIER OTRA FORMA) EN RELACIÓN CON OTRAS CUESTIONES, INCLUYENDO, SIN LIMITACIÓN, LA NO INFRACCIÓN DE LOS DERECHOS DE TERCEROS, COMERCIABILIDAD, INTEGRACIÓN, CALIDAD SATISFACTORIA O IDONEIDAD PARA CUALQUIER PROPÓSITO EN PARTICULAR. PARTE II. CONTRATO DE LICENCIA DE SOFTWARE. AL UTILIZAR, COPIAR O DISTRIBUIR TODO O CUALQUIER PARTE DEL SOFTWARE DE ADOBE, USTED ACEPTA TODOS LOS TÉRMINOS Y CONDICIONES DE ESTE CONTRATO, INCLUYENDO, EN PARTICULAR, LAS DISPOSICIONES REFERENTES A: USO, ESTABLECIDAS EN LA SECCIÓN 2; TRANSFERENCIA, ESTABLECIDAS EN LA SECCIÓN 4; CONECTIVIDAD Y PRIVACIDAD, ESTABLECIDAS EN LA SECCIÓN 6; GARANTÍA, ESTABLECIDAS EN LA SECCIÓN 9 Y RESPONSABILIDAD, ESTABLECIDAS EN LAS SECCIONES 10 Y 16. TRAS SU ACEPTACIÓN, ESTE CONTRATO ES EXIGIBLE CONTRA USTED Y CUALQUIER ENTIDAD QUE HAYA OBTENIDO EL SOFTWARE Y EN CUYO NOMBRE SE USE. SI USTED NO ESTÁ DE ACUERDO, NO UTILICE ESTE SOFTWARE. ADOBE LE AUTORIZA A UTILIZAR EL SOFTWARE SOLAMENTE DE CONFORMIDAD CON LOS TÉRMINOS DE ESTE CONTRATO. EL USO DE LOS MATERIALES DE TERCEROS QUE SE INCLUYEN EN EL SOFTWARE PODRÁ ESTAR SOMETIDO A OTROS TÉRMINOS Y CONDICIONES QUE HABITUALMENTE SE ENCUENTRAN EN UN CONTRATO DE LICENCIA INDEPENDIENTE, EN UN ARCHIVO “LÉAME” ADJUNTO A DICHOS MATERIALES O EN LOS “AVISOS DE SOFTWARE PERTENECIENTE A TERCEROS Y/O TÉRMINOS Y CONDICIONES ADICIONALES” QUE PUEDE ENCONTRAR EN http://www.adobe.com/go/thirdparty_es. 1. Definiciones. “Adobe” significa Adobe Systems Incorporated, una sociedad del Estado de Delaware, con domicilio en 345 Park Avenue, San Jose, California 95110, Estados Unidos de América, en caso de que la cláusula 12 (a) sea aplicable; de lo contrario, Adobe significa Adobe Systems Software Ireland Limited, con domicilio en Unit 3100, Lake Drive, City West Campus, Saggart D24, República de Irlanda, una sociedad organizada conforme a las leyes de Irlanda, filial y licenciataria de Adobe Systems Incorporated. “Equipo” significa un dispositivo electrónico personal virtual o físico que acepta información en forma digital o similar y procesa la misma para conseguir un resultado específico basándose en una secuencia de instrucciones. “Software” significa (a) todo el contenido de los archivos (distribuidos electrónicamente o en soportes físicos), o disco(s) o cualquier otro soporte con el que se proporcione este contrato, que puede incluir (i) información computacional o programas de software de Adobe o de terceros, incluidos Adobe

Reader® (“Adobe Reader”), Adobe® AIR™ (“Adobe AIR”), Adobe Flash® Player, Shockwave® Player y Authorware® Player (conjuntamente, Adobe AIR y los reproductores Flash, Shockwave y Authorware son “Adobe Runtimes”); (ii) material escrito o archivos con información relacionada (“Documentación”); y (iii) fuentes; y (b) mejoras, versiones modificadas, actualizaciones, adiciones y copias de lo anterior, proporcionadas por Adobe en cualquier momento (conjuntamente, “Actualizaciones”). El término “Uso” significa acceder, instalar, descargar, copiar o de cualquier otra forma obtener beneficios de la utilización de las funciones del Software. 2. Licencia de software. Si usted obtuvo el Software de Adobe o de uno de sus licenciatarios autorizados y sujeto al cumplimiento de los términos de este contrato, incluyendo las restricciones de la Sección 3, Adobe le garantiza una licencia no exclusiva de uso del Software de la manera y con el objeto que se describe en la Documentación según sigue: 2.1 Uso general. Usted podrá instalar y utilizar una copia del Software en su Equipo compatible. Véase la Sección 3 para restricciones importantes en el uso del Software. 2.2 Uso en un servidor. Este contrato no permite la instalación o uso del software en un servidor de red. Para obtener información acerca del uso del software en un servidor de red, consulte http://www.adobe.com/go/acrobat_distribute_es para obtener información sobre Adobe Reader; o http://www.adobe.com/go/licensing_es para obtener información acerca de Adobe Runtimes. 2.3 Distribución. Esta licencia no le permite otorgar licencias ni distribuir el Software. Para obtener información acerca de la obtención del derecho de distribución del Software en soportes tangibles o mediante una red interna o con un producto o servicio, consulte http://www.adobe.com/go/acrobat_distribute_es para obtener información acerca de Adobe Reader; o http://www.adobe.com/go/licensing_es para obtener información acerca de Adobe Runtimes. 2.4 Copia de seguridad. Usted podrá hacer una copia de seguridad del Software siempre y cuando su copia de seguridad no se instale ni se utilice. No podrá transferir los derechos respecto de una copia de seguridad a menos que transfiera todos los derechos respecto al Software como se establece en la sección 4. 3. Obligaciones y restricciones. 3.1 Restricciones de Adobe Runtime. No podrá utilizar ningún Adobe Runtime en ningún dispositivo que no sea un PC ni tampoco en ninguna versión integrada o de dispositivo de cualquier sistema operativo. En caso de duda y sólo a modo de ejemplo, usted no podrá utilizar un Adobe Runtime en ningún (a) dispositivo móvil, set top box (STB), ordenador de bolsillo, teléfono, web pad, tableta y Tablet PC (si no utiliza Windows XP Tablet PC Edition o sus sucesores), videoconsola, TV, reproductor de DVD, centro multimedia (si no utiliza Windows XP Media Center Edition o sus sucesores), valla publicitaria electrónica o cualquier otra señalización digital, aplicación de Internet o cualquier otro tipo de equipos de conexión a Internet, PDA, aparato médico, ATM, aparato telemático, máquina de juegos, sistemas domésticos de automatización, kiosco, aparato de control remoto o cualquier otro aparato electrónico para consumidores, (b) equipos móviles basados en operador, cable, satélite o sistema de televisión u (c) otro dispositivo de sistema cerrado. Para obtener información sobre las licencias de Adobe Runtimes para su uso en estos sistemas, visite http://www.adobe.com/go/licensing_es. 3.2 Restricciones del Adobe Reader. Adobe Reader tiene la licencia y distribución otorgada por Adobe con el fin de ver, distribuir y compartir archivos PDF. 3.2.1 Restricciones de conversión. Usted no puede integrar o utilizar Adobe Reader con ningún otro programa de software, conector “plug-in” o mejora que utilice o dependa de Adobe Reader para convertir o transformar archivos PDF en otro formato de archivo (por ejemplo, un archivo PDF en un archivo TIFF, JPEG o SVG). 3.2.2 Restricciones de conexión. Tampoco puede integrar ni utilizar Adobe Reader con cualquier programa de software de conexión “plug-in” no desarrollado de acuerdo con el Contrato de Licencia Clave de Integración Adobe. 3.2.3 Funciones desactivadas. Adobe Reader puede contener funciones o funcionalidades que estén ocultas o aparezcan desactivadas o con zonas “grises” (las “Funciones Desactivadas”). Las Funciones Desactivadas solamente

se activan al abrir un documento PDF que fue creado utilizando la tecnología de activación sólo proporcionada por Adobe. Usted no accederá, ni intentará acceder, a ninguna Función Desactivada de ninguna otra manera diferente al uso de dichas tecnologías de activación, ni dependerá de Adobe Reader para crear una función substancialmente similar a ninguna Función Desactivada o evitar por cualquier otra forma la tecnología que controla la activación de tales funciones. Para obtener más información acerca de las funciones desactivadas, consulte http://www.adobe.com/go/readerextensions_es. 3.3 Avisos. Cualquier copia del Software que usted realice deberá contener los mismos avisos de derechos de autor y de propiedad que aparecen en el Software. 3.4 Prohibición de compilación inversa o modificación. Usted no podrá modificar, adaptar, traducir o crear trabajos derivados basados en el Software. Usted no podrá realizar compilación inversa, descompilar, desensamblar o de cualquier forma tratar de descubrir el código fuente del Software excepto en la medida en que esté expresamente autorizado a descompilar o realizar compilación inversa bajo la ley aplicable. 4. Transferencia. Usted no podrá arrendar, alquilar, otorgar licencias, ceder o transferir sus derechos de uso del Software, ni autorizar la copia total o parcial del mismo en otro Equipo a excepción de lo permitido expresamente por este contrato. Sin embargo, usted podrá transferir todos los derechos respecto al uso del Software a otra persona física o legal siempre y cuando: (a) también transmita (i) este contrato, y (ii) el Software y cualquier otro programa o equipo incluido, empaquetado o preinstalado junto con el Software, incluyendo las copias, actualizaciones y versiones anteriores, a dicha persona física o legal, (b) no retenga ninguna copia, incluyendo copias de seguridad y copias grabadas en un Equipo; y (c) la parte receptora acepte los términos y condiciones de este contrato y cualquier otro término o condición bajo los cuales usted adquirió una licencia válida respecto al Software. No obstante lo anterior, Usted no podrá transferir copias educativas, de prelanzamiento o gratuitas del Software. 5. Derechos de propiedad intelectual, reserva de derechos. El Software y cualquier copia autorizada que usted haga son de propiedad intelectual de Adobe Systems Incorporated y sus proveedores. La estructura, organización y código del Software son secretos comerciales e información confidencial valiosa de Adobe Systems Incorporated y sus proveedores. El Software está protegido por ley, incluyendo, pero sin limitación, las leyes de derechos de autor de los Estados Unidos y de otros países y por las disposiciones de tratados internacionales. Excepto lo expresamente contemplado aquí, este contrato no le otorga a usted ningún derecho de propiedad intelectual sobre el Software y todos los derechos no otorgados expresamente están reservados por Adobe y sus proveedores. 6. Conectividad y privacidad. 6.1 Uso de archivos PDF. Si usa el Software para abrir un archivo PDF que se ha activado para mostrar anuncios durante el proceso de registro con el servicio Ads for Adobe PDF, puede que su equipo se conecte a un sitio web operado por Adobe, un anunciante o un tercero. Cuando esto ocurre, se envía su dirección de protocolo de Internet (IP). La parte que aloja el sitio puede utilizar tecnología para enviar (o “servir”) publicidad o cualquier otro contenido electrónico que aparezca en el archivo abierto o cerca de él. El operador del sitio web también puede utilizar JavaScript, balizas web (también conocidas como etiquetas de acción o gifs de un único píxel) y otras tecnologías para aumentar y medir la eficacia de los anuncios y personalizar el contenido de la publicidad. La comunicación con los sitios web de Adobe se rige por la Política de confidencialidad en línea de Adobe, que se encuentra en http://www.adobe.com/go/privacy_es. Adobe no puede acceder o controlar las características que puede utilizar un tercero y las prácticas de información de los sitios web de terceros no están cubiertas por la Política de confidencialidad en línea de Adobe. 6.2 Actualización. Usted reconoce y acepta que el Software puede hacer que su Equipo se conecte automáticamente a Internet para buscar actualizaciones disponibles para que se descarguen automáticamente a su Equipo y comunicar a Adobe que el Software se ha instalado correctamente. Cuando ocurre esto, sólo se transmite información de identificación no personal a Adobe. La comunicación con los sitios web de Adobe se rige por la Política de

Privacidad Online de Adobe, que se encuentra en http://www.adobe.com/go/privacy_es. Consulte la Documentación para ver información acerca de la modificación de la configuración predeterminada de actualización. 6.3 Gestor de configuraciones. Flash Player puede hacer que algunas configuraciones de usuario se almacenen como objetos locales compartidos en su Equipo. Estas configuraciones no están asociadas con Usted pero le permiten configurar algunas de ellas con el Flash Player. Puede encontrar más información referente a objetos locales compartidos en http://www.adobe.com/go/flashplayer_security_es y más información sobre el Gestor de Configuraciones en la página web http://www.adobe.com/go/settingsmanager_es. 7. Ofertas de terceros. El Software le puede permitir tener acceso e interactuar con servicios de datos, aplicaciones de software y sitios web de terceros, incluyendo aplicaciones de Internet enriquecidas (“Ofertas de Terceros”). Su acceso y uso de las Ofertas de Terceros, incluidos los bienes, servicios o información, están regidos por los términos y condiciones respecto a tales ofertas. Las Ofertas de Terceros no son propiedad ni están proporcionados por Adobe. 8. Certificados digitales. 8.1 Uso. Adobe AIR utiliza certificados digitales para ayudarle a identificar el editor de las aplicaciones de Adobe AIR creadas por terceros. Adobe Reader utiliza certificados digitales para firmar y validar las firmas de los documentos PDF, así como para validar los documentos PDF certificados. Su Equipo puede conectarse a Internet en el momento de la validación de un certificado digital. Los certificados digitales son emitidos por entidades de certificación de terceros, incluidos los proveedores de Adobe Certified Document Services (CDS) enumerados en http://www.adobe.com/go/partners_cds_es (“Entidades de Certificación”) o pueden estar autofirmados. 8.2 Términos y condiciones. La adquisición, el uso y la confianza en los certificados digitales son responsabilidad de usted y una Entidad de Certificación. Antes de confiar en cualquier documento certificado, firma digital o servicios de Entidad de Certificación, deberá revisar los términos y las condiciones aplicables según los que dicha Entidad de Certificación ofrece sus servicios, incluyendo, por ejemplo, cualquier contrato de suscriptor, contratos de "recíproca dependencia" entre las partes, políticas de los certificados y declaraciones de prácticas. Consulte los vínculos en http://www.adobe.com/go/partners_cds_es para obtener información acerca de los proveedores de CDS de Adobe. 8.3 Reconocimiento. Usted acepta que (a) un certificado digital puede haber sido revocado anteriormente a su momento de verificación, lo que haría que el certificado o la firma digital pareciesen ser válidos cuando en realidad no lo son, (b) la seguridad o la integridad de un certificado digital puede estar comprometida debido a un acto u omisión del firmante del documento, la Entidad de Certificación aplicable o cualquier otro tercero y (c) un certificado puede ser un certificado autofirmado no proporcionado por una Entidad de Certificación. USTED ES EL ÚNICO RESPONSABLE DE LA DECISIÓN DE CONFIAR O NO EN UN CERTIFICADO. A MENOS QUE UNA ENTIDAD DE CERTIFICACIÓN LE PROPORCIONE UNA GARANTÍA POR ESCRITO APARTE, DEBERÁ UTILIZAR LOS CERTIFICADOS DIGITALES ASUMIENDO USTED ÚNICAMENTE EL RIESGO. 8.4 Terceros beneficiarios. Usted acepta que cualquier Entidad de Certificación en la que confíe es un tercero beneficiario de este contrato y tendrá el derecho de hacer cumplir este contrato en su propio nombre como si fuera Adobe. 8.5 Indemnización. Usted acepta mantener a Adobe y a cualquier Entidad de Certificación (salvo que esté expresamente provisto en sus términos y condiciones) libre de cualquier y toda responsabilidad, pérdida, juicio, daño o reclamación (incluyendo todos los gastos, costes y honorarios de abogados que sean razonables) que surjan o estén relacionados con el uso o dependencia de cualquier servicio de tal entidad, incluyendo, pero sin limitarse (a) a la fianza en un certificado vencido o anulado; (b) la verificación incorrecta de un certificado; (c) el uso de un certificado, excepto el permitido por los términos y las condiciones aplicables, el presente Contrato o la ley aplicable; (d) el caso que no se ejercite juicio razonable en las circunstancias al confiar en los certificados o servicios del emisor; o (e) el incumplimiento de cualquier obligación según lo exigido en los términos y las condiciones relacionados con los servicios. 9. Sin garantía.

El Software se entrega “TAL CUAL” y EN EL ESTADO EN QUE SE ENCUENTRA. ADOBE Y SUS PROVEEDORES Y ENTIDADES DE CERTIFICACIÓN NO GARANTIZAN NI PUEDEN GARANTIZAR EL FUNCIONAMIENTO O LOS RESULTADOS QUE USTED PUDIERA OBTENER AL UTILIZAR EL SOFTWARE, LOS SERVICIOS DE LAS ENTIDADES DE CERTIFICACIÓN O CUALQUIER OTRA OFERTA DE TERCEROS. EXCEPTO EN LA MEDIDA EN QUE CUALQUIER GARANTÍA, CONDICIÓN, REPRESENTACIÓN O TÉRMINO NO PUEDAN O PUDIERAN SER EXCLUIDOS O LIMITADOS POR LA LEGISLACIÓN APLICABLE EN SU JURISDICCIÓN, ADOBE Y SUS PROVEEDORES Y ENTIDADES DE CERTIFICACIÓN NO OTORGAN GARANTÍAS, CONDICIONES, REPRESENTACIONES O TÉRMINOS (EXPRESOS O IMPLÍCITOS, YA SEA POR ESTATUTO, JURISPRUDENCIA, COSTUMBRE, USO O DE CUALQUIER OTRA FORMA) EN RELACIÓN CON OTRAS CUESTIONES, INCLUYENDO, SIN LIMITACIÓN, LA NO INFRACCIÓN DE LOS DERECHOS DE TERCEROS, COMERCIABILIDAD, INTEGRACIÓN, CALIDAD SATISFACTORIA O IDONEIDAD PARA CUALQUIER PROPÓSITO EN PARTICULAR. Las disposiciones de las Secciones 9 y 10 continuarán en vigencia tras la terminación del presente contrato, cualquiera que sea la causa de dicha terminación, sin que esto implique o cree ningún derecho continuado para utilizar el Software una vez terminado este contrato. 10. Limitación de responsabilidad. EN NINGÚN CASO ADOBE, SUS PROVEEDORES O LAS ENTIDADES DE CERTIFICACIÓN SERÁN RESPONSABLES ANTE USTED POR CUALQUIER DAÑO, RECLAMACIÓN O COSTES DE CUALQUIER NATURALEZA, INCLUYENDO CUALQUIER DAÑO CONSECUENTE, INDIRECTO O SECUNDARIO, NI DE CUALQUIER PÉRDIDA DE BENEFICIOS O GANANCIAS, AÚN EN EL CASO DE QUE UN REPRESENTANTE DE ADOBE HUBIERA SIDO NOTIFICADO DE LA POSIBILIDAD QUE SE PRODUZCAN DICHAS PÉRDIDAS, DAÑOS O PERJUICIOS O RECLAMACIONES. LAS LIMITACIONES Y EXCLUSIONES ANTERIORES SE APLICARÁN EN LA MEDIDA EN QUE LO PERMITA LA LEGISLACIÓN APLICABLE EN SU JURISDICCIÓN. LA RESPONSABILIDAD CONJUNTA TOTAL DE ADOBE Y SUS PROVEEDORES Y ENTIDADES DE CERTIFICACIÓN CONFORME O EN RELACIÓN CON ESTE CONTRATO SE LIMITARÁ A LA CANTIDAD PAGADA POR EL SOFTWARE, EN CASO DE QUE EXISTA. Nada contenido en este contrato limita la responsabilidad de Adobe ante Usted en el caso de muerte o lesiones resultantes de la negligencia de Adobe o por daño causado por engaño (fraude). Adobe actúa en nombre de sus proveedores y Entidades de Certificación con el fin de renunciar, excluir y/o limitar las obligaciones, garantías y responsabilidad tal y como se establece en este contrato, pero no con otros objetivos o fines. Para obtener más información, consulte la información específica de cada jurisdicción al final de este contrato, en caso de que exista, o póngase en contacto con el Departamento de Atención al Cliente de Adobe. 11. Reglas de exportación. Usted está de acuerdo en que el Software no podrá ser enviado, transferido o exportado a ningún país, ni se utilizará en ninguna forma que prohíba la Ley de Administración de Exportaciones de los Estados Unidos de América (United States Export Administration Act) o cualquier otra ley, restricciones o reglamentos de exportación (conjuntamente “Leyes sobre Exportación”). Asimismo, si el Software se identifica como un elemento controlado de exportación según las Leyes sobre Exportación, usted declara y garantiza no ser ciudadano de, o no residir en, una nación bajo embargo (incluyendo sin limitación a Irán, Siria, Sudán, Cuba y Corea del Norte) y que las Leyes sobre Exportación no le prohíben de ninguna forma recibir el Software. Todos los derechos para utilizar el Software se otorgan bajo la condición de que dichos derechos se perderán si usted no cumple los términos de este contrato. 12. Ley aplicable. Este contrato se regirá e interpretará de conformidad con las leyes substantivas vigentes en: (a) el Estado de California, si ha obtenido una licencia para el Software mientras se encontraba en los Estados Unidos de América, Canadá o México; o (b) Japón, si ha adquirido una licencia para el Software mientras se encontraba en Japón, República de China, República de Corea u otro país del Sudeste Asiático donde los idiomas oficiales se escriben ya sea con ideogramas (por ejemplo, hanzi, kanji o hanja), y/o con otros caracteres basados en ideogramas o con estructura similar a los caracteres ideográficos, como hangul o kana; o (c) Inglaterra, si usted ha obtenido una licencia para el Software mientras se encontraba en cualquier otro país no descrito anteriormente. Los tribunales

respectivos del Condado de Santa Clara en California, Estados Unidos de América, cuando se aplique la legislación de California, el Tribunal de Distrito de Tokio en Japón, cuando se aplique la legislación de Japón y los tribunales competentes de Londres, Inglaterra, cuando se aplique la legislación de Inglaterra, tendrán cada uno jurisdicción no exclusiva sobre las disputas relacionadas con este contrato. Este contrato no se regirá por las disposiciones sobre el conflicto de derecho de cualquier jurisdicción ni por la Convención de las Naciones Unidas sobre los Contratos de Compraventa Internacional de Mercaderías, cuya aplicación queda expresamente excluida. 13. Disposiciones generales. Si se determina que cualquier parte de este contrato es nula y no exigible, lo anterior no afectará la validez del resto del presente contrato, que permanecerá válido y exigible de conformidad con sus términos. Este contrato no perjudicará los derechos conferidos en las leyes de cualquier parte que opere como consumidor. Este contrato sólo se podrá modificar mediante un escrito firmado por un representante autorizado de Adobe. Adobe podrá otorgar una licencia para las actualizaciones con términos adicionales o diferentes. El presente Contrato representa el acuerdo completo entre Adobe y Usted en relación con el Software y reemplaza cualquier representación, discusión, compromiso, comunicación o publicidad anterior relacionada con el Software. 14. Notificación a los usuarios finales del gobierno de los EE. UU. Para los Usuarios Finales del Gobierno de EE. UU., Adobe acepta cumplir todas las leyes de igualdad de oportunidades aplicables incluyendo, de ser apropiado, las disposiciones de la Orden Ejecutiva 11246, con las reformas correspondientes, la Sección 402 de la ley de Ayuda a los Veteranos del Vietnam de 1974 (38 USC 4212), y la Sección 503 de la Ley de Rehabilitación de 1973, con las reformas correspondientes, así como las disposiciones contenidas en el 41 CFR partes 60-1 hasta 60-60, 60-250 y 60-741. La cláusula y normativas del programa de acción afirmativa contenidas en la frase anterior se incorporarán por referencia a este contrato. 15. Cumplimiento de licencias. En caso de ser una empresa u organización, usted está de acuerdo en que si Adobe o un representante autorizado de Adobe así lo solicita, tendrá que documentar y certificar completamente dentro del plazo de 30 (treinta) días que el uso de cualquier Software de Adobe en dicho momento cumple con las licencias válidas de Adobe. 16. Excepciones y disposiciones específicas. 16.1 Limitación de responsabilidad para los usuarios que residen en Alemania y Austria. 16.1.1 Si usted ha adquirido el Software en Alemania o Austria y dicho país es su país de residencia, no se aplicará la Sección 10. En su lugar, y de acuerdo con el contenido de la Sección 16.1.2, la responsabilidad de Adobe conforme a la ley se limitará de la siguiente manera: (i) Adobe será responsable solamente hasta la suma de los daños habitualmente previstos en el momento de celebrar el contrato de licencia respecto a los daños causados por una negligencia leve de una obligación contractual material y (ii) Adobe no será responsable de los daños causados por la negligencia leve de una obligación contractual no material. 16.1.2 La limitación de responsabilidad mencionada no se aplicará a cualquier responsabilidad que la ley exija, en especial, a la responsabilidad según la Ley de Responsabilidad de Productos Alemanes, responsabilidad que comporta asumir una garantía específica o responsabilidad por lesiones personales causadas en forma culposa. 16.1.3 Usted tiene la obligación de tomar todas las medidas razonables para evitar y reducir los daños, en especial, realizar copias de seguridad del Software y de sus datos informáticos sujetos a las disposiciones de este contrato.

Si usted tiene preguntas en relación a este contrato, o si desea solicitar información adicional a Adobe, por favor utilice la dirección y la información de contacto incluidas en este producto o, vía web, la página www.adobe.com/es para ponerse en contacto con la oficina de Adobe que presta el servicio en su jurisdicción.

Adobe, AIR, Authorware, Flash, Reader y Shockwave son marcas registradas o comerciales de Adobe Systems Incorporated en los Estados Unidos de América y/o en otros países.

Reader_Player_AIR_WWEULA-es_ES-20080204_1313

 

ADOBE SYSTEMS INCORPORATED Friskrivning från garantiansvar och programvarulicensavtal. DETTA DOKUMENT INNEHÅLLER GARANTIINFORMATION (DEL I) OCH ETT LICENSAVTAL SOM STYR ANVÄNDNINGEN AV ADOBE-PROGRAMMET (DEL II). DEL I. FRISKRIVNING FRÅN GARANTIANSVAR. PROGRAMVARAN OCH DEN ÖVRIGA INFORMATIONEN LEVERERAS TILL DIG ”I BEFINTLIGT SKICK” OCH MED ALLA BRISTER. VARKEN ADOBE ELLER DESS LEVERANTÖRER OCH CERTIFIKATUTFÄRDARE GARANTERAR PRESTANDA ELLER RESULTAT VID ANVÄNDNING AV PROGRAMVARA, TJÄNSTER FÖR UTFÄRDANDE AV CERTIFIKAT ELLER ANDRA ERBJUDANDEN FRÅN TREDJE PART. FÖRUTOM I DEN UTSTRÄCKNING SOM GARANTIER, VILLKOR ELLER UTFÄSTELSER INTE LAGLIGEN KAN UNDANTAS ELLER BEGRÄNSAS I ENLIGHET MED DEN LAGSTIFTNING SOM GÄLLER I ER JURISDIKTION, LÄMNAR ADOBE OCH DESS LEVERANTÖRER INTE NÅGRA GARANTIER, VILLKOR ELLER UTFÄSTELSER (UTTRYCKLIGA ELLER UNDERFÖRSTÅDDA, I ENLIGHET MED LAG, PRAXIS, SEDVANA ELLER HANDELSBRUK ELLER LIKNANDE), VILKET INKLUDERAR, UTAN BEGRÄNSNING, GARANTIER OM ATT VÅRA TJÄNSTER INTE GÖR INTRÅNG I TREDJE PARTS IMMATERIELLA RÄTTIGHETER, SÄLJBARHET, SAMVERKAN, TILLRÄCKLIG KVALITET, ELLER LÄMPLIGHET FÖR SPECIELLA ÄNDAMÅL. DEL II. PROGRAMVARULICENSAVTAL. GENOM ATT ANVÄNDA, KOPIERA ELLER DISTRIBUERA HELA ELLER DELAR AV PROGRAMVARAN FRÅN ADOBE GODKÄNNER NI VILLKOREN I AVTALET, INKLUSIVE, OCH I SYNNERHET, VILLKOREN GÄLLANDE: ANVÄNDNING I AVSNITT 2; ÖVERLÅTELSE I AVSNITT 4; ANSLUTNINGSMÖJLIGHETER OCH INTEGRITET I AVSNITT 6, GARANTI I AVSNITT 9 OCH ANSVAR I AVSNITT 10 OCH 16. NÄR AVTALET ACCEPTERAS ÄR DET VERKSTÄLLBART GENTEMOT ER OCH ALLA JURIDISKA PERSONER SOM HAR ERHÅLLIT PROGRAMVARAN OCH PÅ VILKENS UPPDRAG DET ANVÄNDS. ANVÄND INTE PROGRAMVARAN OM NI INTE GODKÄNNER DESSA VILLKOR. ADOBE TILLÅTER ENDAST ATT PROGRAMVARAN ANVÄNDS I ENLIGHET MED VILLKOREN I DETTA AVTAL. ANVÄNDNING AV VISST MATERIAL FRÅN TREDJE PART SOM INGÅR I PROGRAMVARAN KAN OMFATTAS AV ANDRA VILLKOR SOM VANLIGEN MEDDELAS I ETT SEPARAT LICENSAVTAL, EN ”README”-FIL I ANSLUTNING TILL SÅDANT MATERIAL ELLER I ”MEDDELANDEN OM TREDJEPARTSPROGRAMVARA OCH/ELLER YTTERLIGARE VILLKOR” PÅ http://www.adobe.com/go/thirdparty_se. 1. Definitioner. Med ”Adobe” avses Adobe Systems Incorporated, ett Delaware-företag på adressen 345 Park Avenue, San Jose, Kalifornien 95110, USA, om underavsnitt 12 (a) i detta avtal är tillämpligt. I annat fall avses Adobe Systems Software Ireland Limited, Unit 3100, Lake Drive, City West Campus, Saggart D24, Irland, ett företag registrerat enligt irländsk lag och som är ett dotterbolag och licenstagare till Adobe Systems Incorporated. Med ”Dator” avses en virtuell eller fysisk elektronisk enhet som hanterar information i digital eller motsvarande form och bearbetar den för ett specifikt resultat baserat på en sekvens av instruktioner. ”Programvara” är (a) allt innehåll i filer (tillhandahållna elektroniskt eller på fysiskt media), på diskar eller andra media som tillhandahålles med detta Avtal, vilket kan inkludera (i) information eller programvara från Adobe eller tredje part, inklusive Adobe Reader® (”Adobe Reader”), Adobe® AIR™ (”Adobe AIR”), Adobe Flash® Player, Shockwave® Player och Authorware® Player (AdobeAIR, Flash, Shockwave och Authorware-spelarna kallas gemensamt för ”Adobe Runtimes”); (ii) tillhörande skriftligt material eller filer (”Dokumentation”); och (iii) teckensnitt samt (b) uppgraderingar, ändrade versioner, uppdateringar, tillägg och exemplar av det föregående, som när som helst tillhandahålles av Adobe (kallas

gemensamt för ”Uppdateringar”). ”Användning” innebär åtkomst, installation, nedladdning, kopiering eller att på annat sätt dra nytta av funktionerna i Programvaran. 2. Programvarulicens. Om Ni erhållit Programvaran från Adobe eller från en av dess auktoriserade licenstagare och under förutsättning att Ni följer villkoren i detta avtal, inklusive begränsningarna i avsnitt 3, beviljar Adobe Er en icke-exklusiv licens att använda programvaran på det sätt och för de ändamål som beskrivs i Dokumentationen enligt följande. 2.1 Allmän användning. Ni får installera och använda ett exemplar av Programvaran på en kompatibel Dator. Se avsnitt 3 för viktiga begränsningar i användningen av Programvaran. 2.2 Serveranvändning. Detta avtal tillåter inte att Programvaran installeras eller används på en datorfilserver. Information om användning av Programvaran på en datorfilserver finns på http://www.adobe.com/go/acrobat_distribute_se om det gäller Adobe Reader; och http://www.adobe.com/go/licensing_se om det gäller Adobe Runtimes. 2.3 Distribution. Denna licens ger Er ingen rätt att underlicensiera eller distribuera programvaran. Information om erhållande av rätten att distribuera Programvaran på materiellt media eller via ett internt nätverk eller tillsammans med Er produkt eller tjänst finns på http://www.adobe.com/go/acrobat_distribute_se om det gäller Adobe Reader; och http://www.adobe.com/go/licensing_se om det gäller Adobe Runtimes. 2.4 Säkerhetskopia. Ni får skapa en säkerhetskopia av Programvaran under förutsättning att säkerhetskopian inte installeras eller används. Ni får inte överlåta era rättigheter avseende en säkerhetskopia såvida Ni inte överlåter alla rättigheter till Programvaran enligt avsnitt 4. 3. Skyldigheter och begränsningar. 3.1 Begränsningar för Adobe Runtime. Ni får inte använda någon Adobe Runtime på en icke-PC-produkt eller med någon inbäddad eller enhetsversion av ett operativsystem. För att undanröja eventuella missförstånd och endast som exempel, får Ni inte använda någon Adobe Runtime på några (i) mobilenheter, set top box ljudenheter (STB), handhållna enheter, telefoner, trådlösa webbrädor, tabletter och pekdatorer (om de inte används med Windows XP Tablet PC Edition eller senare modeller), spelkonsoler, TV-apparater, DVD-spelare, mediacenter (om de inte används med Windows XP Media Center Edition och dess efterföljare), elektroniska anslagstavlor eller andra digitala anslag, Internetanordningar eller andra produkter som är anslutna till Internet, handdatorer (PDA:s), medicinska enheter, bankomater, telematikenheter, spelmaskiner, hemautomatiseringssystem, kiosker, fjärrkontroller, eller någon annan elektronisk konsumentprodukt, (b) operatörsbaserat mobilsystem, kabel-, satelliteller televisionssystem eller (c) andra stängda system. Information om licensiering av Adobe Runtimes för användning på denna typ av system finns på http://www.adobe.com/go/licensing_se. 3.2 Begränsningar i Adobe Reader. Adobe Reader är licensierat och distribueras av Adobe för visning, distribution och delning av PDF-filer. 3.2.1 Begränsningar vid konvertering. Ni får inte integrera eller använda Adobe Reader med någon annan programvara, plugin-program eller förbättring som använder eller är baserade på Adobe Reader när PDF-filer konverteras till ett annat filformat (t ex en PDF-fil till en TIFF-, JPEG- eller SVG-fil.) 3.2.2 Begränsningar för plugin-program. Ni får inte integrera eller använda Adobe Reader med något pluginprogram som inte utvecklats i enlighet med licensavtalet för Adobe Integration Key. 3.2.3 Inaktiverade funktioner. Adobe Reader kan innehålla gömda funktioner eller funktioner som ser inaktiverade ut eller är ”nedtonade” (de ”Inaktiverade funktionerna”). Dessa inaktiverade funktioner aktiveras endast när du öppnar vissa PDF-dokument som har skapats med aktiveringsteknik som endast är tillgänglig från Adobe. Ni får inte försöka komma åt några Inaktiverade funktioner på annat sätt än med aktiveringstekniker, och Ni får inte begära att Adobe Reader ska skapa en funktion som i största utsträckning påminner om någon Inaktiverad funktion eller på annat sätt kringgå den teknik som styr aktiveringen av en sådan funktion. Ytterligare information om inaktiverade funktioner finns på http://www.adobe.com/go/readerextensions_se.

3.3 Meddelanden. Om Ni gör kopior av Programvaran måste dessa märkas med samma copyright- och andra äganderättsliga meddelanden som finns på eller i Programvaran. 3.4 Ingen ändring eller baklängeskonstruktion. Ni får inte ändra, anpassa, översätta eller skapa härledda arbeten baserade på Programvaran. Ni får inte försöka avslöja källkoden till programvaran via baklängeskonstruktion, dekompilering, demontering, förutom om Ni uttryckligen ges tillstånd att baklängeskonstruera eller dekompilera Programvaran enligt tillämplig lag. 4. Överlåtelse. Ni får inte hyra ut, leasa ut, licensiera, överföra eller överlåta era rättigheter till Programvaran, eller godkänna att hela eller delar av exemplar av Programvaran framställs på en annan användares Dator förutom vad som uttryckligen tillåts i detta avtal. Ni får emellertid överlåta alla era rättigheter att använda programvaran till en annan privatperson eller juridisk person, under förutsättning att: (a) Ni även överlåter (i) detta avtal, samt (ii) Programvaran och all annan programvara eller hårdvara som levererats tillsammans med eller är förinstallerad med Programvaran, inklusive alla exemplar, uppdateringar och tidigare versioner till sådan person eller juridisk person; (b) Ni inte behåller några exemplar, inklusive säkerhetskopior eller exemplar lagrade på en Dator; och (c) den mottagande parten accepterar villkoren i avtalet och övriga villkor som gällde vid inköpet av en giltig licens för Programvaran. Oavsett ovanstående får Ni inte överlåta utbildningsexemplar, förhandsversioner eller exemplar av Programvaran som inte är avsedda för försäljning. 5. Immaterialrättsinnehav, förbehåll av rättigheter. Programvaran och tillåtna kopior som Ni framställer, utgör immateriella rättigheter som tillhör Adobe Systems Incorporated och dess leverantörer. Programvarans struktur, organisation och kod utgör värdefulla företagshemligheter och konfidentiell information som tillhör Adobe Systems Incorporated och dess leverantörer. Programvaran är skyddad enligt lag, inklusive men ej begränsat till upphovsrättslagstiftning i USA och andra länder samt internationella konventioner. Med undantag för vad som uttryckligen anges häri, ger detta avtal Er inga immateriella rättigheter till Programvaran, och samtliga rättigheter som inte uttryckligen beviljats Er förbehålles Adobe och dess leverantörer. 6. Anslutningsbarhet och integritet. 6.1 Användning av PDF-filer. När du använder programvaran för att öppna en PDF-fil som har aktiverats för att visa annonser genom registrering i tjänsten Ads for Adobe PDF kan datorn ansluta till en webbplats som drivs av Adobe, en annonsör eller tredje part. När detta sker skickas Er IP-adress (Internet Protocol). Webbplatsens värd kan använda teknik för att skicka (eller ”ta fram”) annonser eller annat elektroniskt innehåll som visas i eller i närheten av den öppnade filen. Den som ansvarar för webbplatsen kan även använda JavaScript, webbsignaler (kallas även för åtgärdstaggar eller enpixelgif-filer), och andra tekniker för att öka och mäta annonsernas effektivitet och för att personligen anpassa annonsinnehållet. Kommunikationen med Adobes webbplatser styrs av Adobes Integritetspolicy online som finns på http://www.adobe.com/go/privacy_se. Adobe har eventuellt inte åtkomst till eller kontroll över funktioner som används av en tredje part, och informationspraxis för tredje parts webbplatser täcks inte av Adobes Integritetspolicy online. 6.2 Uppdatering. Ni accepterar och samtycker till att Programvaran kan göra att Datorn ansluts till Internet automatiskt för att kontrollera om det finns uppdateringar tillgängliga för automatisk nedladdning till Datorn och för att låta Adobe veta att Programvaran har installerats. Endast identifieringsinformation som inte är personlig överförs till Adobe när detta sker. Kommunikationen med Adobes webbplatser styrs av Adobes Integritetspolicy online som finns på http://www.adobe.com/go/privacy_se. Läs dokumentationen för information om ändring av de förvalda uppdateringsinställningarna. 6.3 Settings Manager. Flash Player kan göra att vissa användarinställningar lagras på datorn som ett lokalt delat objekt. Dessa inställningar associeras inte med Er, men kommer att tillåta att Ni kan konfigurera vissa inställningar i Flash Player. Mer information om lokalt delade objekt finns på http://www.adobe.com/go/flashplayer_security_se och mer information om Settings Manager finns på http://www.adobe.com/go/settingsmanager_se.

7. Erbjudanden från tredje part. Programvaran kan tillåta att Ni kommer åt och använder webbplatser från en tredje part, programvara och datatjänster, inklusive interaktiva webbprogram (AIR) (”Erbjudanden från tredje part”). Åtkomsten till och användningen av erbjudanden från tredje part, inklusive varor, tjänster eller information, styrs av de villkor som hör samman med denna typ av erbjudanden. Erbjudanden från tredje part innehas eller tillhandahålles inte av Adobe. 8. Digitala certifikat. 8.1 Användning. Adobe AIR använder digitala certifikat som är användbara för att identifiera utgivaren av Adobe AIR-program som skapats av tredje part. Acrobat Reader använder digitala certifikat för att signera och verifiera signaturer i PDF-dokument och för att verifiera certifierade PDF-dokument. Datorn kan ansluta till Internet när det digitala certifikatet verifieras. Digitala certifikat utfärdas av tredje parts certifikatutfärdare, inklusive de leverantörer av Adobe Certified Document Services (CDS) som anges på http://www.adobe.com/go/partners_cds_se (”Certifikatutfärdare”), eller kan självsigneras. 8.2 Allmänna villkor. Ni och certifikatutfärdaren ansvarar för inköp, användning och tillit till digitala certifikat. Innan Ni litar på ett certifierat dokument, en digital signatur eller Certifikatutfärdare, bör Ni granska de villkor som Certifikatutfärdarens tjänster lyder under, inklusive, exempelvis, eventuella abonnemangsavtal, behäftade partsavtal, certifikatpolicys och bestämmelser om praxis. Se länkarna på http://www.adobe.com/go/partners_cds_se för information om Adobes CDS-leverantörer. 8.3 Bekräftelse. Ni samtycker till att (a) ett digitalt certifikat kan ha återkallats innan det verifierades, vilket gör att den digitala signaturen eller certifikatet verkar vara giltigt när det i själva verket inte är det, (b) ett digitalt certifikats säkerhet eller integritet kan komprometteras p.g.a. åtgärd eller försummelse av den som signerar dokumentet, gällande Certifikatutfärdare, eller annan tredje part och (c) ett certifikat kan vara ett självsignerat certifikat som inte tillhandahålles av en Certifikatutfärdare. NI BÄR ENSAM ANSVARET FÖR ATT AVGÖRA OM DET GÅR ATT LITA PÅ ETT CERTIFIKAT. OM INTE CERTIFIKATUTFÄRDAREN HAR GIVIT EN SEPARAT SKRIFTLIG GARANTI BÄR NI ENSAM ANSVARET FÖR ANVÄNDNINGEN AV DIGITALA CERTIFIKAT. 8.4 Tredje mans nyttjanderättshavare. Ni samtycker till att den Certifikatutfärdare Ni förlitar Er på är en tredje parts förmånstagare av detta avtal och ska ha rätt att upprätthålla detta avtal i sitt eget namn som om det vore Adobe. 8.5 Skadestånd. Ni accepterar att hålla Adobe och alla tillämpliga Certifikatutfärdare (förutom vad som uttryckligen anges i dess villkor) skadelösa från allt ansvar, förluster, åtgärder, skador eller anspråk (inklusive alla rimliga utgifter, kostnader och ombudskostnader) som härrör från eller relaterar till användningen av eller tilliten till tjänster från en sådan utfärdare, inklusive men inte begränsat till (a) tillit till ett utgånget eller tillbakadraget certifikat; (b) oriktig bekräftelse av ett certifikat; (c) användning av ett certifikat på annat sätt än vad som tillåts av tillämpliga villkor, detta avtal eller tillämplig lag; (d) försummelse att göra en rimlig bedömning av omständigheterna vid förlitan på utfärdarens tjänster eller certifikat; eller (e) försummelse att utföra de förpliktelser som erfordras i de villkor som gäller för dessa tjänster. 9. Ingen garanti. Programvaran levereras till er ”I BEFINTLIGT SKICK” och med ALLA BRISTER. VARKEN ADOBE ELLER DESS LEVERANTÖRER OCH CERTIFIKATUTFÄRDARE GARANTERAR PRESTANDA ELLER RESULTAT VID ANVÄNDNING AV PROGRAMVARA, TJÄNSTER FÖR UTFÄRDANDE AV CERTIFIKAT ELLER ANDRA ERBJUDANDEN FRÅN TREDJE PART. FÖRUTOM I DEN UTSTRÄCKNING SOM GARANTIER, VILLKOR ELLER UTFÄSTELSER INTE LAGLIGEN KAN UNDANTAS ELLER BEGRÄNSAS I ENLIGHET MED DEN LAGSTIFTNING SOM GÄLLER I ER JURISDIKTION, LÄMNAR ADOBE OCH DESS LEVERANTÖRER INTE NÅGRA GARANTIER, VILLKOR ELLER UTFÄSTELSER (UTTRYCKLIGA ELLER UNDERFÖRSTÅDDA, I ENLIGHET MED LAG, PRAXIS, SEDVANA ELLER HANDELSBRUK ELLER LIKNANDE), VILKET INKLUDERAR, UTAN BEGRÄNSNING, GARANTIER OM ATT VÅRA TJÄNSTER INTE GÖR INTRÅNG I TREDJE PARTS IMMATERIELLA RÄTTIGHETER, SÄLJBARHET, SAMVERKAN, TILLRÄCKLIG KVALITET, ELLER LÄMPLIGHET FÖR SPECIELLA ÄNDAMÅL. Villkoren i avsnitt 9 och 10 skall gälla även efter uppsägning av detta avtal, oavsett anledning, men detta innebär eller medför inte fortsatt rätt att använda programvaran när detta avtal sagts upp.

10. Ansvarsbegränsning. ADOBE, DESS LEVERANTÖRER ELLER CERTIFIKATUTFÄRDARE SKALL INTE UNDER NÅGRA OMSTÄNDIGHETER VARA ANSVARIGA FÖR NÅGRA SOM HELST SKADOR, KRAV, KOSTNADER, INKLUSIVE FÖLJDSKADOR, INDIREKTA ELLER OAVSIKTLIGA SKADOR, UTEBLIVEN VINST ELLER UTEBLIVEN BESPARING. DETTA SKALL GÄLLA ÄVEN OM FÖRETRÄDARE FÖR ADOBE HAR UNDERRÄTTATS OM ATT DET FINNS RISK FÖR FÖRLUST, SKADA ELLER SKADESTÅNDSANSPRÅK. OVANSTÅENDE BEGRÄNSNINGAR GÄLLER I DEN UTSTRÄCKNING TILLÄMPLIG LAGSTIFTNING I ER JURISDIKTION TILLÅTER DETTA. DET TOTALA ANSVARET FÖR ADOBE, DESS LEVERANTÖRER OCH CERTIFIKATUTFÄRDARE UNDER OCH I SAMBAND MED DETTA AVTAL SKALL VARA BEGRÄNSAT TILL DET BELOPP SOM BETALATS FÖR PROGRAMVARAN. Inget i detta avtal utesluter eller begränsar Adobes ansvar för dödsfall eller personskador med anledning av Adobes vårdslöshet eller ansvar för bedrägeri. Adobe företräder sina leverantörer och certifikatutfärdare avseende friskrivning och/eller begränsning av skyldigheter, garantier och ansvar i enlighet med detta avtal, dock inte i något annat avseende eller syfte. För ytterligare information läs den eventuella jurisdiktionsspecifika information som kan finnas i slutet av detta avtal, eller kontakta Adobes avdelning för kundstöd. 11. Exportregler. Ni samtycker till att Programvaran inte kommer att fraktas, överföras eller exporteras till något annat land, eller användas på något sätt som förbjuds enligt ”United States Export Administration Act”, andra exportlagar, restriktioner eller författningar (gemensamt ”Exportlagar”). Om programvaran identifieras som underkastad exportkontroll under exportlagarna utfäster och garanterar Ni att Ni inte är medborgare eller på annat sätt befinner Er inom ett land som är underkastat handelsembargo (vilket inkluderar Iran, Syrien, Sudan, Kuba och Nordkorea) och att Ni inte på annat sätt är förhindrad att erhålla programvaran under exportlagarna. Alla rättigheter att använda Programvaran ges med förbehållet att sådana rättigheter förverkas om Ni inte följer villkoren i detta avtal. 12. Tillämplig lag. Detta avtal lyder under och skall tolkas i enlighet med gällande lagar i: (a) delstaten Kalifornien, om en licens av programvaran inköps när Ni befinner er i USA, Kanada eller Mexiko; eller (b) Japan, om en licens av programvaran inköps när Ni befinner er i Japan, Kina, Korea eller annat sydostasiatiskt land där det officiella språket skrivs med antingen ideografisk skrift (t.ex. hanzi, kanji eller hanja), och/eller annan skrift som är baserad på eller har motsvarande struktur som ideografisk skrift, t.ex. hangul eller kana; eller (c) England om en licens av programvaran införskaffas när Ni befinner er inom en jurisdiktion som inte omnämns ovan. Respektive domstolar i Santa Clara County, Kalifornien, vid tillämpning av kalifornisk lag, distriktsdomstolen i Tokyo, Japan, vid tillämpning av japansk lag och behöriga domstolar i London, England, vid tillämpning av engelsk lag, skall var och en ha ickeexklusiv jurisdiktion över tvister avseende detta avtal. Detta avtal skall inte underkastas lagvalsregler inom den internationella privaträtten eller Förenta nationernas konvention angående avtal om internationella köp av varor, vars tillämpning är uttryckligen undantagen. 13. Allmänna bestämmelser. Om någon del av detta avtal befinns vara ogiltig och icke verkställbar, skall detta inte påverka avtalets giltighet i övrigt, vilket skall förbli giltigt och verkställbart i enlighet med dess villkor. Avtalet skall inte begränsa de lagliga rättigheter som tillkommer en part i dess egenskap av konsument. Detta avtal får endast ändras i ett skriftligt dokument som har skrivits under av en av Adobe auktoriserad ämbetsman. Uppdateringar kan licensieras till Er av Adobe med ytterligare eller andra villkor. Detta avtal utgör det enda avtalet mellan Adobe och Er såvitt avser programvaran och det ersätter alla tidigare utfästelser, diskussioner, åtaganden, meddelanden eller tillkännagivanden med anknytning till programvaran. 14. Meddelande till slutanvändare inom amerikansk förvaltning.

Avseende slutanvändare inom amerikansk förvaltning accepterar Adobe att följa alla tillämpliga lagar gällande lika rättigheter, inklusive, om så är tillämpligt, det som anges i Executive Order 11246, enligt tillägget i sektion 402 i Vietnam Era Veterans Readjustment Assistance Act från 1974 (38 USC 4212) och sektion 503 i Rehabilitation Act från 1973, enligt tillägget och föreskrifterna i 41 CFR Parts 60-1 t.o.m. 60-60, 60-250 och 60-741. Processklausulen och föreskrifterna i föregående mening skall ingå i detta avtal via hänvisning. 15. Överensstämmelse med licenser. Företag eller organisationer samtycker till att, efter förfrågan från Adobe eller Adobes behöriga ställföreträdare, inom trettio (30) dagar fullständigt dokumentera och intyga att användningen av all programvara från Adobe vid tidpunkten för förfrågan överensstämmer med giltiga licenser från Adobe. 16. Specifika bestämmelser och undantag. 16.1 Ansvarsbegränsning avseende användare bosatta i Tyskland och Österrike. 16.1.1 Om ni har förvärvat programvaran i Tyskland eller Österrike och har er huvudsakliga hemvist i ett av dessa länder, gäller inte avsnitt 10. Istället, avhängigt villkoren i avsnitt 16.1.2, begränsas Adobes skadeståndsansvar enligt följande: (i) Adobes ansvar omfattar endast ersättning för de skador som typiskt sett är förutsebara vid licensavtalets ingång med avseende på skador som uppstår till följd av ringa avtalsbrott av materiella kontraktsenliga förpliktelser, och (ii) Adobe skall inte hållas ansvarigt för skador som uppstår till följd av ringa kontraktsbrott av icke-materiella kontraktsenliga förpliktelser. 16.1.2 Ovan nämnda begränsning omfattar inte fall där tvingande lagstiftning är tillämplig, i synnerhet avseende ansvar enligt produktansvarslagar i Tyskland, ansvar för antagande av speciell garanti eller ansvar för personskador som uppstår till följd av vårdslöshet. 16.1.3 Ni är skyldig att vidta skäliga åtgärder för att undvika och begränsa skador, i synnerhet genom att säkerhetskopiera programvaran och annan data som omfattas av villkoren i detta avtal.

Vid frågor angående detta avtal och för information från Adobe använder Ni den adress- och kontaktinformation som medföljde den här produkten eller informationen på www.adobe.com/se för att kontakta det Adobe-kontor som betjänar Er jurisdiktion. Adobe, AIR, Authorware, Flash, Reader och Shockwave är antingen inregistrerade varumärken eller varumärken som tillhör Adobe Systems Incorporated i USA och/eller i andra länder.

Reader_Player_AIR_WWEULA-sv_SE-20080204_1313

 

ADOBE SYSTEMS INCORPORATED Garanti Reddi Beyanı ve Yazılım Lisans Anlaşması İŞBU BELGE, GARANTİ BİLGİSİNİ (1. BÖLÜM) VE ADOBE YAZILIMININ KULLANIMINI DÜZENLEYEN LİSANS ANLAŞMASINI (2. BÖLÜM) İÇERMEKTEDİR. BÖLÜM I. GARANTİ REDDİ BEYANI. YAZILIM VE DİĞER BELGELER SİZE “OLDUKLARI GİBİ” TÜM HATALARIYLA BİRLİKTE VERİLMEKTEDİR. ADOBE VE TEDARİKÇİLERİ VE SERTİFİKA YETKİLİLERİ, YAZILIMI, SERTİFİKA YETKİLİSİ HİZMETİNİ VEYA DİĞER ÜÇÜNCÜ ŞAHIS ÜRÜNLERİNİ KULLANARAK ELDE EDECEĞİNİZ PERFORMANS VEYA SONUÇLARDAN DOLAYI GARANTİ VERMEZ VE VEREMEZ. BÖLGENİZDE, YÜRÜRLÜKTEKİ YASALAR GEREĞİNCE KAPSAM DIŞI TUTULAMAYACAK YA DA SINIRLANDIRILAMAYACAK GARANTİ, KOŞUL, TAAHHÜT VEYA HÜKÜMLER DIŞINDA, ADOBE, TEDARİKÇİLERİ VE SERTİFİKA YETKİLİLERİ, PERFORMANS, SONUÇLAR, ÜÇÜNCÜ TARAF HAKLARININ İHLAL EDİLMEDİĞİ, SATILABİLİRLİK, ENTEGRASYON, TATMİN EDİCİ KALİTE, BELİRLİ BİR AMACA UYGUNLUK DAHİL ANCAK BUNLARLA SINIRLI OLMAKSIZIN HİÇBİR KONUDA GARANTİ VERMEMEKTE, KOŞUL BELİRTMEMEKTE, BEYANDA BULUNMAMAKTADIR (YASALAR, ÖRF VE ADET HUKUKU, TEAMÜLLER YA DA BAŞKA KAYNAKLAR GEREĞİ, AÇIKÇA YA DA ZIMNEN). BÖLÜM II. YAZILIM LİSANS ANLAŞMASI. ADOBE YAZILIMINI KISMEN VEYA TAMAMEN KULLANMAK, KOPYALAMAK VEYA DAĞITMAKLA İŞBU ANLAŞMANIN, 2. MADDEDEKİ KULLANIM, 4.MADDEDEKİ DEVİR, 6. MADDEDEKİ BAĞLANTI VE GİZLİLİK, 9. MADDEDEKİ TEMİNAT VE 10.VE 16.BÖLÜMLERDEKİ KISITLAMALAR BAŞTA OLMAK ÜZERE TÜM HÜKÜM VE KOŞULLARINI KABUL ETMİŞ OLACAKSINIZ. KABULDEN SONRA İŞBU ANLAŞMA GEREK SİZE, GEREKSE DE YAZILIMI ALAN VE ADINA KULLANILDIĞI HER TÜRLÜ TÜZEL KİŞİYE YÖNELİK OLARAK YÜRÜRLÜKTE OLACAKTIR. ŞARTLARI KABUL ETMIYORSANIZ, YAZILIMI KULLANMAYIN. ADOBE SİZE YAZILIMI SADECE İŞBU ANLAŞMA HÜKÜMLERİ ÇERÇEVESİNDE KULLANMA İZNİ VERMEKTEDİR. YAZILIM KAPSAMINDA BULUNAN ÜÇÜNCÜ ŞAHISLARA AİT OLAN MALZEMELERİN KULLANIMI AYRI BİR LİSANS ANLAŞMASI, BÖYLE MALZEMELERİN YANINDAKİ “BENİ OKU” DOSYALARINDA VEYA http://www.adobe.com/go/thirdparty_tr ADRESİNDE BULUNAN “ÜÇÜNCÜ ŞAHIS YAZILIM UYARILARI VE/VEYA ÖZEL HÜKÜM VE KOŞULLAR”A BAĞLI OLABİLİR. 1. Tanımlar. “Adobe”, aşağıdaki 12 (a) bendi kapsamında, Delaware eyaletinde kurulmuş, 345 Park Avenue, San Jose, California 95110 adresinde mukim Adobe Systems Incorporated anlamına, diğer hallerde ise, İrlanda Kanunlarına göre kurulmuş ve faaliyet gösteren, Adobe Systems Incorporated şirketinin bağlı ve lisanslı bir kuruluşu olan Adobe Systems Software Ireland Limited (Unit 3100, Lake Drive, City West Campus, Saggart D24, İrlanda Cumhuriyeti) anlamına gelmektedir. “Bilgisayar” dijital veya benzer formda bilgileri kabul eden ve bunları bir komut dizisini temel alarak belirli bir sonucu elde etmek için işleyen sanal ya da fiziksel kişisel elektronik cihaz anlamına gelecektir. “Yazılım” (a) (i) Adobe Reader® (“Adobe Reader”), Adobe® AIR™ (“Adobe AIR”), Adobe Flash® Player, Shockwave® Player ve Authorware® Player (hepsi birden, Adobe AIR olarak ve Flash, Shockwave ve Authorware oynatıcıları “Adobe Çalıştırma Sürümleri” olarak geçer) dahil olmak üzere Adobe’ye veya üçüncü bir şahsa ait yazılımlar veya bilgisayar bilgileri, (ii) ilgili açıklayıcı yazılı belgeler ve dosyalar (“Dokümanlar”) ve (iii) yazı tiplerini içeren, işbu anlaşmanın birlikte verildiği bütün dosya içerikleri (elektronik veya fiziksel aygıtlarla aktarılan) veya diskler ya da diğer ortam dosyaları ve (b) bunların Adobe tarafından ayrı bir anlaşma kapsamında olmaksızın herhangi bir zamanda verilecek yükseltmeleri, değiştirilmiş sürümleri, güncellemeleri, ekleri ve

kopyaları (hepsi birden “Güncellemeler”). “Kullanım”, Yazılımın işlevlerini kullanarak Yazılıma erişmek, Yazılımı kurmak, indirmek, kopyalamak veya Yazılımdan faydalanmak anlamına gelmektedir. 2. Yazılım Lisansı. Eğer yazılımı Adobe’den veya onun lisanslı yetkililerinden birinden satın aldıysanız, işbu anlaşmanın 3. Maddedeki kısıtlamalar dahil olmak üzere tüm hüküm ve koşullarına uymanız koşuluyla, Adobe size, söz konusu Yazılımın Dokümanlarda ve aşağıda belirtilen şekil ve amaçla münhasır olmayan kullanım hakkını vermektedir: 2.1 Genel Kullanım. Yazılımın yalnızca bir kopyasını, uyumlu Bilgisayarınıza kurup kullanabilirsiniz. Yazılımın kullanılması konusundaki önemli kısıtlamalar için 3. Maddeye bakın. 2.2 Sunucu kullanımı. İşbu anlaşma, yazılımı, bilgisayar dosya sunucusu üzerinde kurarak kullanmanıza izin vermemektedir. Yazılımı, bilgisayar dosya sunucusu üzerinde kullanma konusunda http://www.adobe.com/go/acrobat_distribute_tr adresinden Adobe Reader ile; veya , http://www.adobe.com/go/licensing_tr adresinden Adobe Çalıştırma Sürümleri ile ilgili bilgi alabilirsiniz. 2.3 Dağıtım. İşbu lisans size, Yazılımı alt lisans yoluyla tahsis etme veya dağıtma hakkı tanımaz. Yazılımı, somut bir aygıt ya da dahili bir ağ aracılığıyla ya da ürün veya hizmetinizle birlikte dağıtma hakkını elde etmek için, http://www.adobe.com/go/acrobat_distribute_tr adresinden Adobe Reader ile ilgili veya http://www.adobe.com/go/licensing_tr adresinden Adobe Çalıştırma Sürümleri ile ilgili bilgi alabilirsiniz. 2.4 Yedek Kopya. Yedek kopyanızı kurmamak ve kullanmamak koşuluyla Yazılımın bir adet yedek kopyasını alabilirsiniz. Yazılımın bütün haklarını 4. Maddeye göre devretmediğiniz sürece, Yazılımın yedek kopyasını devredemezsiniz. 3. Yükümlülükler ve Kısıtlamalar. 3.1 Adobe Çalıştırma Sürümü Kısıtlamaları. Bir Adobe Çalıştırma Sürümünü, kişisel bilgisayar olmayan bir aygıtta veya herhangi bir işletim sisteminin yerleşik veya cihaz sürümü ile birlikte kullanamazsınız. Şüpheye yer bırakmamak için ve bir örnekle açıklamak gerekirse, bir Adobe Çalıştırma Sürümünü, (a) bir mobil cihaz, set top box (STB), portatif bilgisayar, telefon, web pad cihazı, tablet ve Tablet PC (Windows XP Tablet PC Sürümü ve ardılları hariç), oyun konsolu, TV, DVD oynatıcı, medya oynatıcıları (Windows XP Media Center Sürümü ve ardılları hariç), elektronik billboard veya diğer sayısal tabelalar, İnternet cihazları ya da diğer İnternet bağlantılı aygıtlar, PDA, medikal cihazlar, ATM, telematik cihazlar, oyun makineleri, ev otomasyon sistemleri, kiosk, uzaktan kontrollü cihazlar veya diğer tüketici elektroniği cihazları, (b) operatör tabanlı mobil, kablolu, uydu veya televizyon sistemleri veya (c) diğer kapalı sistem cihazlarında kullanamazsınız. Bu sistemlerde Adobe Çalıştırma Sürümlerinin lisans işlemleri konusunda daha fazla bilgi için http://www.adobe.com/go/licensing_tr adresini ziyaret edin. 3.2 Adobe Reader Kısıtlamaları. Adobe Reader, Adobe tarafından PDF dosyalarının görüntülenmesi, dağıtılması ve paylaşılması için lisanslanmakta ve dağıtılmaktadır. 3.2.1. Dönüşüm Kısıtlamaları. PDF dosyalarını diğer dosya biçimlerine (örneğin, PDF dosyasını bir TIFF, JPEG veya SVG dosyasına) dönüştürürken Adobe Reader’ı, herhangi bir başka yazılımla; Adobe Reader’ı kullanan veya temel alan eklenti ya da donanımla birlikte kullanamaz, bunlara entegre edemezsiniz. 3.2.2. Eklenti Kısıtlamaları. Adobe Reader’ı, Adobe Integration Key Lisans Anlaşması’na uygun olarak geliştirilmeyen eklenti yazılımlarla birlikte kullanamaz, bunlara entegre edemezsiniz. 3.2.3 Devre Dışı Bırakılan Özellikler. Adobe Reader, gizlenmiş ya da devre dışı bırakılmış ya da “silik gösterilmiş” (“Devre Dışı Bırakılan Özellikler”) özellikler veya işlevler içerebilir. Devre Dışı Bırakılan Özellikler, yalnızca Adobe tarafından sağlanan teknoloji ile oluşturulan PDF belgeleri açıldığında etkinleşecektir. Bu türden etkinleştirme teknolojilerini kullanma yöntemi haricinde, Devre Dışı Bırakılan Özellikler’e erişemez veya erişme girişiminde bulunamazsınız; Devre Dışı Bırakılan Özellikler’e önemli ölçüde benzeyen bir özellik oluşturma konusunda Adobe Reader’ı kullanamaz veya bu tip özelliklerin etkinleştirilmesini kontrol eden teknolojiyi başka şekilde devre dışı bırakamazsınız. Devre dışı bırakılan özelliklerle ilgili daha fazla bilgi için lütfen http://www.adobe.com/go/readerextensions_tr adresini ziyaret edin.

3.3 Uyarılar. Yazılımın herhangi bir kopyası, Yazılımın üzerinde veya içinde bulunan telif hakkı ve diğer tüm fikri mülkiyet notlarını içermek zorundadır. 3.4 Ters Mühendislik veya Değişiklik Yasağı. Yazılımı değiştiremez, uyarlayamaz, tercüme edemez veya Yazılımı temel alan türev çalışmalar yapamazsınız. Yazılım üzerinde, yürürlükteki yasalarca ters mühendisliğe veya kaynak koda dönüştürmeye izin verilmesi dışında ters mühendislik, derlemeyi çözme, kaynak koda dönüştürme işlemleri yapamaz veya başka şekillerde Yazılımın kaynak kodunu keşfetmeye çalışamazsınız. 4. Devir. Yazılımla ilgili haklarınızı kiralayamaz, satamaz, alt lisans yoluyla devredemez, devir veya transfer edemez, işbu anlaşma kapsamında açıkça izin verilen haller dışında yazılımın herhangi bir bölümünü başka bir kullanıcının bilgisayarına kopyalatamazsınız. Bununla birlikte, tüm Yazılım kullanım haklarınızı (a) (i) bu Anlaşmayı, (ii) Yazılımı ve Yazılım ile birlikte paketlenmiş veya ön kurulumu yapılmış tüm yazılım ve donanımlarla tüm kopyalarını, güncellemeleri ve önceki sürümleri, (b) bir bilgisayarda kayıtlı yedekler ve kopyalar dahil olmak üzere hiçbir yükseltmeyi, güncellemeyi veya kopyayı elinizde tutmamanız ve (c) Yazılımı alan tarafın işbu Anlaşma ile Yazılım için geçerli bir lisansı edindiğiniz diğer tüm hüküm ve koşulları kabul etmesi kaydıyla başka bir gerçek ya da tüzel kişiye devredebilirsiniz. Yukarıda belirtilenlere rağmen, yazılımın eğitim, ön sürüm ya da satış için olmayan kopyalarını devredemezsiniz. 5. Fikri Mülkiyet Hakları, Hakların Saklı Tutulması. Yazılım ve Yazılımdan alacağınız tüm kopyaların fikri mülkiyeti Adobe Systems Incorporated ve tedarikçilerine aittir. Yazılımın yapısı, düzeni ve şifresi Adobe Systems Incorporated ve tedarikçilerinin değerli ticari sırlarıdır. Yazılım Amerika Birleşik Devletleri ve diğer ülkelerdeki telif hakları yasaları dahil olmak fakat bunlarla sınırlı olmamak üzere yasalar ve uluslararası anlaşmalarla korunmaktadır. İşbu anlaşma, kapsamında özellikle belirtilen hususların dışında size hiçbir fikri mülkiyet hakkı tanımamaktadır ve Adobe Systems Incorporated ve tedarikçileri tarafından işbu Anlaşma kapsamında açıkça verilmiş bulunanların dışındaki tüm haklar saklıdır. 6. Bağlantı ve Gizlilik. 6.1 PDF Dosyalarının Kullanımı. Adobe PDF için Reklamlar hizmetine kayıtlı olduğu için reklam görüntüleyen bir PDF dosyasını açmak için Yazılımı kullandığınızda bilgisayarınız Adobe’nin, bir reklamverenin veya başka bir üçüncü tarafın işlettiği bir web sitesine bağlanabilir. Bu işlem sırasında İnternet Protokol (IP) adresiniz gönderilir. Siteyi barındıran taraf, açılan dosyanın içinde veya kenarında beliren reklam veya diğer elektronik içeriği göndermek (veya “sunmak”) amacıyla belirli teknolojiler kullanabilir. Web sitesi operatörü, reklamların verimliliğini arttırmak ve ölçmek amacıyla ve reklam içeriğini kişiselleştirmek için JavaScript, web işaretleri (aynı zamanda işlem etiketi ya da açık GIF teknolojisi olarak bilinir) ve diğer teknolojileri kullanabilir. Adobe web sitesi ile olan iletişiminiz, http://www.adobe.com/go/privacy_tr sitesinde bulunan Adobe Online Privacy Policy (Adobe Çevrimiçi Gizlilik Kuralları) belgesine tabidir. Adobe’nin, üçüncü şahısların kullandığı özelliklere erişimi veya bu özellikler üzerinde kontrolü bulunmayabilir. Üçüncü şahısların web sitelerindeki bu tip bilgilerin kullanımı, Adobe Online Privacy Policy belgesine tabi değildir. 6.2 Güncelleme. Yazılımın, Bilgisayarınıza otomatik olarak indirmeye hazır güncellemeleri kontrol etmek için, Bilgisayarınızı otomatik olarak İnternet’e bağlayacağını ve Adobe’yi, Yazılımın başarılı bir şekilde kurulduğunu bilgilendireceğini kabul etmiş sayılırsınız. Bu işlem sırasında yalnızca, kişisel olmayan bilgiler iletilmektedir. Adobe web sitesi ile olan iletişiminiz, http://www.adobe.com/go/privacy_tr sitesinde bulunan Adobe Online Privacy Policy’ye (Adobe Çevrimiçi Gizlilik Bildirisi) tabidir. Varsayılan güncelleme ayarlarını değiştirmekle ilgili bilgiler için Belgelere bakın. 6.3 Ayar Yöneticisi. Flash Oynatıcı, bazı kullanıcı ayarlarının, Bilgisayarınızda yerel paylaşılan nesne olarak kaydedilmesine neden olabilir. Bu ayarlar, sizinle ilgili değildir ancak size, Flash Oynatıcı’daki bazı ayarları değiştirebilme olanağı sunar. Yerel paylaşılan nesnelerle ilgili daha ayrıntılı bilgiyi http://www.adobe.com/go/flashplayer_security_tr adresinden ve Ayar Yöneticisi ile ilgili bilgiyi de http://www.adobe.com/go/settingsmanager_tr adresinden bulabilirsiniz.

7. Üçüncü Şahıs Ürünleri. Yazılım, zengin İnternet uygulamaları dahil olmak üzere üçüncü şahıs web sitelerine, yazılım uygulamalarına ve veri hizmetlerine erişim ve bunlarla ortak çalışabilme olanağı sunabilir (“Üçüncü Şahıs Ürünleri”) Ürün, hizmet veya bilgi dahil olmak üzere bu tip Üçüncü Şahıs Ürünlerine erişiminiz ve bu ürünleri kullanımınız, bu ürünlerle ilgili şartlar altında düzenlenmiştir. Üçüncü Şahıs Ürünleri, Adobe’un değildir ve Adobe tarafından sağlanmaz. 8. Dijital Sertifikalar. 8.1 Kullanım. Adobe AIR, üçüncü şahıslar tarafından oluşturulan Adobe AIR uygulamalarının yayıncısını tanımanıza yardımcı olacak dijital sertifikalar kullanır. Adobe Reader, PDF belgelerini imzalamak ve imzaları doğrulamak amacıyla ve sertifikalı PDF belgelerini doğrulamak için dijital sertifika kullanır. Bilgisayarınız, dijital sertifikanın doğrulanması sırasında İnternet’e bağlanabilir. Dijital sertifikalar, http://www.adobe.com/go/partners_cds_tr adresinde listelenen Adobe Certified Services (CDS - Adobe Sertifikalı Hizmetler) satıcıları da dahil olmak üzere, üçüncü şahıs sertifika yetkilileri tarafından yayımlanan veya kendinden imzalı sertifikalardır. 8.2 Hüküm ve Koşullar. Dijital sertifikaları satın alma, kullanma ve dijital sertifikaların güvenilirliği sizin ve Sertifika Yetkilisinin sorumluluğunuzdadır. Sertifikalı bir belgeye, dijital imzaya veya Sertifika Yetkilisi hizmetlerine güvenmeden önce, ilgili Sertifika Yetkilisinin sağlamış olduğu hizmetlerin tabi olduğu, örneğin, abonelik sözleşmesi, güvenirlik anlaşmaları, sertifika yönetmelikleri ve uygulama bildirimleri gibi geçerli hüküm ve şartları incelemelisiniz. Adobe’nin CDS satıcıları ile ilgili bilgi için http://www.adobe.com/go/partners_cds_tr adresindeki bağlantılara bakın. 8.3. Onay. (a) Bir dijital sertifikanın doğrulama işlemi yapılmadan önce iptal edilmiş olabileceğini bu durumun dijital imzanın veya sertifikanın geçerli olmadığı halde geçerli görünmesine neden olabileceğini, (b) dijital bir sertifikanın güvenliğinin veya doğruluğunun belgeyi imzalayan kişi, ilgili Sertifika Yetkilisi ya da üçüncü şahısların fiilleri veya ihmali nedeniyle tehlikeye girebileceğini ve (c) bir sertifikanın, bir Sertifika Yetkilisi tarafından sağlanmamış, kendinden imzalı bir sertifika olabileceğini kabul etmiş sayılırsınız. BİR SERTİFİKAYA GÜVENİP GÜVENMEME KONUSUNDA TEK SORUMLU SİZSİNİZ. BİR SERTİFİKA YETKİLİSİ TARAFINDAN SİZE VERİLMİŞ EK BİR YAZILI GARANTİ OLMADIKÇA, DİJİTAL SERTİFİKAYI TÜM RİSKLERİ SADECE SİZE AİT OLMAK ÜZERE KULLANIRSINIZ. 8.4 Lehdar Üçüncü Şahıslar. Güvenli bulduğunuz Sertifika Yetkilisinin işbu anlaşma hükümleri açısından lehdar üçüncü şahıs olarak değerlendirileceğini ve bu hükümlerin uygulanmasını sağlama konusunda Adobe ile aynı haklara sahip olduğunu kabul etmektesiniz. 8.5 Tazminat. (a) Süresi dolmuş ya da feshedilmiş bir sertifikaya güvenerek iş yapmak; (b) sertifikanın hatalı bir şekilde tasdik edilmesi; (c) herhangi bir sertifikanın ilgili şartlar, işbu Anlaşma ya da ilgili yasalar tarafından izin verilen amaç dışında kullanılması; (d) düzenleyicinin hizmetlerine veya sertifikalarına güvenme konusunda makul karar verememiş olmanız; ve (e) hizmetle ilgili hüküm ve koşullarda belirtilen yükümlülüklerin yerine getirilmemiş olması da dahil olmak ancak bunlarla sınırlı kalmamak kaydıyla, bir Sertifika Yetkilisinin sağlamış olduğu herhangi bir hizmetin kullanılmasından kaynaklanan zarar, ziyan, dava ya da tazminat nedeniyle (tüm makul giderler, masraflar ve avukatlık ücretleri de dahil olmak üzere) Adobe’yi ve ilgili Sertifika Yetkilisini (hüküm ve koşullarında açık olarak belirtilen durumlar dışında) sorumlu tutmayacağınızı kabul etmektesiniz. 9. Garanti Olmaması. Yazılım size “OLDUĞU GİBİ” TÜM HATALARIYLA birlikte verilmektedir. ADOBE VE TEDARİKÇİLERİ VE SERTİFİKA YETKİLİLERİ, YAZILIMI, SERTİFİKA YETKİLİSİ HİZMETİNİ VEYA DİĞER ÜÇÜNCÜ ŞAHIS ÜRÜNLERİNİ KULLANARAK ELDE EDECEĞİNİZ PERFORMANS VEYA SONUÇLARDAN DOLAYI GARANTİ VERMEZ VE VEREMEZ. BÖLGENİZDE, YÜRÜRLÜKTEKİ YASALAR GEREĞİNCE KAPSAM DIŞI TUTULAMAYACAK YA DA SINIRLANDIRILAMAYACAK GARANTİ, KOŞUL, TAAHHÜT VEYA HÜKÜMLER DIŞINDA, ADOBE, TEDARİKÇİLERİ VE SERTİFİKA YETKİLİLERİ, PERFORMANS, SONUÇLAR, ÜÇÜNCÜ TARAF HAKLARININ İHLAL EDİLMEDİĞİ, SATILABİLİRLİK, ENTEGRASYON, TATMİN EDİCİ KALİTE, BELİRLİ BİR AMACA UYGUNLUK DAHİL ANCAK BUNLARLA SINIRLI OLMAKSIZIN HİÇBİR KONUDA GARANTİ VERMEMEKTE, KOŞUL BELİRTMEMEKTE, BEYANDA

BULUNMAMAKTADIR (YASALAR, ÖRF VE ADET HUKUKU, TEAMÜLLER YA DA BAŞKA KAYNAKLAR GEREĞİ, AÇIKÇA YA DA ZIMNEN). 9. ve 10. Madde hükümleri işbu anlaşmanın süresi boyunca geçerliliklerini sürdürecekler ancak bu durum işbu Anlaşmanın hitamından sonra Yazılımı Kullanmaya devam etme hakkı doğurmayacaktır. 10. Sorumluluğun Sınırlandırılması. ADOBE, TEDARİKÇİLERİ VEYA SERTİFİKA YETKİLİLERİ SİZE KARŞI HİÇBİR DURUMDA, NEDEN OLUNAN, DOLAYLI, ARIZİ ZARARLAR VEYA KAR YA DA BİRİKİM KAYBI DAHİL OLMAK ÜZERE, HİÇBİR ZARARDAN, HAK TALEBİNDEN VEYA MALİYETTEN, BU TÜRDEN OLASI KAYIP, ZARAR VEYA HAK TALEBİ BİR ADOBE TEMSİLCİSİNE BİLDİRİLMİŞ OLSA BİLE SORUMLU DEĞİLDİR. BU SINIRLANDIRMA SİZİN YARGI ÇEVRENİZDE GEÇERLİ OLAN YASALARIN İZİN VERDİĞİ ÖLÇÜDE GEÇERLİDİR. ADOBE’NİN SORUMLULUĞU VE BAĞLI KURULUŞLARININ, TEDARİKÇİLERİNİN VE SERTİFİKA YETKİLİLERİNİN İŞBU ANLAŞMADAN KAYNAKLANAN YÜKÜMLÜLÜKLERİ SADECE YAZILIM İÇİN ÖDENMİŞ OLAN LİSANS ÜCRETİ İLE SINIRLIDIR. İşbu Anlaşmanın hiçbir hükmü, Adobe’nin ihmalinden ya da sahtekarlığından kaynaklanan ölüm ya da yaralanma durumunda Adobe’nin size karşı olan yükümlülüklerini sınırlamamaktadır. Adobe sadece yükümlülüklerin, garantilerin ve sorumlulukların işbu Anlaşmada belirtilen çerçevede tekzibi, hariç tutulması ve/veya sınırlandırılması konularında tedarikçileri ve Sertifika Yetkilileri namına hareket etmektedir, başka bir amaç taşımamaktadır. Ayrıntılı bilgi için lütfen eğer mevcutsa işbu Anlaşmanın sonunda yer alan yasal bilgilere başvurunuz ya da Adobe Müşteri Destek Departmanı ile irtibat kurunuz. 11. İhracat Kuralları. Yazılımın Amerika Birleşik Devletleri İhracat Yasası ile diğer ihracat yasaları, sınırlamaları ve yönetmelikleri (topluca “İhracat Yasaları”) tarafından yasaklanmış ülkelere sevk, devir ve ihraç edilmeyeceğini ve bu yasalarda yasaklanan şekillerde kullanılmayacağını kabul etmektesiniz. Ayrıca Yazılımın İhracat Yasaları uyarınca kontrollü olarak ihraç edilen ürünler kapsamında değerlendirilmesi durumunda, ambargo konulmuş bir ülkenin (İran, Suriye, Sudan, Küba ve Kuzey Kore dahil olmak ancak bunlarla sınırlı kalmamak kaydıyla) vatandaşı olmadığınızı ve bu ülkelerden birinde ikamet etmediğinizi ve İhracat Yasalarınca Yazılımı satın almanızın yasaklanmamış olduğunu kabul ve taahhüt etmektesiniz. İşbu Anlaşmanın hüküm ve koşullarına uymadığınız taktirde Yazılım Kullanma haklarını ihlal etmiş olarak kabul edileceksiniz. 12. Geçerli Yasalar. İşbu Anlaşma aşağıda belirtilen bölgelerde yürürlükte olan yasalara tabi olup bu yasalara göre yorumlanır: (a) Yazılımı Amerika Birleşik Devletleri, Kanada veya Meksika sınırları içerisindeyken edinmeniz durumunda Kaliforniya Eyaleti Yasaları; veya (b) Yazılımı Japonya, Çin, Kore veya resmi dilin ideografik simgelerle (örneğin Hanzi, Kanji veya Hanja) ve/veya Hangul ya da Kana gibi benzeri simgelerle yazıldığı diğer Güney Doğu Asya ülkelerin sınırları içerisindeyken edinmeniz durumunda Japonya yasaları veya (c) Yazılımı yukarıda belirtilen ülkelerin dışında bir ülke sınırları içerisindeyken edinmeniz durumunda İngiltere yasaları. Kaliforniya yasalarına tabi olunduğunda Santa Clara County, Kaliforniya mahkemeleri, Japon yasalarına tabi olunduğunda Tokyo Bölge Mahkemesi, İngiliz yasalarına tabi olunduğunda ise İngiltere mahkemeleri yetkilidir. Bu mahkemeler işbu Anlaşmadan kaynaklanan ihtilafların çözümünde münhasırlık özelliği taşımadan yetkilidirler. İşbu Anlaşma herhangi bir yargı bölgesinde ya da işbu Anlaşma tahtında açıkça uygulama dışı bırakılan Uluslararası Ticaret hakkındaki Birleşmiş Milletler Konvansiyonunda yasaların çatışması prensibine tabi değildir. 13. Genel Hükümler. Eğer işbu Anlaşmanın herhangi bir hükmünün geçersiz veya uygulanamaz olduğu anlaşılırsa, işbu Anlaşmanın diğer şartları tamamen etkili ve geçerli olmaya devam edecektir. İşbu Anlaşma tüketici sıfatıyla hareket eden herhangi bir şahsın yasal haklarına halel getirmeyecektir. İşbu Anlaşma ancak Adobe’nin yetkili bir görevlisi tarafından imzalanmış bir yazı ile değiştirilebilecektir. Güncellemeler size, Adobe tarafından ek veya başka hükümler çerçevesinde lisanslanabilir. İşbu anlaşma Yazılım konusunda Adobe ile yapmış olduğunuz tüm anlaşma

hükümlerini içermekte ve Yazılım ile ilgili olarak önceden yapılmış tüm taahhütleri, görüşmeleri, yazışmaları ve reklamları geçersiz kılmaktadır. 14. ABD Hükümeti üyesi son kullanıcılara uyarılar. Adobe A.B.D. Hükümetine bağlı Son Kullanıcılara yönelik olarak, değiştirilmiş şekliyle 11246 sayılı Kanun Hükmünde Kararname, 1974 tarihli Vietnam Gazileri Yeniden Düzenleme Yardım Yasasının 402’nci Maddesi (38 USC 4212), değiştirilmiş şekliyle 1973 tarihli Rehabilitasyon Yasası ve 41 CFR 60-1 ila 60-60, 60-250 ve 60-741 sayılı bölümleri hükümleri uyarınca tüm fırsat eşitliği yasalarına uymayı taahhüt etmektedir. Yukarıdaki cümlede belirtilen istihdamda eşit fırsatlar yaratılmasına yönelik maddeler ve yönetmelikler atıfta bulunularak işbu Anlaşmaya dahil edilmiştir. 15. Lisansa Uygunluk. Ticari şirketler ve kurumlar, Adobe ya da yetkili temsilcisi tarafından talep edilmesi halinde otuz (30) gün içerisinde, talep tarihi itibariyle tüm Yazılımların Adobe tarafından düzenlenen geçerli lisansa uygun bir şekilde kullanıldığını belgeleyip onaylayacaklardır. 16. Özel hükümler ve İstisnalar. 16.1 Almanya’da veya Avusturya’da ikamet eden Kullanıcılar için Sınırlı Yükümlülük. 16.1.1 Yazılımı Almanya’dan veya Avusturya’dan satın almışsanız ve genellikle bu ülkelerden birinde ikamet ediyorsanız işbu anlaşmanın 10. Bölümü uygulanmayacak, bunun yerine, 16.1.2 sayılı paragraf hükümlerine tabi olmak koşuluyla Adobe’nin yasal zarar sorumluluğu aşağıda belirtilen sınırlamalara tabi olacaktır: (i) Adobe sadece sözleşmeden kaynaklanan maddi bir yükümlülüğün hafif ölçüde ihlali çerçevesinde lisans anlaşmasının akdedildiği tarihte öngörülmesi mümkün olan zararlardan yükümlü olacaktır ve (ii) Adobe sözleşmeden maddi olmayan yükümlülüklerin hafif ölçüde ihlali sonucunda ortaya çıkan zararlardan yükümlü olmayacaktır. 16.1.2 Yukarıda belirtilen yükümlülük sınırlaması, özellikle Almanya Ürün Yükümlülüğü Yasasından kaynaklanan yükümlükler, belirli bir garanti verilmesinden kaynaklanan yükümlülükler ve yaralanmalara neden olan hatalardan kaynaklanan yükümlülükler gibi zorunlu yasal yükümlülükler için geçerli olmayacaktır. 16.1.3 İşbu Anlaşma hükümleri çerçevesinde, Yazılımın ve bilgisayarınızdaki verilerin yedek kopyalarını çıkartmak gibi gerekli tüm makul önlemleri almanız gerekmektedir.

İşbu Anlaşma ile ilgili herhangi bir sorunuz varsa ya da Adobe’den herhangi bir bilgi almak isterseniz, bölgenizdeki Adobe bürosuyla irtibata geçmek için ürün paketinde bulunan adresi ve irtibat bilgileri kullanabilir veya web üzerinden www.adobe.com/tr adresini ziyaret edebilirsiniz. Adobe, AIR, Authorware, Flash, Reader ve Shockwave Amerika Birleşik Devletlerinde ve/veya diğer ülkelerde Adobe Systems Incorporated şirketinin tescilli ticari markalarıdır ya da ticari markalarıdır.

Reader_Player_AIR_WWEULA-tr_TR-20080204_1313

 

ADOBE SYSTEMS INCORPORATED Відмова від гарантій та ліцензійна угода на комп’ютерну програму. ЦЕЙ ДОКУМЕНТ МІСТИТЬ ІНФОРМАЦІЮ ПРО ГАРАНТІЇ (ЧАСТИНА І) ТА ЛІЦЕНЗІЙНУ УГОДУ, ЩО РЕГЛАМЕНТУЄ ВИКОРИСТАННЯ ПРОГРАМНОГО ЗАБЕЗПЕЧЕННЯ ADOBE (ЧАСТИНА ІІ). ЧАСТИНА І. ВІДМОВА ВІД ГАРАНТІЙНИХ ЗОБОВ’ЯЗАНЬ. ЦЯ КОМПЮТЕРНА ПРОГРАМА ІЗ СУПРОВІДНОЮ ДОКУМЕНТАЦІЄЮ ПОСТАВЛЯЄТЬСЯ НА УМОВАХ „ЯК Є” І МОЖЕ МІСТИТИ ПЕВНУ КІЛЬКІСТЬ НЕДОЛІКІВ. ADOBE, ЇЇ ПОСТАЧАЛЬНИКИ ТА ОРГАНИ СЕРТИФІКАЦІЇ НЕ НАДАЮТЬ ЖОДНИХ ГАРАНТІЙ ЩОДО РОБОЧИХ ХАРАКТЕРИСТИК АБО РЕЗУЛЬТАТІВ, ОДЕРЖАНИХ З ВИКОРИСТАННЯМ ПРОГРАМНОГО ЗАБЕЗПЕЧЕННЯ, ПОСЛУГ ОРГАНУ СЕРТИФІКАЦІЇ АБО ІНШИХ ПРОПОЗИЦІЙ ТРЕТІХ ОСІБ. ЗА ВИНЯТКОМ БУДЬ-ЯКОЇ ГАРАНТІЇ, УМОВИ, ЗАЯВИ АБО ПОЛОЖЕННЯ, ЯКІ НЕ МОЖУТЬ БУТИ ВИКЛЮЧЕНИМИ АБО ЯКІ НЕ ДОЗВОЛЯЄТЬСЯ ВИКЛЮЧИТИ АБО ОБМЕЖИТИ ЗГІДНО ЧИННОГО ЗАКОНОДАВСТВА, ЯКЕ ЗАСТОСОВУЄТЬСЯ У ВАШІЙ ЮРИСДИКЦІЇ, КОМПАНІЯ ADOBE, ЇЇ ПОСТАЧАЛЬНИКИ ТА ОРГАНИ СЕРТИФІКАЦІЇ НЕ НАДАЮТЬ ГАРАНТІЙ, УМОВ АБО ПОЛОЖЕНЬ (ВИРАЖЕНИХ ПРЯМО ЧИ ОПОСЕРЕДКОВАНО, ЯК ЗА ЗАКОНОМ, ЗАГАЛЬНИМ ПРАВОМ, ЗВИЧАЄМ, ПРАВАМИ СПОЖИВАЧІВ, ТАК І ТИХ, ЩО ВИНИКАЮТЬ ІНШИМ ЧИНОМ, СТОСОВНО БУДЬ-ЯКОГО ПИТАННЯ, ВКЛЮЧАЮЧИ: НЕПОРУШЕННЯ ПРАВ ТРЕТІХ ОСІБ, ТОВАРНОГО ВИГЛЯДУ, СУМІСНОСТІ, ЗАДОВІЛЬНОЇ ЯКОСТІ АБО ПРИДАТНОСТІ ДЛЯ ОСОБЛИВОЇ МЕТИ (АЛЕ НЕ ОБМЕЖУЮЧИСЬ НИМИ). ЧАСТИНА ІІ. ЛІЦЕНЗІЙНА УГОДА ДЛЯ ПРОГРАМНОГО ЗАБЕЗПЕЧЕННЯ. ВИ ПОГОДЖУЄТЕСЬ НА ВСІ УМОВИ ЦІЄЇ УГОДИ, ЯКЩО КОРИСТУЄТЕСЬ, ВИГОТОВЛЯЄТЕ КОПІЇ АБО РОЗПОВСЮДЖУЄТЕ ВСЕ ПРОГРАМНЕ ЗАБЕЗПЕЧЕННЯ КОМПАНІЇ ADOBE АБО ЙОГО КОМПОНЕНТИ, ВКЛЮЧАЮЧИ ПОЛОЖЕННЯ ПРО НАСТУПНЕ: ВИКОРИСТАННЯ, ЩО ПЕРЕДБАЧЕНЕ В РОЗДІЛІ 2; ДОЗВІЛ НА ПЕРЕДАЧУ В РОЗДІЛІ 4; МОЖЛИВІСТЬ ПІД’ЄДНАННЯ ТА КОНФІДЕНЦІЙНІСТЬ В РОЗДІЛІ 6; ГАРАНТІЇ В РОЗДІЛІ 9 ТА ВІДПОВІДАЛЬНІСТЬ В РОЗДІЛАХ 10 ТА 16. ЯКЩО ВИ ПОГОДИЛИСЬ З УМОВАМИ ЦІЄЇ УГОДИ, ТО ВАС ТА ВАШУ КОМПАНІЮ (ЯКЩО ВИ ОТРИМАЛИ ПРОГРАМНЕ ЗАБЕЗПЕЧЕННЯ І ЯКЕ ВИКОРИСТОВУЄТЬСЯ ВІД ВАШОГО ІМЕНІ) МОЖУТЬ ПРИМУСИТИ ВИКОНУВАТИ ЇЇ ПОЛОЖЕННЯ ЗА УМОВИ. ЯКЩО ВИ НЕ ПОГОДЖУЄТЕСЯ НА УМОВИ ЦІЄЇ УГОДИ, ТО НЕ ВИКОРИСТОВУЙТЕ ЦЕ ПРОГРАМНЕ ЗАБЕЗПЕЧЕННЯ. КОМПАНІЯ ADOBE ДОЗВОЛЯЄ ВИКОРИСТОВУВАТИ ПРОГРАМНЕ ЗАБЕЗПЕЧЕННЯ ЛИШЕ З ДОДЕРЖАННЯМ УМОВ ЦІЄЇ УГОДИ. ВИКОРИСТАННЯ ДЕЯКИХ МАТЕРІАЛІВ ТРЕТІХ ОСІБ, ЩО ВКЛЮЧЕНІ В ПРОГРАМНЕ ЗАБЕЗПЕЧЕННЯ, МОЖЕ РЕГЛАМЕНТУВАТИСЯ ІНШИМИ УМОВАМИ, ЯКІ ЗВИЧАЙНО ВИКЛАДАЮТЬСЯ В ОКРЕМІЙ ЛІЦЕНЗІЙНІЙ УГОДІ, У ФАЙЛІ «READ ME», ЩО МІСТИТЬСЯ В ТАКИХ МАТЕРІАЛАХ, АБО В «ПОВІДОМЛЕННІ ПРО ПРОГРАМНЕ ЗАБЕЗПЕЧЕННЯ ТРЕТІХ ОСІБ ТА/АБО ДОДАТКОВИХ УМОВАХ, З ЯКИМИ МОЖНА ОЗНАЙОМИТИСЯ НА ВЕБСТОРІНЦІ http://www.adobe.com/go/thirdparty_ua. 1. Визначення. «Adobe» означає Adobe Systems Incorporated, компанію у штаті Делавер, що розташована за адресою: 345 Park Avenue, San Jose, California 95110, якщо застосовується підрозділ 12 (a) цієї угоди; в іншому випадку Adobe означає компанію Adobe Systems Software Ireland Limited, що розташована за адресою: Unit 3100, Lake Drive, City West Campus, Saggart D24, Republic of Ireland і заснована відповідно до законів Ірландії, є аффіліатом та ліцензіатом компанії Adobe Systems Incorporated. «Комп’ютер» означає віртуальний або фізичний персональний електронний пристрій, який приймає інформацію в цифровій або аналогічній формі та обробляє її для досягнення конкретного результату, виходячи з послідовності команд. «Програмне забезпечення» означає (a) повний зміст файлів (які надсилаються електронним шляхом, на фізичних носіях),

диск (и) або інші носії, разом з якими надається ця угода, включаючи: (i) файли з програмним забезпеченням та іншою комп’ютерною інформацією компанії Adobe, в тому числі Adobe Reader® (надалі - «Adobe Reader»), Adobe® AIRTM, Adobe Flash® Player, Shockwave® Player та Authorware® Player (надалі плейєри Flash, Shockwave і Authorware разом іменуються Adobe Runtimes); (ii) пов’язані пояснювальні письмові матеріали або файли (надалі - «Документація»); (iii) типи шрифтів; (b) покращені, модифіковані версії, оновлення, доповнення та їх копії, що надаються вам компанією Adobe у будь-який час (надалі усі разом «Оновлення»). «Використання» означає отримання, інсталяцію, завантаження, виготовлення копій або отримання інших вигод від функціональних можливостей програмного забезпечення. 2. Ліцензія на програмне забезпечення. Якщо ви отримали Програмне Забезпечення від компанії Adobe або одного з її уповноважених ліцензіатів та дотримувались умов цієї угоди, у т. ч. обмежень, описаних у Розділі 3, то компанія Adobe надає вам невиключну ліцензію використовувати Програмне забезпечення для цілей, описаних у Документації, як визначено нижче: 2.1 Загальне використання. На комп’ютері з відповідними технічними характеристиками ви можете здійснювати інсталяцію та користування однією копією програмного забезпечення. Суттєві обмеження на використання програмного забезпечення викладені в Розділі 3. 2.2 Використання на Сервері. Ця угода не дозволяє інсталяцію або використання Програмного забезпечення на сервері. Інформацію про використання програмного забезпечення на сервері можна отримати на вебсторінці http://www.adobe.com/go/acrobat_distribute_ua для програми Adobe Reader; або http://www.adobe.com/go/licensing_ua для програми Adobe Runtimes. 2.3 Розповсюдження. Ця ліцензія не надає право на субліцензування або розповсюдження Програмного забезпечення. Iнформацію про оформлення права на розповсюдження програмного забезпечення на фізичному носії, через внутрішню мережу або разом з вашими продуктами або послугами можна знайти на сайті http://www.adobe.com/go/acrobat_distribute_ua для програми Adobe Reader; або http://www.adobe.com/go/licensing_ua для програми Adobe Runtimes. 2.4 Резервна копія. Ви можете зробити одну резервну копію програмного забезпечення, але за умови, що її не можна використовувати або здійснювати інсталяцію. Ви не можете передавати права на резервну копію, крім випадків, коли ви передаєте всі права на Програмне забезпечення, як це передбачається Розділом 4. 3. Зобов’язання та обмеження. 3.1 Обмеження щодо програми Adobe Runtime. Ви не можете використовувати будь-яку програму Adobe Runtime на такому пристрої, що не є PC-сумісним, або разом з будь-якою вбудованою версією або версією будь-якої операційної системи. Для уникнення сумнівів і лише для прикладу неможливо використовувати програму Adobe Runtime на будь-яких (a) мобільних пристроях, телевізійних декодерах, портативних пристроях, телефонних апаратах, портативних web-пристроях, планшетах і планшетних ПК (на які не встановлено програму Windows XP Tablet PC Edition), ігрових консолях, телевізорах, DVD-плейєрах, медіацентрах (за винятком Windows XP Media Center Edition та її подальших версій), електронних рекламних щитах або інших цифрових пристроях виводу, пристроях для доступу до Інтернету або інших пристроях, під’єднаних до Інтернету, PDA, медичних пристроях, банкоматах, телематичних пристроях, ігрових автоматах, побутових автоматичних системах, інтерактивних терміналах, пристроях дистанційного управління або будь-яких інших електронних побутових приладах, (b) мобільних, кабельних, супутникових або телевізійних системах, що використовують послуги оператора або (c) інших пристроях із закритою системою. Інформацію про ліцензування програми Adobe Runtimes з метою використання на подібних системах можна отримати на сайті http://www.adobe.com/go/licensing_ua. 3.2 Обмеження щодо програми Adobe Reader. Ліцензування та розповсюдження програми Adobe Reader здійснюється компанією Adobe для перегляду, розповсюдження і спільного користування файлами в форматі PDF.

3.2.1 Обмеження щодо конверсії програмного забезпечення. Програмне забезпечення Adobe Reader не призначене для інтеграції або використання з іншим програмамним забезпеченням, додатковими модулями або оновленнями, які покладаються на програмне забезпечення Adobe Reader під час конверсії PDF-файлів або зміни їх формату (наприклад, формату PDF у формат TIFF, JPEG або SVG). 3.2.2 Обмеження, повязані з використанням додаткових модулів. Програмне забезпечення Adobe Reader не призначене для інтеграції або використання з додатковими модулями, що не було розроблено відповідно до ключової ліцензійної угоди для інтеграції програмного забезпечення Adobe. 3.2.3 Неактивні функції. Програмне забезпечення Adobe Reader містить функції або можливості, які є прихованими, неактивними або позначаються «сірим кольором» («Неактивні функції»). Неактивні функції активуються тільки в момент відкриття документа PDF, який був створений з використанням відповідної технології, що постачається лише компанією Adobe. Не намагайтесь отримати доступ до неактивних функцій в інший спосіб, крім використання таких дієвих технологій, і не застосовуйте програмне забезпечення Adobe Reader для створення функції, подібної за суттєвими ознаками до неактивної функції, або іншим чином не намагайтеся обійти технологію, що контролює активізацію будь-якої такої функції. Додаткову інформацію про неактивні функції можна отримати на сайті http://www.adobe.com/go/readerextensions_ua. 3.3 Повідомлення. Будь-яка зроблена вами копія програмного забезпечення має містити такі ж повідомлення про авторське право та інші захищені права, що й у програмному забезпеченні. 3.4 Заборона здійснення модифікацій або розшифровки вихідного коду програми. Не дозволяються модифікації, адаптації, переклади або створення похідних продуктів на основі програмного забезпечення. Не намагайтесь розшифровувати вихідний код, декомпілювати, розбивати на компоненти або іншим чином встановлювати вихідний код програмного забезпечення, за винятком прямого дозволу у діючому законодавстві на розшифровку вихідного коду або декомпіляцію програмного забезпечення. 4. Заборона передачі. Не дозволяється прокат, оренда, субліцензування, уступка або передача прав на програмне забезпечення, або видача дозволу на копіювання всього або частини програмного забезпечення на комп’ютер іншого користувача, за винятком наявності прямого дозволу в умовах цієї угоди. Проте, дозволяється передача всіх прав на використання програмного забезпечення іншій фізичній або юридичній особі, якщо: а) також передається (і) ця Угода, та (іі) програмне забезпечення, всі інші програмні засоби та пристрої, поєднані з програмним забезпеченням, або функціонують на його основі, у т. ч. усі копії, оновлення та попередні версії такій особі або компанії, б) знищені всі копії, включаючи резервні, а також у комп’ютері, та в) отримувач погоджується з умовами цієї Угоди та іншими умовами, на підставі яких ви отримали чинну ліцензію на це програмне забезпечення. Незважаючи на вищезазначене, ви не можете передавати навчальні, попередні або не призначені для перепродажу примірники Програмного Забезпечення. 5. Право на інтелектуальну власність. Збереження прав. Програмне забезпечення та будь-які дозволені копії є інтелектуальною власністю Adobe Systems Incorporated та її постачальників. Структура, організація і код Програмного Забезпечення є важливою комерційною таємницею та конфіденційною інформацією компанії Adobe Systems Incorporated та її постачальників. Програмне Забезпечення захищене законодавством, включаючи але не обмежуючись: законами про охорону авторських прав Сполучених Штатів Америки та інших країн, і положеннями міжнародних договорів. За винятком, якщо прямо передбачено цим Договором, вам не надаються будь-які права інтелектуальної власності відносно Програмного забезпечення, а усі права, якщо прямо не надані, продовжують належати компанії «Adobe» та її постачальникам. 6. Сумісність та конфіденційність. 6.1 Призначення PDF-файлів. Якщо комп’ютерна програма дає можливість відкрити PDF-файл, що спроможний відображати рекламний контент, зареєстрований для послуги Adobe PDF, ваш комп’ютер може

підключитись до веб-сайту компанії Adobe, рекламодавця або третьої особи. В цьому разі висилається ІРадреса (Internet Protocol (IP) address). Сторона, яка здійснює хостинг сайту, може використати технологію для відправлення (або розміщення) реклами або іншого електронного контенту, що з’являються у відкритому файлі або поруч із ним. Оп xОператор сайту також може застосувати JavaScript, веб-знаки (також відомі як теги дії або однопіксельні GIF), інші технології для збільшення та вимірювання ефективності реклами та персоналізації рекламного контенту. Спілкування з сайтом регулюється Мережевою політикою конфіденційності Adobe, що відкрита на http://www.adobe.com/go/privacy_ua. Adobe не забезпечує доступ або контроль над функціональними можливостями, які використовуються третіми особами, і політика конфіденційності компанії Adobe не охоплює інформаційну діяльність сайтів третіх осіб. 6.2 Оновлення. Ви визнаєте і погоджуєтесь, що це програмне забезпечення може автоматично підключити ваш комп’ютер до Інтернету для перевірки наявності оновлень, що можуть автоматично завантажуватись на ваш комп’ютер, та повідомити компанію Adobe про успішну інсталяцію цієї Програми. Коли це відбувається, то до сайту компанії Adobe передається тільки реєстраційна інформація неособистого характеру. Зв’язок із сайтом компанії Adobe регламентується Політикою конфіденційності компанії Adobe, з якою можна ознайомитись на веб-сторінці http://www.adobe.com/go/privacy_ua. Прохання прочитати документацію для отримання інформації про зміну стандартних параметрів оновлень. 6.3 Менеджер Параметрів Установки. Flash Player може стати причиною зберігання певних налаштувань користувача на вашому комп’ютері як об’єктів локального спільного користування. Ці параметри установки не пов’язані з вами, але дозволяють вам конфігурувати певні параметри установки Flash Player. Ви можете знайти додаткову інформацію про локальні об’єкти спільного користування на веб-сторінці: http://www.adobe.com/go/flashplayer_security_ua і додаткову інформацію про Менеджер Параметрів Установки за адресою: http://www.adobe.com/go/settingsmanager_ua. 7. Пропозиції третіх осіб. Комп’ютерна програма може надати доступ до сайтів третіх осіб та забезпечити взаємодію з ними, пакетами програмного забезпечення та інформаційними послугами, включаючи потужні прикладні програми для Інтернету («Пропозиції третіх осіб»). Використання і доступ до Пропозиції третьої сторони, включаючи будь-які товари, послуги або інформацію, регламентується умовами таких пропозицій. Пропозиції третіх осіб не є власністю компанії Adobe або не надаються нею. 8. Цифрові сертифікати. 8.1 Використання. В програмному забезпеченні Adobe AIR застосовуються цифрові сертифікати для встановлення видавця прикладних програм Adobe AIR, створених третіми особами. В програмному забезпеченні Adobe Reader включені цифрові сертифікати для нанесення підписів в документах PDF та легалізації підтверджених документів у форматі PDF. Ваш комп’ютер може з’єднатися з Інтернетом в момент підтвердження цифрового сертифікату. Цифрові сертифікати видаються органами сертифікації третіх осіб, у т. ч. продавцями Послуг сертифікації документів Adobe (CDS), перелік яких розміщений на веб-сторінці http://www.adobe.com/go/partners_cds_ua («Органи сертифікації»), або ж вони можуть бути підписані самостійно. 8.2 Умови та положення. Ви спільно з Органом сертифікації несете відповідальність за придбання, використання та надійність цифрових сертифікатів. До того, як покладатися на будь-який сертифікований документ, цифровий підпис або послуги органів сертифікації, перевірте відповідні умови надання цих послуг органом сертифікації, включаючи, наприклад, будь-які угоди з клієнтами, угоди про надійність партнерів, політику сертифікації та інформацію про існуючі практики. Інформацію про продавців програмного забезпечення Abode CDS можна знайти на веб-сторінці http://www.adobe.com/go/partners_cds_ua. 8.3 Підтвердження. Ви згодні, що а) цифровий сертифікат може бути скасовано до часу перевірки, під час якої цифровий сертифікат або підпис видаються чинними (хоча фактично вони такими не є), б) безпека та цілісність цифрового сертифікату можуть піддаватися ризику внаслідок дії або бездіяльності особи, яка підписала документ, відповідного Органу сертифікації чи третьої особи, та в) сертифікат може бути

підписаний самостійно без участі Органу сертифікації. ВИКЛЮЧНА ВІДПОВІДАЛЬНІСТЬ ЗА РІШЕННЯ ПРО НАДІЙНІСТЬ СЕРТИФІКАТУ ПОКЛАДАЄТЬСЯ НА ВАС. ЯКЩО НЕ ВИДАНО ОКРЕМУ ПИСЬМОВУ ГАРАНТІЮ ОРГАНОМ СЕРТИФІКАЦІЇ, ТО ВИ КОРИСТУЄТЕСЬ ЦИФРОВИМИ СЕРТИФІКАТАМИ НА ВАШ РИЗИК. 8.4 Третя особа-бенефіціар. Ви погоджуєтесь, що будь-який орган сертифікації, на який ви покладаєтесь, є третьою особою-бенефіціаром за цією угодою, та має право примушувати виконувати цю угоду від свого імені так, якби він був компанією Adobe. 8.5 Відшкодування. Ви зобов’язуєтесь звільнити Adobe та відповідний орган сертифікації (якщо інше прямо не передбачене в умовах угоди) від відповідальності за відшкодування всіх зобов’язань, збитків, дій та позовних вимог (включаючи всі розумні видатки, витрати та винагороду адвокатів), що виникають у результаті надання будь-якої послуги такого органу, включаючи а) надійність простроченого або скасованого сертифікату, б) неналежну перевірку сертифікату, в) використання сертифікату в інший спосіб, ніж це дозволено відповідними умовами, цією угодою або діючим законодавством, г) нездійснення розумної оцінки за обставин, коли довіряють послугам або сертифікатам особи, яка видає сертифікат, або д) невиконання зобов’язань, визначених в умовах надання послуг (але не обмежуючись цим). 9. Відсутність жодних гарантій. ЦЯ КОМПЮТЕРНА ПРОГРАМА ПОСТАВЛЯЄТЬСЯ НА УМОВАХ „ЯК Є” І МОЖЕ МІСТИТИ ПЕВНУ КІЛЬКІСТЬ НЕДОЛІКІВ. ADOBE, ЇЇ ПОСТАЧАЛЬНИКИ ТА ОРГАНИ СЕРТИФІКАЦІЇ НЕ НАДАЮТЬ ЖОДНИХ ГАРАНТІЙ ЩОДО РОБОЧИХ ХАРАКТЕРИСТИК АБО РЕЗУЛЬТАТІВ, ОДЕРЖАНИХ З ВИКОРИСТАННЯМ ПРОГРАМНОГО ЗАБЕЗПЕЧЕННЯ, ПОСЛУГ ОРГАНУ СЕРТИФІКАЦІЇ АБО ІНШИХ ПРОПОЗИЦІЙ ТРЕТІХ ОСІБ. ЗА ВИНЯТКОМ БУДЬ-ЯКОЇ ГАРАНТІЇ, УМОВИ, ЗАЯВИ АБО ПОЛОЖЕННЯ, ЯКІ НЕ МОЖУТЬ БУТИ ВИКЛЮЧЕНИМИ АБО ЯКІ НЕ ДОЗВОЛЯЄТЬСЯ ВИКЛЮЧИТИ АБО ОБМЕЖИТИ ЗГІДНО ЧИННОГО ЗАКОНОДАВСТВА, ЯКЕ ЗАСТОСОВУЄТЬСЯ У ВАШІЙ ЮРИСДИКЦІЇ, КОМПАНІЯ ADOBE, ЇЇ ПОСТАЧАЛЬНИКИ ТА ОРГАНИ СЕРТИФІКАЦІЇ НЕ НАДАЮТЬ ГАРАНТІЙ, УМОВ АБО ПОЛОЖЕНЬ (ВИРАЖЕНИХ ПРЯМО ЧИ ОПОСЕРЕДКОВАНО, ЯК ЗА ЗАКОНОМ, ЗАГАЛЬНИМ ПРАВОМ, ЗВИЧАЄМ, ПРАВАМИ СПОЖИВАЧІВ, ТАК І ТИХ, ЩО ВИНИКАЮТЬ ІНШИМ ЧИНОМ, СТОСОВНО БУДЬ-ЯКОГО ПИТАННЯ, ВКЛЮЧАЮЧИ: НЕПОРУШЕННЯ ПРАВ ТРЕТІХ ОСІБ, ТОВАРНОГО ВИГЛЯДУ, СУМІСНОСТІ, ЗАДОВІЛЬНОЇ ЯКОСТІ АБО ПРИДАТНОСТІ ДЛЯ ОСОБЛИВОЇ МЕТИ (АЛЕ НЕ ОБМЕЖУЮЧИСЬ НИМИ). Положення Розділів 9 та 10 зберігають чинність після припинення дії цієї угоди з будь-якої причини, але не означають або не створюють право на подальше використання програмного забезпечення. 10. Обмеження відповідальності. У ЖОДНОМУ ВИПАДКУ КОМПАНІЯ ADOBE, ЇЇ ПОСТАЧАЛЬНИКИ АБО ОРГАНИ СЕРТИФІКАЦІЇ НЕ НЕСУТЬ ВІДПОВІДАЛЬНІСТЬ ПЕРЕД КЛІЄНТОМ ЗА ЗБИТКИ, ПОЗОВНІ ВИМОГИ АБО ВИТРАТИ, ВКЛЮЧАЮЧИ ПОБІЧНІ, НЕПРЯМІ, ВИПАДКОВІ ЗБИТКИ, АБО НЕОТРИМАНИЙ ПРИБУТОК ЧИ ВТРАЧЕНІ ЗАОЩАДЖЕННЯ, НАВІТЬ КОЛИ ПРЕДСТАВНИК ADOBE БУВ ПОВІДОМЛЕНИЙ ПРО МОЖЛИВІСТЬ ТАКИХ ЗБИТКІВ, ПОЗОВНИХ ВИМОГ АБО ВИТРАТ. ВИЩЕВКАЗАНІ ОБМЕЖЕННЯ І ВИНЯТКИ ЗАСТОСОВУЮТЬСЯ В МАКСИМАЛЬНІЙ, ДОЗВОЛЕНІЙ ЧИННИМ ЗАКОНОДАВСТВОМ В ВАШІЙ ЮРИСДИКЦІЇ МІРІ. ЗАГАЛЬНИЙ ОБСЯГ ВІДПОВІДАЛЬНОСТІ КОМПАНІЇ ADOBE, ЇЇ ПОСТАЧАЛЬНИКІВ ТА ОРГАНІВ СЕРТИФІКАЦІЇ ЗГІДНО З ЦІЄЮ УГОДОЮ ОБМЕЖУЄТЬСЯ СУМОЮ, ЯКА БУЛА СПЛАЧЕНА ЗА ПРОГРАМНЕ ЗАБЕЗПЕЧЕННЯ. Жодний пункт цієї угоди не обмежує відповідальність Adobe перед клієнтом у випадку смерті або шкоди здоров’ю у результаті необережності компанії Adobe або внаслідок обману (шахрайства). Компанія Adobe виступає від імені своїх постачальників та органів сертифікації з метою відмови, виключення та (або) обмеження зобов’язань, гарантій та відповідальності, передбачених у цій угоді, але не відповідає за інші аспекти та цілі. Для отримання додаткової інформації прохання ознайомитись із спеціальною інформацію про юрисдикцію в кінці цієї угоди (якщо надається) або звернутися до Відділу обслуговування клієнтів компанії Adobe. 11. Експортні правила.

Ви погоджуєтесь, що Програмне забезпечення не буде постачатись, передаватись або експортуватись в будь-яку країну або використовуватись будь-яким чином, відносно якої існує заборона в силу Закону США про контроль за експортом або будь-яких інших законів, обмежень або постанов (разом іменуються «Закони про експорт»). До того ж, якщо Програмне забезпечення визначене як товар, експорт якого підлягає контролю в силу Законів про експорт, то ви заявляєте та гарантуєте, що ви не є громадянином і не знаходитесь на території країни, по відношенню до якої встановлене ембарго або будь-яке інше обмеження (включаючи, без обмежень, Іран, Сірію, Судан, Лівію, Кубу та Північну Корею), і по відношенню до Вас не застосовується будь-яка інша передбачена Законами про експорт заборона отримати Програмне забезпечення. Всі права використання Програмного Забезпечення надаються за умови, що такі права втрачаються, якщо ви не дотримуєтесь умов цього договору. 12. Законодавство, що регулює цей Договір. Тлумачення та регламентація цієї Угоди здійснюється згідно з чинним законодавством: а) штату Каліфорнія, якщо ліцензія на програмне забезпечення одержана під час перебування у США, Канаді або Мексиці; або б) Японії, якщо ліцензія на програмне забезпечення одержана під час перебування в Японії, Китаї, Кореї або іншій країні Південно-Східної Азії, де всі офіційні мови викладені ідеографічним шрифтом (наприклад, ханзі, канджі або ханджа), та (або) іншим шрифтом, який оснований на подібному до ідеографічному шрифті (хангул або кана); або в) Англії, якщо ліцензія на програмне забезпечення одержана під час перебування в іншій юрисдикції, не зазначеній вище. Всі суперечки, пов’язані з цією угодою, підлягають розв’язанню у невиключній юрисдикції округу Санта Клара (Каліфорнія), якщо застосовується законодавство Каліфорнії, Окружного суду Токіо в Японії, коли застосовується законодавство Японії, та компетентних судів Англії, якщо застосовується законодавство Англії. До цього договору не застосовуються положення колізійного права будь-якої юрисдикції і положення Конвенції Об’єднаних Націй про договори міжнародної купівлі-продажу, застосування яких прямо виключається. 13. Загальні положення. Якщо будь-яка частина цієї угоди визнана недійсною або втратила юридичну силу, то вона не впливає на чинність законних положень цієї угоди, які зберігають юридичну силу згідно з цими умовами і виконання яких може забезпечуватись юридичним примусом. Ця угода не зменшує законних прав будь-якої сторони, що є споживачем. Ця угода може змінюватись тільки письмово уповноваженою посадовою особою компанії Adobe. Ви можете отримувати ліцензії від компанії Adobe стосовно оновлень з додатковими або іншими умовами. Цей договір становить повну угоду між Adobe та вами відносно Програмного Забезпечення, і він замінює собою будь-які попередні заяви, обговорення, зобов’язання, повідомлення або рекламні оголошення, які стосуються Програмного Забезпечення. 14. Повідомлення для кінцевих споживачів в уряді США. Компанія Adobe зобов’язується дотримуватись всіх чинних законів про рівні можливості, включаючи, за належних обставин, положення виконавчого наказу 11246 з поправками, Статті 402 Закону про сприяння реабілітації ветеранів в’єтнамської війни 1974 р. (38 USC 4212), та Статті 503 Закону про реабілітацію 1973 р. з поправками, та положень 41 Кодексу федеральних правил, Частини 60-1 до 60-60, 60-250 та 60-741. Положення про дії, що містяться в попередньому реченні, включені як довідковий матеріал в цій угоді. 15. Дотримання умов ліцензій. Компанії або організації зобов’язуються, що за першою вимогою компанії Adobe або її уповноваженого представника ці юридичні особи протягом тридцяти (30) днів оформлять повну документацію та сертифікат, що використання програмного забезпечення та всіх його компонентів в момент запиту узгоджується з чинними ліцензіями компанії Adobe. 16. Особливі положення та виключення.

16.1 Обмеження відповідальності для користувачів, які живуть в Німеччині та Австрії. 16.1.1 Якщо ви отримали програмне забезпечення в Німеччині або Австрії та проживаєте в цих країнах, то не застосовується частина 10. Замість неї, на підставі положень частини 16.1.2, передбачена законом відповідальність компанії Adobe за збитки обмежується таким чином: (і) Adobe несе відповідальність тільки в рамках типових збитків, які можна передбачити на момент укладання ліцензійної угоди щодо збитків, спричинених порушенням суттєвого контрактного зобов’язання внаслідок незначної недбалості, та (іі) компанія Adobe не несе відповідальність за збитки, спричинені порушенням несуттєвого контрактного зобов’язання внаслідок незначної недбалості. 16.1.2 Вищезазначене обмеження відповідальності не застосовується до будь-якої обов’язкової відповідальності, визначеній у законодавстві, зокрема, на підставі Німецького Закону про відповідальність за товари, надання конкретної гарантії або відповідальність за заподіяння шкоди здоров’ю осіб. 16.1.3 Ви маєте виконати всі розумні заходи для попередження та зменшення збитків, зокрема, робити резервні копії програмного забезпечення та даних на вашому комп’ютері згідно з положеннями цієї угоди.

Для відповідей на запитання стосовно цієї угоди та запиту щодо будь-якої інформації в компанії Adobe прохання звертатись за адресою, зазначеною в цій документації, або до представництва компанії Adobe у вашій країні (за допомогою сайту) www.adobe.com/ua. Adobe, AIR, Authorware, Flash, Reader та Shockwave є зареєстрованими торговельними марками або торговельними марками компанії Adobe Systems Incorporated в Сполучених Штатах та (або) інших країнах.

Reader_Player_AIR_WWEULA-uk_UA-20080204_1313

 

ADOBE SYSTEMS INCORPORATED Warranty Disclaimer and Software License Agreement. THIS DOCUMENT INCLUDES WARRANTY INFORMATION (PART I) AND A LICENSE AGREEMENT GOVERNING THE USE OF ADOBE SOFTWARE (PART II). PART I. WARRANTY DISCLAIMER. THE SOFTWARE AND OTHER INFORMATION IS DELIVERED TO YOU “AS IS” AND WITH ALL FAULTS. ADOBE AND ITS SUPPLIERS AND CERTIFICATE AUTHORITIES DO NOT AND CANNOT WARRANT THE PERFORMANCE OR RESULTS YOU MAY OBTAIN BY USING THE SOFTWARE, CERTIFICATE AUTHORITY SERVICES OR OTHER THIRD PARTY OFFERINGS. EXCEPT TO THE EXTENT ANY WARRANTY, CONDITION, REPRESENTATION OR TERM CANNOT OR MAY NOT BE EXCLUDED OR LIMITED BY LAW APPLICABLE TO YOU IN YOUR JURISDICTION, ADOBE AND ITS SUPPLIERS AND CERTIFICATE AUTHORITIES MAKE NO WARRANTIES CONDITIONS, REPRESENTATIONS, OR TERMS (EXPRESS OR IMPLIED WHETHER BY STATUTE, COMMON LAW, CUSTOM, USAGE OR OTHERWISE) AS TO ANY MATTER INCLUDING WITHOUT LIMITATION NONINFRINGEMENT OF THIRD PARTY RIGHTS, MERCHANTABILITY, INTEGRATION, SATISFACTORY QUALITY, OR FITNESS FOR ANY PARTICULAR PURPOSE. PART II. SOFTWARE LICENSE AGREEMENT. BY USING, COPYING OR DISTRIBUTING ALL OR ANY PORTION OF THE ADOBE SOFTWARE, YOU ACCEPT ALL THE TERMS AND CONDITIONS OF THIS AGREEMENT, INCLUDING, IN PARTICULAR, THE PROVISIONS ON: USE CONTAINED IN SECTION 2; TRANSFERABILITY IN SECTION 4; CONNECTIVITY AND PRIVACY IN SECTION 6; WARRANTY IN SECTION 9 AND LIABILITY IN SECTIONS 10 AND 16. UPON ACCEPTANCE, THIS AGREEMENT IS ENFORCEABLE AGAINST YOU AND ANY ENTITY THAT OBTAINED THE SOFTWARE AND ON WHOSE BEHALF IT IS USED. IF YOU DO NOT AGREE, DO NOT USE THE SOFTWARE. ADOBE PERMITS YOU TO USE THE SOFTWARE ONLY IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE TERMS OF THIS AGREEMENT. USE OF SOME THIRD PARTY MATERIALS INCLUDED IN THE SOFTWARE MAY BE SUBJECT TO OTHER TERMS AND CONDITIONS TYPICALLY FOUND IN A SEPARATE LICENSE AGREEMENT, A “READ ME” FILE LOCATED NEAR SUCH MATERIALS OR IN THE “THIRD PARTY SOFTWARE NOTICES AND/OR ADDITIONAL TERMS AND CONDITIONS” FOUND AT http://www.adobe.com/go/thirdparty. 1. Definitions. “Adobe” means Adobe Systems Incorporated, a Delaware corporation, 345 Park Avenue, San Jose, California 95110, if subsection 12(a) of this agreement applies; otherwise it means Adobe Systems Software Ireland Limited, Unit 3100, Lake Drive, City West Campus, Saggart D24, Republic of Ireland, a company organized under the laws of Ireland and an affiliate and licensee of Adobe Systems Incorporated. “Computer” means a virtual or physical personal electronic device that accepts information in digital or similar form and manipulates it for a specific result based on a sequence of instructions. “Software” means (a) all of the contents of the files (delivered electronically or on physical media), or disk(s) or other media with which this agreement is provided, which may include (i) Adobe or third party computer information or software, including Adobe Reader® (“Adobe Reader”), Adobe® AIR™ (“Adobe AIR”), Adobe Flash® Player, Shockwave® Player and Authorware® Player (collectively, Adobe AIR and the Flash, Shockwave and Authorware players are the “Adobe Runtimes”); (ii) related explanatory written materials or files (“Documentation”); and (iii) fonts; and (b) upgrades, modified versions, updates, additions, and copies of the foregoing, provided to you by Adobe at any time (collectively, “Updates”). “Use” means to access, install, download, copy, or otherwise benefit from using the functionality of the Software.

2. Software License. If you obtained the Software from Adobe or one of its authorized licensees, and subject to your compliance with the terms of this agreement, including the restrictions in Section 3, Adobe grants to you a non-exclusive license to use the Software in the manner and for the purposes described in the Documentation as follows: 2.1 General Use. You may install and use one copy of the Software on your compatible Computer. See Section 3 for important restrictions on the use of the Software. 2.2 Server Use. This agreement does not permit you to install or use the software on a computer file server. For information on use of software on a computer file server please refer to http://www.adobe.com/go/acrobat_distribute for information about Adobe Reader; or http://www.adobe.com/go/licensing for information about the Adobe Runtimes. 2.3 Distribution. This license does not grant you the right to sublicense or distribute the Software. For information about obtaining the right to distribute the Software on tangible media or through an internal network or with your product or service please refer to http://www.adobe.com/go/acrobat_distribute for information about Adobe Reader; or http://www.adobe.com/go/licensing for information about the Adobe Runtimes. 2.4 Backup Copy. You may make one backup copy of the Software, provided your backup copy is not installed or used. You may not transfer the rights to a backup copy unless you transfer all rights in the Software as provided under Section 4. 3. Obligations and Restrictions. 3.1 Adobe Runtime Restrictions. You will not use any Adobe Runtime on any non-PC device or with any embedded or device version of any operating system. For the avoidance of doubt, and by example only, you may not use an Adobe Runtime on any (a) mobile device, set top box (STB), handheld, phone, web pad, tablet and Tablet PC (other than with Windows XP Tablet PC Edition and its successors), game console, TV, DVD player, media center (other than with Windows XP Media Center Edition and its successors), electronic billboard or other digital signage, Internet appliance or other Internet-connected device, PDA, medical device, ATM, telematic device, gaming machine, home automation system, kiosk, remote control device, or any other consumer electronics device, (b) operator-based mobile, cable, satellite, or television system or (c) other closed system device. For information on licensing Adobe Runtimes for use on such systems please visit http://www.adobe.com/go/licensing. 3.2 Adobe Reader Restrictions. Adobe Reader is licensed and distributed by Adobe for viewing, distributing and sharing PDF files. 3.2.1 Conversion Restrictions. You will not integrate or use Adobe Reader with any other software, plug-in or enhancement that uses or relies upon Adobe Reader when converting or transforming PDF files into a different format (e.g., a PDF file into a TIFF, JPEG, or SVG file). 3.2.2 Plug-in Restrictions. You will not integrate or use Adobe Reader with any plug-in software not developed in accordance with the Adobe Integration Key License Agreement. 3.2.3 Disabled Features. Adobe Reader may contain features or functionalities that are hidden or appear disabled or “grayed out” (the “Disabled Features”). Disabled Features will activate only when opening a PDF document that was created using enabling technology available only from Adobe. You will not access, or attempt to access, any Disabled Features other than through the use of such enabling technologies, nor will you rely on Adobe Reader to create a feature substantially similar to any Disabled Feature or otherwise circumvent the technology that controls activation of any such feature. For more information on disabled features, please refer to http://www.adobe.com/go/readerextensions. 3.3 Notices. Any copy of the Software that you make must contain the same copyright and other proprietary notices that appear on or in the Software. 3.4 No Modification or Reverse Engineering. You may not modify, adapt, translate or create derivative works based upon the Software. You will not reverse engineer, decompile, disassemble or otherwise attempt to discover the

source code of the Software except to the extent you may be expressly permitted to reverse engineer or decompile under applicable law. 4. Transfer. You may not rent, lease, sublicense, assign or transfer your rights in the Software, or authorize all or any portion of the Software to be copied onto another user’s Computer except as may be expressly permitted by this agreement. You may, however, transfer all your rights to use the Software to another person or legal entity provided that: (a) you also transfer (i) this agreement, and (ii) the Software and all other software or hardware bundled or preinstalled with the Software, including all copies, updates and prior versions, to such person or entity, (b) you retain no copies, including backups and copies stored on a Computer, and (c) the receiving party accepts the terms and conditions of this agreement and any other terms and conditions upon which you obtained a valid license to the Software. Notwithstanding the foregoing, you may not transfer education, pre-release, or not for resale copies of the Software. 5. Intellectual Property Ownership, Reservation of Rights. The Software and any authorized copies that you make are the intellectual property of Adobe Systems Incorporated and its suppliers. The structure, organization and code of the Software are the valuable trade secrets and confidential information of Adobe Systems Incorporated and its suppliers. The Software is protected by law, including without limitation the copyright laws of the United States and other countries, and by international treaty provisions. Except as expressly stated herein, this agreement does not grant you any intellectual property rights in the Software and all rights not expressly granted are reserved by Adobe and its suppliers. 6. Connectivity and Privacy. 6.1 Use of PDF Files. When you use the Software to open a PDF file that has been enabled to display ads through registration with the Ads for Adobe PDF service, your computer may connect to a website operated by Adobe, an advertiser, or other third party. Your Internet Protocol (IP) address is sent when this happens. The party hosting the site may use technology to send (or “serve”) advertising or other electronic content that appears in or near the opened file. The website operator may also use JavaScript, web beacons (also known as action tags or single-pixel gifs), and other technologies to increase and measure the effectiveness of advertisements and to personalize advertising content. Your communication with Adobe websites is governed by the Adobe Online Privacy Policy found at http://www.adobe.com/go/privacy. Adobe may not have access to or control over features that a third party may use, and the information practices of third party websites are not covered by the Adobe Online Privacy Policy. 6.2 Updating. You acknowledge and agree that the Software may cause your Computer to automatically connect to the Internet to check for updates that are available for automatic download to your Computer and to let Adobe know the Software is successfully installed. Only non-personal identifying information is transmitted to Adobe when this happens. Your communication with Adobe websites is governed by the Adobe Online Privacy Policy found at http://www.adobe.com/go/privacy. Please consult the Documentation for information about changing default update settings. 6.3 Settings Manager. Flash Player may cause certain user settings to be stored on your Computer as a local shared object. These settings are not associated with you, but allow you to configure certain settings within the Flash Player. You can find more information on local shared objects at http://www.adobe.com/go/flashplayer_security and more information on the Settings Manager at http://www.adobe.com/go/settingsmanager. 7. Third Party Offerings. The Software may allow you to access and interoperate with third party websites, software applications, and data services, including rich Internet applications (“Third Party Offerings”). Your access to and use of any Third Party Offering, including any goods, services or information, is governed by the terms and conditions respecting such offerings. Third Party Offerings are not owned or provided by Adobe.

8. Digital Certificates. 8.1 Use. Adobe AIR uses digital certificates to help you identify the publisher of Adobe AIR applications created by third parties. Adobe Reader uses digital certificates to sign and validate signatures within PDF documents and to validate certified PDF documents. Your Computer may connect to the Internet at the time of validation of a digital certificate. Digital certificates are issued by third party certificate authorities, including Adobe Certified Document Services (CDS) vendors listed at http://www.adobe.com/go/partners_cds (“Certificate Authorities”), or can be selfsigned. 8.2 Terms and Conditions. Purchase, use and reliance upon digital certificates is the responsibility of you and a Certificate Authority. Before you rely upon any certified document, digital signature or Certificate Authority services, you should review the applicable terms and conditions under which the relevant Certificate Authority provides services, including, for example, any subscriber agreements, relying party agreements, certificate policies and practice statements. See the links on http://www.adobe.com/go/partners_cds for information about Adobe’s CDS vendors. 8.3 Acknowledgement. You agree that (a) a digital certificate may have been revoked prior to the time of verification, making the digital signature or certificate appear valid when in fact it is not, (b) the security or integrity of a digital certificate may be compromised due to an act or omission by the signer of the document, the applicable Certificate Authority, or any other third party and (c) a certificate may be a self-signed certificate not provided by a Certificate Authority. YOU ARE SOLELY RESPONSIBLE FOR DECIDING WHETHER OR NOT TO RELY ON A CERTIFICATE. UNLESS A SEPARATE WRITTEN WARRANTY IS PROVIDED TO YOU BY A CERTIFICATE AUTHORITY, YOU USE DIGITAL CERTIFICATES AT YOUR SOLE RISK. 8.4 Third Party Beneficiaries. You agree that any Certificate Authority you rely upon is a third party beneficiary of this agreement and shall have the right to enforce this agreement in its own name as if it were Adobe. 8.5 Indemnity. You agree to hold Adobe and any applicable Certificate Authority (except as expressly provided in its terms and conditions) harmless from any and all liabilities, losses, actions, damages, or claims (including all reasonable expenses, costs, and attorneys fees) arising out of or relating to any use of, or reliance on, any service of such authority, including, without limitation (a) reliance on an expired or revoked certificate, (b) improper verification of a certificate, (c) use of a certificate other than as permitted by any applicable terms and conditions, this agreement or applicable law; (d) failure to exercise reasonable judgment under the circumstances in relying on issuer services or certificates or (e) failure to perform any of the obligations as required in the terms and conditions related to the services. 9. No Warranty. The Software is being delivered to you “AS IS” and with ALL FAULTS. ADOBE AND ITS SUPPLIERS AND CERTIFICATE AUTHORITIES DO NOT AND CANNOT WARRANT THE PERFORMANCE OR RESULTS YOU MAY OBTAIN BY USING THE SOFTWARE, CERTIFICATE AUTHORITY SERVICES OR OTHER THIRD PARTY OFFERINGS. EXCEPT TO THE EXTENT ANY WARRANTY, CONDITION, REPRESENTATION OR TERM CANNOT OR MAY NOT BE EXCLUDED OR LIMITED BY LAW APPLICABLE TO YOU IN YOUR JURISDICTION, ADOBE AND ITS SUPPLIERS AND CERTIFICATE AUTHORITIES MAKE NO WARRANTIES CONDITIONS, REPRESENTATIONS, OR TERMS (EXPRESS OR IMPLIED WHETHER BY STATUTE, COMMON LAW, CUSTOM, USAGE OR OTHERWISE) AS TO ANY MATTER INCLUDING WITHOUT LIMITATION NONINFRINGEMENT OF THIRD PARTY RIGHTS, MERCHANTABILITY, INTEGRATION, SATISFACTORY QUALITY, OR FITNESS FOR ANY PARTICULAR PURPOSE. The provisions of Section 9 and Section 10 shall survive the termination of this agreement, howsoever caused, but this shall not imply or create any continued right to use the Software after termination of this agreement. 10. Limitation of Liability. IN NO EVENT WILL ADOBE, ITS SUPPLIERS, OR CERTIFICATE AUTHORITIES BE LIABLE TO YOU FOR ANY DAMAGES, CLAIMS OR COSTS WHATSOEVER INCLUDING ANY CONSEQUENTIAL, INDIRECT, INCIDENTAL DAMAGES, OR ANY LOST PROFITS OR LOST SAVINGS, EVEN IF AN ADOBE REPRESENTATIVE HAS BEEN ADVISED OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH LOSS, DAMAGES, OR

CLAIMS. THE FOREGOING LIMITATIONS AND EXCLUSIONS APPLY TO THE EXTENT PERMITTED BY APPLICABLE LAW IN YOUR JURISDICTION. ADOBE’S AGGREGATE LIABILITY AND THAT OF ITS SUPPLIERS AND CERTIFICATE AUTHORITIES UNDER OR IN CONNECTION WITH THIS AGREEMENT SHALL BE LIMITED TO THE AMOUNT PAID FOR THE SOFTWARE, IF ANY. Nothing contained in this agreement limits Adobe’s liability to you in the event of death or personal injury resulting from Adobe’s negligence or for the tort of deceit (fraud). Adobe is acting on behalf of its suppliers and Certificate Authorities for the purpose of disclaiming, excluding and/or limiting obligations, warranties and liability as provided in this agreement, but in no other respects and for no other purpose. For further information, please see the jurisdiction specific information at the end of this agreement, if any, or contact Adobe’s Customer Support Department. 11. Export Rules. You agree that the Software will not be shipped, transferred or exported into any country or used in any manner prohibited by the United States Export Administration Act or any other export laws, restrictions or regulations (collectively the “Export Laws”). In addition, if the Software is identified as export controlled items under the Export Laws, you represent and warrant that you are not a citizen, or otherwise located within, an embargoed nation (including without limitation Iran, Syria, Sudan, Cuba, and North Korea) and that you are not otherwise prohibited under the Export Laws from receiving the Software. All rights to use the Software are granted on condition that such rights are forfeited if you fail to comply with the terms of this agreement. 12. Governing Law. This agreement will be governed by and construed in accordance with the substantive laws in force: (a) in the State of California, if a license to the Software is obtained when you are in the United States, Canada, or Mexico; or (b) in Japan, if a license to the Software is obtained when you are in Japan, China, Korea, or other Southeast Asian country where all official languages are written in either an ideographic script (e.g., Hanzi, Kanji, or Hanja), and/or other script based upon or similar in structure to an ideographic script, such as Hangul or Kana; or (c) England, if a license to the Software is obtained when you are in any other jurisdiction not described above. The respective courts of Santa Clara County, California when California law applies, Tokyo District Court in Japan, when Japanese law applies, and the competent courts of England, when the law of England applies, shall each have non-exclusive jurisdiction over all disputes relating to this agreement. This agreement will not be governed by the conflict of law rules of any jurisdiction or the United Nations Convention on Contracts for the International Sale of Goods, the application of which is expressly excluded. 13. General Provisions. If any part of this agreement is found void and unenforceable, it will not affect the validity of the balance of this agreement, which shall remain valid and enforceable according to its terms. This agreement shall not prejudice the statutory rights of any party dealing as a consumer. This agreement may only be modified by a writing signed by an authorized officer of Adobe. updates may be licensed to you by Adobe with additional or different terms. This is the entire agreement between Adobe and you relating to the Software and it supersedes any prior representations, discussions, undertakings, communications or advertising relating to the Software. 14. Notice to U.S. Government End Users. For U.S. Government End Users, Adobe agrees to comply with all applicable equal opportunity laws including, if appropriate, the provisions of Executive Order 11246, as amended, Section 402 of the Vietnam Era Veterans Readjustment Assistance Act of 1974 (38 USC 4212), and Section 503 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973, as amended, and the regulations at 41 CFR Parts 60-1 through 60-60, 60-250, and 60-741. The affirmative action clause and regulations contained in the preceding sentence shall be incorporated by reference in this agreement. 15. Compliance with Licenses.

If you are a business or organization, you agree that upon request from Adobe or Adobe’s authorized representative, you will, within thirty (30) days, fully document and certify that use of any and all Software at the time of the request is in conformity with your valid licenses from Adobe. 16. Specific Provisions and Exceptions. 16.1 Limitation of Liability for Users Residing in Germany and Austria. 16.1.1 If you obtained the Software in Germany or Austria, and you usually reside in such country, then Section 10 does not apply, Instead, subject to the provisions in Section 16.1.2, Adobe’s statutory liability for damages shall be limited as follows: (i) Adobe shall be liable only up to the amount of damages as typically foreseeable at the time of entering into the license agreement in respect of damages caused by a slightly negligent breach of a material contractual obligation and (ii) Adobe shall not be liable for damages caused by a slightly negligent breach of a nonmaterial contractual obligation. 16.1.2 The aforesaid limitation of liability shall not apply to any mandatory statutory liability, in particular, to liability under the German Product Liability Act, liability for assuming a specific guarantee or liability for culpably caused personal injuries. 16.1.3 You are required to take all reasonable measures to avoid and reduce damages, in particular to make back-up copies of the Software and your computer data subject to the provisions of this agreement.

If you have any questions regarding this agreement or if you wish to request any information from Adobe please use the address and contact information included with this product or via the web at www.adobe.com to contact the Adobe office serving your jurisdiction Adobe, AIR, Authorware, Flash, Reader, and Shockwave are either registered trademarks or trademarks of Adobe Systems Incorporated in the United States and/or other countries.

Reader_Player_AIR_WWEULA-en_US-20080204_1313

 

